One of the most significant risks to the beef cattle industry is price instability. This price risk can be eliminated through hedging activity. Since, hedging opportunities are based on fat cattle prices in states other than Wisconsin , the Wisconsin cattle producer trades price risk for basis risk. Basis is the difference between the CME fat cattle futures price and the Wisconsin fat cattle cash price, and basis risk occurs when the cash price does not respond in the same manner or by the same magnitude as the futures price. When there is significant correlation in movements in the futures market and the cash market basis risk is less than price risk.

Porcine Reproductive and Respiratory Syndrome (PRRS) is currently one of the most prevalent and economically devastating diseases in swine production. It is a virus that primarily causes abortions in sows and potentially fatal pneumonia in young pigs. This research involved testing PRRRS infected pigs for signs of the virus and looking for a common genetic link between those pigs that faired better than others under the same conditions.

Agriculture and related fields are increasingly impacted by a rapidly changing regulatory environment. A single course no longer meets the needs of our students; the legal information must be infused across the curriculum. A legal resource person, faculty development seminar and a series of workshops focused on curriculum development resulted in legal content being infused into 15 courses impacting approximately 400 students.

One main sediment transport feature within glaciers is eskers created by water from melting glacial ice. During times of rapid melt the amount of sediment that can be transported is at a maximum as well as the size of grains that can be transported. From the remnants of eskers I looked at these maximum flow events. The areas of investigation have been the northwestern portion of Wisconsin and the northeastern portion of Minnesota . These esker remnants are being investigated to find the unusually large grains infrequently transported during times of maximum discharge, and with that, find the maximum amount of energy in eskers.

My research project was the preparation and identification of dinosaur vertebrae. The rocess began with a field jacket and ended with a reassembled vertebra. I was able to identify it as the dinosaur species Triceratops horridus, and the placement of the vertebrae is the first dorsal spine. I conducted my work on the project at the Science Museum of Minnesota, were tools and guidance was made available to me.

This study evaluated the efficiency at which an absorbable collagen sponge saturated with recombinant human bone morphogenetic protein-2 at two different concentrations healed a mid-shaft tibial ostectomy within a canine model. A bilateral tibial ostectomy was performed on twenty-seven dogs. The ostectomy was stabilized with an external fixator where after they were treated with 0.2 mg/mL rhBMP-2, 0.4 mg/mL rhBMP-2, or were strictly wrapped with the collagen sponge. The nine limbs of each treatment group were the contralateral limb served as the untreated control for the individual dog. Results were recorded through mechanical testing of maximum stiffness and torque of each limb and contralateral control eight weeks post-surgery. No significant differences were observed between the maximum stiffness and torque of any of the untreated control limbs (contralateral), control limbs (strictly collagen), or the two treatment groups. However, this evaluation was not able to show healing times between the treatment groups.

Pre-chilled chicken carcasses slaughtered under pilot plant conditions were dipped in antimicrobial solutions. The dips caused 90 to 99.9 % (1-3 log) initial reduction in total bacterial counts. Three carcass samples were presumptive positive for Salmonella but confirmatory tests were negative for Salmonella contamination.

Total bacterial and coliforms levels in 50 raw milk samples were determined by a rapid optical instrument, the Micro Foss and by a conventional method, the Petrifilm plates. The rapid method yielded microbiological contamination data in as little as 3.8 hours compared with 24-48 hours required for the conventional method.

Syneresis of Double cream cheese samples prepared using an acid coagulated cream cheese process was measured following storage for 10 days at refrigeration (4 C) and room temperature (22 C). Cheese stored at room temperature showed higher amounts of Expressible serum (ES) indicating greater syneresis.

Reduced fat cheese with made with 1% citrus fiber showed significant increase in the yield, moisture content and acidity. There were no differences in the fat contents of the two cheeses. However, differences were noticed in the microstructures of the cheeses.

Yogurt made with Lactobacillus bulgaricus, Lactobacillus helveticus and Lactococcus cremoris strains compared with control yogurt made with Streptococcus thermophilus indicated that L. helveticus showed the highest acid development followed by L. bulgaricus. The control, yogurt showed higher pH, lower %TA and few " yogurt -like" characteristic.

Port Salut made using whole milk was ripened on a pine board and a plastic board in an environment controlled chamber for 13 days. The characteristics of the rind resulting from surface application of Brevibacterium linens, the total plate counts and pH were monitored during the ripening.

In the fall of 2005, I walked the pilgrimage route El Camino de Santiago in northern Spain . During my time on the Camino, I interviewed fellow pilgrims to discover why people want to complete this pilgrimage, as well as evaluating my own experiences as I walked.

The purpose of this research is to determine if Keynesian or supply-side fiscal policies are more effective at stimulating the economy. In order to compare these policies, the Kennedy-Johnson and Reagan Administrations were analyzed by examining changes in unemployment, inflation, and economic growth rates during each Administration.

Chili peppers are pungent because of a compound known as capsaicin that binds to TRPV1 receptors. Capsaicin also has the ability to desensitize pain sensing nerve cells. Compounds that bind to TRPV1 without stimulating it may provide relief from some forms of pain. A series of capsaicin-like compounds were synthesized for analgesic purposes.

We report here on our efforts to determine the protein composition of trichomes from Arabidopsis thaliana. Determining the protein makeup of trichomes will provide new information on cell fate determination in leaf cells as well as provide a greater understanding of cell differentiation in general.

Residual pharmaceuticals found in natural and public water sources may exhibit toxic effects on humans. Among these, estrogenic compounds cause increasing concern due to effects on wild populations. This study assesses the multi-generation effects of three estrogenics, bisphenol A, ethynyl estradiol, and 17 b -estradiol, on the him-5 strain of the model organism Caenorhabditis elegans . Reproduction and physical abnormalities are used as toxicity endpoints.

During development, immature nerve cells form neurites which become the axon and dendrites. Neurite initiation requires reorganization of the cytoskeleton. Little is known about how this reorganization is controlled because its study has been limited by technical difficulties. We have developed an acute neural culture system that solves these problems.

Capsaicin, the chemical in chili peppers responsible for the burning sensation, has the potential to be an analgesic. Much research is going into the synthesis of capsaicin analogs with hopes of finding a pain relieving drug. The goal of my research was to synthesize meta-chloro and meta-bromo analogs of capsaicin that could be tested as possible analgesics.

Many pathogens travel explicitly through air movement and pose health and economic risk to animals and producers. Two sampling techniques were put in place to examine bioaerosols; a UV-radiation pump and the impinger-air filtration pump. Samples were collected at designated sites near animal sheds in the Lowe Saxony region of Germany . The microbial growth found on plates was significantly lower when passing through the radiation device. Testing bio-aerosols allows for better knowledge of potential pathogens, and let producers take preventative action and follow specific protocol.

Incarvillateine is a monoterpene alkaloid that has been found to have antinociceptive activity similar to that of morphine. The goal of this project was to complete the enantioselective total synthesis of (-)-incarvilline and(-)-incarvillateine via a scheme that also allows for the facile preparation of (+)-incarvilline and (+)-incarvillateine.

Cells were grown on phenol plates and DNA was extracted. Established Polymerase Chain Reaction (PCR) for LmPH genes was completed and the correct size LmPH product was observed on agarose gels. Future work is to sequence the LmPH product and compare to the expected sequence from the known databases.

We participated in the Belize Study Tour over spring break, and we would like to share some of the things we learned by making a dual-poster presentation. One poster will consist of Mayan history and culture and the other will consist of Belizean biological factors, including the environment and wildlife.

This research compares the incumbency advantage at the state level to the congressional level. The Wisconsin State Legislature was the subject of this study. Surveys and interviews were used to collect data. The results of this research show similar advantages between the state and congressional level of politics.

Hermes is a protein needed for Xenopus laevis  (frog) development. We performed a yeast two-hybrid screen to search for frog proteins that bind Hermes. We are currently characterizing these candidate Hermes binding proteins. By identifying the proteins that interact with Hermes, we hope to better understand how Hermes controls development.

This study examined whether subjects who exhibit behaviors indicative of eating disorders identify with a larger group of individuals diagnosed with an eating disorder. Subjects were asked to rate characteristics of individuals who exhibit eating disorders, using a 7-point Likert scale, as well as the perceived causes of eating disorders.

We are measuring the intensity of light reflected from an asteroid over time to find its rotational period. Many images of the asteroid will be obtained over several nights via the use of the UW-RF Observatory and a remote observatory in Arizona .

Many models of reinforcement value predict that an animal should value a large delayed reinforcer more than a small immediate reinforcer. However, as the delay between choices and presentation of the large reinforcer increases, eventually, an animal should value the small reinforcer more highly. The current experiment employed a discrete-trials choice procedure to test these predictions.

Student attitudes and perceptions of campus safety were assessed in this study. A survey was distributed to two halls measuring perceptions compared to the surrounding city and other campuses. The results yielded correlations concerning the satisfaction with preventative measures, punishment, and sense of safety around campus.

This research examines differences in how men and women cope with sexual harassment behaviors. We expected men to be less likely to indicate that they would report harassment, especially for hostile-environment behaviors. We found a significant three-way interaction indicating that men and women endorse different coping responses to sexual harassment behaviors.

Five male Long-Evans hooded rats received a combination of discrete-trials go/no-go discrimination training and free-operant successive discrimination training. Three additional rats received only free-operant successive discrimination training. These procedures were employed to estimate the ability of subjects to discriminate between pure tone stimuli of various frequencies. Results indicate more rapid acquisition of the discrimination under free-operant successive discrimination training conditions.

Recent advances in superconductor technology are making it practical to use superconductors as replacements for traditional materials in industrial and research applications. Using automated measurement and control techniques, we characterized the properties of a new commercially available high temperature superconductor.

Ultraviolet-visible (UV-VIS) spectroscopy measures the absorbance of ions in solution, and a kinetics study involves monitoring the rate at which reactions proceed. The selection of the time intervals used to measure the rate of oxidation of pyrogallol red (PGR) by MnO 4 - and Cr 2 O 7 -2 in a kinetics experiment will be investigated and the results will be discussed.

This poster presents our recent observations of BeWo cells (model placental trophoblast cells) growing in vitro on tubular three-dimensional scaffolds, using basic tissue engineering methods. Our work has revealed that trophoblast cells developing on these artificial scaffolds show distinctive phenotypic changes, resulting in formation of tissue-like villus structures.

In these studies we evaluated the relative cell densities of CHO-EE cells grown for up to 1 month on 3-D collagen-like scaffolds. Additionally, we calculated the relative surface area of these scaffolds for a given weight using basic morphometric methods. The results of these studies indicate that we are achieving approximately similar cell densities on a 0.5 cm 3 scaffold as we do on a 25cm 2 flask.

Here we report on the long-term growth of HEK-293 cells on 3D collagen-like scaffolds as well as evidence of phenotypic shifts in these cells. After 5 months of continuous culture, the development of tissue-like features illustrated that differentiation is being induced or enhanced by culturing these cells on 3D scaffoldings.

During extended culture on 3-D scaffolding materials, 5 day chicken embryonic neural tissues formed a complex tissue-like architecture with development and differentiation of neuronal cells. However, significant differences were observed between samples from the forebrain and midbrain regions. In particular the midbrain samples showed a propensity to grow out and expand extensively until the entire scaffold became covered in artificial tissue. In the case of forebrain samples outgrowth was much more restricted.

Recent studies in our laboratory have focused on the application of basic tissue engineering methods and techniques to evaluate the behavior of cells under 3-dimensional culture conditions. Now we report on studies using collagen-like tubular scaffolding to grow primary chick embryonic neural cells which then formed complex artificial tissues.

Japanese Knotweed, Polygonum cuspidatum (Polygonaceae) is highly invasive. Most colonies are suspected to reproduce asexually by sprouting from rhizomes, incapable of spreading via seed. We tested the viability of the seeds from a local colony following cold stratification and discovered the seeds were viable. Stratification did not effect germination.

This research proposes representing relations in semantic networks as ordinary nodes, hence, allowing relations to be used just like any other node. This empowers relations that can be: representations of other nodes and relations, dynamically related to similar relations, and part of structural and inheritance hierarchy, enabling distinct instance relations.

This project involves research regarding the theory of the consumption function as used in modern macroeconomic models. Milton Friedman and Franco Modigliani have been awarded the Nobel Prize in Economics for their work in this area. The theory is presented and a model to explain consumption behavior is developed. The functional relationship explaining consumption is estimated.

This project involves research regarding the theory which connects the economic conditions of inflation and unemployment. Several individuals have been awarded a Nobel Prize for Economics as a result of research related to this study. The competing theories to explain this relationship will be presented and a representative model to explain the relationship is developed. The functional relationship explaining inflation is estimated.

This project involves identifying the short term relationship between Fed announcements of policy and equity prices. This is an important relationship since the Federal Reserve has recently changed its policy announcement procedure in an effort to reduce the instability in capital markets generated by policy announcement. The theory regarding asset price determination is presented and a model to identify the Fed policy announcement effect is developed. The functional relationship between policy announcement and equity prices is estimated.

This project involves estimation of the demand for money function. By explaining those factors that determine the demand for money, we can identify the effect of monetary policy. This area of research is responsible for the fundamental changes in macroeconomic theory that have occurred over the past thirty years. The theory regarding the demand for money is presented and a model to explain the demand for money is developed. The functional relationship identifying the determinants of the demand for money is estimated.

Many factors contribute high levels of teacher attrition. The extent to which teacher preparation programs align pre-service teachers' idealized expectations with realities faced by newer teachers can assist in countering such factors. This study compared pre-service teacher expectations with realities faced by newer teachers. Findings illustrate differences between expectations and realities that could be useful in pre-service teacher program design.

This research poster focuses on the media and body image, self-esteem and mental health as impacted by distorted body image, and ways to improve one's body image. It was designed to communicate with adolescents and college-aged adults in settings such as a health fair. The literature review has been translated into language that will communicate several important health promotion concepts regarding enhancing one's body image.

The purpose of this study was to examine the controversy over Native American names and their mascots in sports. During the fall of 2006 the University of North Dakota , Fighting Sioux, were making the news headlines because the university did not want to change the team name or logo.

The purpose of the study was to determine whether the current Bowl Championship Series (BCS) format works for the Division I teams, or if and how a play-off format should be implemented. The results showed almost 75% of the participants in the survey do not agree with the current BCS system.

The purpose of this study was to see if overtraining is a real problem among college athletes. Seventy-eight percent of the participants have seen the effects of overtraining first hand. The participants thought overtraining was more prevalent at the collegiate level than the professional level.

The purpose of this research was to determine whether BOD:P ratios could be effectively utilized to assess water quality in surface water systems. Samples were taken from the Kinnickinnic River and analyzed for BOD and phosphorous. An acceptable BOD:P ratio of at least 2:1 was met or exceeded 12 times. For this water system, high BOD:P ratios are an indicator of better water quality because high ratios were most often obtained when phosphorous concentrations were low. BOD:P ratios are not very useful for surface water systems because the ratio makes it impossible to see which factor is the problem.

The objective of this research was to determine if various forms of cherries change the components of a processed cheese spread. Fresh and processed (dried and canned) cherries were added to the cheese spread. Aged White Cheddar cheese and Young Swiss cheese from the UW-RF dairy plant were used to make the processed cheese spread. Each form of cherry was used in each batch made, to make a total of three different batches. The cheese was put through a series of analytical tests; test included percent fat, percent solids, and moisture content. These tests were then compared to the control.

Aged Cheddar and Swiss cheeses, produced in the UWRF dairy plant, were used to create a ranch flavored processed cheese using Hidden Valley Ranch seasoning in varying amounts which were three ounces in the weak batch and five ounces in the strong batch. The compositional attributes of %fat, moisture, pH, and salt were then measured using the Babcock, Vacuum oven, pH meter, and Corning Chloride Analyzer respectively. The two types were then evaluated by an untrained sensory evaluation panel using a descriptive analysis with scaling test. The results indicated that ranch processed cheese was preferred by 96% of the evaluators and that the weaker batch was the overall favorite.

Organic foods have become more popular in the last few years with approximately 40% of organic products being fruits and vegetables in 2001. To be certified organic, producers can use natural sources of nutrients as fertilizers such as, animal manure, plant debris, fish emulsion, and kelp. These sources may lead to contamination and increased bacteria levels in fruits and vegetables. Since fruits and vegetables are ready to eat foods, this may pose a hazard to consumers. Conventional producers use pesticides, herbicides, and chemical fertilizers which will not directly increase the bacteria levels like the natural sources can. This study tests the total plate count, coliform plate counts, and the presence of  Escherichia coli . Petrifilm, Simplates, and pour plates will be used to determine these counts and a presumptive and confirmed test will be used to determine the presence of  E. coli .

Individually frozen turkey breast fillets were mapped and subdivided according to a grid resulting in 2" square pieces and measured for CIE L*a*b* color values. The color measurements were used to determine the relationship between position and color in order to compare the breast color with its pH, percent moisture uptake and percent cooked yield characteristics. The average color values varied slightly related to position on the breast while the pH, moisture uptake and cook yield varied by location, but not significantly. This suggests that there is a correlation between the color and muscle quality characteristics as well as the color variation on the breast.

Nitrite is used as a food additive in processed meats, as a preservative, antimicrobial agent, and a color fixative. Sodium nitrate is the most commonly used formed of nitrate added in conventional processed meats. Nitrite is found naturally in foods and in high concentrations in certain vegetables. The problem with using nitrites is if they are in excess they can react with proteins under heat and produce nitrosamines, a carcinogen. It is for this reason that cure accelerators are added to the product to react with the excess nitrite. The use of cure accelerators is not required in organic processed meats so the levels of excess nitrite in the product are unknown. The purpose of this study is to compare the levels in both organic and non-organic processed meats and compare them to the legal limits set.

A detailed sample was collected throughout the Batestown Till in three profiles, every 20 cm vertically, for a total of 2.0 meters. The samples were collected in Wedron , IL . The samples were then tested for anisotropy of magnetic susceptibility, to determine how strongly the grains were aligned, and the eigenvalues were determined on each level. These values were compared to laboratory determined values, and were able to determine a strain graph throughout the profiles. There were two localized areas of very high strain; 0.2-0.4m, and 0.8-1.0m. There were also relatively high strains throughout the profile, which is interpreted as the till being deposited as lodgement.

Sodium lactate is a naturally occurring salt of lactic acid which is being increasingly used as an antimicrobial in processed meat products, sometimes in combination with other antimicrobials such as sodium diacetate or potassium lactate. The increased use of sodium lactate is being encouraged by the U.S. Department of Agriculture as method to control pathogens, especially  Listeria monocytogenes . In light of recent  Listeria  outbreaks, regulations have become more stringent with the control of  Listeria  in Ready-to-Eat meat products. Meat processors also use sodium lactate for control of general bacteria populations, allowing a shelf life extension and improved quality. The antimicrobial effect of sodium lactate has been documented in a variety of research, showing that sodium lactate is effective in limiting growth of bacteria populations. In an experiment conducted under the supervision of the University of Wisconsin-River Falls, after 49 days of storage a batch of skinless wieners containing 0% sodium lactate had a bacteria standard plate count of Too Numerous To Count (TNTC), while a batch containing 1.2% sodium lactate included in the product formulation had a standard plate count of 2700 Colony Forming Units per gram. This and additional research shows a broad antimicrobial effect which is generally bacteriostatic, not bacteriocidal. Sodium lactate is gaining importance in the processed meat industry. This trend will likely continue.

The overabundance of the American grey squirrel (Sciurus carolinensis) has been an ecological and aesthetic nuisance to the forests of Scotland ever since their arrival from North America . These creatures' negative interaction with deciduous trees has caused considerable problems in forest conservation practices across the United Kingdom . The purposes of this study demonstrated that squirrels are a threat to Scotland 's sustainable forestry practices, and traditional control methods such as hunting and trapping are ineffective. To illustrate this, a study area was established at Buccleuch Estates in Dalkeith , Scotland . Data were then collected by teams of students observing the damage on individual trees at a selected site representative of the forest stands within the estate. The data revealed damage to nearly every tree examined. Several of the trees had moderate to heavy damage. The use of rodenticides such as warafin in conjunction with the previously mentioned traditional methods seems to be the most feasible option of population control of the American grey squirrel.

Morphological and geometric characteristics of the sinkholes in a locality near Woodville , Wisconsin were determined in this study. By means of physical measurement the length, width, depth, and location data were gathered for each sinkhole. The measurements collected will provide an excellent baseline for future research on the sinkholes in this locality. The results of this analysis showed that the sinkholes and depressions in the study area were mainly small in area and shallow in depth. The majority of the sinkholes had neighbors within15 m.

The increasing genetic modification of plants and animals has raised varied levels of human concern and support worldwide. Genetically modifying plants and/or animals has both advantages and disadvantages that may affect the future of our state, nation, and world. Consumers' knowledge of, and opinions and attitudes towards genetically modified organisms, specifically genetically modified foods, have been carefully studied and traced back to consumers' personal characteristics. Data was collected from-upperclassmen at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls to assess their attitudes towards genetic modification of plants and animals and to cross examine their belief with their gender, topic of study, farming status, and location of permanent residence. This survey was conducted as a comparative study based on the Napier et al. study-Consumer attitudes toward GMOs: the Ohio experience.

A state-of-the-art water-quality monitoring system is being developed on the UWRF campus. Students and faculty have collaborated to install three continuous monitoring stations along the South Fork of the Kinnickinnic River . In addition to improving the scientific understanding of this stream, a key goal is to involve undergraduate students in the process of designing, installing, operating, and analyzing hydrologic data, and to eventually capture real-time data accessible via the internet. Sondes are deployed near the upstream and downstream limits of campus, and also on the principal stormwater outfall. Parameters being monitored include temperature , pH , specific conductance , stream level , dissolved oxygen , nitrate , chloride and turbidity .

Tourism is one of the world's largest and fastest growing industries, and as with any industry there is the potential for risks and rewards. There are three main categories of impacts tourism has on the host community: Economic Impacts, Environmental Impacts, and Socio-Cultural Impacts. Although these three aspects of tourism are interrelated, there is a tendency to ignore the latter. It is much easier to focus on the economic and environmental aspects of tourism as they are more pronounced and much easier to measure. The socio-cultural effects tourism has on host communities have the potential to be positive or negative.

Coffee is one of the largest traded growth commodities in Central America . This growth is driving the need for additional good land and equitable fair trade practices as many farmers are loosing their jobs to unfair trading and land degradation. Sustainable, fair trade, shade-grown and organic coffee growing practices are just a few of the approaches that can be used to meet the needs of future generations. Selva Negra Coffee Estate not only produces top quality gourmet coffee, but also operates under a philosophy that ensures sustainable environmental, social, and economic surroundings.

Until very recently, researchers thought the sharks in Lake Nicaragua were a separate species because there was no way for the sharks to move in or out. It was later discovered that they were jumping along the rapids of the Rio San Juan just like Salmon. Bull Sharks tagged inside the lake were later caught in the open ocean.

The ecosystems of Central America are unique due to their location and annual rainfall. Costa Rica and Nicaragua are located in the middle of Central America and by looking at the ecosystems of these countries you can get an overview of some of the most interesting ecosystems in the world. With diversity from cloud forest to mangrove streams, the four main ecosystems are beautiful and diverse in their nature.

Deforestation in Costa Rica poses a serious global threat to biodiversity. Deforestation has been primarily a result of growing agriculture and coincides with the general development of the country. Issues such as poaching and poverty still pose a barrier to sustainable development in the nation. As nature based tourism gains popularity in the region, and the resulting development pressures persist, the tropical forests ironically stand in danger of being lost. A combination of proactive policy making and raised public awareness must be made if the country is to meet its goal of responsible land stewardship.

A visit to Costa Rica would not be complete without seeing any of its four species of monkeys: the cebus (or capuchin), howler, spider, and squirrel. They belong to a group called New World monkeys, along with about 50 other species, which evolved from a single simian group that appeared about 40 million years ago in Africa and Asia .

The viability of the people of Datanl - El Diablo Nature Reserve ( Nicaragua ), lies in their choices about future land use. The answers do not come quickly or easily. For these people, nature tourism, in combination with shade-grown coffee and sugar cane, is being considered as a solution to their struggle with poverty. Invariably, tourism is the proverbial double-edged sword of prosperity versus change; the first is possible while the other is almost certain. How can they maximize one, while minimizing the other? The answer lies in the very conscious and deliberate choices they are making for implementation.

The leatherback sea turtle is one of the largest living reptiles. In the United States , these turtles are characterized as endangered under the US Federal Endangered Species Act. Internationally, they are listed as critically endangered by the International Union for Conservation of Nature and Natural Resources. Currently, estimations of 20,000 to 30,000 female leatherbacks exist worldwide. Scientists estimate that only 1 in 1000 hatchlings survive into adulthood. Scientists worldwide come to Costa Rica to study these creatures in hope that they can gather information about their biology, their nesting habits, and their early development in order to save them from extinction.

The Mombacho Volcano Nature Reserve in Nicaragua is a place where humans and nature can meet. It is an example of a well-established place of ecotourism that strongly believes in sustainability. After visiting Mombacho guests gain an appreciation for the history of the volcano, the amazing amount of biodiversity, and the ecotourism and sustainability efforts brought about by the local people. This project was designed with the goal of informing educators, students, and interested people in the beliefs, history, and efforts of the Mombacho Nature Reserve.

Several pounds of barley seed were irradiated with fast neutrons. Second generation seed following irradiation was planted in Rosemont , Minnesota and inoculated with rust in hopes of finding a naturally resistant plant with signs of susceptibility to stem rust. Phenotypic mutations observed in a number of plants suggest the irradiation was a success but only a limited number of plants became infected with stem rust. Stem rust infected plants were collected and will be analyzed further in hopes of locating one, or possibly more, genes coding for rust resistance in barley.

The purpose of this work was to examine how feelings of empathy and presentation style would affect participants' racial attitudes, both immediately and after two weeks. Participants' level of empathy was manipulated with instructions (high empathy, no empathy) before they were presented with information about racism that was either broad-based and statistical or in the form of narrative first-person stories (both formats contained the same information). Results showed that the story format elicited less denial of the information they read, though this did not extend to their attitudes about (and denial of) racism generally, neither immediately nor two weeks later.

Sonoluminescence is the production of light from a tiny air bubble being expanded and contracted violently by the alternating pressure of a standing sound wave. The process is still not completely understood within the scientific community, and has become a focus of study within the last fifteen years. To accomplish sonoluminescence, we have constructed an apparatus consisting of a round bottom flask with piezoelectric ceramic devices epoxied to it. The piezoelectric devices vibrate water in the flask making it possible to trap and drive a bubble in the water.

The number of different molecules with the formula C 64 H 130 is more than one hundred million billion times greater that the number of different molecules of all types and formulas cataloged in all of human history. Therefore, it is imperative that theoretical chemists develop methods to predict properties of molecules from their structures so that synthetic chemists can identify on which of the enumerable molecular structures they should expend their finite resources. One such approach to predicting the properties of molecules involves something called a topological index. We present an analysis of the problems involved in the use of one such topological index for quantitative structure-property relationships.

Lead persists as an environmental pollutant even years following its disuse in general consumer products. For this project, the lead content in various water sources throughout the region was analyzed using atomic absorption spectroscopy (AAS). Water samples from both municipal and natural water sources will be analyzed and the lead levels at each sampling site reported. If time permits, a secondary analysis using an alternative colorimetric method will be used to confirm the (AAS) results. The results of this assay will serve to educate people on lead's continued prevalence and increase awareness of its presence in our drinking water.

Bisphenol-A is a chemical which leaches from polycarbonate drinking bottles such as those made from Nalgene and Lexan. The concentration of bisphenol-A, a known mutagen and teratogen, was measured by UV-VIS spectroscopy. A standard curve of Absorbance vs. [bisphenol-A] was derived from standard solutions of bisphenol-A in a 1:1 mixture of ethanol and water at a wavelength of 280 nm. The concentration of bisphenol-A was determined in water samples taken from four different polycarbonate drinking bottles. Each drinking bottle had undergone a different treatment designed to mimic the approximate conditions under which these bottles are subjected. These four treatments include: heat, rigorous shaking, heavy detergent, and mild detergent. The results of this analysis will be discussed.

A laser-pointer-based colorimetric detector will be assembled and its validity will be assessed by comparison to visual and literature results. The usefulness of this detector to other visual indicators will be evaluated by a simple acid-base titration using phenolphthalein as an indicator. The difference in precision between visual and spectrometer based endpoints will be assessed. We expect the results of the investigation to demonstrate the applicability of this detector to other titrations based on visual indicators (i.e., color changes).

Last J-term, four students embarked for Ambergris Caye in Belize . Spending three weeks along the ocean at the Bacalar Chico Marine Reserve we collected data to conduct a conch population survey. Also, using a underwater digital camera, we took pictures for a Bacalar Chico field guide of marine and terrestrial flora and fauna being assembled by a local Peace Corps volunteer. Results of the population survey and outstanding photos will be shared and presented.

The goal of this project is to reduce the number of trials required in a volumetric analysis experiment (i.e., a titration experiment.) A multiplexed modeling routine will be used to analyze the results of a redox titration of sodium oxalate with potassium permanganate. Traditionally, when students perform this experiment, a total of nine titrations must be run to ensure the necessary precision. Using the multiplexed modeling method, it is anticipated that the number of titration analyses can be reduced to five, while still attaining the same, or better, precision. The experiment will compare the results and precision of a traditionally executed analysis and one performed using multiplexed modeling method. The results of this comparison will be discussed. If time permits, this multiplexed modeling method will be applied to other volumetric analyses.

The Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) has recently reduced the acceptable arsenic concentration in drinking water from 50 ppb to 10 ppb. Arsenic has been found to contribute to bladder and lung cancer as well as diabetes and heart disease. We hope to determine if several unnamed water sources are in compliance with this new standard. Standard arsenic samples will be analyzed by atomic absorption spectroscopy (AAS) to generate a calibration curve. Water samples from 4 local and national sources will be analyzed using the standard curve to determine the arsenic concentrations within a given certainty. These results may prove extremely relevant since the drinking water in Minnesota and Wisconsin have both previously tested above the old EPA standard of 50 ppb.

Women have been historical underrepresented in the field of journalism, and it is journalists we mostly rely upon when hearing information concerning war. With the gendered imbalance that exists in journalism, it leads us to question whether we are getting a full picture of what is happening in the war-field. A content analysis of three major newspapers was conducted to investigate: Do men and women write differently from the war field? If they do, what are the consequences of the gender inequality that exists? And, how might a gender-imbalanced reporting structure shape the public's perception about war?

We have constructed and tested a tabletop thermoacoustic refrigerator. The design uses a porous plug inside a simple organ pipe resonator. Standing sound waves were produced by a speaker located at one end of the tube. Thermal energy (heat) is moved by the combination of compression and expansion of air packets and oscillatory movement of air inside the tube. We have demonstrated a 9 degree Fahrenheit difference between the two ends of the porous plug. These refrigerators have no moving parts, no CFCs, and can operate at a high efficiency and may someday replace existing refrigerator designs.

On October 1, 1962 James Meredith, a twenty-nine year old veteran, from Mississippi accomplished the impossible. After a long political battle and personal fight he was allowed to register at Ole Miss as the first African-American to do so. His struggle for equality took center stage nationally when he tried to break down segregation in the southern state most dedicated to remaining segregated. The integration of James Meredith into Ole Miss changed society in Mississippi and as a result changed the discriminatory culture that had previously thrived in the state.

We have constructed a closed rectangular channel to investigate the velocity profile of flowing water. We will shine a laser through the side of our channel to illuminate particles that have been added to the water. We will take pictures of the illuminated particles to determine a velocity profile for our channel, and compare our experimental velocity profile to a theoretical model.

At the heart of everything we do with music is one fundamental idea: listening. Music is an aural art, and listening with knowledge is a skill that must be learned to fully appreciate the art form that we love. The purpose of this project was for students in Music Ed I to develop a set of active listening lessons intended to help school age children attending the St. Croix Valley Symphony Young Person's Concert understand and be cognitively engaged with the music performed in the concert. Students were assisted in this project by a peer advisor, Karla Miller, who helped with resources, modeled teaching, and compiled the final book of lessons completed by students in the class.

The streptomycetes, a group of bacteria significant for their production of antibiotics, are commonly found in the rhizosphere where they feed off nutrients exuded from plant roots. Previously, the antibiotic activity of streptomycetes isolated from three plant species were studied, and a link to plant species was discovered. We hypothesize the link between plant species and phenotype of the streptomycetes may be due to nutrients on which the streptomycetes feed. Streptomycete spores were inoculated onto Biolog plates. The relationship between the nutrients metabolized by each streptomycete isolate and the plant rhizosphere from which it was collected is presented.

The presidential debates give the candidate an opportunity to speak directly to the American public, and give the American citizen an opportunity to directly listen to the candidate's message. It was in knowing this that a two-level content analysis was done on the word usage of the 2004 presidential debates to find out how and what kinds of words the candidates used to relay their platforms, views and beliefs. The first level involved how and if the question was answered, and looked at the structure of their response. The second-level focused on the word usage of the presidential debates in relation to the structured Democratic and Republican Convention nomination acceptance speeches by the candidates. It was done with the assistance of the computer program, DICTION, designed by University of Texas professor Dr. Roderick Hart. The program was able to analyze the words in the five main headings of: certainty, activity, optimism, commonality and realism, and thirty-five other sub-features. This led to an in-depth comparison of the word usage between the two candidates.

The goal of this project is to develop a cell culture system for testing analogs of capsaicin, the hot pepper chemical, for their ability to stimulate vanilloid receptors. We have attempted various strategies to clone cDNA encoding the human vanilloid receptor (TRPV1) from human tissues, and have successfully isolated the gene from a plasmid obtained from the human genome project. The cDNA will be transferred into cultured cells, and the ability of the capsaicin analogs to stimulate TRPV1 will be tested by exposing the cells, loaded with fluorescent calcium-binding dye, to the capsaicin analogs and detecting the fluorescence emitted.

C. elegans  is an attractive model for studying the sensory behaviors and the nervous system. C. elegans  possess many sensory receptors in the head that coordinate sensory behaviors such as chemotaxis towards attractant compounds and away from repellant compounds. It is well established that ethanol is a strong chemo-attractant compound for C. elegans . Our results demonstrated that formaldehyde is a more potent chemoattractant than ethanol in the wild type (N2) C. elegans . Formaldehyde has also been used to induce fluorescence in the neurons of C.elegans . The purpose of this project was to investigate the chemotactic properties of formaldehyde and formaldehyde induced fluorescence in the neurons of N2 C. elegans  and several unc  mutations.

Seven-in-absentia (sina) is a gene required for eye development in fruitflies ( D.melanogaster ) and male fertility in mice ( M. muluscus ). The worm C.elegans  is a powerful model organism for studying animal behavior and development. Worms contain a gene, sia-1, that is homologous to sina. We have used RNA interference (RNAi) to eliminate sia-1 gene function in C.elegans  (see preceding poster). Here we describe experiments that we are currently conducting to analyze these worms. One of our experiments focus on whether sia-1 disruption alters worm fertility. We are currently testing whether sia-1 RNA interference affects overall worm brood size. In mice the sina gene homolog only affects male fertility. We would like to know whether this is also true in worms. C.elegans  exist as either self-fertile hermaphrodites or males. Normally male worms are rare, making it difficult to measure their fertility. We plan to overcome this difficulty by mating mutant worm strains that produce primarily males with mutant female strains.

The goal of this project was to optimize the reverse transcriptase-polymerase chain reaction (RT-PCR) amplification of the capsaicin receptor gene, TRPV1. The steps in this process, including cDNA synthesis and PCR amplification, are being systematically tested to determine why previous attempts have been unsuccessful. The TRPV1 gene will be used to generate a transformed cultured cell line to test capsaicin analogs for their ability to bind to the receptor.

The bald eagle population in the lower 48 states of the United States of America has declined dramatically. Sixteen of the thirty-five active bald eagle breeding sites in the Twin Cities Metro Area are located in Washington County . Slope and aspect along with distance to open water, and proximity to roads, railroads and other man-made features of the known nesting sites were calculated to determine the GIS model. By developing and analyzing the GIS model of bald eagle nests, it was concluded that of the 1,015 square kilometers in Washington County , 88 square kilometers would be suitable for bald eagle nests.

The electron transfer stoichiometry of E. coli  ribonucleotide reductase (RNR) R2 subunit with diiron has yet to be thoroughly understood. The overall goal is to study the oxygen activation and the mechanism of RNR. These mechanisms of oxygen activation by metal complexes, such as the diiron, and the enzymes involves are still not fully understood. Once understood, it would allow for the design of catalysts that could use oxygen as an oxidant. Previous resonance Raman experiments have demonstrated that one atom of 18 O 2 from dioxygen is incorporated into the Fe-O-Fe bridge in the presence of excess reductant. A protein purification protocol for UWRF is being established using streptomycin and ammonium sulfate precipitation and High Pressure Liquid Chromatography (HPLC). The goal at UWRF is to develop the purification protocol to obtain a large yield of R2 to perform resonance Raman, and stopped-flow kinetic experiments. The protein has been characterized by UV/Vis spectroscopy and the comparison of chromatograms from the HPLC.

We report here on the use of two-dimensional gel electrophoresis for the identification of proteins involved in the cellular differentiation of trichomes in Arabidopsis thaliana. Learning more about the process of trichome differentiation will help us to better understand cellular development in all eukaryotic organisms. Previous genetic studies have identified three transcription factors that together form an initiation complex. However, the proteins whose expression is controlled by this initiation complex have not been identified. Proteins were isolated from the leaf tissue of four different genotypes of arabidopsis. Each genotype shows unique trichome patterning; ranging from a complete lack of trichomes to a large excess. Leaf tissue was harvested from each genotype and the respective proteins were isolated using phenol extraction. The proteins were then separated using two dimensional gel electrophoresis in which the proteins were first separated according to their isoelectric points and then by their relative sizes. Finally, the proteins were visualized through the use of a silver staining procedure. Comparison of the protein content of the four genotypes allows us to identify proteins unique in the trichome abundant leaves. We propose that these unique proteins are important to the process of trichome development.

Bacterial populations in the aquatic community are known to degrade dissolved organic matter (DOM). This project incorporated a two-fold approach: i) the culture of naturally occurring freshwater bacteria capable of degrading DOM, and ii) their characterization. Two of four sequenced bacterial isolates were related to the g -Proteobacteria and had sequences similar to species in the genus Stenotrophomonas  (commonly found in aquatic environments). The other two had sequences similar to Burkholderia  sp. and grouped with the beta - Proteobacteria (commonly found in terrestrial and aquatic environments). Differences among species has the potential to influence transport, cycling, and retention of DOM in aquatic ecosystems.

In these studies, samples of Hela, HEK, JEG and BeWo cells grown on 3-dimensional scaffoldings were evaluated and a variety of measurements made using the NIH "Image J" analysis program. Preliminary results suggest that the scaffolding material itself has an average wet diameter of about 38um and that cells layer one deep on it are about 28 um deep. Differences were noted between ry and wet diameters of the scaffolding structures as well as between cell lines. These data will be contrasted with tissue sections of related structures in the body to define relationships between these cultures and actual features.

These studies have been undertaken to evaluate the potential apoptosis-inducing effect of a library of synthetic compounds (N-Phenethylpyridinecarboxamides). Although not identical, these are closely related to others which have previously been reported to induce apoptosis in leukemic cell lines and primary spleen cells of mice. It is hypothesized that our compounds may also induce specific cellular components which lead to programmed cell death and that these components may be selectively expressed in cancer cells. Our current studies are evaluating phenotypic changes caused by timed exposure of Hela cells to 100 nM of the test compounds.

The purpose of this project is to develop cell lines which stably express a commercial DNA vector that contains a fusion gene of green fluorescent protein (GFP) and alpha tubulin. The resultant cell lines will then be utilized for ongoing studies in our laboratory focused on the normal development and differentiation of placental trophoblast cells. Therefore, we are now seeking to introduce the GFP-tubulin "living colors" vector into epithelial (Hela and HEK) cells, followed by selection of transfected cells and growth into sub-lines of cells expressing this important cytoskeletal component.

The purpose of this project is to clone the envelope gene of human endogenous retrovirus-W (hERV-W) into a commercial GFP containing expression vector. This is being pursued in order to generate a fusion gene for use as a marker in several of our placental studies. This gene, HERV-W was reported and subsequently confirmed to be the protein which mediates developmental cellular fusion in the trophoblast of normal human placenta. Our lab is very interested to construct this vector to aid in studies focused on cytoskeletal changes in the normal placental trophoblast.

Our research attempts to use chromatin immunoprecipitation in order to identify the genes that are turned on in response to trichome initiation and development in Arabidopsis thaliana . Using trichome development in arabidopsis as a model, cellular development in all organisms can be better understood. All of the cells in an organism contain the exact same genetic information, but are physiologically very different. Cellular differentiation in eukaryotic, multicellular organisms is a highly regulated and complex process that involves specific gene activation and deactivation. The transcription factor complex involved in Arabidopsis  trichome initiation has been identified, but the genes that are activated by this complex are still unknown. We are identifying the activated genes by first isolating the chromatin from trichome rich leaves, and then separating the active chromatin through immunoprecipitation. This enables the isolation of regions of DNA at which the transcription factor complex is bound. After amplification and sequencing of this DNA region, the sequence will be compared to the arabidopsis genome to specifically locate the probable genes involved in trichome development.

The study performs an OLS regression on the demand for money including market volatility. The hypothesis tested was whether adding velocity to the demand for money function would affect the equation at all. We tested the hypothesis using consumption, GDP, volatility, M2 and the 3-Month T-Bill. Results showed that there was little effect on adding velocity to the equation. We shifted our focus and tried the equation without consumption and found that this did affect money demand. We concluded that our hypothesis was not true and needed further research and testing time.

This study employs a unique survey of non-agricultural self-employed women and men in St. Croix County , Wisconsin to directly test if effort expended (at work or doing household chores) has a significant effect on their net earnings. Preliminary results indicate the greater effort self-employed women in this sample expend doing household chores does significantly reduce their net earnings. At the same time, the net earnings of these women is not reduced by number of hours they spend doing housework. In the estimates of self-employed men, effort at work or doing household chores does not significantly impact their net earnings. The preliminary results suggest, however, the net earnings of these men is significantly reduced by the time spent doing household chores.

Previous researchers have indicated that the perceived self-efficacy level in students may have an effect on their performance and achievement. In this study, the relationship between self-efficacy and the performance of English Language Learners (ELL) in Math and Reading was examined. Pre- and post exams were taken by students in the subjects of math and reading to determine their level and to measure their progress throughout a program during the summer course. This program was designed to prepare Latino youth in passing the Minnesota Basic Standards test by implementing technology and additional support. In addition, pre- and post surveys were also distributed to establish the self-efficacy level in each student and to determine if there would be a difference of scores. These scores were analyzed to determine whether or not self-efficacy has a significant impact on ELL student's performance. Results show that completion of the program increased participant's perceived self-efficacy in reading and math. In addition, self-efficacy in reading and learning vocabulary was found to be a significant predictor of growth in reading and vocabulary. However, math self-efficacy was not a significant predictor in the increase of math scores.

The objective of this research was to determine if management style influenced profitability. The management options compared included: Management Intensive Rotational Grazing (MIRG), a stored feed group, and a mixed feeding group. Survey results were used to define management style. Financial ratios were used to measure profitability; there were nineteen different financial ratios used in this research. Dupont analysis was performed on the financial ratio measures calculated from the Agricultural Financial Advisor (AgFA) database.

Viability of Lactobacillus acidophilus in three commercial brands of yogurt was tested by determining the viable bacterial counts(CFU/g) of L acidophilus  during 2 week storage at refrigeration temperature. Though the initial counts of L acidophilus  varied slightly, all three brands showed similar levels of Lactobacillus acidophilus  after storage at 4 C. Our results indicate that there was no significant difference in the levels of Lactobacillus acidophilus  or viability of these strains in commercial brands of yogurt stored under refrigeration conditions for two weeks.

The main objective of this work to study of vinegar acidification on flavor of queso blanco cheese. Milk from the UW RF dairy farm was used to make queso blanco cheese using different vinegars. Five percent salt ( w/w curd weight basis) was added to the curd prior to molding and stored for 18 hr. Cheese was vacuum packed in a plastic bag and stored at refrigerated temperature until testing.

Microbial levels in organic and conventional carrots and broccoli were assessed to determine if organic produce had higher levels of microbial contamination. Appropriate dilutions of samples of carrots and broccoli purchased from local supermarkets were plated on the Standard Plate Count agar plates and incubated aerobically at 35 C and Room Temperature for 48 hours. Microbial contamination was determined by enumerating colonies. All analyses were performed in duplicate. Results showed comparable levels of contamination in both organic and conventional products tested.

A local poultry producer identified a microbial problem that was causing white spots on the boneless skinless chicken breast. The organisms had been isolated by the producer to be lactic acids and yeast. The simulation conducted at UW-River Falls involved 3 treatments including lactic acids, yeasts and a mixed culture on the chicken breasts. Two studies were conducted one using whirl-paks bags and the other with regular tray packs. The results of the experiment are aiding the processor in eliminating the point of introduction of these organisms.

Mycobacterium avium subsp. paratuberculosis  infection causes Johne's disease in dairy cattle. The organisms has been also thought to be an etiological factor in Crohn's disease. In this poster presentation, we will explore culture and polymerase chain reaction identification of organism from intestinal specimens, human seroreactivity, and treatment regimen of antibiotic therapy as well as survival of MAP during pasteurization treatment of milk. .

Capsaicin, the chemical which is responsible for the pungency of chili peppers, also desensitizes the nerve after the initial hot sensation. This observation has led to the inclusion of capsaicin in some over-the-counter pain-relieving commercial products; however, it still has the disadvantage of initially eliciting a burning pain sensation before it provides any pain relief. The natural receptor activated by capsaicin called VR1 has been cloned and N-arachidonoyl dopamine has been proposed as the natural endogenous ligand.

An object with an index of refraction that differs from the medium it is suspended in can be trapped by optical pressure at the focal point of a laser propagating through the medium. By trapping and observing an object over a period of time, we have begun to characterize the potential energy well of the trap, which will lead to better understanding of the behavior of objects caught in trap.

It is believed that Americans' lack of interest in political issues is associated with a decline in sociological imagination in Americans. By sending more students to abroad programs such as Wisconsin in Scotland , it is possible that as students' sociological imaginations grow, so will their interest in political issues.

Scanning Tunneling Microscopy (STM) is a technique to image surfaces that has been around for nearly twenty years, and is widely used in industry and research. Due to recent developments in digital technology these microscopes are becoming cheaper and more powerful. I am utilizing these new technologies to build a Digitally Controlled STM. After the completion of the project, UWRF will have a STM to use in future experiments and demonstrations.

This poster presents recent maps made by students undertaking a GIS and Cartography Minor at UW-RF. These maps were produced for classes, special projects, and internships over the past year and were submitted to the department's annual Map of the Year Contest. Two awards are given in this competition: one for a map made in an introductory course and a second for a map made in an advanced course, special project, or internship. A wide range of activities that take place in the GIS and Cartography curriculum are represented in this display.

Chiral bis(dihydrooxazole) ligands have been synthesized from malonodinitrile, and different chiral 2-amino-3-propanol's. We are attempting to create palladium(II) complexes with one deprotonated bis(dihydrooxazole) ligand, which will then be used as a catalyst. To optimize the reaction we are exploring different palladium(II) starting materials, and the use of different solvents.

The purpose of this project was to determine if phenol-degrading genes called LmPH (large multi-component phenol hydroxylase) are located on plasmids in freshwater phenol-degrading bacteria. Plasmid DNA was extracted from control and phenol-degrading bacteria. Detection of LmPH genes was accomplished using the Polymerase Chain Reaction (PCR) and published primers.

The Polymerase Chain Reaction (PCR) technique was used to determine if a specific phenol-degrading gene sequence was present in cultured freshwater phenol-degrading bacteria. This gene sequence, the large multi-component phenol hydroxylase (LmPH), was tentatively identified in all tested bacteria.

In the past, our research group has synthesized various oxazoline molecules for use as a ligand on palladium. Such a complex could be used as an asymmetric catalyst for enantioselective reactions. The purpose of this research is to create a ferrocenyl-thiazole molecule to be used in a similar manner, and compared to previous work. Much experimentation with the synthesis and purification of benzyl-thiazole led to an analogous scheme for ferrocenyl-thiazole.

Soybean cultivars are described for patenting by standard morphological traits. Because many commercial soybeans are descended from the same elite lines, they are often indistinguishable based on these methods. A system based on SSR DNA markers has been proposed to provide unique DNA fingerprints for the purpose of obtaining patents for new soybean cultivars. Any DNA-based testing system must be able to pick up genetic contamination within the given sample. It was our goal to determine the level of contamination detectable by the SSR genotyping method. We obtained the SSR genetic fingerprints of 20 soybean lines and then mixed genotypes to determine what level of contamination was observable. Unfortunately, the SSR DNA method does not seem to be effective at detecting genetic contamination.

To identify reagents which detect endogenous retroviral proteins in placental trophoblast cells, we are using immunoassays to test the cross-reactivity of several anti-retroviral antibodies. Based at our own and other laboratories observations, a number of available antibodies against exogenous retroviruses also detect proteins in non-infected tissues and placental cells. This is thought to represent antibody cross-reactivity to conserved regions within retroviral proteins and is based on the relatively simple construction and similar function of these proteins in all retroviruses. To experimentally test this concept, we are currently using an ELISA assay to screen a library of anti-HIV-1, MULV and HERV monoclonal antibodies for reactivity to immobilized HIV-1 gp 160.

In this study, HIV-1 envelope gene transfected-CHO cells were employed to evaluate microtubule cytoskeletal reorganization following membrane fusion to target HeLa cells. CHO-WT and HeLa cells co-cultured in chambered slides were washed, fixed, pretreated with 0.1% SDS and immunolabeled for a and b tubulin. Numerous syncytial cells were observed in cultures from 24 to 72 hours with the majority being localized to the edges of the monolayers. These syncytia contained between 2 and 10 identifiable nuclei, based on DAPI staining. Classic microtubule architecture was observed in the mononuclear CHO-WT and HeLa cells and in many of the cultures mitotic figures were also clearly evident.

The Oregon Wolfe Barleys are a population of doubled haploids with easily scored phenotypes. Genetic analyses of SSRs (simple sequencing repeats) was done using multiplex PCR on the Oregon Wolfe Barley progeny. Phenotypic assessment consisted of the progeny being scored on their susceptibility to powdery mildew and on plant and seed traits.

Nitrogen is an important nutrient in plants. Plants receiving inadequate levels of nitrogen show yellowing of leaves and slow, stunted shoot growth. One function of cytokinin, a plant hormone, is to delay senescence (death). Cytokinin promotes cell division leading to shoot growth. In this experiment plants were treated with a nitrogen-deficient solution. Some of the plants were then treated with a cytokinin solution. The morphological characteristics of leaves and stems were analyzed.

Scientists can use mutagenesis to study the development of organisms. In this experiment EMS (ethyl methane sulfonate), a chemical that usually causes single base-pair mutations in the organism's DNA, was used to treat C-fern spores. The spores were sown on 0.5X Murashige Skoog agar plates and placed under lights. Data regarding spore survival, germination rate, and phenotypic variation in the mutagenized C-fern plants are presented.

Biological evidence of continental drift usually takes the form of fossils; however, modern populations of the living species Oxymitra incrassata might actually represent passengers that have been riding the continents as they drifted apart! We are using nucleotide sequences to see if populations are divergent or closely related. High divergence would suggest that this species consists of ancient populations but if continental populations are closely related it would mean recent dispersal of a younger species.

This experiment was designed to determine the species of small mammals present in a rapidly developing region of Saint Croix County within the Saint Croix River Watershed. The area of study was wooded residential zone quite close to an area of rapid new human development. We performed this study on the small mammals in the area to allow comparison of populations previously determined during a similar time period in 2002. From these population data diversity and species richness calculations were made and an analysis of habitat was inferred.

These modules allow students to observe the rooting process and root growth over time. We examined root emergence, root growth rate, and root diameter in cuttings rooted in 1) potting soil or sterile sand and 2) in the presence or absence of auxin (2-way ANOVA). Preliminary root competition experiments (willow vs. grass) will be discussed.

Streptomycete bacteria are medically important as they are the major source of antibiotics used to improve human health. They are commonly found in soils. Prior studies have shown that the Streptomycete community in agronomic soils is influenced by the cropping history of those sites, suggesting that plants may exert some influence on the Streptomycete community. The ecological role these important bacteria play in their native soil environment, however, is largely unstudied.

Our goal is to determine culture conditions that will increase expression of HIV co-receptors on human leukocytes. Cells are treated with PMA to induce differentiation to a dendritic-like phenotype, and receptor expression is measured by RT-PCR. These cells will be used to analyze co-receptor distribution by immunogold labeling.

This poster depicts a content analysis of the Washington Post's and the New York Times' coverage of the 2000 presidential debates. The results showed that the coverage (quotations) from the newspapers was disproportionally negative compared to what was spoken by the candidates at the debates.

We estimate money demand functions for the MZM money supply using monthly data over the period 1975-2004 for price level, GDP, and interest rates within a single equation framework. We compare the accuracy of both linear and nonlinear regression models. We find that the demand for money is a stable function over this period of time.

We are looking at levels of foreign investment and levels of economic growth in developing countries to determine if the level of foreign investment is correlated with or impacts economic growth. We will be looking at foreign investment, GDP, Per Capita GDP and GDP growth in developing countries.

This research focuses on the determinants of demand for U.S. imported oil, and the variables that affect demand. Specifically we expect that the continuous changes in price, holding all other variables constant, will not significantly affect the quantity demanded of imported oil.

Summary: This poster presents the 3rd edition of Brux, "Economic Issues and Policy", and summarizes the changes that have taken place in the last three years since the previous edition. The poster displays through data, policies, and quotations how the U.S. and global economy have shifted from the left to the right of the economic/political spectrum.

This project will investigate the type of self-talk women on the UWRF soccer team use to enhance performance. Participants will complete a survey to identify the type(s) of self-talk. The investigator will provide 12 sessions (2x/wk, 10-15 min/sessions) to disseminate knowledge and strategies for incorporating effective self-talk into their lives. A post survey will be given to determine changes in self-talk as a result of intervention.

Three hundred surveys were distributed in various locations throughout the Midwest . One hundred sixteen were returned for return rate of 39%. The survey consisted of several questions; we analyzed six of them. The more educated the participants were the more likely they were to met the Surgeon's General Recommendations for physical activity.

This safety education poster was researched and prepared for display at the UWRF Campus Health Fair (April 14, 2004). Colorful design elements were selected to creatively catch the eye of the passer-by to draw people into the research details. Jennifer and Heidi worked collaboratively to create scenarios of real life situations. These scenarios challenge the reader to apply critical thinking skills and to connect the utilitarian device (such as a shovel, flashlight, safety cone, or candle) with a purposeful and responsive use during a vehicular emergency situation. Within each scenario, the operative word indicating the emergency response item is embedded several times to reinforce long term memory and application.

The purpose of the Scholarship of Teaching and Learning (SoTL) is to improve the practice of teaching through scholarly inquiry into student learning.. At UWRF there has been a recent initiative to increase the amount of awareness about SoTL and to encourage faculty to begin doing this work The purpose of this poster is to present more detail about the UWRF SoTL initiative as well as to showcase the recent SoTL work of the first UWRF Teaching Scholars.

It has textures consistent with a shallow formation depth. We interpret minerals along fractures and in cavities as the result of a hydrothermal system percolating through a collapsed volcanic caldera. Strike and dip studies reveal regional trends perhaps related to the nearby Athens shear zone.

The main objective of this case study was to determine infection status of a commercial dairy herd, suspected to have a S. aureus problem and recommend an effective treatment strategy to control mastitis and increase milk quality. Individual cow milk samples were analyzed for Staphylococcus aureus using the conventional plating method and the 3M Petrifilm Staph Express Count Plate method. Typical isolates were characterized based on characteristic colony morphology, Gram stain, catalase and coagulase reaction. Twenty four of 46 (52.2%) cows were found to be positive for S. aureus. based on these results, control strategy involving strict regimen of dry cow therapy, sanitation and segregation was recommended to the producer.

Spelnda and Aspartame two popular artificial sweaters. An untrained panel comprising of UW-River Falls students were asked to evaluate samples of cookies and lemonade beverage prepared with 100 % sugar, 100% Aspartame(lemonade) or Spenda(cookies) and 1:1 mixture of sugar and selected sweetener for sweetness and over all acceptance. Results indicated that the panelists preferred products made with 100% sugar over those made with Splenda or Aspartame.

Turkey breast fillets were evaluated using pH, L* color value, percentage of moisture uptake, and percentage of cooked yield. The fillets were subdivided and mapped on a grid in order to evaluate the uniformity of the breast muscle. This evaluation will be used to assist poultry processors in identifying how to best determine muscle quality of meat that will be used for further processing.

The primary objective of this study is to establish high quality baseline water quality and Geographic Information System data as a foundation for a long term sustainability study. The scope of the study includes establishing what effects UWRF campus and surrounding land uses have on the South Fork of the Kinnickinnic River, a Class A coldwater trout stream. Base maps were generated from preliminary GIS data of watershed delineation, 15 documented storm water outfalls, and environmental factors surrounding both the South Fork and the Unnamed Tributary.

These include the cost of converting existing equipment or buying new equipment, the challenge of performing operations once corn is emerged, and the shortage of narrow row equipment under the width of 30 inches.

For many Wisconsin dairy farms, manure composting has become a viable option for manure management. Wisconsin possesses little data of the environmental impact of composting on soil rather than concrete. This study analyzed soil samples for nitrogen and phosphorus compounds on six dairy farms.

The goal was to determine how soil at a given time reflects nutrient leaching under compost piles. Results of this compost study shows that little leaching of nutrients through soil occurs on different soil types and management practices.

My research is on cultural and civic aspect of Scottish nationalism. Historical circumstance (the preservation of Scottish institutions during union with England, the narrow Highland focus on cultural symbols, the broad definition of Scottish identity, and economic conditions) have made Scotland somewhat unique in having a nationalism based on political and economic control of place, rather than the more common cultural conception of nationality based on ethnicity, language, and religion.

The most common 9/11 storylines were those that dealt with Anti-Arab/Muslim backlash; the effect of 9/11 on the public safety community; issues of terrorism and international conflict and those that focused attention on the military conflict in Afghanistan. Programs incorporated 9/11 themes in one of three ways: 1) through season-long storylines; 2) through individual episodes; and 3) through season-long symbolic and subtle incorporation.

For a German language teacher the showing of a German movie offers some significant linguistic pedagogical challenges. A subtitle may help get the gist, but the subtle nuances are otherwise lost. Some DVD's now come with the option to delete the subtitle and this is a great advance for language learners. For several years I have been working on the creation of packets for students to enhance their listening comprehension skills when they view a film. I will display several teaching packets which I created for post World War II German films. I shared them with college and advanced high school level teachers at the Fall 2002 Wisconsin Association of Foreign Language Teachers meetings held in Appleton.

An intrinsically good thing is something that has value above and beyond how much it benefits humans. I argue that that the very idea of intrinsic worth is incoherent, because we humans can only regard those things valuable which benefit humans. However, philosophers greatly fear reducing all value to human related value. They fear this would lead to value relativism, hedonism and utilitarianism. I argue this need not be the case at all.

In social psychology this overestimation of future positive outcomes is referred to as a positive illusion. Both groups of participants evaluated risk levels for eight different outcome variables in each of three different contexts.

The purpose of this study is to determine the communication trends, patterns, and effectiveness within a unit on the UW-River Falls unit. This "in progress" work includes analysis of a needs assessment. Data were collected through surveys, interviews and observations. Based on the results, training recommendations will be made.

The photographs to be displayed are unsuccessful attempts at creating silhouettes. Silhouettes are reportedly easy to produce; if so, it is a skill that has eluded me to this point as a budding photographer. These photographs represent my best efforts at creating something "easy."

This project combines my passions of travel and photography into a visual demonstration of my spring break experience. The photos illustrate my trip from beginning to end-traveling on a Greyhound bus to New Haven, Connecticut, and wandering around in New York City.

"Scapino!" is a play of two cultures and time periods which must be melded. Based on Moliere's "The Cheats of Scapin" it uses commedia del' arte conventions popular in the 15th century such as stock characters, but the play is set in the late 1960's. To meld the two periods we researched clothing styles and fabrics from both periods and cultures looking for intersections of line, color, silhouette and motif.

The reactivity of oxygen molecules with metal complexes is essential for living organisms. The coordination of O2 to transition metals is a reversible reaction that living systems use to transport oxygen throughout the system.

Hemoglobin is one example of an iron oxygen-carrying complex in the human body. Cobalt complexes with coordinated oxygen have been studied as models for these more complex dioxygen carriers. The crystal structure of the dioxygen complex, decaammine- -peroxodicobalt(4+) cation was studied.

Caenorhabditis elegans is a free living soil nematode, used in many laboratories as a model system. When exposed to noxious heat, C. elegans exhibits a rapid, reflexive withdrawal followed by backing and a heading change as a defense mechanism. Capsaicin, the active ingredient in hot peppers, stimulates a nociceptive heat response followed by an analgesic effect.

The active ingredient in hot peppers-capsaicin-causes a burning sensation by stimulating vanilloid receptors in sensory nerves. Capsaicin is used as a topical pain reliever, because the same action appears to inhibit the sensation of pain. Analogs of capsaicin developed by the UW-River Falls Chemistry Department will be tested via receptor mediated Ca2+ influx in transformed human embryonic kidney cells. A model system has been shown effective in measuring Ca2+ influx.

Predicting physical properties for highly-branched giant molecules is not currently possible. Small molecules and linear polymers have been successfully modeled using a topological index from graph theory, a branch of mathematics. We have designed a special class of highly branched polymers, perhaps best named Fibonacci molecules, to identify why topological indices fail to model the properties of hyper-branched macromolecules.

The pendulum is suspended from a speaker driven by broadband white noise to provide a random force on the magnet. A second pair of electromagnets is used to modulate the depths of the potential wells. We present results showing stochastic resonance for simple harmonic modulations.

Micron sized glass spheres held in optical traps for long periods of time undergo changes that eventually cause the sphere to be expelled from the trap. Our goal is to understand the physical changes of the sphere that lead to this expulsion. We have developed a unique two-axis microscope along with image analysis software to determine the location of the sphere in real time in three dimensions.

A liquid crystal cell is a construction of conductive glass sandwiching an electrically responsive liquid crystal. When an electric field is applied to the conductive glass, the liquid crystal molecules change their orientation, preventing polarized light from passing through. This light valve is the basis for liquid crystal display technology. This study determined that a reasonable quality optical device suitable for studying light valve technology can be constructed under ordinary non cleanroom laboratory conditions.

Arabidopsis thaliana has been the subject of many fields of study, including cell differentiation-the specialization of cells which have acquired a certain cell fate. One cell fate that is highly regulated in the Arabidopsis thaliana is the trichomes, the unicellular structures on the leaf epidermis of Arabidopsis thaliana, which is speculated by prior research to have a multimeric promoting complex. The genes implicated for the promotion of this complex are GL1, GL3 and TTG1. Due to the extreme difficulty of isolating the proteins from the trichomes themselves, biochemical studies have been few and far between. Here we have cloned these genes and expressed their proteins in yeast and purified them. We conducted two hybrid experiments to show interactions between these transcription factors. Our hypothesis was that there would be an interaction between GL1-GL3, and GL3-TTG1 but not GL1-TTG1.

This study seeks to understand how transport occurs across the innermost endothelial layer. Particularly, we are working to co-localize 2 types of transport-related proteins, caveolin-1 and cytoskeletal elements. A better concept of the relationship between these will greatly aid our understanding of placenta biology as a whole.

This paper investigates the effect of actions taken by the Federal Reserve to make their policy actions transparent. In 1989 the FOMC adopted a policy of using 25 basis point multiples for changes in its federal funds target.

These relatively large changes made it easier for market participants to observe policy changes. This transparency of policy was a reversal of its previous position that secrecy of policy action and intent of policy promoted financial market stability.

The largest component of spending with the economy is consumption. To understand the things that determine consumption and to identify opportunities for manipulating consumption with policy, it is necessary to identify the consumption function. The two current models of consumption are the permanent income hypothesis and the life cycle hypothesis. In this paper we will estimate the aggregate consumption function and identify opportunities for policy actions to have an effect on consumption.

This project is based on a study of UW River Falls "underrepresented students" in relation to their constraints and interests in international study abroad. The results of the study suggest that "underrepresented students" (particularly racial and ethnic minority students) are very interested in study abroad, but have little awareness of programs or encouragement in participating, and they face serious constraints.

In the past ten years supercomputers have changed. What was once a one-of-a-kind several million-dollar piece of equipment, available only to wealthy organizations, can be replaced with networks of less expensive computers. This is possible due to the fact that the power of desktop computers has increased dramatically over the past few years while prices have fallen. Although a single desktop computer may not be able to perform supercomputing-level computations, a cluster of desktop computers can. We have successfully constructed a cluster of 13 Pentium computers in the College of Business and Economics (South Hall) Networking Lab. Using the MPI message passing interface, we are writing parallel programs that will spread a computation over as many processors as required.

Case It! is a case based multimedia project for high school and college students studying genetic diseases, DNA, gel electrophoresis and related procedures, and ethical issues raised by genetic testing. This project enables students to study real life situations in molecular biology and genetics, and is available to educators at no charge. High school students using the program developed an awareness of ethical issues associated with genetic testing, thus increasing interest by connecting science to real life situations.

The purpose of the experiment is to determine whether the color of the text or background will effect reading speed. I believe that a white background with different colored texts will be more easily read than different colored texts with a black background.

As future teachers, these student researchers were challenged to research, design, and develop a research poster session that could communicate with an audience of both teachers and middle school students. The safety education topic of "Food Safety" was selected, along with a focus on proper food preparation. Subtopics for research were limited to practical living skills (food shopping, cooking temperatures, and common sense preparation tips) that can contribute to decreasing the incidence of food poisoning.

The essence of the poster and my project as a whole is to gain an appreciation for athletics, in particular basketball, in Spain, and to compare Spanish and US approaches to the game. Through visiting several clubs in Barcelona and Madrid, as well as one in Valladolid and two in Salamanca, I was able to see a wide spectrum of abilities and varying degrees of interest in the sport. The grandest difference seems to be amount of time put into the sport: in Spain, basketball begins in September or October,and they play until June. The best players play internationally in July, leaving only one month off for summer vacation.

The genomic library for this rare bacterium has been sequenced and a gene encoding cytochrome bd oxidase, the terminal electron acceptor in the electron transport chain, has been found in this organism.

Genomic DNA was isolated from various strains of streptomyces, antibiotic-producing bacteria found commonly in soil. The strains that are being analyzed were isolated from soil surrounding the roots of the prairie plant Liatris aspera. Data will be analyzed to determine the genetic diversity between these streptomycete strains.

Controlling the Random Motion of a Magnetic Pendulum/Lowell McCann, Physics, Arriety Lowell, Student Recently, methods have been proposed on how to control the otherwise random motion of thermally activated objects in a series of potential wells. We have constructed a simple system to investigate these predictions for a two-state magnetic pendulum.

The goal of this project is to develop an in vitro protocol that will produce somatic embryos that can be utilized to multiply the mother plant more quickly than is possible with conventional methods such as grafting or budding.

Throughout the 1970s and 1980s, instances of right-wing violence in Germany were relatively rare. Typically, no more than one or two dozen reports of attacks were received by the German Ministry of the Interior in any given year. However, at the beginning of the 1990s, the numbers increased dramatically.

This research project involves the identification and estimation of a function that explains movements in stock prices. A literature review identifies many variables that may have an impact on stock prices. In this project the analysis will look at measures of monetary policy, measures of change in policy, as well as other variables expected to have an impact on stock prices.

This research project involves the estimation of the functional relationship between aggregate employment and inflation. The economic theory on this topic is well established and a review of the literature reveals that the employment function includes the independent variables nominal wage growth, productivity growth, expected inflation, and inflation. Regression analysis will be used to estimate the function.

Thoughts and Reflections on a Teaching Trip to China/Hilree J. Hamilton, Music Education I was invited to China to present a series of teaching sessions related to how children learn music and additionally, to share information about recent trends and practices in music education in the United States.

Skills practiced include transformation, DNA isolation, batch culture, affinity chromatography, Bradford assays, and electrophoresis. This experiment introduces fundamental biochemistry, molecular biology, and biotechnology concepts.

The hyperbolic-decay model specifies the relationship between the value of a reinforcer and two parameters, namely, reinforcer amount and the delay between a choice response and reinforcement (Mazur, 1997). The current report details efforts to develop a discrete-trials choice procedure for the rat, with the objective of extending Mazur's model of conditioned reinforcement.

The main objective of this research was to study Osmotic Dehydration (OD) of apples. Granny Smith apples dried by OD process was compared with conventionally dried apples. Cored and sliced apples were placed into a pretreatment solutions designed to minimize browning.

Icecube Detector/James Madsen, Physics, and Keith Jacko, Student This poster will describe simulations that are being run to understand the performance of the IceCube detector, a cubic kilometer neutrino telescope buried in the South Pole ice.

Single beam optical traps are now a widely used scientific tool, particularly in biophysics where they are used to manipulate, modify, and measure the properties of cellular and molecular objects. Despite the importance of optical traps in these and other applications, their use is still limited due to a lack of understanding of the behavior of the objects in the traps.

The strikes of the faults and flexures are similar to those of the faults in the Mid-continental Rift System, suggesting that these small faults might be related to later reactivation of this fault system.

The purpose of this project is to define areas of highpressure systems affecting winter temperatures at Minneapolis/St. Paul. In determination of these areas and by expanding on ideas of Synoptic Climatology ascertained in Geography 412 Advanced Climatology it is hoped to identify the features and affects of each. In doing this study there will be a better understanding of the relationships between atmospheric circulation systems and weather conditions for all geographical locations.

My project consisted of a trip to Edinburgh Scotland to study emergency services. This project idea brought me to the Royal Infirmary of Edinburgh Accident and Emergency Department. Through the Royal Infirmary, I received the opportunity to intern also, with the Scottish Ambulance Service, the Minor Injuries Department of the Western General Hospital, the Accident and Emergency Department of the Royal Sick Children's Hospital, the Coronary Care Unit of the Royal Infirmary, the Neurosurgery Department of the Western General and so much more.

Polymers are highly desirable materials whose wide range of mechanical, electrical and optical properties makes them attractive materials for various applications. One class of polymers, parylene and its derivatives, is incredibly promising for various thin film applications.

The physical properties of linear and branched molecules (such as melting point, boiling point and glass transition temperatures) are difficult to predict from the molecular structure. Recently, graph theory has been applied to the modeling of properties for small molecules. We have extended this application to the important class of macromolecules known as polymers.

As an Honors project, we chose to experiment with holograms and anamorphic art. Holography experiments included testing the developing process, exposure times and outside motion or vibration. Anamorphic art brought creativity to paper by reflection.

Since 1990 the Student Geography Organization has painted playground maps of the world, United States and Wisconsin at nine area schools as a service-learning activity. Geography club members take information gleaned from coursework and apply it to this community service project.

Non-standard climate parameters of atmospheric transmissivity and continentality have been linked to atmospheric circulation to develop a regional climate classification of the United States. Thirteen climate zones have been identified.

C. elegans is a soil nematode that is a convenient organism for demonstrating thermotaxis. We developed a technically simple assay that allows the thermotactic response of C. elegans to be determined.

This study focuses on the impact of accounting and relational value information on internet stock valuation. Only non-financial relational value information is found to be positively related to stock price.

Case It! - enables students to explore scientific problems through multimedia case studies in genetics. Use of the Internet allows students to communicate and discuss their scientific findings with others through web-based posters and electronic conferencing.

In June 2000, several UW-RF students participated in field research at a barrier island in Florida. An analysis of groundwater-level and chemistry data from an array of monitoring tubes constrains beach sand hydraulic conductivity at about 10-2 cm/s, consistent with other estimates.

The hyperbolic decay model specifies the relationship between the value of a reinforcer and two parameters, namely, reinforcer amount, and the delay between choice response and presentation of reinforcement. Mazur has confirmed this model using pigeons. The current report details continuing efforts to develop a discrete-trials choice procedure for the rat analogous to procedures developed by Mazur for the pigeon, with the objective of extending the hyperbolic decay model.

The research examines the influence one person can have on another person's impression formation of a target. The results show that negative comments do have significant effects on impression formation.

TIPS is a partnership among the College of Education and Graduate Studies, the Hudson, River Falls, and Prescott School Districts; St. Bridget Elementary School; and their respective communities. A key focus of our partnership involves meaningful curricular integration of technology.

This study examines the rates of arrest and incarceration for whites and blacks in Minnesota. It looks at the impact presumptive sentencing has had by focusing on the racial characteristics of the prison population.

This study looks at the financial impact the state's current method(s) of funding public education has had in Wisconsin. It also includes an analysis of the financial consequences of the Milwaukee voucher program.

The 4th year of a grant involving 6 UW-System campuses, 6 technical colleges, and 15 public schools. Approximately 300 faculty trained and several thousand students involved through course integration and student life activities.

The natural substance capsaicin is well known as the compound that imparts pungency to hot red chile peppers. Capsaicin, however, is also known to have a pain relieving (analgesic) effect which is believed to result from its action upon calcium channels in pain-signaling nerves. As a pain relieving drug, however, capsaicin has a disadvantage of initially eliciting a burning pain sensation before it provides any pain relief. Two series of compounds were proposed which were designed to incorporate various aspects of the structural features of capsaicin. It is hoped that these new compounds will retain the pain-relieving action of capsaicin, but have diminished pungency. Efforts toward the synthesis of members of each of these series will be described.

First, we are assessing the presence and distribution of specific non-enteric pathogens at selected sites along the Kinnickinnic River. Our second approach is the identification of a consortium of psychrophilic (cold-adapted) organisms that signal the onset of thermal pollution.

Funded by a grant from the National Endowment for the Humanities, this project involves collaboration among area teachers, UWRF professors, and national experts studying the development of American character and the design of innovative practices for its teaching.

This study examined racial privilege acceptance and its effect on white students' evaluations of varying black students. Results showed that black students who took a "bargainer" approach were more highly evaluated regardless of racial privilege acceptance.

Twenty graduate students revealed dispositions and attitudes toward technology intervals during an Educational Psychology course comprised of concurrent face-to-face interactions and web-based learning activities.

We studied the effects of four different chemicals on the growth of the common bread yeast, Saccharomyces cerevisiae. Culture conditions were kept constant except for varying concentrations of the inhibitors.

Streptomycetes are naturally-occurring soil microbes which produce antibiotics as a strategy to out compete their competitors. Streptomycetes were collected from two native prairie soil sites and tested for their antibiotic inhibitory activity.

Neutrino astronomy is an emerging field which seeks to observe the universe in an entirely new way. This poster will outline the principles behind the operation of a neutrino telescope, and describe the connection to UWRF.

A consortium of six universities, eight 2-year technical colleges and twelve school districts have engaged in service-learning as a result of a federally funded grant. The grant supported faculty in curriculum integration, student class projects and student organizations, organizations in local communities, and staff development for faculty and students. Wisconsin Partnerships in Service Learning has become a forerunner for service-learning programs throughout the United States.

A Comprehensive Survey of Aquatic Invertebrates of the Kinnickinnic River, a Record of Diversity and a Basis for Determination of Water Quality Clarke Garry, Biology; Eric Secrist, Student There has never been a comprehensive survey of invertebrate species inhabiting the Kinnickinnic River. This project was initiated to systematically document the diversity of macroinvertebrate life in this river system and to establish a permanent archive collection. This data set provides a foundation for he next phase of research, documentation of water quality (including that of the South Fork on the UWRF campus) based on insects present.

We report the results of a boron-11 nuclear magnetic resonance study on model compounds, and a systematic investigation of the dilute solution viscosity in order to determine the mechanism for the formation of this class of hydrogels.

Lateral migration on the upper Kinnickinnic River has been monitored on a near-annual basis for the past 18 years (216 months) by a college geomorphology class. Results show that a meander bend has migrated 9 ft. during this period and over 36 ft. during the past 50 years as determined from analysis of aerial photographs.

The Upward Bound program is a year-round, pre-college program for capable high school students who are from families with limited income and/or where neither parent has completed a four-year college degree.

C. elegans is a soil nematode that is a convenient organism for demonstrating chemotaxis. We developed a technically simple chemotaxis assay that allows the chemotactic response of C. elegans to be determined.

This presentation will teach students, faculty, and staff how to conduct an environmental audit. Specifically, where to start, how to interpret data, and the benefits the audit produces through benchmarking waste output annually.

River, is highly subject to impact by agriculture. In 1998 it was the scene of a manure runoff event which killed over 6400 fish and much of the invertebrate life. The purpose of this research was to assess the insect diversity and abundance in this tributary, establishing a baseline against which recovery and future damage can be compared.

Spongies start with a colorful, creamy filling with your choice of strawberry cheesecake or lemon cheesecake flavoring. The cream is surrounded by a sweet, spongy, yellow cake with a slight hint of almond flavor. Spongies are a more natural and lower-fat product, individually wrapped for your convenience and ready to eat.

Creative research was done by undergraduates in alternative photographic processes of: Cyanotype, Van Dyke and Liquid Emulsion. Further development of the photographic imagery was explored with layering of traditional printmaking plates.

A photogravure is a 19th century technique which is a marriage of etching and photography. Several large photogravures were created at Renaissance Press, N.H. to complete "Putting Out Ashes" print suite.

Our experiment tested the effects of colored paper (e.g., red, yellow, blue, white) on participants' test scores. Prior research has shown that blue paper will lead to the highest scores, especially with more difficult questions.

The study examined juror decision making. We gave participants information about a trial and examined how different types of evidence (emotional or non-emotional) and different judges instruction (ruling evidence inadmissable or admissible) might effect participants' perceptions of innocence or guilt.

The synthesis of symmetrically and asymmetrically mono- and disubstituted titanocene thiolates was undertaken. One mono-substituted derivative was successfully isolated. The lability of thiolate ligands was investigated by means of proton NMR. The results of both, synthetic and exchange studies will be presented.

We present the progress we have made towards Subcloning and sequencing the lux A gene. While our results do not represent original data, they do demonstrate that we were able to achieve the stated goals of our independent study project.

Mycorrhizae are naturally occurring endophytic fungi that beneficially infect the roots of many herbaceous plants. The association between mycorrhizae and many prairie plants is not well understood. To aid future restoration efforts, we studied the relationship between mycorrhizal infection and growth of five species of prairie plants.

The Nuclear Overhauser Effect (NOE) was used to study the structure of brucine, a highly toxic alkaloid. A simple and concise set of instructions were developed on running these experiments for future laboratories.

Using a probe corresponding to a conserved region of the E. coli cytochrome oxidase gene, clones were isolated from a Thermoplasma acidophilum DNA library and characterized by nucleotide sequence analysis.

This experiment examined how participants would react to reading about an automobile accident after imagining themselves as the driver. In one condition, participants were to imagine that they were talking on a cell phone while driving whereas other participants were not given that instruction.

In addition, for half the participants the accident had severe consequences whereas the other half read a scenario with only minor consequences. We measured their feelings of guilt and we also measured how easy it was for them to think of other outcomes in the scenario.

The purpose of this work was to create a series of new compounds structurally related to capsaicin, which is known as the pungent substance found in hot red peppers. Toward this end, the preparation of several 5-(4'-alkylphenyl) pentanoic acids was attempted. Such compounds are of interest as potential new drugs for the relief of pain.

An Investigation into the use and Effectiveness of Videotape modeling of conducting for Student Teachers Kristin Tjornehoj, Music What is the best way to teach and mentor student teachers in the area of instrumental conducting? This study combined a instructional video, print materials, checklists, and self-and supervisor evaluations in a two group, pre-and post-test study.

Phenol-degrading bacteria found in the environment are thought to have the large multicomponent phenol hydroxylase (LmPH) genes. The purpose of this project is to apply DNA molecular techniques to determine if this gene sequence is present in freshwater bacteria that can degrade phenol as a sole carbon and energy source.

Capsaicin, the chemical which is responsible for the pungency of chile peppers, also desensitizes the nerve causing an initial hot sensation. Our research is focused on designing new drugs that will enhance the pain-relieving aspect and minimize the hot sensation. Several target structures based on both capsaicin and N-arachidonoyl dopamine have been synthesized.

Normal human placental development involves the expression of endogenous retroviral proteins in critical cellular processes. These include formation of the maternal/fetal interface and require significant changes to cellular structures. This study focuses on understanding how these proteins interact with cellular cytoskeletal elements to build the outer-most fetal tissue layer.

Based on the physical similarity and relative simplicity of retroviral structural proteins we are exploring the observed and reported immuno-crossreactivity between exogenous (HIV-1) and endogenous (HERV-w) retroviral envelope proteins. These studies have begun with the ELISA immunoassy and will eventually include Western blots and IF studies as well.

Writers of grant proposals typically must consult with a program officer at the funding agency. The Grants Office can make the initial contact for you. We can also help negotiate with other universities or organizations, with other UW-RF units, or with our own administration.

Recently, many  federal agencies have created gopher sites or WWW pages to disseminate information and (in some cases) distribute grant program announcements. If you like, access these sources for information; you may find exactly the information you need and save one of us a frustrating phone call to Washington.

We will do whatever we can to help generate grant proposals from UW-RF. We write some proposals (especially proposals which have an impact on the entire institution) and we collaborate with groups of faculty and staff or with individuals. We help brainstorm ideas, talk through potential projects, review and edit proposals written by others, and generally do whatever we can do to get proposals out the door in fundable condition.

To stimulate your thinking, we provide outlines for proposals and letters of inquiry to foundations. These outlines are not guides--there are many ways to write successful proposals and letters of inquiry--but they are a good starting point.

Obtaining approvals from UW-River Falls administrators. Grant proposers should remember that proposals go forward from the university, not the individual. And grant awards are made to the university, not the individual.

Chancellor before they are submitted. The Approval to Apply for External Funding form is the instrument we use to obtain those approvals. Proposers should obtain signatures from Department Chair and Dean; the Grants Office will get the rest.

In recent years, several scandals have emerged which call into question the ethics of some academic scientists.  For instance, researchers investigating the efficacy of new drugs have been found to be very well-paid consultants to the pharmaceutical companies which had invented the new drugs and proposed them for FDA approval.  In the face of Congressional pressure, the Public Health Service and the National Science Foundation created new rules governing conflict of interest and financial disclosure which will prevent such abuses.  Early versions of those rules were proposed in 1994.  After comment and reconsideration, final rules were published in the Federal Register on July 11, 1995 (vol. 60, no. 132, pp. 35809-35819; editorial corrections appear in the July 31 issue).

Chapter UWS 8 of the Wisconsin Administrative Code currently serves as the Code of Ethics for unclassified staff.  It requires unclassifed staff to report significant outside activities and interests each year.  Those requirements are unchanged by this policy paper.  UWS legal counsel has determined that UWS 8 is not sufficient to meet the new rules.  Consequently UW institutions must implement a policy in accord with the new rules; hence this UW-River Falls policy paper.

External Funding form.  All investigators involved in a grant proposal must complete and sign this form before the university submits their proposals to the funding agency.  The Director will review the modified forms.

If the investigator is satisfied with the Conflict Review Committee's proposed resolution, it will stand.  If s/he is dissatisfied with the Conflict Review Committee's proposed resolution, s/he may appeal to the Vice Chancellor/Provost who will consult with the applicant and Conflict Review Committee as deemed necessary and appropriate to the particular circumstance.  The decision of the Vice Chancellor/Provost shall be final.

Step 1.   Do you and/or your immediate family have a financial interest from or in a for-profit business that is reasonably likely to be directly and significantly affected by the research or educational activities for which you have received or expect within the year to seek and receive funding?  If not, then the interest is not reportable.  If yes, go to step 2.

Step 2.   Do you and/or your immediate family together receive from such a business $5,000 or more per year, or is the ownership interest you and your family have together in such a business 5% or more of the total ownership interest?  If no, then the interest is not reportable.  If yes, you must report the interest(s) on the other side of this form.

Recognizing that honesty in the conduct of academic research is fundamental to its integrity and credibility and to the maintenance of public trust in the university, the UW-River Falls adopts these policies and procedures for reviewing and investigating allegations of scientific misconduct.

Every member of the faculty and academic staff at the time of appointment makes a personal commitment to professional honesty and integrity that meets the demanding standards of the state and national academic communities.

The board of regents, administrators, faculty, academic staff and students of the university of Wisconsin system believe that academic honesty and integrity are fundamental to the mission of higher education and of the university of Wisconsin system. The university has a responsibility to promote academic honesty and integrity and to develop procedures to deal effectively with instances of academic dishonesty.  Students are responsible for the honest completion and representation of their work for the appropriate citation of sources, and for respect of others' academic endeavors.  Students who violate these standards must be confronted and must accept the consequences of their actions.

"misconduct" means fabrication, falsification, plagiarism or other practices that seriously deviate from those that are commonly accepted within the scientific community for proposing, conducting, or reporting research.  It does not include honest error or honest differences in interpretations or judgements of data.

Misuse by a researcher of University funds (including grant and contract funding from extramural sponsors) is also cause for discipline or dismissal and may be cause for criminal prosecution.  However, an allegation of misuse of funds is not within the scope of this policy; such allegation shall be referred to the Vice Chancellor who will consult with the Controller concerning an appropriate course of action.

A violation of institutional procedures or federal regulations on the protection of human or animal research subjects or a violation of state or federal safety laws or regulations is also not within the scope of this policy.  An allegation regarding any such violation shall be promptly referred to the chair of the Institutional Review Board in cases involving human subjects, to the chair of the Animal Care Committee in cases involving animal subjects, or to the Chancellor in cases involving safety.

The goal of the procedures outlined below is to assure the integrity of scholarly research, to achieve a rapid and equitable resolution of all charges and to assure that all parties are treated with fairness.  In order to protect the reputation of an innocent party, the procedures will preserve the maximum level of confidentiality consistent with law and with justice for all parties to these procedures.  All parties will take whatever action is required to avoid any unnecessary conflict of interest.

Where an inquiry or investigation results in a finding that no misconduct has occurred, the University will not institute a new inquiry or investigation into an allegation of misconduct where the allegation is made against the same person and is based on material facts which were reviewed and found not to constitute misconduct during the prior inquiry or investigation, unless new material evidence is presented by a different complainant, or unless the person who is the subject of the inquiry or investigation requests another proceeding.

Because of the difficulties of assessing stale claims and the unfairness to the person against whom the allegation is made, allegations based on conduct which occurred seven years or more prior to the making of the allegation will not be inquired into under this policy unless the circumstances indicate that the alleged conduct was not discoverable earlier.

Chancellor shall so inform the Chancellor.  The Chancellor shall immediately appoint a committee to conduct the investigation.  The committee shall be composed of impartial faculty members possessing appropriate competence and research expertise for the conduct of the investigation, and no faculty member having responsibility for the research under investigation, or having any other conflict with the university's interest in securing a fair and objective investigation, may serve on the investigating committee.  If necessary, individuals possessing the requisite competence and research expertise who are not affiliated with UW-River Falls may be asked to serve as consultants to the investigating committee.

The investigation normally will include examination of all documentation, including but not necessarily limited to relevant research data and proposals, publications, correspondence, and memoranda of telephone calls.  Interviews should be conducted of all individuals involved either in making the allegation or against whom the allegation is made, as well as others who might have information regarding key aspects of the allegations.  Summaries of interviews conducted shall be prepared, and provided to the parties interviewed for their comment or revision.  These summaries shall be made a part of the record of the investigation.

Note: Protocols can be approved for a short time, a semester, an academic year, or for a maximum of 12 months. The requested duration should include a time period long enough to encompass all activities involving animal subjects, but no longer.

Please remember that the purpose of this protocol review is to assure the humane care and treatment of animals. Your attached procedure should describe the surgical and non-surgical manipulations or practices that are employed.

The goal of this project is to implement electronic feedback devices throughout the K-12 Physical Education curriucula in River Falls School District and to introduce UWRF Physical Education major students to classroom uses of these feedback devices. These feedback devices can provide students with information to understand their own health-related fitness levels and to motivate them to be concerned about their health and fitness. As a result, students will know a great deal more than they do today about what, specifically, affects their individual levels of fitness and what they can do about it.

Columbia University Education Program website.  Ask Alice your personal health questions about relationships, sexuality, sexual health, emotional health, fitness, nutrition, alcohol, nicotine & other drugs and any other general health question that plagues you.

So you wanna quit smoking? Okay, friend, the fun's over. No more hacking coughs, no more shelling out money to Big Tobacco day after day, no more shortness of breath, and no more social alienation. How do you give all this up? That's what we're here to tell you.

Lung Association (ALA) today fights lung disease in all its forms, with special emphasis on asthma, tobacco control and environmental health. This site features information on quitting, nicotine replacement theory information, fact sheets, secondhand smoke and much more.

Cancer Society is the nationwide community- based voluntary health organization dedicated to eliminating cancer as a major health problem by preventing cancer, saving lives, and diminishing suffering from cancer, through research, education, advocacy, and service. Web site contains information on types of cancer, treatment options, prevention, statistics, etc.

Center for Disease Control website. Overview of tobacco efforts in the U.S. and the world with links & information for quitting, comments & questions area, share your thoughts, Surgeon General report.

National Women's Health Information Center (NWHIC) created this page to help empower women and girls, and the people they love, to breathe clean! Gain independence from the stale world of smoking by using our information and resources. Learn about the specific effects of smoking on your health and how to overcome barriers to quit.

Cancer Program, which conducts and supports research, training, health information dissemination, and other programs with respect to the cause, diagnosis, prevention, and treatment of cancer, rehabilitation from cancer, and the continuing care of cancer patients and the families of cancer patients.

The mission of Turningpoint is to provide shelter and support services for victims of domestic and sexual violence and abuse, to educate the community, and to promote the existence of a peaceful society. Primary service areas are Pierce and St.

Get Informed. Be Prepared. One-stop access to U.S. Government avian and pandemic flu information. Managed by the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services. Learn more about pandemic influenza and planning that is happening, including what you as an individual can do (Click on Individual Planning).

The UWRF College of Arts and Sciences does not have a centralized internship office where all internships are coordinated. For arranging to receive credit for an internship in the College of Arts & Sciences, please contact your relevant internship coordinator, who will guide you through their department's process for arranging internships.

For arranging to receive credit for an internship in the College of Business and Economics, please read instructions on the College of Business & Econ Internship Page. You will work closely with an appropriate internship coordinator below for coordination of your internship experience.

Finding Internships: Some departments at UWRF maintain a listing of available internships, while other departments require students to research and find their own internship opportunity, then present it to their department's internship coordinator for validating its worthiness for course credit. Use the below resources to find your own internship.

Each UWRF department has expectations that must be fulfilled before a student may receive internship credit for work experience. If you have an internship availability, please first post the position through the UWRF Career Services Office so that it will be posted for internship seeking UWRF students. Then you may contact a relevant college internship coordinator directly regarding coordinating the internship with UW-River Falls. See a list of college internship coordinators below.

The UW-River Falls Annual Career Fair takes place the third Wednesday of  October and is an event where students and employers may meet one-on-one regarding position vacancies, opportunities and internships.

Seeking interns (for credit as a 379 course) for each semester to write creative, interesting feature storeis and athlete biographies for its Web site, game programs, and media kits. Opportunities to do sports photography and design game programs and other printed materials. Preference given to junior or senior journalism majors or minors, although sophomores with writing experience are welcome to apply. Write a one-page cover letter to Mr. Rick Bowen, summarizing your interviewing and writing abilities/experiences. Include any visual communication skills you may have. Attach a resume. Applications due 4 pm Friday, December 1 in the Journalism office, 310 North Hall. For further information, contact Colleen Callahan, Internship Coordinator.

Applicants must have completed their junior year of college by June, 2007 and be entering their full senior year in the fall of 2007. Information and applications can be downloaded from asme.magazine.org.

Six interns, including one international student. The stories are published on their Web-based wire: www.shfwire.com. Open to college juniors and seniors who are studying print or online journalism. More details and the application form are on the website. Deadline for spring internships is October 16. For summer term, applications must be postmarked by November 1.

Communications intern. College 2nd year student or higher majoring in Communications, Journalism or Public Relations. Excellent oral and written communications skills. Good interpersonal skills and ability to work on project teams. Must have good skills in MS Word, Excel, PowerPoint. Selection criteria may include testing and/or assessment. For information see communications intern .

FT Summer news intern position from early June to late August. The intern joins the news staff and participates in weekly planning, covers various beats, writes breaking news and feature stories, cutlines, headlines, columns, editorials, take photos, edits copy, contributes online stories and updaates and can become involved in page design and other related areas of interest. Applications/resumes can be e-mailed any time to editor Phil Pfuehler at rfjeditor@rivertowns.net or mailed to River Falls Journal (Attn: Phil Pfuehler)/ P.O. 25/ River Falls, WI 54022.

Keep a weekly journal of what you learned and accomplished and your impressions of the company (management, organization, morale, etc.). The journal will be helpful later when you write a summary of your experience.

Eleven years ago, Jean Batiste Uwimana said goodbye to his mother, siblings and the only home he had ever known in hopes of finding peace and an education. Throughout his journey to the United States , Uwimana overcame tragedy, language barriers and experienced new educational opportunities at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls.

"We never got to bury my father," said Uwimana. "The morning after his death we had to leave and go to a rural area near Congo where my grandparents lived. We stayed for a few days because the rebels were advancing towards Congo , killing a lot of civilians."

"In Kenya , life was so hopeless. There were no jobs, no schools for us, and we lived on very little food and money that the United Nations High Commission for Refugees was giving us. It was maybe $30 a month for three people," said Uwimana.

"I refused to gather that information because many of us could have been killed," said Uwimana. "So the Rwanda government threatened to send me to Rwanda and put me in jail, which meant they would have killed me."

"Everything seemed big to me; the cars, buildings, food and amazingly the people. I have never seen so many big people in any other place in the world," he said. "But I really liked the diversity and the defficiency here better than the other places I have been."

Uwimana lived in Baltimore , MD for three years and earned an associate degree in electronics from TESST College of Technology. He then worked for Ciena Corporation as an electronic fiber optic technician.

Belgium . He told Uwimana that his family was alive in Kigali . He decided to go back to school and work towards a career that would provide him with enough money to bring his family to the United States .

"A friend of mine was getting his doctorate at UW-Madison and told me that the UW System was one of the best public education systems in the nation," said Uwimana. "I did my research and was pleased with my results."

"Because I have been to so many places, I was fortunate to learn different languages such as French, Rwandan and Burundian, which are my native languages, English, Arabic and Swahili," he said. "I would also love to learn Spanish and Chinese Mandarin."

"I have learned that no matter how big our problems seem to be, there are always ways to find solution for them. I've learned not to take family, friends or anything for granted. Tomorrow is never given to us."

Tashi Palzom never expected to go to college. Growing up in India as the daughter of a Tibetan refugee, Palzom fully expected to end her schooling in ninth grade, as many children in India do. Palzom never imagined that she would be the first person in her family to get a higher education. Yet, today she studies Marketing Communications and Speech Communications at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls. The journey to this point in her life, however, was not an easy one.

"We moved here because my dad wants us to have a better life...a better education," says Palzom. Because of the difficulties her father had faced in his life, he worked hard to create a promising future for his children.

Orphaned at the age of seven, Palzom's father was separated from his three brothers, one of whom he would never see again. He lived in Tibet with his aunt until the age of fourteen. His life with his aunt was not a happy one. Because he was expected to work instead of study, he attended only two years of school.

Wanting to escape the oppression he felt in his aunt's home, he sought enlistment in the Tibetan army to fight against the invading Chinese forces. At this time, the Tibetan people were struggling to maintain their freedom from China . Too small to join the soldiers, Palzom's father journeyed to India where he officially became a refugee.

Palzom's father traveled throughout India , supporting himself with various temporary jobs. Her parents met while working at a carpet manufacturing factory in Bhutan , India and had four children together after settling in Dalhousie, a quiet town in the Western Himalayan Mountains . Palzom remembers this time as a very happy period in her life.

During Palzom's seventh year, tragedy struck when her mother became suddenly and unexpectedly ill. "We saw her friends help her walk home and no one would tell my sister and me what was going on," says Palzom. "They sent us to the neighbor's apartment. We were scared because we didn't know what was wrong."

They didn't learn until the next morning that their mother had died of unknown causes. Palzom's father was left alone to raise four young, grief-stricken children. It was at this time that he decided to make a drastic change in his life for his children. He received permission to move to the United States in 1992.

Palzom and her siblings, with the exception of her oldest brother, were enrolled in a boarding school when their father moved to the United States the next year. With the help of an immigration agency in Madison , Wis. , he was able to find a job and begin to build a new home. Her father worked as a housekeeper until he could raise enough money to bring his children to the United States .

During this time, Palzom struggled through her schooling. With a very spontaneous and outgoing personality, Palzom found the strict schedule and discipline of her boarding school to be extremely stifling. She remembers being scared to be punished because punishment there was much harsher than we are used to here. She recalls watching other children being hit to teach them a lesson.

Finally, in March of 1998, Palzom and her siblings were allowed to move to the United States . Only her oldest brother stayed behind because, being over eighteen, he could not come with the other children.

America 's culture, and she did not want to leave her home. Her first memories outside of India are of the airport in Paris . She was afraid of the food and ate only bread and butter. She and her sister played for hours on the escalator because they had never seen one before. She was shocked when she saw an Asian woman smoke because this would have been completely taboo in India . The journey flew by and Palzom cannot remember much of it.

After arriving in the United States , Palzom was enrolled as a freshman in high school. The transition was not an easy one. Palzom had to learn to speak English. She also had to learn to survive in high school society, which is not always easy, even for student who grew up in the United States .

India is used as a sign to tell someone to come here. When a new friend waved hello to Palzom, she thought the student was telling her to follow, even though she walked away. Palzom began to follow the student throughout the high school hallways. Luckily, another student explained to Palzom what the hand signal meant before she got to the student who had waved. "She would have thought I was crazy," Palzom says. "I'm really glad she never saw me!"

Wisconsin-River Falls was the first and last university Palzom considered for college. She knew as soon as she saw the campus that it was where she wanted to study. With its close proximity to the Twin Cities and small student population, she knew that she would make strong connections with the faculty and in the business world. She is now in her third year at the university and loves being here.

When she first came to the United States , all she wanted was to go home to see her family. She says her father told them that they might suffer now but in the end they would have a better life. At the time, this did not seem true. Now, however, Palzom says she knows it is.

Palzom better understands the hardships her father endured in his life and the sacrifices he made for his children. "What he did, I want to give it back," she says. "I hope to make him proud." To do this, Palzom works hard at school.

Her family has built a very strong life here. In 2002, her oldest brother was able to make the journey to the Unites States. Her father has remarried and recently had a new baby. They try to keep the traditions of Tibet alive in their home so that their culture and its struggle will not be forgotten. They still worship the Dalai Lama, the high priest of Lamaism, a form of Buddhism. They also follow the traditional calendar of their homeland and celebrate the holidays that it includes.

Palzom says she would love to go back to India to visit her homeland but she would not like to stay there. She says it is harder to get a good job in India and the education is not as good as in the United States . Overpopulation is an issue that India struggles with and Palzom says the results of this can be seen in the streets that are very dirty.

Good because you can make your own choices. Bad sometimes because sometimes you don't want to do anything because you don't have to do it." Palzom's best advice is to make sure you take advantage of the opportunities that are given to you and be grateful that you have them because there are many people who don't. She looks forward to a bright future tries to always remember to be grateful also.

College is a starting new point for many young people, for Carol Xiong that notion is on a whole new level. Many parents encourage their children to go to school and pursue a degree in higher education, so did Xiong's, but her journey really brings pride to the family.

Accepting the task he is now a war veteran, and in the when face of danger had to flee the country with his friends leaving his family behind. He was in California for a year and then came to St. Paul to finish high school and got his diploma. Upon completing high school he graduated from a two-year college and has used his AA degree in his job ever since he finished.

Xiong's mother fled with her mother and her sisters, following her brothers who fled before the women did. They went first to Oklahoma then came to St. Paul to be with her brothers. She has a job that helps make the family a financial success.

The two speak little of the voyage to America in order to try and put the tragedies of the war behind them, instead they chose to forge ahead in their lives and prosper. The two Laotian natives met in America and eventually got married and had five children. Tony, Carol, Calvin, Kou, and Jessica were all raised in St. Paul . To some it may appear that they had a very "Americanized" childhood.

Early memories going back to visiting the zoo with her family, Xiong recalls that her "parents knew some English then." Watching television with siblings was more than entertainment in the Xiong household; it was also educational in learning English. Celebrating religious traditions are typical, but when they include the slaughtering of animals as a ritual is a little different from what some are used to. Most parents do not want their children to do things that will embarrass them, but whatever was done by one member in the Xiong family was very reflective of the family as a unit. Many daughters are expected to help around the house, but it is a little different to not be allowed to participate in extra curricular activities because of responsibilities waiting at home.

"I had no time to hang out," said Xiong of her pre-college years. Three years at college has freed her up to do more, but she still has responsibility at home. On weekends her parents count on her to be there to cook and clean and maintain her curfew. While she is there she also keeps her job working at the Mall of America. During her weekends at home she continues to gain knowledge of her heritage that her family revolve much of their life around.

Shaman, a priest or leader figure, visits the homes of believers. During the visit he gets into a "ceremonial trance and speaks to the ancestors and asks them for help in watching over the family for the next year," said Xiong. During the three to four hour visit animals are sacrificed to the ancestors as on offer in exchange for help. The house is blessed, and each family member is also blessed to attempt to divert any harm that could come to them that year. Most times the Shaman is a relative of the family so that it is easier for them to reach the ancestors because they too had known them. Xiong remembers when she was younger and the Shaman would be in his trance and she would be very afraid while he was communicating with the dead. She was, and still somewhat is, unsure about the idea of sacrificing the animals because it seems so "barbaric".

That is not the only thing she sees as barbaric in her culture. One thing she wishes that would change if she could would be that her heritage has deep roots in the idea of a patriarchal society. She thinks that the worst aspect of such a patriarchal society is what is expected of her as a woman is so unequally different from her brothers. While she is expected to cook, clean and take care of her siblings, they are not. There was even a time she recalls when she was not allowed to participate in an aspect of her grandfather's funeral.

Shaman funerals are more complex and different from typical American funerals. They are usually three to four days long; consist of the sacrificing of 12 or more animals on behalf of the recently deceased.

During the funeral ceremonies, time is set apart when the male blood relatives go into a room by themselves and drink beer, offer wine and money, and recite a passage that they have memorized. The passage is a form of respect that honors the dead. When Xiong's grandfather died she started to learn the passage that her brothers were learning with them until her father quickly stopped her and said that if she continued to learn the passage it would be bad for her grandfather, so she had to stop. She was saddened and upset that she could not participate in this aspect because she felt that "he was my grandpa too." There is one particular Shaman tradition however that Xiong is proud of.

With a lit up face Xiong begins explaining her most valued possession, her wedding dress. To her a wedding dress is not one gown that is made and worn on one day. Throughout the life of a young Shaman girl intricate gowns are made to show wealth and availability. The gowns are made by the girl's relatives and have great detail and are very beautiful and ceremonial.

When a woman is ready to wed a brand new gown is made for her. The new gown represents leaving the old family, and the old gowns, to start a new family with her husband. The gown indicates to others the ethnic clan that the bride is from. Xiong's will be mostly plain white and adorned with all sorts of jewels, coins and silver. The more accessories there are on a gown represents the wealth of the family that she is leaving. The gowns that she has from growing up bring her as much pride in her culture as her father has in her.

Being an educated man, Xiong is vicariously fulfilling the dreams her father had for all his children. She is the only child that is currently pursuing higher education. While at times it may be difficult to live a life true to your family's wishes and culture while trying to fit in with American ways, Xiong can not imagine a life in Laos . She may at times be irritated with the Hmong ways and think it's a barbaric way of life but it is still hers. College at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls and provided this History major the freedom she desires from the rigid cultural demands, as well as the avenues to loosen up and allow personal growth and exploration. Exploration rooted within herself as well as in her richly valued culture.

From the small beginnings of selling my mother's home-made doughnuts on the sidewalk and street corners of Congo Town, Monrovia, Liberia, to dodging bullets and facing hunger and disease, it didn't seem likely that I would one day end up in the United States, attending a University and working with one of the Minnesota's oldest newspapers. It was a dream of mine to one day become a journalist, and that dream is starting to take shape.

I was born in Monrovia, Liberia in 1980, a time when there was political turmoil in the country. As a matter of fact, I was born shortly after a military coup and a series or "revolutionary" uprisings. Hence, I was named "Baite"

Efforts to revive an already striving economy for a second time, suffered another impediment. Subsequently, in 1996, there was a third fiasco perpetrated by rival warlords thus plunging Monrovia and its environs in total chaos. This left the country's social and economic infrastructure in shambles.

Although elections were eventually held, the situation did not improve substantially. This prompted my family and I to begin the process of immigration to the United States. After going through a series of paper work, tests, and many other procedures, we finally immigrated to Minnesota, where I completed high school, enrolled in college, and majored in journalism. I could now fulfill my dream to create an awareness of the plight of those in the third world, such as I had experienced.

The Immigration and Nationality Act defines a refugee as "any person who is outside any country of such person's nationality or in the case of a person having no nationality, is outside any country in which such person last habitually resided, and who is unable or unwilling to return to, and is unable or unwilling to avail himself or herself of the protection of, that country because of persecution or a well-founded fear of persecution on account of race, religion, nationality, membership in a particular social group, or political opinion."

Twenty-year-old Freshman Naroen Khath is planning on majoring in education so she can one day inspire students the same way teachers inspired her as she worked her way through Minnesota 's public school system. Though her passionate desire to teach is what led Naroen to the University of Wisconsin-River Falls, it was a decision that her parents made thirteen years ago that ultimately got her to where she is today.

Naroen is a refugee. In the late 1970s Naroen's parents and eldest sister left their homeland of Cambodia and resettled in a small village in Thailand full of Cambodians. Though she is not entirely sure why her parents decided to move, in 1978 a Vietnamese invasion of Cambodia caused hundreds of thousands of Cambodians to flee their homeland and head for Thailand .

While in their newly adopted country the Khaths welcomed three more daughters into their family, Naroen being the youngest. She and her sisters made many friends in the village, but when asked about Thailand her clearest memory seems to be the poor school system. "One time we all just babysat the teacher's kids,"

In the early 1990s, rumors about the United States began circulating in the village and Naroen's parents were excited by what they heard. Two of the most intriguing things they were told was that it was easy to find a job and that all kids got an education in America . Her parents decided to make the move. At the ripe age of eight Naroen was taken through the steps of becoming a refugee to the United States .

She and her family were given physical examinations and were interviewed as a group by United States government officials. Being that Naroen was the youngest of the bunch, she simply had to state her age and sign her name. A couple weeks later the family got the news that they would be moving to America . They celebrated by going out for fruity drinks when they got the notice. Even though Naroen was not sure why they were leaving, she did not ask any questions. She and her sisters went through a program prior to leaving that taught them how to behave on an airplane and how to use a toilet. Their village's toilets were not hooked up to plumbing and the sound of a flushing toilet scared Naroen at first.

It may have been that fear that led her parents to conclude that she would not make it though the long flight to their new home. To bypass any potential problems she was given sleeping pills that lasted her through the two stops on the way to their final destination: Minnesota , USA .

The family arrived in the states with literally just the clothes on their backs; rumors in Thailand had warned them that whatever they brought with them would be thrown out. Thankfully, Naroen's uncle lived in St. Paul and the family was able to start their new life off in the home of a loved one. That initial comfort may have given them an advantage over other newcomers, but their adjustment to life in America was by no means easy.

The Khaths needed to apply for government assistance which required filling out "tons of paperwork." Since they did not yet speak English, they were dependent on others for quite some time. Naroen remembers it being difficult to adjust to her new surroundings, but her transition was a little easier than her parents.

Naroen and her sisters were immersed in the English language in the classroom, among fellow students and by way of the television. She had teachers encouraging her every step of the way to do her best. Her parents also went to school to learn the language in hopes of getting good jobs, but Naroen says it was difficult for them and didn't help much in the end.

Regardless of the language barrier, her parents were able to find late-night jobs and the family eventually moved into their own apartment. That felt too crowded so they later moved into government housing. With her parents working such late hours Naroen's oldest sister was her main care-giver and covered most parental duties, including attending Naroen's parent-teacher conferences.

Naroen too gained some responsibility when the youngest Khath sister was born in 1997. She was often expected to stay home and take care of her sister when she was just entering her teen years - a time when most young girls in America are becoming more social. Her home life may have been strict, but because it was all she knew and family is of such importance to her it felt normal.

The Khaths made sure to keep the most important Cambodian values and holidays in tact, such as the Cambodian New Year that the family celebrates every April 12 th , but they are not against the influence of the American culture that surrounds them here. "We basically celebrate everything," Naroen admits.

This openness her parents have towards American culture has allowed Naroen to experience a relatively normal American upbringing, but they unfortunately continue to struggle themselves. Her parents still feel alienated most of the time; they do not yet speak English proficiently and greatly miss all of their family that remains in Cambodia . Naroen suspects that part of her mother regrets leaving Cambodia because she has not seen her siblings in more than twenty years. Their most recent setback occurred when Naroen's mother was laid-off. Not only did they lose some of their income, they also lost their home.

Naroen has been sympathetic to her family's setback, but she has not lost sight of her own goals and is continuing her life as planned. She is enjoying a great relationship with her boyfriend, working hard to advance her education and is currently looking for her own place nearer to the cities because she has chosen to continue her college career at Metro State University ; she was disappointed by the quiet weekends here and rule-enforced life in the dorms.

Fortunately it seems that not much else has let her down since her 1992 arrival in America . She loves all the opportunities America has to offer her and is very grateful that she did not have to grow up in either Thailand or Cambodia . Not only would she likely have been illiterate, but she expects that she would be a mother to more than one child by now since women there are usually expected to have children to help with physical labor.

When comparing her life here in America to what she would have endured had her parents not moved, Naroen would consider it easier, but not necessarily easy. She understands that a good education and hard work are important factors to success in this country. She knows that by implementing these factors, her dream of becoming a teacher will become a reality - a reality she would never have imagined had her parents not taken the initiative to give their children the opportunity at better lives.

Whether you work for a nonprofit organization,   a newspaper, a radio station, television station, corporate communications, a government agency, a magazine, a book publisher, a public relations firm, free-lance or you have your own blog - you have communication experience that would benefit our students very much.

As we begin our new converged curriculum in Fall 2005, we're looking for alumni who are interested in providing informational interviews (in person or via e-mail), speaking to classes, welcoming a student to job shadow, critiquing resumes, alerting us to internship possibilities, and mentoring. We're calling the connection SAGE Advice.

Yes, I look forward to a student interviewing me about my communication field. Students in JOUR 110 are required to conduct one informational interview. If you mark yes, your name will be listed on a "Informational Interviews with Alumni" list. Students would contact you either in person or by e-mail. We also encourage students to conduct additional  interviews on their own, so you may receive requests not tied to a class assignment.

Yes, I would love to speak to journalism classes! We are looking for speakers from a variety of work experiences where a journalism degree provides an important foundation. Marking yes here means you'll get an e-mail or phone call soon! If you do not live nearby, but plan to visit the area when classes are in session, let us know as much in advance as possible, and we will make every effort to fit your visit into our classes.

Yes, I would enjoy having a student spend a workday with me. This is not a course requirement, but we strongly recommend students to job shadow whenever possible. If you mark yes, your name will go on a "Job Shadowing with Alumni" list.

Yes, I'm willing to take time to critique student resumes. Your name would go on a "Critiques by Alumni" list. Students would send you their resume electronically and expect a reasonable response time (1-2 weeks). These students would most likely be juniors or seniors.

Yes, it would be a rewarding experience to mentor a journalism student. This would entail connecting with a student on a regular basis, either via e-mail or in person, to give advice, share expertise, and provide support. Your name would be listed under "Alumni Mentors." Students may contact you directly or a faculty member may make the initial contact.

Andris Straumanis, a man who didnt think about studying journalism until his senior year in high school and chose not to major in history because he didnt see himself as a teacher, has been welcomed as UW-River Falls newest journalism professor.

Straumanis was born in New York and went on to live in Pennsylvania, North Carolina, Illinois and Minnesota. He said that having a professor as a father caused the family to move around the United States as he taught at different universities.

After graduating from a southern Illinois high school in 1975, Straumanis went on to attend Southern Illinois University at Carbondale. He received a bachelors degree in journalism in 1977, finishing two years early after earning credit for passing several general education proficiency exams and attending two summer sessions.

He decided to attend the University of Minnesota in pursuit of a masters degree in American studies in the early 1980s, and is currently working on his dissertation for a doctorate in mass communication.

After graduate school, Straumanis spent one and a half years as a reporter and photographer for the Monticello Times in Monticello, Minn. He then found a position as editor of the Elk River Star News in Elk River, Minn. where he spent four years.

But by the end of the second semester, he  felt differently and was rehired on another contract when positions opened up. For seven years, Straumanis taught anything they wanted me to teach including introductory courses for mass communications and news writing as well as visual communications, public affairs reporting, advanced reporting, magazine editing and design, women in mass media, and news editing and design for the World Wide Web.

In his personal life, Straumanis said he spends time remodeling (although he said he has always been bad at carpentry), has an eclectic music collection, enjoys reading, good cooking, foreign films and bicycling.

Straumanis is second-generation Latvian, and he has spent time teaching and doing research in the country. He said he visits at least once a year and plans to return in January to study Latvian media.

Straumanis also has a 20-year-old daughter, Kaija, who is a junior at Coe College in Cedar Rapids, Iowa, a school that he said is known for having a good writing program. An English major with a minor in German, Straumanis said she is interested in becoming a translator. She is currently living in Germany through a study abroad program.

O'Connell graduated from UW-RF with bachelor's degrees in journalism, English and sociology and a goal to become an investigative reporter. She said that the Watergate scandal and the Vietnam War helped drive her interest in the field.

"I was a farm kid at heart," O'Connell said of growing up in Newark, N.J. With a love of horses, she said she always wanted one of her own and one of the reasons she decided to attend UW-RF was because she would be able to keep one on campus.

"My spirit would soar when I was approached by people who thought they had importanat news," O'Connell said of working as editor of a small town paper. "Cars lined up outside my house during deer season to get their pictures taken."

She spent a lot of time selling advertisements, shoveling snow and sitting on city boards with people three times her age. Her husband was an active local politician and O'Connell said she felt like she "shouldn't be writing stories that covered my husband's politics."

It was then that she decided to leave her job as editor and was "grubbing around for 10 years of unemployment and getting paid minimum wage at a bank." Because of an admitted lack of skill in mathematics, O'Connell said she decided to "go over to the dark side" to find a career in public relations.

She said that she didn't plan to teach, but received a fateful telephone call one day when, three weeks into the semester, the public relations professor quit. O'Connell began her career as an educator at 7 p.m. that day.

O'Connell said deregulation of  the energy industry opened a lot of opportunities while she worked with Edison, and she was able to be involved with the creation of its new identity  while handling five advertising and public relations agencies for different languages.

Deregulation folded in 2001, and OConnell said she left the company by choice in 2003 because there wasnt work to do. She took an unpaid leave, thinking that things may change for the industry in the future, while freelance writing in northern California.

Working on the journalism department payroll while teaching marketing communications classes, OConnell was offered the chance to change departments, enabling the University to hire another instructor for core, news-focused journalism courses.

"I was very proud of not only my effort, but the effort of every writer, photography, designer and columnist, he said. We each played a part and I'm very proud of the progress the staff made since then."

Hausler, who was the WRFW program director at the time, went on air with a brief report about Lydeckers death. After that announcement, he was joined by Bryan Harmelink, music director; Jessica Wolf, news director; and Amanda Granger, who helped out in the news department. The four students decided to spend the day preparing a documentary biography in Lydeckers honor for the five oclock news.

He described the final product as rough, because it was recorded only once and left in its original form. Hausler said that taking a piece from conception to completion in one day meant that it wouldnt have the technological quality of the average story.

But that didnt discourage Sandy Ellis, journalism professor and overseer for the WRFW news department, from deciding to send the piece to the Wisconsin Broadcasters Association's Student Awards for Excellence's competition.

Journalism lab stocked with iMacs by Helen Clarke Journalism students  were delighted at the start of fall semester when they discovered that the old PCs in the department computer lab had been replaced by brand new iMacs.

Ellis said broadcast journalism faculty identified  software  needed for their classes and found Production Suite, a package offered by Apple that includes all of the best video production software available to professionals.

Slattery said in-class discussions have played a larger role in her classes since the computers were placed facing the surrounding walls of the lab rather than in rows, and tables were grouped in the center of the room.

Helen Clarke is a senior print journalism major at UW-River Falls with an Option B minor in human studies. Prior to writing for the Online Journalist, she worked as a reporting intern for the Hudson Star-Observer and as a columnist for the Student Voice. She is currently both the assistant editor and reporter for the Voice.

In the future, Clarke says she has many career options she would like to look into. Some of these prospects include working as a reporter, copy editor, or editor of a newspaper or magazine. She calls herself 'opinionated' and 'tenacious,' and hopes to one day share her views with the world through journalism.

I am an assistant professor in the Department of Journalism at the University of Wisconsin - River Falls, teaching classes in print and online journalism and advising the campus newspaper, the Student Voice.

I continue to work as a freelance writer and Web communicator. Among other activities is editing Latvians Online, an English-language Web site offering news, features, reviews, opinion and other material of interest to Latvians living abroad. The site was established in November 2000, but its various roots go back to 1995.

Minnesota's School of Journalism and Mass Communication. My dissertation looks at the relationship between mass communication and ethnic identity by examining the Latvian immigrant press in North America from 1896 to 1920.

County, Wis. The community was settled before World War I and is one of the few places in the United States where there was a concentration of Latvian immigrants. The research has been supported by a grant from the Latvian Foundation.

A digital collection at Duke University that examines the development of advertising from the mid-19th century, when many of the devices of modern advertising began to develop in the United States. Claims to have more than 9,000 images of various form of advertising.

Based in the political science department at the University of Wisconsin - Madison, the project studies the relationship between advertising and political campaigns. Included on the site are examples of historic television commercials from several presidential campaigns, including the 1964 "Daisy Girl" spot for Lyndon Johnson's campaign.

Created by the Carolina Business News Initiative at the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill, the site "is designed to provide people interested in the field of business journalism some historical perspective of how reporting and writing about business and the economy has evolved throughout time."

A great museum in Arlington, Va. The facility is closed now while a new building is constructed in Washington, D.C. Meanwhile, the Web site continues to offer a number of interesting features, including "Today's Front Pages," a digital collection of newspaper front pages from across the United States and the world.

The Library of Congress in Washington, D.C., provides a rich online collection, including this section devoted to inventor Thomas Edison and his work with early motion pictures. The site includes numerous silent shorts for download.

Based in Pittsburgh, Pa., and founded in 1988, the society "is an organization of individuals and institutions sharing a common interest in the art, history and practice of the daguerreotype." The site includes a gallery of daguerreotypes.

The George Eastman House in Rochester, N.Y., honors the inventor of Kodak film and provides a venue for the history of photography. Among features of the Web site is a look at the history of photographic technology.

A site devoted to Nicephore Niepce, regarded as the experimenter who created the first photograph, as well as to the early history of photography. Includes a section on the house from which View from the Window at Le Gras was made. In French and English.

A rich site created by the University of California, Riverside. Includes a number of Web projects examining the history of photography and photographers. Among them are a gallery of Kodak Brownie cameras, as well as examinations of the work of Eadweard Muybridge and Ansel Adams.

Nanci Griffith is an atypical country singer. Hailing from Austin, Texas, she regularly pays homage to those who came before her, but also is a gifted songwriter herself. She's best seen in small, intimate venues.

The best-known folk music band from Latvia. While its roots are in traditional music, the band in recent years has mixed various styles and is now better classified in the "post-folk" or "world music" genres.

Web designer Dan Cederholm creates some well-structured sites, plus offers good advice on how to do so. useit.com Usability guru Jakob Nielsen's site suggests ways to cut through the junk in Web design.

One of my strong research interests is the history of the immigrant and ethnic press in the United States. As such, I've been collecting links to Web sites of these newspapers as they come to grips with the digital age and reach out to new audiences. Eventually, this page will be moved to a separate domain, but for now, here are the links categorized by ethnic group.

I define "ethnic press" to be the products of the various ethnic groups in the United States, while the "immigrant press" is a subset of the ethnic press that is primarily geared toward the first generation of newcomers to a host society. The informational needs of the first generation, particularly in terms of easing acculturation, differ from those of the second and subsequent generations, for whom the focus often shifts to issues of cultural maintenance.

A broader term, ethnic media, addresses how many of these groups have expanded into radio, television and the Internet, as well as ventured into film and recorded music. Despite various predictions over the years that the ethnic media are waning, they remain a vibrant source of information and entertainment for millions of people across the United States.

Published in New York, Ethnikos Kyrix claims it is "the only Greek American daily newspaper in the world and is the undisputed media leader in the Greek American community." The company also publishes a weekly English-language edition, The National Herald.

The modern English version of the one of the great Yiddish-language newspapers in American ethnic history. The Yiddish version, founded in 1897, still exists, as does a new Russian version. Published in New York.

Billed as the "nation's largest, independent English language monthly newspaper dedicated to the promotion, preservation and continuance of Polish American culture." Founded in 1911 as a Polish-language newspaper. Published in Boston, Mass.

The media system in Latvia since 1991 has progressed from what might be described as a traditional "Soviet Communist" model, through a transitional period, to a European model of social responsibility. The press is protected under the constitution, but a number of laws do provide for some restrictions.

While print and electronic media were critical in informing the population about radical and rapid changes during the National Awakening of the late 1980s into the early 1990s, the dust quickly settled after Latvia reemerged as an independent nation in 1991. Today, the forces of commercialism, political influence and concentration of ownership have combined to where the media are no longer so much the venue for debate as the topic of debate. Interesting research is emerging in Latvia about the role of media in a democracy, about the influence media have on society, and about the divergent "information spaces" occupied by Latvian- and Russian-language media. Some of the research may be found on the politics and public policy portal politika.lv.

Want to find the Department of Journalism? Try this Google map. Hints: Click the plus and minus signs to zoom in or out. You can scroll around the map by dragging the mouse pointer. Click on the pin icon to get our address.

All undergraduate students must complete General Education Program requirements comprising slightly fewer than one-third of the total credits needed to earn a degree. The General Education Program is designed to develop essential academic skills, to acquaint students with their cultural heritage, and to provide them with a broad base of liberal studies in the humanities, mathematics, and in the social and physical sciences. This program will serve as a foundation for study in a major. Further, it will develop breadth of knowledge and will cultivate the critical judgment necessary for mature and responsible lives in work, in leisure and as citizens of the nation and the world.

The University of Wisconsin Board of Regents has approved mission statements for the University of Wisconsin System and for the several kinds of degree-granting institutions within the System. The System Mission Statement and the Core Mission of the University Cluster (predominantly four-year campuses) are included below.

The university offers liberal arts programs and degrees to meet regional needs in the arts, humanities, mathematics, natural and physical sciences and social and behavioral sciences. The liberal arts also strengthen and broaden programs in the agricultural sciences, teacher education, and business administration.

The university offers graduate programs in education, agriculture and other areas clearly associated with its mission. Development of cooperative graduate instructional programs with appropriate institutions is encouraged.

The university expects scholarly activity, including research, scholarship and creative endeavor, that supports its programs at the baccalaureate level, its selected graduate programs and its select mission.

The university continues to develop interinstitutional relationships in cooperative research, graduate training and undergraduate programs within the state, region and world. As a border institution, the University promotes interstate cooperation.

The university provides students opportunities to develop an appreciation of the richness and diversity of American culture and is committed to representing this diversity in its staff and student body.

The university offers students the opportunity to increase their global awareness and sensitivity to other cultures. It also has a continuing commitment to provide opportunities for students to live, study and travel abroad and to increase the number and diversity of international students on campus.

The university provides public service by using its resources to address problems and concerns throughout the state and region. Special emphasis is placed on cooperative extension, extension and economic development outreach.

The mission of this system is to develop human resources, to discover and disseminate knowledge, to extend knowledge and its application beyond the boundaries of its campuses, and to serve and stimulate society by developing in students heightened intellectual, cultural, and humane sensitivities; scientific, professional, and technological expertise; and a sense of value and purpose. Inherent in this mission are methods of instruction, research, extended education, and public service designed to educate people and improve the human condition. Basic to every purpose of the system is the search for truth.

Offer an environment that emphasizes teaching excellence and meets the educational and personal needs of students through effective teaching, academic advising, counseling, and through university-sponsored cultural, recreational, and extracurricular programs.

Expect scholarly activity, including research, scholarship, and creative endeavor, that supports its programs at the associate and baccalaureate degree level, its selected graduate programs, and its approved mission statement.

Promote the integration of the extension function, assist the University of Wisconsin - Extension in meeting its responsibility for statewide coordination, and encourage faculty and staff participation in outreach activity.

The provisions of the catalog do not constitute a contract between a student at UW-River Falls and the university. The sole purpose of the catalog is to provide regulations, course listings, degree programs and fee schedules which are in effect at the time of publication. UW-River Falls reserves the right to change the regulations in the catalog at any time during the period for which it is in effect and to add, modify or withdraw courses at any time. Changes to the information in the catalog may be reflected in the online catalog located at http://www.uwrf.edu/catalog. UW-River Falls, with the concurrence of the System Administration and the Board of Regents of the University of Wisconsin System, also reserves the right to change fees and to add, modify or withdraw degree programs at any time. Effective dates of changes will be determined by the proper university authorities and published through class schedules or other official publications of the university.

The University of Wisconsin-River Falls is committed to creating an educational community which enhances student awareness and appreciation of diverse ethnicities and cultures and which actively supports tolerance, civility and respect for the rights and sensibilities of each person without regard to economic status, ethnic background, political views, sexual orientation, or other personal characteristics or beliefs. Awareness of and sensitivity to diverse ethnic and cultural heritages are especially sought in applicants.

Accounting involves measuring business activities and communicating this information to investors, creditors, and other decision makers who will use it to make sound, informed, financial decisions. This practice serves to encourage investment activity, which in turn creates jobs and helps the economy to grow.

It is the intention of the department to expose the student to the leading edge of theory while emphasizing the importance of human relationships and the ability to form sound ethical and moral decisions. In short, the program intends to equip the student for lifelong learning.

Students are required to have a minimum of 150 semester credit hours in order to sit for the CPA exam in Wisconsin. As of 2003, forty-eight states and jurisdictions have legislated the 150 credit hour requirement. The 150 semester hours may be completed at the undergraduate or the graduate level. Students should consult their adviser for the best course of study.

Students should plan to take MATH 146 (if necessary) before taking MATH 156 or ECON 205 as required in General Education. The lower division requirements must be completed before the student begins the upper division requirements and the required accounting courses. A 2.5 grade point average must be maintained in the required accounting and business law courses to graduate with a major in accounting.

Overall, one-half of the credits required for graduation must be taken outside of the College of Business and Economics. At least 50 percent of the business credits required must be taken in the UW-RF College of Business and Economics.

Computer Literacy - students who are not prepared to use word processing and spreadsheet programs to complete assignments in Agricultural Engineering Technology courses should elect CSIS 105 in their freshman year.

Agricultural Studies is a four-year Bachelor of Science degree program. Students majoring in Agricultural Studies will acquire broad knowledge in the fields of agriculture, food and the environmental sciences. Students may also pursue individual special interests through elective classes. In consultation with an adviser, students may choose elective courses in areas such as agronomy, animal science, communications, marketing, management, international studies, etc. The Agricultural Studies major also requires completion of a minor in an agricultural subject area.

Careers in Advertising Design and Computer Graphics. Students interested in a career in advertising design and computer graphics are advised to take a Broad Area Art Degree choosing options within the degree to become as broadly and professionally prepared as possible. An internship is recommended in the senior year. Adviser: M. Padgett.

Careers in Art Therapy. Students interested in a career in art therapy are advised to take an art major degree with a psychology minor. A program sheet to guide minor elective choices is available in the art department. Graduate school (M.A.) is required for registration in the field. Internships are available for senior students. Adviser: L. Jermal.

Semester Abroad Program. Each fall semester, art majors may participate in the Study Abroad Program, do an independent research project in a European country of their choice, and receive six credit hours in ART 378 and six credit hours of INTS 377. Participants must meet weekly for preparatory sessions during the spring semester preceding the experience abroad. Adviser: D. Heberlein.

Internship Program. The art department offers a number of opportunities for students to gain on-the-job experience as a supplement to their academic preparation. Students work under the direct supervision of a job supervisor and a member of the art faculty. See ART 379 for details. Adviser: M. Padgett.

Courses in the major or required supporting courses may be double counted to satisfy the General Education science requirements. Therefore, the total General Education credit hour requirement is reduced by the courses that can be double-counted.

The Biotechnology major is an interdisciplinary program that is focused on the molecular basis of life processes and the techniques utilized to both study and control these processes under in vivo and in vitro conditions. The Biotechnology curriculum draws upon the expertise and course offerings of the participating departments: Biology, Chemistry, Animal and Food Science, and Plant and Earth Science. Students complete core programs in Biology and Chemistry, which lead to minors in both areas, and a 30-semester hour, interdepartmental course requirement.

The Biotechnology major is designed to provide those students who are interested in pursuing careers at the interface of biology and chemistry with the academic background required to either secure entry level positions in the biotechnology industry or to continue their education in graduate or professional schools.

Students majoring in business administration have varied opportunities to select a program to meet specific interests. One choice is to complete a business administration degree with a minor. Another is to pursue a broad area business administration degree with an option in marketing, management, finance, or management information systems. A minor is not required with the Broad Area Major in Business Administration.

The Department of Animal and Food Science offers three options for Dairy Science majors. Required core courses within the Dairy Science major are identical, regardless of option. Additional requirements are based on the choice of option. The Dairy ScienceManagement option is designed for students seeking careers in dairy farm management or supporting industries such as feed, pharmaceutical, or genetics sectors of the dairy industry. The Dairy ScienceScience option is designed for students that plan to enroll in graduate or professional degree programs following completion of the Bachelor of Science degree. This option is strongly suggested for students that hope to enroll in a college of veterinary medicine at a future date. The Dairy ScienceMinor option is designed for students who wish to supplement their education with an academic minor or second major.

The mission of the Department of Health and Human Performance is to prepare quality teachers, coaches, fitness and recreation leaders who will enrich and support the well-being of others; help all individuals live healthy, satisfying, and energetic lives; and cultivate a commitment to physical activity and healthy lifestyle choices.

The four-year curriculum leading to the bachelor's degree in Elementary Education, designed to prepare teachers for elementary schools, grades 1-6, consists of a minimum of 132 semester hours that give students a broad general education, professional preparation for effective teaching at the elementary education level, and special preparation in an academic minor. Upon completion of these requirements, the elementary education major is certifiable for grades 1-6.

Admission to Teacher Education is required the semester prior to enrolling in the Block sequence. See the college web page http://www.uwrf.edu/college-of education/ for a complete list of requirements for admission and current admission deadline dates.

The B.A. in English, Literature Emphasis-Liberal Arts prepares students to be broadly educated, culturally and historically, and skilled in thinking critically, researching, and writing. The degree prepares students for jobs in business, government and nonprofit organizations, journalism, and publishing.

The B.A. in English, Creative Writing Emphasis-Liberal Arts gives students preparation in both creative writing and literature. This degree helps students interested in pursuing a graduate degree or a career in the publishing and writing fields.

The B.S. in English, Literature Emphasis-Liberal Arts prepares students through their broad education and important general skills to enter various careers, and they choose minors that supplement their career goals. Some commonly chosen minors are history, film studies, journalism, professional writing, art, speech, and one of the modern languages. If a modern language is not chosen as a minor, a modern language course is strongly recommended as a liberal arts elective.

The B.S. in English, Creative Writing Emphasis-Liberal Arts gives students preparation in both creative writing and literature. This degree helps students interested in pursuing a graduate degree or a career in the publishing and writing fields.

The Bachelor of Science (Education) degree is primarily intended to certify students to teach English in public high schools though the core skills it develops have broad application as well. The B.S. in English-Education prepares students to teach literature, interpretive skills, writing, language, research, and critical thinking skills in high schools. Students must choose a minor. Minors in which students can obtain a second certification to teach in that subject are popular choices. Some of these minors include speech communication and theatre arts, a modern language, journalism, and history.

The B.S. in Teaching English to Speakers of Other Languages-Education prepares students to teach children who are non-native speakers of English in the public schools. Depending on the educational setting in which the student intends to work, such a major can work well with any of the minors that are certifiable areas of study.

The Bachelor of Science in Broad Area English-Education degree is designed to provide prospective high school teachers with additional areas of study that support their core English courses and that respond to the current demands of the teaching situations in modern secondary schools. No minor is required with this major; the Broad Area in effect replaces the minor.

The environmental science major is designed to prepare students to face challenges in environmental quality management and sustainable development. Environmental science majors are prepared to monitor, model and manage environmental systems in the areas of environmental quality and risk evaluation, sampling and analysis, remediation and regulatory compliance. Graduates pursue careers in environmental consulting firms, local, state and federal environmental agencies or corporations.

Environmental Sciences and the College of Arts and Sciences, and is administered by the department of plant and earth science. Departments contributing to the major include agricultural engineering technology, biology, chemistry, geography, physics, and plant and earth science. Required foundation courses are in the College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences or in the College of Arts and Sciences.

History, Journalism, and Speech Communication and Theatre Arts. Film Studies examines film as an art form, as an industry, and as the most popular and most influential communication medium of the twentieth century. Film Studies provides an interdisciplinary approach to visual literacy as it introduces students to film history, theory, criticism, and production.

The geography major allows students to relate their studies in the humanities and social sciences to their work in the natural sciences. The geography curriculum can be tailored to those who have broad interdisciplinary interests and to those who have a focused interest in one of the geography subfields: human geography, physical geography or Geographic Information Systems (GIS) and cartography.

In addition to the geography major and minor, the department offers a GIS/Cartography minor. Coursework prepares students for careers in GIS applications and digital map production. The department offers various courses in cartographic theory, GIS, and map design. All GIS and cartography courses are computer based.

An emphasis is not a minor but is a suggested series of courses taken as directed electives that fit together well, fit well with the geology major and that would help a career in the designated area. Consult with geology faculty for more information.

Students from all disciplines are encouraged to enjoy the opportunities provided through minors in health education, coaching, dance education, or outdoor education. An Adapted Physical Education minor is also available for students seeking K-12 physical education certification or for teachers who are already certified in K-12 physical education.

The Department of History and Philosophy offers courses and degrees for those who wish to obtain a liberal arts degree which teaches how to read, think, and write effectively. Thus, a liberal arts degree is the best preparation for careers in business, advertising, government, foreign service, international relations, publications, journalism, and human services. It also is indicated for those who wish to pursue a career specifically in the field of history including teaching at the elementary, secondary, or college level, or working in museums, archives and libraries. Students take courses in a variety of periods, areas and topics.

Required of all participants during junior or senior year. Participants must submit a project proposal outlining their research hypotheses, methodologies, and expected outcomes, and suggest appropriate faculty reviewers to the Honors Director for approval before commencing their work. Each project will be evaluated by three faculty chosen by the student and approved by the Honors Director.

Service learning in this context means unpaid volunteer work that will benefit the community and provide a significant learning experience. Service learning is based on the rationale that learning occurs through reflection on the service.

Kilian, business administration; Charles Rader, geography; Ogden Rogers, social work; David Trechter, agricultural economics The primary mission of the International Studies Program is to create global awareness by providing students with the intellectual skills and substantive knowledge necessary to meet the global challenges of the 21st Century.

Students may complete a first major in international studies within the Colleges of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences; Arts and Sciences; and Education and Professional Studies. Students in the College of Business and Economics can complete the major as a second major. Students in all colleges can complete an international studies minor. Students must complete the appropriate BA or BS Liberal Arts requirements for their respective colleges.

Students complete two years of a foreign language of their choice; e.g., complete any two-year language at UW-RF, complete testouts equivalent to two years, or complete two years at another accredited university and transfer the credits to UW-RF.

Students complete one year of a foreign language of their choice; e.g., complete any one-year language at UW-RF, complete testouts equivalent to one year, or complete one year at another accredited university and transfer the credits to UW-RF.

In order to maintain accreditation and to fulfill the department mission of providing journalism students with a broad liberal arts education, all majors must take a minimum of 80 credit hours outside journalism and mass communication courses, including a minimum of 65 credit hours in the liberal arts and sciences.

Communication emphasis offered in the Speech Communication and Theatre Arts department. All journalism majors must take six supporting courses outside the major, specified under the Supporting Courses category. These six courses may be counted in other areas of the students degree program such as General Education, Liberal Arts, a second major, a minor, or general electives.

Journalism and Secondary Education. Students interested in teaching journalism and/or serving as a newspaper or yearbook advisor at the secondary school level may major or minor in journalism, and must take a second teaching area major such as English or broad area studies. The student should consult with the dean of the College of Education and Professional Studies for specific teaching requirements.

Journalism and Agriculture. This program is designed for students who wish to pursue a career in agricultural journalism. The student develops a major in journalism and a second major or minor in the College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences. Students may take AGED 230 (Agricultural News Writing) as a journalism elective.

The Language Arts/Reading minor is one of eight recommended by the Department of Public Instruction and the College of Education and Professional Studies for Elementary Education majors who must choose a minor. They select this minor to provide breadth of understanding and skills in English (literature, language and writing), speech, and reading. Course work will support both the specific teaching of these areas and also the teaching of other subjects (i.e. reading, speaking, and writing across the curriculum). Students who choose this minor should plan their programs with Dr. Nicholas Karolides, adviser for the minor.

The interdisciplinary marketing communications major integrates the activities of advertising, public relations, sales promotion, direct marketing, personal selling and cybermarketing into a single professional field of expertise. Students will develop knowledge and skills in oral, written and visual modes of communication.

Practical experience with current technology tools and a required internship program ensure that students have not only strong academic preparation, but also practical experience in marketing communications activities.

A student may complete the major in Marketing Communications in the College of Arts and Sciences, the College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences, or in the College of Business and Economics. Please consult the dean of the respective college for college-specific course requirements. It is recommended that a student completing the major in CBE or CAFES have a minor in that college.

Minor. All applicants for admission to degree programs in music must satisfactorily complete a performance audition. Audition requirements for all performance areas are available from the Music Department. In addition to the performance audition, all transfer applicants must take a music theory and history placement exam.

The results of the exam will determine the appropriate course levels. Music students should consult the department handbook, which clarifies course requirements and provides additional pertinent information.

The minor in Musical Theatre, offered as a collaborative effort between the departments of speech communication and theatre arts, music, and health and human performance (dance), is designed to provide students an opportunity to gain formal training. It includes courses in music theory and performance, dance styles, and stage movement, as well as additional courses in theatrical performance, production, and design, with special consideration to their application in creation of and performance in musical production. This minor is available to all students, including music and theatre majors and minors.

Philosophical inquiry aims at uncovering, analyzing, and evaluating the fundamental values and assumptions implicit in various human activities and practices such as science, the arts, religion, morality, and social and political institutions.

This major is awarded jointly with a B.S. in engineering after the student has successfully completed a three-year program at UW-River Falls with a minimum grade point average of 3.0 and a two-year program at either UW-Madison or the University of Minnesota.

Broad Field Social Studies Major: Political Science is one of the subject fields comprising the Broad Field Social Studies major. For information about this major, see page 112 of the printed catalog.

The Professional Writing Minor Business-Government option provides study and practice in the spectrum of communication from graphic design to computer literacy and emphasizes training useful in business, industry, and government. The minor is not recommended for English Education majors. Students selecting this minor are advised to complete an English internship, ENGL 379.

The Professional Writing Minor Creative Writing option serves as a foundation for general publication or in-house publication in large businesses and also for "professional writing" in its traditional sense: "free-lance" writing as a primary or supplemental source of income or as an avocation. The minor is not recommended for English Education majors. Students selecting this minor are advised to complete an English internship, ENGL 379.

Additional courses in Psychology. All psychology majors are required to participate in the departmental assessment of the psychology major. This involves keeping a portfolio and taking a psychology assessment test in their first and last year in the program.

Broad Field Sciences Programs are monitored by representatives from the departments of biology, chemistry, physics, and plant and earth science. Students choosing one of these programs will typically be assigned an advisor from one of these departments. The Broad Field Science Programs are interdepartmental programs tailored to various interdisciplinary niches in the sciences. These programs are the equivalent of a major and a minor. A student selecting one of these programs is not required to have an additional minor. Two of these programs lead to certification in secondary or middle school education. Students interested in certification in those programs should consult the Secondary Education Handbook for Undergraduates at www.uwrf.edu/college-of-education/ for the detailed requirements for various levels of certification in Wisconsin General Education Requirements Arts and Sciences as listed on pages 22-23; and Education and Professional Studies as listed on pages 31-32. Up to two of these courses may be double counted in the General Education program, depending on your specific course of study.

A person with a broad field science license may teach any science class, middle-school level through grade 10, and any basic science class in grades 11-12 which is not a college-preparatory course, advanced placement (AP) course, or an elective course with more depth of content than a basic course. However, you may teach advanced courses in your areas of concentration.

Up to two of these courses may be double counted in the General Education program, depending on your specific course of study. When planning your course selection, be sure to consider the prerequisites for upper level courses. Higher level courses may be substitute on a case-by-case basis; contact the coordinator.

The degree curricula designed to prepare teachers for the secondary school, grades 9-12, consists of a minimum of 120 semester hours that give the student a broad general education, specialized preparation in one or more academic fields and professional preparation needed for effective teaching. Specific course requirements are listed for each academic department preceding the departmental course descriptions.

The minor in Social Science, available for majors in elementary and middle school (6-9) education is a program of study comprised of several social science disciplines: economics, geography, history, political science and sociology.

The Broad Field Social Studies (BFSS) degree is the preferred degree for secondary teaching in the area of social studies. This degree offers many options and great versatility. The program requires that the student have a concentration (a major) in one of the social sciences and then additional work in the other social sciences.

At River Falls mathematics is viewed as both the foundation for the sciences and a significant field of knowledge in its own right. Our mathematics instruction is dedicated to nurturing and developing students creative mathematical talents as problem-solvers.

The River Falls Mathematics faculty has diverse backgrounds and research interests, including combinatorics, differential equations, mathematics education , mathematical engineering, numerical analysis, probability, and statistics. Two courses which are unique to the River Falls Mathematics Program are Honors Calculus and Senior Seminar. Honors Calculus is a one hour course, taken in tandem with the normal calculus courses, in which first year students have fun exploring calculus in more breadth and depth.

The Mathematics Department is arranged so that many faculty have study spaces directly outside their offices providing an environment of easy accessibility to professors. The department supports a Math Study Room where students work and informally interact with one another, and a Math Help Center which is staffed with upper level students who can provide help and insights to students studying mathematics in their first two years.

The liberal arts have played an increasingly important role at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls since the mission of the University was broadened from that of a teachers college half a century ago.

Based on the premise that the liberal arts offer the strongest foundation for society through the development of the intellectual, cultural and social concepts of the student, the College of Arts and Sciences offers many opportunities.

The mission of the college is to provide for the education of the complete person, education for citizenship and leadership, education for a productive life, and education for the love of learning. These are the primary values associated with a liberal arts education regardless of the discipline.

Science degree, was authorized by the governing board of the State Universities in 1951. This program is designed to give a broad, liberal education and to be the foundation for further specialization in graduate schools, professional colleges of medicine, law, dentistry, engineering and others, or to prepare the student to go directly into the civil service, industry and other fields of work.

A total of 120 semester hours is required for graduation. One full year of work (30 credits) must have been done in residence and the last 15 credits for the degree must have been done in residence unless the dean of the college permits an exception. A candidate must have an honor point average of 2.25 in advanced courses (numbered 300 and above) in the major field of specialization and must have an overall honor point average of 2.0 to graduate.

The courses taken to satisfy the Language Competency, International Component and College Requirement may not be counted toward the major. However, they may be counted toward an optional minor, as a minor is not required for the BA degree.

Taking 14 credits in a language other than the language of the major; or taking 14 credits of additional coursework selected from the College Requirements and/or the International Component; or completing a minor in another field.

These courses meet the Liberal Arts requirements prescribed in the preceding degree programs. They are taken from this catalog only. For courses listed in previous catalogs or those approved subsequent to this catalog, check with the Dean, College of Arts and Sciences.

Assumes completion of 8 credits in each of two areas from B, C and D and 9 credits in the third along with completion of the other requirements. If the English and mathematics requirements are satisfied by demonstrated proficiency, the total number of credits is reduced accordingly.

This policy does not replace a requirement for general education courses to contain writing components. This objective can be fulfilled by a course within major or another area with a substantial writing component.

The fee schedule for the interning student will be the same as the fee schedule for an on-campus student. Each department, with the approval of the Dean of the College, will decide the appropriate number of hours for each internship, according to the level of the work experience in relation to upper division courses, the extent of work involved and the relationship of the work to professional academic pursuits. Individual departments will determine if internship programs can substitute for required courses in the major or minor field. A minimum number of 45 work experience hours per week for the semester is required for 12 credits.

Internship proposals may be initiated by the student, the major or minor department or off-campus agencies. Planning with the academic advisor for an internship should precede the semester in which the proposal is submitted. Some applications for an internship should be submitted to the department chair for approval while other applications should be submitted to the dean of the college for approval at least six weeks prior to the intended start of the internship, after its first having been processed and approved by the faculty advisor and department chairperson. Students must register for the internship credits during the semester the internship is conducted in order to receive credit.

The department will require additional evaluation, the methods to be worked out between the student and his/her faculty advisor within the guidelines of the college. A summary written by the student is submitted to the dean along with the two evaluations prior to the submission of a grade.

In accordance with university policy, the College of Arts and Sciences offers independent study through most departments. Additionally, most departments offer courses in directed readings. Independent Study (numbered 499) is defined as an individually designed topic or course of study or unstructured research to meet the needs of a student. Directed Readings (numbered 490) is a course that is generally prescribed as to its content, materials and activities; it may be used to instruct students in the materials of a given course when that course is taken out of sequence or individually, but under the direction of an instructor.

Students will be limited to nine credit hours of independent study course work and nine credit hours of directed readings but with a combined maximum of 12 credit hours within the 120 credit degree program. Individual departmental courses of study may allow fewer such credits than this maximum for their majors or minors. From one to three credits may be taken in each of these courses in a given semester, depending upon departmental requirements and availability.

Students should plan for such courses with their major advisor. Application for independent study or directed readings must be processed through the department chairperson for approval of the course proposal and assignment of a faculty adviser.

Students interested in careers in bio-medical research are advised to take a broad area science major, choosing options within the major to become as broadly and professionally prepared as possible. A suggested program sheet is available in the Biology Department.

Humanities courses focus on art, music and literature as representative of the ideas and cultural values of a historical period. These interdisciplinary courses integrate the study of the arts, emphasizing correlations among them. Frequently, field trips to museums, concerts and theaters are included. See the course listing for Humanities.

These broad field science majors and minor are programs of study comprised of the science disciplines: biology, chemistry, geology and physics. For information about these majors and their application toward certification see the program listing for Science, Broad Field.

Teacher education students are required to complete a comprehensive program of study in general education, a rigorous series of field-based professional education courses and experiences, and extensive academic study in the areas of certification. Professional education course work and experiences are field-based, requiring numerous laboratory and school-site experiences that apply classroom content. Professional organizations within the college offer students opportunities to become actively involved in the education profession.

UW-RF offers students a Bachelor of Social Work degree (BSW- a major in social work). At the undergraduate level, this liberal arts course of study prepares a student for beginning, generalist, professional practice.

The program is accredited by the Council on Social Work Education (CSWE), the nationally recognized accrediting organization in social work. Social work is the professional activity of helping individuals, groups, or communities enhance or restore their capacity for social functioning and creating societal conditions favorable to that goal. In general, social work is planned, purposeful intervention, based on professional knowledge, values, and skill that is aimed at both individual and social change. Social workers seek to strengthen and improve the capability of people and systems to cope with the task and problems they face in life and to promote improvements in the social environment which will enable human needs to be more adequately met.

Admission to teacher education is based on requirements of the Wisconsin Department of Public Instruction and the College of Education and Professional Studies. Current information is available in the student handbooks and list of dates at the college website: www.uwrf.edu/college-of-education/.

Admission to student teaching or interning is based on requirements of the Wisconsin Department of Public Instruction and the College of Education and Professional Studies. Current information is available in the Student Handbooks and list of dates at the college website: www.uwrf.edu/college-of-education/.

BSW students engage in a two-semester fieldwork experience in their senior year. The experience is at least a 450-hour internship supervised by accredited social work field instructors. Over 60 agencies located in the Twin Cities of Minneapolis-St. Paul, Western Wisconsin and Eastern Minnesota participate to provide opportunities for real-world practice.

Students should be aware that admission requirements to the social work program and the field practicum include factors other than GPA, may change at any time and may differ from those listed here. Current requirements may be found in the Student Handbook and the Field Manual.

Students calculate integrals in both the Riemannian and Newton-Leibnitz methods. Students calculate derivatives using both limit and derived formula methods.*  Students use calculators to investigate limits, and to analyze graphs showing extreme values.

Formulating and posing worthwhile mathematical tasks, solving problems using several strategies, evaluating results, generalizing solutions, using problem solving approaches effectively, and applying mathematical modeling to real-world situations.

Making convincing mathematical arguments, framing mathematical questions and conjectures, formulating counter-examples, constructing and evaluating arguments, and using intuitive, informal exploration and formal proof.

Students are tested on their understanding of calculus concepts from algebraic, numerical, and graphical perspectives.  Students are tested on their ability to follow a strategy for evaluating integrals and a strategy for determining convergence of series.

Students integrate their knowledge from previous courses in Algebra, Trigonometry and Calculus with the new calculus they are learning, gaining confidence in their ability to utilize mathematical knowledge.  Students investigate applications of exponential functions and separable differential equations to the sciences.

Students explore and make conjectures when determining the convergence or divergence of series.  Students explore different integration techniques to determine which technique will work for a particular integral.

Students evaluate a single integral using different integration techniques and determine the convergence of a single series using different tests for convergence.  Students are tested on their ability to use problem solving approaches effectively. Some real-world applications are found in homework assignments.

Students make connections between the general idea of an inverse function in a calculus context and the specific examples of these functions: logarithms, arcsine, arctangent.  Students make connections between the procedure of testing series and the theories behind the tests for convergence.

Students solve problems using algebraic, graphical and numeric approaches choosing one approach to understand the question, another to solve the problem and perhaps, a third to demonstrate the result.  This is done with problems such as evaluating limits and definite integrals.  Students learn a forth way to represent functions: in addition to algebraic, graphic, and numerical representations, they learn to represent functions with Taylor series. Students use Taylor series representations to solve integration and limit problems.

On tests and assignments, students solve problems; communicate their results mathematically; give formal justifications of their reasoning; make connections between theory and example; make connections between algebraic, graphical and numerical viewpoints of a question; represent functions algebraically, numerically, graphically and with series; and use graphing calculators to study functions and series.

Students approximate definite integrals and limits numerically.  Students deepen their understanding of the real numbers through the study of infinite series and by series representations of decimals.

Students do beginning work in polar coordinates from a calculus perspective.  They graph functions, calculate areas, find tangent lines and calculate arc lengths in polar coordinates.  Students do beginning work in numerical integration.

Students identify patterns in all aspects of the course.  Students use functions to describe real world exponential growth and decay problems. Students represent functions in four ways: algebraically, graphically, numerically and as Taylor series; and convert from one representation to another.  Students gain a deeper understanding of polynomials in their study of Taylor series.  Students work with limits, derivatives and integrals of polynomial, rational, trigonometric, algebraic and exponential functions.  Students focus on the attributes of the inverses of such functions, from algebraic, graphical and numerical perspectives.  Students demonstrate knowledge of the underlying concepts of calculus, including, rate of change, limits, and approximations for irregular areas.

Students demonstrate knowledge of the concepts of calculus, including limits (from an intuitive viewpoint), tangents, derivatives, sequences and series.  Students use modeling to solve exponential growth and decay problems.  Students use calculus techniques to find limits, derivatives, and integrals.  Students apply calculus to the problems of area, exponential growth and decay and arc length.  Students approximate integrals using Simpson's Rule, and the trapezoidal rule.

Homework assignments on Euler circuits and Hamilton paths pertain to the historical roots of the subject. Assignments on various algorithms deal with the interaction between technology and the subject.

Counting problems are first carefully posed, then solved with direct methods and indirect methods such as inclusion-exclusion and recurrence relations. The students' ability to do this is then assessed on an exam.

Students are expected to show on assignments and exams that they can onstruct proofs using the direct, indirect, contradiction, and induction methods. They are also expected to be able to know when and how to produce counter-examples.

On the assignments, students are expected to illustrate their ability to work with elementary set theory, elementary number theory including Euclid's algorithm, and work with the alternate number system of modular arithmetic.

The students' understanding of introductory logic, mathematical induction, finite graphs, matrices as a method for representing graphs, and analyzing algorithms is assessed on the assignments, in classroom discussions, and on the exams.

Homework, tests, and labs using computers, models, and manipulatives focus on conceptual understanding and how / why procedures/ algorithms work.  Students are assessed on their understanding and ability to model the use of manipulatives both in lab/homework and on tests.  Manipulatives such as base blocks, Cuisenaire rods, attribute blocks, pattern blocks, and geoboards, are used to model mathematical concepts and principles.

The focus of the course is building understanding of mathematics and is demonstrated through labs in class, in the computer lab, homework, tests, and projects.  Applications, especially through projects and labs build confidence and awareness of the usefulness of mathematics.

Through labs, homework, and tests, students demonstrate their knowledge of heuristics, and labs provide an environment for exploring, conjecturing, and solving problems.  Problem solving is utilized throughout the semester.

As pre-service teachers, students create mathematical tasks/problems for future students to solve both in lab and on written assessments (homework, tests)  Students also share their problems and solutions in class and compare strategies.

Proofs without words, using models and diagrams in labs, homework, and tests.  Inductive and deductive arguments are developed when focusing on patterns (specific to general) shared in small group discussion, homework and tests.

Student questions/responses in class discussion and lab setting.  Student response demonstrating correct use of appropriate mathematical language, symbolism, and notation on homework, labs, projects, and tests.

Students ability to solve practical problems using technology and paper and pencil methods on labs, homework, and tests.  Completion (and demonstration) of a technology integrated project connecting mathematics and other disciplines and daily life.

As a standards based math curriculum, students exhibit their abilities related to problem solving, communication, reasoning, representations, connections, and use of technology through discussion, labs, projects, homework, and tests.

Number sense, set theory, number and operations, number systems, and computational procedures are a focus of this course.  Students demonstrate their knowledge in class discussion, through homework, labs, projects, and tests.

Names, properties, relationships of two-dimensional objects, transformations of two-dimensional objects, and coordinate geometry systems to discuss the relations between coordinate and synthetic geometry are assessed through labs using models such as geoboards, paper folding, as well as reflection devices, use of computer software,  homework, and tests.

Concepts of measurement and estimation, including measuring attributes, standard and non-standard units, precision, accuracy, and use of non-standard units to measure angles, length, perimeter, area, and circumference are assessed through discussion in class lab, use of computer software, homework, and tests.

Euclidean and transformational geometry concepts, procedures and connections are assessed with two-dimensional objects in class discussion, lab,  through the use of computer software such as Logo, Kaleidomania, and Geometer's Sketchpad, homework, projects, and tests.

Opportunities to present convincing arguments by means of demonstration, informal proof, counter-examples, or other logical means to show  the truth of statements and/or generalizations are given in class, lab, through the use of computer software, homework, and in tests.

Operations on expressions and finding the solution of linear equations using concrete, informal, and formal methods are discussed by students in class.  These concepts and principles are assessed through labs, homework, and tests.

Basic counting techniques, introductory sequence activities as analysis of patterns are used in solving problems and related to function analysis.  Labs, homework, and tests are used to assess these ideas.

Homework, tests, and labs using both computers, models, and manipulatives focus on conceptual understanding and how / why procedures/ algorithms work.  Students are assessed on their understanding and ability to model the use of manipulatives both in lab/homework and on tests.  Manipulatives such as base blocks, Cuisenaire rods, pattern blocks, and polydrons, are used to model mathematical concepts and principles.

Through labs, homework, and tests, students demonstrate their knowledge of strategies.  Labs provide an environment for exploring, conjecturing, and solving problems.  This is an area of focus in the course and is utilized throughout the semester.

Number sense, number and operations, number systems, and computational procedures  as related to rational numbers and integers are a focus of this course.  Students demonstrate their knowledge in class discussion, through homework, labs, projects, and tests.

Names, properties, relationships of three-dimensional objects, spatial sense, spatial reasoning and the use of geometric models are used to represent, visualize, and solve problems, and are assessed through labs using models such as polydrons and 3-d solids,  homework, and tests.

The structure of systems of measurement, including the development and use of measurement systems and the relationships among different systems, are assessed through discussion in class lab, use of computer software, and through homework and exams.

Randomness, probability as a way to describe chances or risk in simple and compound events, and outcome analysis and prediction based on experimentation or theoretical probabilities are assessed through labs, through the use of software, and homework, projects, and tests.

Data collection for experiments using real game implements both from our present culture and implements from previous cultures and cultures outside the United States used by students in labs, homework, projects, and exams.

Concrete models are used to solve problems, demonstrate mathematical concepts and procedures.  These models are demonstrated and discussed by students in lab using manipulatives and computer software, as well as being assessed in homework, and tests.

The teacher understands how pupils differ in their approaches to learning and the barriers that impede learning and can adapt instruction to meet the diverse needs of pupils, including those with disabilities and exceptionalities.

The teacher understands and uses a variety of instructional strategies, including the use of technology, to encourage children's development of critical thinking, problem solving, and performance skills.

The teacher uses an understanding of individual and group motivation and behavior to create a learning environment that encourages positive social interaction, active engagement in learning, and self-motivation.

The teacher uses effective verbal and nonverbal communication techniques as well as instructional media and technology to foster active inquiry, collaboration, and supportive interaction in the classroom.

The teacher is a reflective practitioner who continually evaluates the effects of his or her choices and actions on pupils, parents, professionals in the learning community and others and who actively seeks out opportunities to grow professionally.

The teacher fosters relationships with school colleagues, parents, and agencies in the larger community to support pupil learning and well-being and acts with integrity, fairness and in an ethical manner.

The teacher understands the central concepts, tools of inquiry, and structures of the disciplines she or he teaches and can create learning experiences that make these aspects of subject matter meaningful for pupils.

Manipulatives such as algebra tiles, geoboards, 3-d polyhedra, and 2-d tiles are used to model mathematical concepts and principles. Both real and virtual manipulatives are utilized in labs and homework.

Proofs without words, using models and diagrams in labs, homework, and tests. Inductive and deductive arguments are developed when focusing on patterns (specific to general) shared in small group discussion, homework and tests.

Student questions/responses in class discussion and lab setting. Student responses demonstrating correct use of appropriate mathematical language, symbolism, and notation on homework, labs, projects, and tests.

Number and operations, finite number systems, and computational procedures are a focus of this course. Students demonstrate their knowledge in class discussion, through homework, labs, projects, and tests.

Properties and relationships of two- and three -dimensional objects, transformations of these objects, and representation using coordinate geometry systems to discuss the relations between coordinate and synthetic geometry are assessed through labs using models such as geoboards, tiles, as well as the use of computer software, homework, and tests.

Transformations of two- and three- dimensional objects and the ways in which rotation, reflection, and translation of shapes can illustrate concepts, properties, and relationships are assessed on homework, labs, and tests.

Euclidean and transformational geometry concepts, procedures, and connections are assessed with two and three - dimensional objects in class discussion, lab, through the use of computer software such as Logo, Kaleidomania, and Geometer's Sketchpad, homework, projects, and tests.

Randomness, sampling, probability as a way to describe chances or risk, and outcome analysis and prediction based on experimentation or theoretical probabilities are assessed through labs, through the use of software, and homework, projects, and tests.

Students are asked to compare mathematical concepts learned in Calculus I and II to their natural extensions and generalizations (evolution) in Calculus III.  For example, limits, continuity, differentiability, optimization, integration, etc. are all concepts that are revisited for functions of several variables.

Homework problems are of two types; exercise and problem-solving.  Students are required to justify answers through informal arguments.  Use of graphing calculators and computer algebra systems is helpful for some problems.

Students must master quite a bit of analytic geometry: equations of lines, planes, quadric surfaces, characterize parallelism, perpendicularity, and visualize surfaces in three-dimensional contexts.  Measuring areas and volumes is a fundamental problems that is dealt with in homework and test questions.

Students are tested over their understanding of cartesian, polar, cylindrical and spherical coordinate systems.  They should be able to find coordinates of a given point in each of these systems and have some familiarity with transforming double and triple integrals into a given coordinate system.

The analysis of functions of several variables is the principal objective of the course.  Students are required to show mastery of elementary calculus concepts, such as, limits, differentiability, and continuity in this context.  Some equation - solving required as a subtask to many problems in the homework and on tests.  Some work with inequalities (making bounds: upper and lower) is also assessed on problems and tests.

Students must master basic concepts of multivariable calculus and apply them in problem-solving situations.  These topics include: dot product, cross product, arc length, limits, continuity, partial derivatives, tangent planes, differentials, chain rule, directional derivatives, double and triple integrals, surface area.

Student's have the opportunity to show their ability at giving proofs and constructing counter-examples as well as doing informal exploration.  This ability is assessed by using homework problems and exam questions.

Problems on context-free languages assess student's understanding of how mathematics provides ways to precisely describe the syntax of programming languages.  Problems on Turing machines assess student's understanding of how mathematics provides tools for developing computer algorithms.

In solving homework problems that require constructing regular expressions or context-free grammars for a language students must consider and test a variety of forms.  The same conjecturing and testing is done as machines are developed to recognize a given language.

Since the course looks at how to model computation, answers to exam questions and homework require presenting solutions to a given problem using more than one method.  For example, they must construct both a finite automata and a regular expression to describe a language.  Problems also deal with how to describe a complicated language by using descriptions of parts of the language.

Homework problems and exam questions explain how a particular finite automata or regular expression solves a particular problem.  These explanations involve both formal proofs and informal explanations of what the expressions and machines do.

Homework and exam problems that analyze and construct Turing machines show the connection between mathematics and computer science.  Construction of context-free grammars and syntax trees in problems link programming languages to mathematics.

Assigned problems allow students to show they understand the circumstances under which regular expressions, finite automata and transition graphs are appropriate alternatives for representing a language.  Additional problems test students understanding of the process of normalizing context-free grammars and the advantages in doing the normalization.

Many assigned problems test students' ability to develop the appropriate expression, model or grammar.  Both formal and informal techniques need to be used to explain the correctness of the expression, model or grammar.

Students integrate their knowledge from previous courses in calculus and linear algebra with the differential equations topics they are learning, gaining confidence in their ability to utilize mathematical knowledge.  Students investigate applications of differential equations to the sciences.

Students explore and make conjectures when determining which technique might work to solve an ordinary differential equation.  Students explore solutions of first order differential equations graphically, through the direction field and make conjectures about the behavior of solutions from the direction field.

Students compare solutions to differential equations found using different techniques. For example, students solve second order linear differential equations using linear independent solutions, using series solutions and using Laplace transforms.   Students are tested on their ability to use problem solving approaches effectively. Some real-world applications included are growth and decay phenomena, mixing phenomena, and mechanical systems.

Students use intuitive, informal exploration of the solutions of first order differential equations using direction fields.  Students make convincing mathematical arguments about the behavior of solutions of differential equations.  Students create proofs relating to the superposition principle and linear independence of solutions.

Students make connections between the theory of ordinary differential equations and the solutions to ordinary differential equations.  Students make connections between series solutions and algebraic solutions.  Students make connections between differential equations and the sciences.

Via the Laplace transform, students represent a differential equation as an algebraic equation, lowering the level of difficulty of the problem.  They transform from the differential equation representation to the algebraic equation representation, solve the algebraic equation on the Laplace transform side, and then transform the solution back to the differential equation side.

Students solve first order ordinary differential equations numerically, using Euler's method. Students use complex numbers in their solutions of linear second order differential equations, with Euler's formula to translate complex solutions into real solutions.

Students review the basic concepts of calculus.  Students find patterns in families of ordinary differential equations and their solutions.  Students model real world situations with differential equations and describe their solutions with functions.  Students represent solutions to differential equations algebraically, graphically, and as Taylor's series; they compare and contrast these representations.  Students use the properties of polynomial, rational, trigonometric, algebraic and exponential functions in their solutions to differential equations.  Students solve ordinary differential equations using formal algebraic methods, numerically with Euler's method, and graphically with the direction field.

Students use calculus techniques to find derivatives and integrals.  Students solve first order linear and non-linear ordinary differential equations.  Students solve second order linear ordinary differential equations using the techniques involving  theory of linear equations, Taylor's series and the Laplace transform.

Homework assignments on Euler circuits, Hamilton paths and the 4-color Theorem pertain to the historical roots of the subject. Assignments on generating functions deal with the interaction between technology and the subject.

Students are assigned problems dealing with advanced counting procedures including the use of generating functions for sequences and two variable recurrence relations for the Stirling Numbers. These techniques are also assessed on the exams.

The students' understanding of mathematical induction, finite graphs, matrices as a method for representing graphs, and analyzing algorithms is assessed on the assignments, in classroom discussions, and on the exams.

A large part of the course involves the application of concepts learned in calculus, discrete math, and linear algebra to the analysis of algorithms thereby building confidence in this previously encountered knowledge.

Principal questions such as: why does an algorithm work, how does it work, how efficient is it, how accurate is it, are posed and given informal and formal proofs.  Constructing limiting examples and counter-examples are assessed through homework.

The course constantly explores the interplay between geometric and algebraic descriptions of an algorithm.  Links are made to root-finding and fixed-point finding.  Approximating functions by polynomials is another big theme of the course.

Homework problems are of two types: exercise and problem-solving.  Students are required to justify answers through informal arguments.  Programs implemented in the form of Mathematica notebooks and computers must be utilized to solve many problems.

Complex numbers and basic complex arithmetic are reviewed in applying Newton's method to root-finding problems on the complex plane.  Numerical integration algorithms with associated error bounds are derived and applied.  Numeric algorithms are coded in Mathematica.  Students are required to utilize existing programs or write their own. Reasonableness of computed answers and error bounds are discussed extensively.

Some aspects of analytic geometry are assessed in homework and test. For example, students are asked to visualize what happens to a vector when multiplied by a matrix in the definition of a matrix norm.  Properties of vectors and vector norms are reviewed.

Solution of equations, system of equations, linear and non-linear, are major components of course.  Limits and approximation techniques are used throughout the course.  Polynomials and their attributes are used as approximations to functions.

Iteration and recursion are major components in solving equations, systems of linear and nonlinear equation.  Some counting techniques are used in computing number of operations to implement an algorithm.

Complex numbers and basic complex arithmetic are reviewed in discussing Fast Fourier Transforms.  The numerical solution to integral equations requires approximation techniques.  Numeric algorithms are coded in Mathematica.  Students are required to utilize existing programs or write their own. Reasonableness of computed answers and error bounds are discussed extensively.

Some aspects of analytic geometry are assessed in homework and test. Students are introduced to classic partial differential equation problems through their physical models.  This requires a good understanding of coordinate geometry systems and spatial reasoning.

The students' ability to produce proofs, work with matrix rings, and the notion of isomorphism are all topics that are tested in this course and related in classroom discussions to the subject of discrete mathematics.

In homework and exam problems, different strategies are used.  Students work on probabilistic models involving "real-world" situations such as dice and card games, then generalize this to a more abstract setting.

Geometric models of probability (based on uniform random variables) are used repeatedly.  In homework and on exams, students must be able to interpret probabilities as lengths, areas or volumes, depending on the context.

Examples appear in class, on tests, and in assignments that show the use of technology in simulating random processes; a description is given of the increasing sophistication of the tests used to make statistical inference.

In class-responses gauge the development of student intuition for the major issues that arise in a given situation involving statistical inference; the execution of the statistical tests that are developed in class demonstrate a procedural understanding on the part of students.

The problems on homework assignments and exams require students to integrate a rich background of material from Calculus and Discrete Mathematics. Many "real-world" problems can be rephrased as problems that require the application of a statistical test. These tests are used throughout industry.

A strong emphasis is placed on problem solving in this course. The use of computers to simulate random processes yield important opportunities to carry out the multiple stages of active problem solving.

In Mathematical Statistics, as in Probability more generally, problems oftentimes admit a "rigorous" solution through the use of Calculus as well as a heuristic solution obtained through the use of probabilistic "intuition." Most of the statistic theory developed in this course arose from the need to make statistical inferences in situations that arise quite naturally from modeling certain real-world phenomena.

In class work and out-of-class assignments lead to the development of problem solving and communication on the part of the student. Problems such as the computation of bias require students to identify the need to use integration to perform an "averaging."

In Mathematical Statistics, the question of whether or not a test has been applied in a legitimate manner is of paramount importance, and is addressed frequently. The inappropriate use of a test leads to an invalid numerical argument.

The expected values of various order statistics for uniform distributions can be discussed in terms of a uniform partition of the underlying interval for the distribution; these examples have a strong geometric flavor.

The uses of randomness, sampling, and inference are basic to all that we do in this course. By pursuing a rigorous treatment of these concepts, their connections with purely mathematical concepts become very well established.

The uses of random variables, descriptive and inferential statistics, and discrete probability theory are basic to all that we do in this course. By pursuing a rigorous treatment of these concepts, their connections with purely mathematical concepts become very well established.

This course concentrates on developing student's ability to do formal proofs.  Their skills at stating conjectures, constructing arguments and evaluating formal proofs is assessed extensively using homework problems and exam questions.

Classroom discussion, homework and exams are used to assess the ability of students to convert everyday English statements into formal logical statements using the standard language and notation of symbolic logic.

The ability to translate English statements into the forms used in symbolic logic to facilitate proving statements and understanding proofs is assessed through selected exam questions and homework problems.

The formal representation of statements and the methods used in formal arguments are examined in this course.  Students' understanding of these representations and arguments is assessed on exams and in homework.

In homework and on exams, students prove theorems regarding limits, sequences, continuity, differentiation, integration, and other calculus topics.  Students are expected to find counter-examples for results that are not true.

Solutions (homework and exams) require various problem-solving techniques based, in part, on material learned in prerequisite courses.  Students are encouraged to explain their own work before the rest of the class.  Calculators are occasionally used, especially when examining limits.

Students are expected to master advanced topics related to sets of real numbers, iteration techniques, boundedness, monotonicity, limits of sequences and subsequences, the Riemann integral and approximations of definite integrals.

Students use geometric visualization to help them in problems involving limits, continuity, the derivative interpreted as a tangent slope, the mean-value theorem, and the definition of the Riemann integral.

In exams and homework, students must demonstrate a thorough understanding of advanced calculus topics such as limits of sequences and functions, cauchy sequences, continuity, differentiation, and integration.

Problems are based on an advanced treatment of such calculus topics as limits, boundedness, sequences and subsequences, Cauchy sequences, density, continuity, uniform continuity, differentiation, fixed point theorems and integration.

In homework and exam problems, students prove theorems regarding sequences and series, differentiation, integration, vector calculus and multivariable analysis.  Students are expected to find counter-examples for results that are not true.

Homework and exams thoroughly test students' knowledge of the number line, including rational and irrational numbers, the concept of density, limits, infinite sequences and series, and introductory point-set topology.

As a research course students will produce a paper on their research results.  Depending on the research topic selected, the paper may include structures within mathematics, the history of an area of mathematics, the evolution of mathematics or how mathematics interacts with a particular technology.

The paper written on the research results will showcase the student's skill in using the mathematics they have learned.  Since the research usually includes working with a company on an applied mathematics topic, the paper normally includes a discussion of how mathematics is used in the solution of a real-world problem and the economic impact this has on the company.

Depending on the research done, students may need to consider alternative strategies, may need to develop mathematical models and may need to go from specific to general solutions.  The paper would explore what was considered here how the alternatives were evaluated.

The student will need to formulate appropriate mathematical questions as part of their research.  They will need to make conjectures and prove or disprove them.  The paper should list the conjectures made, the counter-examples constructed and the proofs constructued as part of this research.

As a research project, the solution of the problem may require selecting the appropriate representation or may require converting among representations to complete the research.  The paper will discuss these representations and conversions.

Geometry is a subject which manifests itself in daily life.  Individual and group projects allow students to show they understand geometric concepts and the connections among the topics covered in the course.

To pass the exams in this course, students must be successful at problem solving, communication, and reasoning both at formal and informal levels. Students use Geometer's Sketchpad software in solving some homework problems.  Group projects and individual projects are used to assess students ability to give formal and informal arguments.

The course tests the students thoroughly on all of these points.  Students present extensive arguments in homework.  Exams test their ability to use geometric models in problem solving.  Transformations are studied extensively and understanding is assessed in exams and homework.  The end of the course covers generalizing geometric principles from 2 to 3 dimensions.

The course tests the students thoroughly on all these points.  Different systems of geometry, transformations and 3-dimensional geometry concepts are tested on exams, homework and projects.  Students are required to give informal proofs, and counter-examples as part of their work.

The written results produced by students together with examination questions on quadrilateral similarity theory, geometric constructions and projective geometry will assess students' problem-solving skills.

Student's homework on geometric constructions will assess their ability to pose mathematical problems, use multiple strategies and evaluate results.  Effective use of problem-solving techniques are assessed in homework and exam questions.

Students present formal and informal arguments involving quadrilateral similarity theory and geometric constructions in their homework and in answering examination questions.  Three dimensional transformations are studied extensively and understanding is assessed in exams and homework.

Students are assessed using exams questions, and homework on their understanding of projective geometry.  Three-dimensional geometric transformations concepts are tested on exams, homework and projects.  Students are required to give informal proofs, and counter-examples as part of their answers on exams, in their solutions to homework problems and in their projects.

Students are introduced to the idea of a generalized function (or distribution). Students use graphing calculators and/or computer algebra systems to help them solve systems of differential equations.

Students integrate their knowledge from previous courses in calculus, differential equations and linear algebra with the differential equations topics they are learning, gaining confidence in their ability to utilize mathematical knowledge.  Students investigate applications of differential equations to the sciences.

Students make convincing mathematical arguments about the behavior of solutions of differential equations.  Students create proofs about the properties of Fourier series and convolutions of functions.

Students express their understanding of the theory and solutions of ordinary and partial differential equations using mathematical language, notation and symbolism on written tests and assignments.  Students give an oral report on a special topic in differential equations, which they investigate independently with a classmate.

Students make connections between the theory of ordinary and partial differential equations and the solutions to ordinary and partial differential equations.  Students make connections between Fourier series and Taylor series. Students make connections between differential equations and the sciences.

Students translate between systems of linear differential equations and systems of linear algebraic equations, exploiting their knowledge of algebra to solve differential equations.  Students represent solutions algebraically, graphically, and with series.  Students are introduced to representing qualitative solutions to differential equations via phase plane analysis.

Students use complex numbers in their solutions of systems of differential equations, with Euler's formula to translate complex solutions into real solutions.  Students use complex numbers to understand Fourier series.

Students review concepts of calculus as necessary.  Students find patterns in families of ordinary and partial differential equations and their solutions.  Students model real world situations with differential equations and describe their solutions with functions.  Students represent solutions to differential equations algebraically, graphically, as Taylor's series and as Fourier series; they compare and contrast these representations. Students use the properties of polynomial, rational, trigonometric, algebraic and exponential functions in their solutions to differential equations.

This course is all about the historical roots of what students will be teaching to their secondary and middle school pupils.  Two major tests are used to assess the students overall knowledge in the area of math history.

Students gain a certain amount of empathy toward their ability (or perceived deficiency) to utilize mathematical knowledge when they realize that creators (discoverors) of mathematics sometimes lacked confidence in their own work.  They have the opportunity to talk about this in their journal entries.

In studying the three major unsolvable construction problems of Greek mathematics students learn that mathematics can be generated only by exploring, conjecturing and analyzing.  Results obtained are not necessarily ones that were sought.

The development of viable number systems is discussed early in the course. The first crisis in mathematics, the discovery of irrational numbers, leads to a discussion of how to prove that numbers are irrational.

The development of Euclidean geometry as an axiomatic mathematical system is a major component of the first half of the course.  The rise of non-Euclidean geometries is discussed in the second half of the course.  Student assessment is accomplished by test questions on the mid-term and final.

The explicit solution to cubic equations is an interesting chapter in the history of mathematics.  Students learn that mathematicians advance the body of knowledge sometimes without a complete understanding of the nature of the problems they are attempting to solve.  The emergence of imaginary numbers from the study of cubic equations is an example of this phenomena.

Markov chains and other basic random processes that are studied in this course have both well-defined procedural solutions and an underlying mathematical theory that lends itself to a conceptual understanding of these solutions.

The determination of steady-states solutions for Markov Chains can be approached in several directions - recurrence relations, matrix operations. The determination of recurrence times and the times needed to reach certain ergodic states can be developed as generalizations of geometric random variables. The results so obtained can be verified through the simulation by a computer of the accompanying random processes.

In Advanced Probability, advanced counting techniques are used in enumerating the number of ways in which a given event can occur. These methods of enumeration are then reformulated in terms of linear algebra and matrix operations. The answers to queries about the random processes that we study have values that can be intuited from a basic consideration of the qualitative properties of the process. This relationship allows students the opportunity to assess the reasonableness of their results. The underlying use of linear algebra, matrix methods, and differential equation in Advanced Probability allows for the use of technology to carry out the computations therein.

The study of two-dimension random walk introduces the technique of identifying the arrival times for certain symmetrically placed sites as being equal; this use of symmetry allows one to reduce the size of the state space that must be employed in the construction of equations for the arrival times of the random walk on the sites of a lattice.

Counting techniques are used to identify the number of ways in which an event can occur; these enumerations are basic to the calculation of certain probabilities that arise in a natural way in the study of Markov Chains and other models.

Markov chains can be represented in a natural way in terms of weighted, directed graphs by drawing edges between communicating states and employing the corresponding transition probability between these states as the weight.

Students study a selected topic.  They normally work problems and take exams related to the material.  These problems and exams, depending on the topic studied, will usually assess at least one of structures, history, the evolution of mathematics or the use of technology.

The homework problems and exam questions are geared toward assessing how the students are doing in building their confidence in the selected mathematical topic.  The problems and questions also test students ability to use the mathematics in a wide variety of situaitions.

If teaching probability or statistics is the selected topic for study, students would typically examine one or more of these areas and present examples in class of how they would present this material to a class.

If teaching functions, algebra or calculus is the selected topic for study, students would typically examine one or more of these areas and present examples in class of how they would present this material to a class.

If teaching discrete mathematics is the selected topic for study, students would typically examine one or more of these areas and present examples in class of how they would present this material to a class.

Typically, students will summarize material they read and work problems related to the material read.  These, depending on the topic studied, will usually assess at least one of structures, history, the evolution of mathematics or the use of technology.

Studying the selected topic on their own and working problems related to that topic measure  the student's ability to study and understand mathematics on their own with general guidance from an instructor.  This measures both their confidence in using mathematics independently and awareness of how useful mathematics is.

Students will typically give an oral report on their progress on a regular basis to the faculty member directing their work.  Worked problems will typically include mathematical notation and language.

Students study a selected topic under the direction of a faculty member.  They normally work problems related to the material.  These problems, depending on the topic studied, will usually assess at least one of structures, history, the evolution of mathematics or the use of technology.

Depending on the topic studied, problems on these topics could be done. If the topic selected involved teaching number operations and relationships, a presentation or paper on these subject areas would be done.

Teachers' knowledge of axiomatic structures assessed through exam items; students use Geometer's Sketchpad to explore geometric ideas, and are assessed via exams, assignments, projects and presentations.

Confidence levels in dealing with a variety of axiomatic systems are assessed primarily through presentations and comments made in class and to individual instructors.  Awareness of usefulness of geometry is assessed in presentations and class discussions.

Exploring and testing conjectures is an integral part of the instruction of this course; student ability to explore geometric ideas in a problem solving manner is assessed during class discussions, on homework, and in written projects and oral presentations.

Teachers' ability to provide convincing informal and formal arguments based on appropriate geometric axiomatic systems are an integral part of the course, and are assessed during class discussions, homework, exams, projects, and presentations.

Projects provide the main opportunity for teachers to show their understanding of connections between geometry and real life.  The concepts and procedures of non-Euclidean and Euclidean geometries are connected within and between topics through an emphasis on which axioms hold in all systems, and which are unique to a system; teachers' understanding is assessed through exams, homework, and projects and presentations.

Different geometries use different representations depending on their axiomatic systems and the real life problems that are being solved; teachers' abilities to choose appropriate representations and to move back and forth between representations are assessed on homework, exams, in class discussions, and in projects and presentations.

In their study of every type of geometry in this course (Euclidean, finite, Spherical, Hyperbolic, and Taxicab), teachers' apply each and every one of these processes, as noted in previous sections.  All are assessed through class discussions, homework, exams, projects, and presentations.

All of these content areas are prerequisite knowledges for the current course, but they are not a focus of the course, since they appear to reflect lower level geometric knowledge and this is a graduate level course; consequently, they are not formally assessed in this course per se, although teachers cannot demonstrate their complete understanding of this courses' topics without having a certain amount of proficiency with these lower level topics.

There are two exceptions to the above statement; the first occurs in the area of spatial reasoning and the use of geometric models to represent, visualize and solve problems.  In the study of spherical geometry, teachers use Lenart spheres and spherical compasses to visualize spherical geometry concepts and solve problems.  They are assessed on their use of these models and their problem solving ability in spherical geometry on homework, exams, projects, and presentations.

The other exception is in the area of using measurement to compare geometric phenomena.  Angle sizes and sums of angles in various spherical and hyperbolic polygons are compared to results from Euclidean geometry.  Teachers knowledge is assessed on homework, exams, and projects.

Systems of geometry (finite, Euclidean, Spherical, Hyperbolic and Taxicab), transformational geometry, and the development of the ability to use convincing arguments and proof, are the main components of this course.

Teachers' ability to analyze systems, solve problems, use technology, and make and prove hypotheses are assessed throughout the course activities: class discussions, homework, exams, projects, and presentations.

One notable exception is in the area of trigonometric functions and their definition and applications to spherical geometry. Teachers compare and contrast Euclidean trigonometry with spherical trigonometry, and are assessed on their knowledge and understanding via homework, exams, projects, and presentations.

In their projects and during their presentations, teachers demonstrate how they would present some of this courses' ideas to high school students, and are assessed on their level of understanding of high school students' intellectual levels and learning needs.

During computer lab activities, and in subsequent homework and exam items, teachers are assessed on their ability to use technology, particularly The Geometer's Sketchpad, in developing geometric ideas, and in geometric problem solving.

Teachers' knowledge of how to engage students in active learning and group work is assessed during their presentations and in their projects, in which they must provide student activities which can be used in high school geometry classrooms.

Teachers who are enrolled in a graduate course such as this one are showing that they are interested in growing in their mathematical knowledge, and in their ability to present advanced geometric ideas in ways that high school students can understand. Teachers' level of content understanding and ability to relate topics to high school are assessed through homework, exams, class discussions, projects, and presentations.

Teachers in this course form close relationships with other teachers in the course, and share many stories  about their teaching experiences, as well as ways they have found to enhance teaching and learning.  While such relationships are not formally assessed in this course, they are noted informally by the instructors, and used as a way to pair teachers for group labs or projects.

These are experienced teachers and the classroom discussions dealing with data gathering and handling not only provide an insight into their abilities to manage a classroom but also help others gain ideas.

The students' understanding of all of these topics is assessed throughout the course on the assignments, in classroom discussions, and on the exams. There is also a student presentation used to assess these skills.

In homework and exam problems, different approaches are utilized.  Students work on probability models involving "real-world" situations such as dice, cards and coin-tossing, then generalize this to a more abstract setting.

Students are required to prove basic results using the axioms of probability and such concepts as independence and conditioning.  When results are not true, students are expected to find counter-examples.

Geometric models of probability (based on uniform random variables) are used throughout the course.  In homework and on exams, students are required to interpret probabilities as lengths, areas or volumes, depending on the context.

Many historical topics are discussed in this survey course of the single variable calculus.  Graphing calculators and the computer algebra system Mathematica are used to demonstrate concepts and procedures.  Students are assessed through homework, the final exam, and small oral presentations.

Students are tested on their ability to apply the mathematical knowledge gained in the course to problems on homework and tests.  The usefulness of mathematics is particularly emphasized when topics such as: differential equations and integral applications are discussed.

The structure and properties of real and complex numbers is an emphasized topic. Some number theory results are treated to illustrate application of geometric series and other proofs based on series expansions For example, proof of the irrationality of e based on its Maclaurin series expansion, proof of the structure of even perfect numbers based on finite geometric series.

The accuracy of numerical differentiation and integration formulas is discussed and error bounds are derived.  Students are expected to exhibit a familiarity with these results on homework and examination problems.

Students are tested over their ability to present convincing arguments.  Sometimes this is accomplished through counter-examples or indirect proof. Emphasis in the course is placed on proving propositions that are usually left unproven in an undergraduate calculus course.  Students are responsible for recreating some of these proofs on homework and the final.

The analysis of functions of a single variable is the principal objective of the course.  Students are required to show mastery of elementary calculus concepts, such as, limits, differentiability, and continuity in this context.  Some equation - solving required as a subtask to many problems in the homework and on tests.  Some work with inequalities (making bounds: upper and lower) is also assessed on problems and the final exam.

Students must show mastery of basic and advanced concepts of single variable calculus and apply them in problem-solving situations.  These topics include almost all of the topics listed at left.  Mastery is demonstrated on the final exam, homework, small oral presentations, answering questions in class and an assigned paper.

Iteration and recursion arises in when discussing some topics, such as: series, sequences, Newton's method, solving first-order differential equations graphically with slope fields, approximating irrational numbers, etc.

Emphasis is placed on teaching to a variety of learning styles.  Some students grasp calculus concepts more readily in graphical format. Some respond better to an algebraic presentation. Others feel more comfortable if numbers and data are used as principle illustrations of concepts, while others are best approached initially through a verbal description.  Students in this course are asked to reflect on this during the final exam.

This course begins with reflection on why do we teach calculus,  what should we teach at the high school level, and how should it be taught.  These main questions reoccur throughout the course in discussing specific topics.

Many American Indian Tribes used rawhide in many different ways.  Rawhide is prepared by taking the skin of an animal, removing the flesh and hair, and stretching it until it dried.  It was so stiff that many items they used could be made from rawhide, such as a shield.  Also, elaborate decorations would be painted on one side.  These designs were always geometric in shape and were a symbol of a particular tribe.

The Navaho Indians followed simple geometric designs for their blankets and carried them out on a large scale.  I created a program in LOGO to recreate one of the Navaho blankets following a design found in Native American Art  by David Penney.

Cheyenne Parfleche (rawhide trunk) from Oklahoma was created in the 1880's.  The parfleche was designed to store clothing, utensils, and food.  It is made of rawhide and paint.  The parfleche is oblong with long sides folded inward and laced shut.

The Ojibwa are a group of Native Americans that can be found in northern Minnesota and Wisconsin as well as parts of Canada, Michigan, and parts of the Dakotas.  They are also referred to as  Anishinabe or the Chippewa.  The Ojibwa are known for their craft and bead work.  They use many designs in their artwork.  This particular design is one that was found on a beaded knife sheath.

"Like many other Creek and Seminole Designs, the linear elements of the design on these moccasins are created with multiple colors creating strong contrasts.  An active, almost vibrating pattern results.

Undergraduates, future teachers, enrolled in CS 360: Logo Programming at the University of Wisconsin - River Falls completed this project during the fall semester of the 1996-1997 academic year.  For this project, students investigated Native American art using the world wide web, as well as library and school resources.  Each student selected art pieces to inspire a logo programming graphic design project.  Logo procedures were developed using top down design to create a design inspired by Native American art.  A home page was then created by each student after studying html coding and home page construction.

The WWW was searched for examples of Native American Art and for information about such art.  The web was also used to study and learn about home page construction, standards, html codes, examples of page layouts, and detailed information such as code numbers for background colors.

In several projects trigonometry was used to calculate angles for triangles.  Geometry was utilized to determine angle measures for isosceles and right triangles and algebra was used to figure the differences needed to outline and fill objects.  Students also applied graphing in cartesian coordinates to create the effect desired for nested geometric figures.  Several students also applied the Pythagorean Theorem in order to determine desired lengths.

Falls Brass Chamber Music Camp began the summer of 2004 and will continue every summer for years to come. This weeklong camp provides chamber music experiences for students that have completed grades 7-12.

During the summer of 2001, he spent four weeks as a guest artist in Brazil. His residency in Londrina included master classes, brass quintet coaching, and several solo and chamber music performances. These performances were highlighted with 2 live local TV broadcasts and 1 live national TV broadcast. Dr. Barnett also appeared as a featured soloist with the Banda de Metais Champagnat of Londrina. During his stay in Vale Veneto, an Italian community in the foothills of southern Brazil, Dr. Barnett gave daily master classes, coached brass quintets, and additionally performed as a soloist with the festival orchestra.

She has been a visiting professor in Women's Studies at the University of North Carolina for the past two summers. Carol taught creative process and poetry for adults and children at the Loft Literary Center throughout the year. In April, Carol organized a presentation of music, poetry and photography at River Falls. River Gathering: A Confluence of the Arts featured Carol performing Bach's First Suite for Unaccompanied Cello, the "water" poems of English professor, Dr. Jennifer Brantley, and photography of water by students of Dr. David Heberlein - which included a fountain of photographs. Carol joined a collection of faculty poets at the University of Minnesota in a reading of Peace poems in February.

Two of her peace poems have been accepted for publication in 2005 in Out of Line, a literary journal. Carol was a presenter at the International society of Basis's convention in Richmond, Virginia this summer, where she lead a "Poetry of Music" seminar with Saint Paul Chamber Orchestra Principal Bassist, Chris Brown. Carol enjoys teaching a large number of private students in her St. Paul studio. She also freelances as a cellist.

Woodrow Wilson Research Grant, Dr. Britton has been the biographer and compiler of the keyboard works of the eighteenth-century Italian composer, Maria Teresa Agnesi. The research, conducted in Milan, is the only extant biographical information and collected keyboard works of Agnesi.

Britton, a pianist, uncovered and edited all of the keyboard works of Agnesi and  conducted research in Milan on her life in 1978-80 with the help of a Woodrow Wilson Research Grant.  All of the prior known facts about Agnesi were taken from biographical treatises about her sister, Gaetana, a famous mathematician.  Nothing was known about Teresa's life after her marriage to Pietro Pinnotini at the age of 30, a marriage not approved of by her family.  Britton searched the archives of the State of Lombardy, the library holdings of the Biblioteca Ambrosiana and finally found the family archives listed under another name in Cremona.

Britton, as the only biographer to have consulted primary sources was cited in the program and invited to the production and festivities following the performance on September 21, 2006.  She also wrote a paper on her research which will be included as part of the Foundation's annual publication on Women in Music.  The opera will be performed later this fall in Naples, Rome and Venice.

As a percussion soloist and chamber musician she has had the opportunity to be involved in a number of recordings and can be found under such labels as Hat Hut, Bridge Records, New World and Mode labels. She has recorded a CD of solo percussion pieces from the new complexity movement. She has commissioned a number of new pieces from the composers of her generation and to date has given nearly one hundred premieres.

In addition to her extensive contemporary background, Patti explores other musical avenues such as classical and world music; she also works actively in collaboration with artists from a number of different mediums including dance, theater, video and interactive percussion with computers.

She has been organist-choirmaster at three Twin Cities Lutheran churches and at Luther-Northwestern Seminary in St. Paul. Mrs. Moen taught at Luther and Augsburg colleges prior to taking her present position on the music faculty at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls.

Kathryn U.Moen played a program for the University of Minnesota Faculty Women's club (Music Section) in May. She also performed on a Thursday Musical of Minneapolis program in April. In July she attended the national convention of the American Guild of Organists which was held in Seattle, Washington. She also gave an organ performance in the West Nidaros Lutheran Church near Sioux Falls, South Dakota in July. She continues to play most every Sunday as a substitute organist in Twin Cities churches.

With the passion, style, and musical sophistication borrowing from the best chamber music and string quartet traditions, the Minneapolis Guitar Quartet has successfully made its case as one of the world's leading guitar ensembles since its founding in 1986. "Flawless, musical and witty" (Classical Guitar Magazine, England), the MGQ has performed throughout the United States both in recital and concerto appearances, balancing a dizzying array of first-rate repertoire ranging from Renaissance and Baroque to Spanish, Latin American, and Romantic, to highly imaginative existing and commissioned contemporary works. Cutting-edge composer/performer Daniel Bernard Roumain, one of more than 20 composers commissioned by the MGQ, calls the group "more than a guitar quartet, more than superb musicians, and more than a great chamber group. They are ambassadors of sound, style, and substance."

Hilree Hamilton teaches music education methods courses to music education and elementary education majors. Additionally, she teaches world music, class piano, music appreciation, and she supervises student teachers.

Hamilton received her B.A. from the University of Northern Colorado in Music Education, her M.A. from the University of Minnesota in Music Education with the equivalency in Music Therapy, and her Ph. D. from the University of Minnesota. Dr. Hamilton taught elementary and middle school classroom and choral music for 25 years in school districts in Kansas and Minnesota.

Dr. Hamilton has extensive training in the Orff Schulwerk approach to music education. She has presented workshops and conference sessions throughout the United States on composition and improvisation in elementary classroom music and music therapy settings. She has articles published in recent journals of the Wisconsin School Musician, The Orff Echo, General Music Today, and the Gopher Music Notes.

Minnesota Opera, the Minnesota Sinfonia, and the Cedar Avenue Big Band, as well as continuing performances in California with the Santa Barbara Chamber Orchestra and the Asia America Symphony, and on the score for the TV Movie "Netforce." He can be heard on the original television soundtrack from the series "Chicago Hope," for which he played solo trumpet for the first three seasons of the series. As a drummer, he has performed with various Twin Cities artists, including the David Singley trio, and a new quartet that includes UWRF Music Faculty Member David Milne.

King teaches oboe at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls and has recently completed a new performing edition of one of the so-called "Dresden Concerti," which are pieces written by Johann David Heinichen to showcase the court orchestra at Dresden.

Nathan Leaf serves on the music faculty at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls where he conducts the Men's Chorus and teaches studio voice.   Dr. Leaf brings a broad array of conducting experience to the podium, having conducted chamber choirs, large choirs with orchestra, musical theater, opera, and wind ensembles.  He was previously on the music faculty of Concordia College in Moorhead, Minnesota, and has also directed choirs at The University of Texas at Austin and at the University of Florida.  In addition to his work at UWRF, Leaf is Assistant Minister of Music at House of Prayer Lutheran Church in Richfield, Minnesota.

An active clinician, Dr. McVey regularly gives masterclasses and presentations to various teaching organizations, and frequently serves as an adjudicator for local and state music competitions.  He has a particular interest in music of the 20th and 21st centuries, and his article "Teaching Modern Music" was recently published by the Georgia Music Educators Journal.

In 1996 he was awarded first prize in the EDIP International Competition for his performance of "Yeni Makam 4," a composition based on Turkish classical music. Pat currently performs with the Turkish ensemble Sultani Yegah. In addition, he was a percussionist with the Brazilian ensemble Sol e Mar in San Diego, and has appeared regularly with the group Brasamba in Minneapolis.

As a professional choral singer she enjoyed a busy life of rehearsing, performing, touring, and recording with the Dale Warland Singers up through the organization's final season in 2004.  Through that group, she met, sang for, and worked with many of the great choral composers of our day.  Among her many outstanding experiences with the group were singing with the Chicago Symphony Orchestra at the Ravinia Festival and singing on the Grammy-nominated recording of Dominick Argento's Walden Pond.

Currently, she is very active performer of choral and solo singing in the Twin Cities.  Besides being a section leader, soloist, and cantor at the Cathedral of St. Paul, she also sings with Phillip Brunelle's Vocal Essence Ensemble Singers.  She performs, records and tours with Vocal Essence, and also can be heard on the radio on Garrison Keillor's A Prairie Home Companion show.

Michael Roy received his Bachelor of Music and Master of Music degrees from the University of Missouri-Kansas City, Conservatory of Music and has worked on a D.M.A. degree in Percussion Performance at the University of Iowa. He has over 30 years experience as a symphonic percussionist, composer, recitalist and clinician. Mr.

Roy has worked as a free-lance percussionist in the Twin Cities area where he has performed with nearly every large musical organization including the Minnesota and Plymouth Orchestras and the Minnesota Opera and has been involved with the performance of several major works, including several world premieres.

Mr. Roy has composed and arranged over 80 works for percussion, specializing in works for the beginning and intermediate student. These works have been performed throughout the United States, Canada, Europe and Japan.

Janda at the MacPhail Center for the Arts. On a lighter note, Ms. Scheib has also worked with Joshua and Joseph Scrimshaw. The Scrimshaws are sketch and improvisational comedians in the Twin Cities. She appeared with them during the 2000 Fringe Festival, singing and acting in their one-night opera comedy show.

Iceland and Scotland.  She has performed at Carnegie Hall in New York, the Alberta Festival of Bands in Canada, and throughout the Midwest region for conventions and concerts.  She has participated in many music festivals and is a frequent performer on saxophone and piano.  Dr. Tjornehoj is an active member of Music Educators National Conference and Wisconsin Music Educators.  Ms. Tjornehoj is active in church music, and is currently church choir director at Shepherd of the Valley Lutheran Church in Lakeland, MN.

He is a permanent member of the Rochester Symphony Orchestra. Chamber groups he performs with include the Minneapolis Tuba Quartet, Classic Brass Quintet and the River Falls Brass, one of the busiest professional brass quintets in the Twin Cities.

Weller teaches flute and directs the flute choir at UW-River Falls and teaches flute and chamber music at MacPhail Center for Music in Minneapolis. She is active in the arts community of Minneapolis/St. Paul as a flutist, teacher, residency artist, author, consultant and arts administrator. Janis is founder/director of The Elision Institute (www.elisioninstitute.org), an umbrella organization serving as a catalyst for evolution and growth in the training and support of musicians. She is a former dean at MacPhail, where she also served in other administrative roles for fourteen years.

Janis has presented residencies, clinics and workshops in dozens of schools with students of all ages. She has worked with teachers on curriculum design and staff development through the National Flute Association, National Guild of Community Schools of the Arts, Suzuki Association of the Americas, College Music Society, Minnesota State Arts Board, Minnesota Music Educators Association, Minnesota String Teachers Association, Arts Curriculum Expertise program and numerous other organizations.

The University of Wisconsin-River Falls Concert Choir has earned recognition as one of the top collegiate choirs in the Midwest. The choir has received critical acclaim for its enthusiastic musicality and beautiful choral tone. An auditoned mixed ensemble made up of music and non-music majors, they perform standard sacred and secular choral literature dating from the renaissance era to the twenty-first century.

"No," she said, "but if you can get another male to sing with you, you can start a quartet." Thus marked the debut of the Men's Quartet, under the direction of Sarah Parks. By the following year the "quartet" had grown to over sixteen members and become a true Men's Chorus.

Dr. Kristin Tjornehoj, professor of music at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls is the director of the Symphonic Wind Ensemble. Some of the finest performers on campus belong to this audition-only ensemble.

The Symphonic Wind Ensemble tours annually. Last year they toured Iceland and France. They traveled to England on a concert tour in May, 2001.The band performed in Beijing, China in March of 1999.  The Indianhead Arts Center hosted the ensemble in conjunction with a middle level honors band and presented an invitation concert for high school students in the area last December.

Repertoire for this ensemble incorporates the standard band literature as well as small ensemble works. At UW-River Falls, the Symphonic Wind Ensemble consists of the finest instrumental musicians on campus and represents the department at graduation, special events and in concerts.

The orchestra is comprised of UW-RFstudents and greater St. Croix Valley community members. Rehearsing on Monday evenings from 7:00 - 9:00 p.m. the ensemble explores a wide variety of repertoire. Designed to meet the needs of the membership by providing a quality performance venue, the group also excels at outreach for the St. Croix Valley. The annual Young Persons Concert  which is growing in popularity will be performed for area elementary students in March.

Randy Sabien, violin and Kristin Tjornehoj have collaborated in beginning a string orchestra for the greater St. Croix Valley. Currently called the New American Symphony, the ensemble consists of violins and a rhythm section complete with violinists aged 10  18.  The ensemble  performs jazz and classical pieces in unique, creative fashions. Any interested students can contact Dr. Tjornehoj at the UW-RF music department for further information.

Patti Cudd, is a nonauditioned ensemble that offers the music or nonmusic major the opportunity to perform many styles of music including compositions written especially for percussion and arrangements-from ragtime to jazz. The Percussion Chamber Ensemble and Marimba Ensemble gives the more advanced student the experience of performing more difficult types of music and encourages the development of a sense of style and independence. These ensembles have performed extensively in the upper Midwest, including special performances in the Twin Cities with William Kraft and at the WMEA Convention in Madison.

Over the past few years the ensemble has been involved with the premiere of several new works for percussion, including "Four Score" by Irwin Bazelon and "In Each Other's Presence" by Mary Ellen Childs. Members of the ensemble performed the world premiere of LEGACY, a piece written by Jared Spears in 2000 for three percussion soloists and wind ensemble.

The University of Wisconsin-River Falls Brass Ensemble is an auditioned ensemble of 16 of the finest brass performers on campus. It is conducted by Rick Gaynor, adjunct faculty of Low Brass at UWRF. This group performs at least four concerts a year.

The Piano Ensemble class has been in existence for over thirty years. When it began, the students played their recital in North Hall Auditorium on one 7 ft. Steinway and an ancient 6 ft. Mason & Hamlin which had to be brought over for the concert. The sounds of the two pianos certainly did not match but the students had a wonderful time performing in spite of this. When the Fine Arts Building was built in 1973, the Music Department proudly acquired the two 9 ft.

Over the years, the students have performed almost all the standard repertoire for two pianos and many piano duets as well. The instructors, Carolyn Britton and Lillian Tan, have tried to limit the choice of pieces to those originally written for the medium or occasionally an arrangement made by the composer. Works for as many as four pianos, notably the Paris Suite by Milhaud, and works for two pianos and four players such as the Rondo by Smetana have appeared on the program. Other outstanding performances were of La Valse by Ravel, En Blanc et Noir by Debussy, very early works originally for two harpsichords by Mattheson and Pasquini, and very new works in manuscript, notably the Winnsboro Cotton Mill Blues by the American avant-garde composer, Frederic Rzewski. The piano ensemble concert this year is scheduled for Sunday, May 7th at 8:00 p.m. in Abbott Concert Hall.

UW-RF alumni often comment that among their most memorable experiences while students was their participation in Piano Ensemble class. In 2003, one of those alumni made a remarkable gift to the music department. Mary Ella Jerome, through the Mary Ella Jerome Foundation, granted the funds to keep these concert grands in like-new condition. With her support and the dedicated efforts of Michael Drost of Three River Piano Service in River Falls, not only have the pianos been restored, but climate-controlled housing for each piano has been provided as well.

The Music Department acquired an additional Steinway 7 ft. grand through the generous gift of the estate of Wayne Tyler, former member of the English Department. This beautiful rosewood piano is housed in North Hall Auditorium and affords another performance site for students, faculty and guests.

De Jong's intention from the beginning was to ensure that contemporary trends in American music would become part of the repertoire of River Falls music students. This project has continued at UW-River Falls for thirty-seven years.

Composers benefit too. They often have the opportunity to expand their repertoire and write for a different mix of instruments/voices. For many, the chance to work with students in an educational setting is an invigorating departure from their normal routine. Several came to campus early in their careers and have gone on to greater accomplishments. Henry Brant, who premiered a piece in 1975, recently won a Pulitzer prize.

This is my 20 th year attending this important ceremony and its celebration of service. In those past years as I listened to the speakers, I often wondered what I might say that would dignify this ceremony if I were asked to speak. This is a profoundly emotion-laden event.

In 1946, outside these very doors, a photographer took one of the most significant photos that can be found in our archives. It documented an assembly of five men and women wearing their dress uniforms.

Veterans of World War II, they had returned to the River Falls Teachers College to complete their educations or to return to the classroom. They represented the more than Eleven Hundred students, faculty, staff and alumni who put themselves in Harm's Way during what has become known as "The Good War." From Battleship Row at Pearl Harbor to the oil fields of Ploeste, from the jungles of Guadalcanal to the snow covered forests of Bastogne and the Battle of the Bulge, they shouldered the burden of freedom. They sweated, they bled, and 24 of them did not return.

It was a form of courage that is threaded throughout the historical fabric of this institution. It was sewn in the Spanish American War, in World War I, Korea, Vietnam, Desert Storm, and now in Afghanistan and Iraq. Many thousands more of our faculty, staff, students and alumni have placed their lives on the line in the dangerous daily business of serving in the military in non-combat areas.

Certainly, there are commonalities that each generation experienced. As a young man in the Marines during the Vietnam War, I learned the nomenclature of my era. It is a verbiage that others from my generation who are here today will recall: some of it is the serious terminology of warfare, and others bear the whimsy of soldiers, sailors and Marines. Terms like C-Rations, John Waynes, LZs, I Corp, M-14s and Pogey Bait.

To many of you here today, those terms will have little meaning. Truth be told, they probably do not have much meaning to those who are in uniform with us here today, some 30 years after my own experiences. But then I, after completing Boot Camp in 1968,  recognized little of my father's and my uncles' military life from World War II.

Even so, there are many common bonds between all veterans. The deepest bond was forged among us when we stepped forward to swear an oath of allegiance to uphold the Constitution of the United States. Our reasons for doing so might have been centered around amorphous ideas like patriotism, or love of country, or an obligation to repay those who served before us. But regardless of your age or motive, there is a gravity in promising to put your life at risk for your nation that becomes immediately obvious as you raise your right hand.

When I reflected about how our insights about military service mature with time, I thought of my father. When he died six years ago, he had carried with him for more than 50 years fragments of shrapnel still lodged in his body, and shards of barbed wire embedded in his eyes. They were his Red Badge of Courage: the wounds he suffered in Belgium and Germany as a 19-year-old machine gunner in the 35 th Infantry Division.

We, at UW-River Falls, are the special beneficiaries of the sacrifices of my father and the millions of other men and women who have served under our flag throughout our history. For we at the University have the obligation to be critical thinkers, to weigh and to assess life in our Republic, and most importantly, to speak freely about our democracy, even when it may be unpopular.

Such a profound societal mission never happened in Stalin's gulags, in Hitler's Germany, or in Saddam Hussein's Iraq. True academics are among the first to be purged in a totalitarian society whose dictates would wither under the ennobled criticism that comes from enlightened, free people.

Freedom of speech and freedom of action, I know, continues to have a profound meaning for my fellow veterans on campus. Over the years I have talked with many of them about this: veterans like Tom Weiss, Dennis Cooper, Jens Gunelson, and Rafael Conde, among others. They hold particularly dear what our nation stands for. That comes in large measure from the requirements that all veterans experienced of necessity through their military service.

When service men and women put on their uniforms they give up their birthrights as free Americans in order to protect our democracy. During World War II General George Patton repeatedly and clearly explained why this must be so in his speeches to the soldiers of the Third Army. Soldiers sacrifice their personal freedoms in the name of discipline, because it is only through discipline that the habits of their training will arise and overcome their fears in combat so as to ensure they gain victory.

This is a beautiful day for this ceremony. And it is a bittersweet day. Before us today our flag flies at half-staff by order of Gov. Jim Doyle to honor the memory of Army Specialist Ben Smith of Hudson, who was taken from us last week in Iraq. Specialist Smith will be laid to rest today.

But it is a joyful day of celebration for our campus and our larger community as we formally welcome back in a parade today our family members, friends and neighbors in the 128th Infantry Regiment of the Wisconsin National Guard who have returned safely to us from Iraq.

In closing, to all of my colleagues from UW-River Falls, to our honored service men and women who are here today in uniform, to our comrades from American Legion Post 121 who honor us with their participation in this ceremony, thank you for allowing me the privilege of addressing you.

The executive officer of the 6th recalled the ferocity of the Black Hats in that contest, " There was, on the part of the men, great hysterical excitement, eagerness to go forward, and a reckless disregard for life, of everything but victory."

Awarded the Congressional Medal of Honor for gallantry at the Cornfield was Private John Johnson of the 2nd Wisconsin. An infantryman, the 20-year-old Johnson was pressed into service as a cannoneer and was cited for valor, when personally aided by General John Gibbon, Johnson manned a cannon to desperately drive off a furious Confederate attempt to overrun the Iron Brigade's artillery battery. Private Johnson's recognition also cited his action at the Battle of Fredricksburg in December of that year. In that bloody killing field of Union soldiers, young Johnson participated in a deadly artillery duel with Confederate gunners. A shell that exploded above Johnson's gun sent a piece of shrapnel tearing through his body, and severing his right arm cleanly at the shoulder.

In his report a few days later, General Hooker wrote, " Every stalk of corn in the northern and greater part of the field was cut as closely as could have been done with a knife, and the slain lay in rows precisely as they stood in their ranks a few moments before. It was never my fortune to witness a more bloody, dismal battle-field."

Despite confirmation that the orders were authentic, McClellan hesitated for 18 hours. If he had marched immediately, and kept moving, it would have had dramatic consequences: the Iron Brigade would have passed through Turner's Gap unopposed, without taking 318 casualties; some 12,500 federal troops at the Union encampment of Harper's Ferry just 8 miles away wouldn't have been encircled and taken prisoner by Stonewall Jackson's Corps; Lee's divided three corps would never have had the time to regroup into a single army at Antietam, leading to 23,000 casualties. And at Antietam, the timid McClellan held 30,000 of his troops in reserve and never committed them to battle at crucial moments. The result? Lee's battered army escaped to fight on for 2.5 more years, leading to several hundred thousand more American deaths.

Thank you, too, to the friends and family members of our service men and women who are here today. Your love and support for them, as well as for their comrades, is keenly felt and appreciated by every veteran who is part of this assembly today.

After a distinguished career as one of the most competent of Union generals, Gibbon said of the Black Hats: "I was not a Wisconsin soldier. But at the judgment day I want to be with Wisconsin soldiers."

"We expect about 275-300 new students, most of whom are transferring from other educational institutions," said Alan Tuchtenhagen, executive director of enrollment services. "This may well be a record new student enrollment for spring term. Our location, affordability and broad array of academic programs makes us a very popular choice for transfer students."

Tuchtenhagen says it is common for individuals to enter the University between terms during an academic year. "Some students are just starting their college career, others are changing institutions and transferring," says Tuchtenhagen. "But there are also many students who have been out of school for some time and have decided that it is time to go back to school to finish their degree and enhance their employability."

Student can take either a full-time or part-time schedule of classes. Registration is Jan. 18 and classes start Jan. 22 for all new, incoming students including transfer students. Students must be admitted before registering. On-campus housing is available as is financial aid for those who qualify.

"This relaxed, interactive class of conversation and role playing will help you develop the confidence you need to enjoy a full Italian experience abroad," said Cynthia Wells-O'Malley, UWRF outreach program manager.

Participants are introduced to the language in "Spanish I" and can opt to continue the lessons in "Spanish II." The classes are practical and proficiency-based and include a blend of culture, vocabulary and grammar presented in a relaxed atmosphere.

Onken, of Hudson, visited Cologne, Bonn, and Berlin in December for nine days along with 9 other invited representatives of the U.S. higher educational system. There, the business tour group learned about Germany's educational and vocational training systems through site visits to institutions, businesses, and government agencies.

Participants also attended lectures on the history, structure, and financing of Germany's dual educational system. In addition, guided tours and cultural excursions in the various cities were provided.

"Involvement in international faculty development programs such as this is of great benefit to the College of Business and Economics as it enhances the international learning experience for UWRF students," said Barbara Nemecek, dean of CBE. "Faculty in these programs study with other faculty and businesses in the countries in which they visit and bring back their observations and experiences to incorporate into the UWRF classroom."

CDS International's mission is to help build the careers of young academic and business professionals. By visiting another country and learning about its educational and vocational systems, these academic professionals can further CDS' mission and enable young adults to gain international experience so they can share their skills with others and continue their own advancement.

Hunt was originally diagnosed with prostate cancer in 1998 and quietly underwent many treatments and surgeries over the past eight years, according to an obituary posted on the Kansas City Chiefs Web site. He maintained his active schedule until entering the hospital for a final time on Nov. 22.

A frequent visitor during the Kansas City Chiefs summer training camps at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls over the years, Hunt appeared with Gov. Tommy Thompson during welcoming ceremonies on campus for the team's first camp at UWRF in 1991 and visited the camp many times.

Hunt's legacy includes the founding of the American Football League and induction into the Hall of Fame for eight sports, including football, soccer and international tennis. He held 13 championship rings from five sports. According to the Chiefs Web site, in addition to being a principal negotiator in the merger of the AFL and NFL in the late 1960s, Hunt was a contributor to the design of the NFL playoff format. He is also credited with naming the NFL's championship game "Super Bowl"--stemming from his children's toy "Super Ball."

"Mr. Hunt has been described as a visionary leader; a friend and gentleman; a man of integrity and humility who was modest, soft spoken, gracious, passionate about sports, and America's greatest sportsman," said UWRF Chancellor Don Betz. "We have witnessed all of these qualities. UWRF faculty, staff and students, the River Falls community, and the thousands of loyal fans who have followed the Chiefs to River Falls send sympathy to the Hunt family and the entire Chiefs organization on this very sad occasion."

"Mr. Hunt never missed an opportunity to come to River Falls," said Halada. "He loved the 'penny' parking and the malts at the South Fork Cafe and very much appreciated the hospitality we extended to the Chiefs. He will be missed."

He is survived by his wife, Norma, and their four children, Lamar, Jr., Sharron Munson, Clark and Daniel. He was also the proud grandfather of 14 grandchildren. In lieu of flowers, the family asks that memorial donations be made to the Dallas Museum of Art and the Heart of a Champion Foundation in Dallas.

"There have been some occasions when it's been difficult to choose the best, most promising student for the award," said English Professor David Furniss, Terry's advisor. "Terry's impact on this department, its faculty as well as its students, cannot be measured."

In 1997, another UWRF alumna, Amy Stenson, won the award. While a worthwhile candidate will have a strong academic record, excellent classroom presence, and a supportive base of faculty nominators, these are hardly decisive factors--every nominee needs some aspect to set them apart and above, says Furniss.

English professor Ruth Wood emphasized Jorgenson's zeal for her work: "Terry is one of the most serious, hard-working, and disciplined people I know, yet her sense of fun, enthusiasm and irreverence are never out of evidence."

She is currently teaching in the same district in which she student taught. "Her cooperating teachers, the English departments and principals in both schools were eager not to let her slip through their fingers," wrote Wood. "As impressive as she's been as an undergraduate, I know that her best work lies ahead."

Lower power FM radio service was created by the FCC in 2000. Stations are allowed for noncommercial or nonprofit educational broadcast, or public safety, transportation or government agencies. Current broadcast licensees with other media interests cannot apply for a permit, and permit holders can only broadcast at 100 watts in a radius of 3.5 miles, according to the FCC.

A typical day began with the newscast at 7 a.m. followed by gathering and writing stories for a later cast and then an afternoon of interviews or press conferences, depending on the current events. Hassel said news in a town Amery's size might equate to a new stoplight, but he recognizes the value of his time in the small town and having to wear many hats.

Despite being one wave of the future, the LPFM station WPCA is working to recapture the "golden age of radio." Recordings of musical presentations from the 1940s play on weekends, and Frank Sinatra and other Rat Packers are staples on the playlist.

Hassel says station owner Bob Zank relies on 'Mom and Pop' underwriters versus commercials for funding. All the equipment at the station is from the 1950s and visitors are invited to view a newscast as it might have looked back in the day when radio shows "Life of Riley" and "The Shadow" and personality Jack Benny were the equivalent to today's "King of Queens" and "CSI" television shows and media maven Dane Cook.

Described as a largely rural phenomena as FCC requirements do not allow LPFM to exist in larger cities with more crowded spectrums, such community stations are credited with bringing back localism and diversity to airwaves. With more than 260 currently in existence in the United States, the stations' platforms range from religious groups, local neighborhoods, and high schools to "regular" news and music programming like WPCA's.

"Undergraduate research is emerging as an institutional value and priority," said Chancellor Don Betz. "This means that we will be encouraging research as an effective way of teaching and learning. UW-River Falls is well suited for such a methodology given our historic devotion to personalized education. SURSCA exists due to the diligent work of the supportive, mentoring faculty and our Director of Grants and Research, Bill Campbell."

During the holidays, people probably consume a fair share of those 31 pounds. The UW-River Falls Falcon Food Store, located in room 149 of the Food Science Addition in the Agriculture Science has a wide array of fresh cheese but also meats and ice cream perfect for holiday parties and gift-giving.

For the holiday season Falcon Foods has cheese gift boxes available with 16 varieties of cheese.Varieties include cheddars. smokey, Colby, dinn, cojack, cheese curds Monterey Jack, pepper cheese, cajun spice, and Swiss. Selections of cheese are available in either 8 oz. or 1 lb. blocks. Cheese varieties can be combined to form a 2 lb. or 4 lb. gift box. A stick of Wisconsin's finest summer sausage is also available. Cheese box orders are accepted through Dec. 22.

Other specialty items include a Queso Shiraz cheese, five-year old cheddar cheese crumbles, and Swiss Shiraz with almonds and smokey bacon country crocks, which are available individually and not as part of gift boxes. A limited supply of a new variety developed by UWRF is CheddarStone Red, a fresh white cheddar cheese combined with Shiraz wine. Cheese and sausage trays are also available and orders must be placed in advance.

All Falcon Foods products are produced by UW-River Falls students in the university plant, which has been in operation since 1983. Students work under the direction of a full-time plant manager and produce a variety of products.

The Falcon Foods store offers students the unique opportunity to work in a commercial plant setting. The dairy plant uses raw milk from the University Dairy Farm and is primarily self-supporting. The meat plant gets some of its animals from the University Lab Farms.

The primary goal of the plant is to provide a valuable learning experience that the students can take with them and put to use on the job. They are involved in all aspects of production, sanitation and quality control.

Prior to coming to UWRF, Splett was a vocational-agriculture instructor in the Barron and Turtle Lake high schools, a loan officer for Production Credit Association and a supervisor for the Farm Credit Administration. He has also served as a consultant to agriculture-oriented financial institutions and taught economics at UW-Stout. He has been a visiting lecturer at the Academy of National Economy in Moscow, Russia.

Receiving the Outstanding Service Award is the Kansas City Chiefs Football Club. Established in 1983, the award recognizes individuals and organizations that have made exemplary contributions to UWRF. It is the highest honor bestowed upon a friend of the university.

Denny Thum (right), KCC executive vice president and chief operating officer, will accept the award on behalf of the NFL club. The Kansas City Chiefs has called River Falls and UWRF its summer home for the past 16 years. The partnership has increased economic impact in the region, enhanced institutional visibility and provided valuable learning experiences for students and summer interns. In addition, the annual training camp and its special events offer visitors from near and far the chance to experience an NFL team up close.       The graduates will also be welcomed by UWRF Chancellor Don Betz and issued congratulations on behalf of the UW System by Mark Bradley, a regent vice president of the UW System Board of Regents. Bradley is an attorney with Ruder Ware LLSC in Wausau and has previously worked for UW System as a budget analyst and assistant to a senior vice president. He received his law degree from UW-Madison and serves as a trustee and/or director for several foundations.

With her achievements as the American editor of the six-volume edition of the letters of Virginia Woolf, Banks found her perspective a little like Mrs. Dalloway, the title character in Woolf's landmark novel. In the novel, Dalloway ponders interconnectedness: "But to go deeper, beneath what people said...What did it mean to her, this thing she called life? Oh, it was very queer...She felt quite continuously a sense of their existence and she felt what a waste; and she felt what a pity; and she felt if only they could be brought together; so she did it."

That's exactly what Banks had in mind when she gave a generous gift to the UWRF College of Arts and Sciences for the creation of a center that will promote and support interdisciplinary teaching and scholarship across the humanities, arts, social sciences and natural sciences.

Terry Brown, dean of the UWRF College of Arts and Sciences is excited to be part of the groundwork in creating the new Banks Center for Interdisciplinary Inquiry. "The center will help support faculty development in interdisciplinary studies, and it will provide physical space for interdisciplinary exchange," says Brown.

Plans include moving to a renovated area in what was known as the Orange Lab in the basement of the Chalmer Davee Library. The center will house the director's office and reception area, as well as a state-of-the-art wireless classroom designed specifically for multidisciplinary inquiry and team teaching equipped with moveable tables and chairs, multiple whiteboards, and multimedia equipment.

Another part of Bank's gift is allocated for supporting sabbatical funding for interdisciplinary teachers and an annual lecture series. The lecture series will bring nationally recognized thinkers to campus while bolstering the intellectual life on campus and significantly raising awareness of UWRF as a center for academic excellence and dialogue in the region.

"This will be devoted to bringing different disciplines together and into dialogue," says Brown, who knew Banks through Woolf academic circles. When the pair met, Brown found much kinship with Banks as both were science majors before switching to literature, and both are cancer survivors.

The act of bringing different disciplines into concert is central to Banks's life work as she started out teaching humanities to engineering students and taught humanities courses for physics majors at Drexel University. Her work installing a literature aspect to the medical program at Pennsylvania State University College of Medicine led to the founding an interdisciplinary field that is now a part of many medical programs across the nation.

While Banks looks back at her past and ponders her legacy, she also recognizes that interdisciplinary education presents several ways at looking at the same subject ...so as Mrs. Dalloway did, she did it.

"The concepts and products are a little different," said Mike Owen, Chartwell's production manager. "With the move to the new University Center and changes in residential dining options it will be a nice challenge to get it all up and running." Minneapolis-based Caribou Coffee will also be located in the center, and samples of its fair trade and organic certified coffee were available at the event.

Biology: Mitra Naserai, River Falls, Wis. Project Advisor: Kim Mogen. Supplies for research project on bacteria-destroying virus to control bacterial infection in bean sprouts will be acquired with the award money.

Chemistry: James Herbison, Tomahawk, Wis. Project Advisor: Karl Peterson. The award money will be used to purchase materials for the study of a chemical process that contributes to the synthesis of the incarvillateiene molecule.

Physics: Michael Tate, Muskego, Wis. Project Advisor: Lowell McCann. Materials will be purchased to build and examine a device called a "quantum eraser," which has applications as an encryption device that makes interception of transmitted data physically impossible.

Psychology: Rhiana Wegner, Prescott, Wis. Project Advisor: Travis Tubre. Wegner will present research examining gender differences in coping responses to same-sex and opposite-sex sexual harassment at the Annual Conference of the Midwest Psychological Association in Chicago.

Nicholas Kuehl, a horticulture landscape design major from Kewaunee, Wis., developed his independent study project with the help of UWRF horticulture Professor Terry Ferriss. She thought it would be an excellent project to provide hands-on experimental learning while being "reflective of sustainable approaches," said Ferriss.

Kuehl will investigate the effects of using beneficial insects to control unwanted pests instead of control with chemical sprays. The UWRF foliage greenhouse is home to several different plant species including tropical, desert, and plant cultivars.

Insects have been a problem for years. In the past, the solution was to spray insecticides; however, this can have a negative effect on the environment and may reduce the overall plant quality. So Kuehl, designed a plan to battle the pests by releasing three kinds of commercially available predatory insects: Cryptobugs (a predatory beetle), Spidex (predatory mites), and Thripex (another species of predatory mites).

Cryptobugs, which target the mealybug species, are placed on the infected leaves in the evening at a temperature above 61 degrees Fahrenheit and take action by eating their prey completely. A bottle of Cryptobugs costs $15.70 for a 100ml bottle containing 25 adults. The activity of the Cryptobugs is indicated by the presence of empty egg pouches.

Spidex can only survive by eating the two-spotted spider mite. In order to introduce Spidex, the bottle must be shaken before opening, and then sprinkled onto the leaves of infected plants. Temperatures should be at 68 degrees Fahrenheit for atleast a couple hours.  Adult predatory mites and nymphs search actively for their prey and suck out their body contents. The spider mites that have been eaten can be identified as tiny black dots on the leaves. A single bottle of Spidex containing 2000 adults mixed with wood chips costs $16.79.

Kuehl said once a week the beneficial insects will be added into the greenhouse for the four week introduction period. During this time, observations and spot checks will be made. Some predators may die or escape through the vents and more will have to be added.

The goal is to try to keep an adequate number of predator insects in the greenhouse at all times in order to control the population of the plant-eating insects. Kuehl will make observations for the rest of this semester and then greenhouse manager Dan Waletzko or another student will have to take over his project as Kuehl will be graduating in December. He is currently seeking a career in interior landscape design, targeting companies in Minneapolis. His ultimate goal is to run his own business.

Research and planning required for promotions and evaluation of promotional plans will be covered along with details and practice in media planning and buying as well as public relations writing. There will be opportunity to work on an individual project related to one's job or organization or on projects related to community organizations as "clients."

Assistant Professor Tracy O'Connell has taught in the UWRF marketing communications program for three years. She has previously managed advertising, marketing and public relations activities for nearly 30 years in the nonprofit arena as well as for a Fortune 500 company. She taught for 10 years in California colleges and holds a doctorate from UCLA.

A University of Wisconsin-River Falls freshman received a national proficiency award at the National FFA Convention held in Indianapolis in October. Kaleb Santy, an agricultural education major from Pulaski, Wis., was named the national winner in the area of Emerging Agriculture Technologies.

This award was presented to Santy for his innovative project which dealt with lowering the somatic cell count (SCC) in lactating dairy cows through the use of natural, homeopathic substances instead of antibiotics. A lower SCC in dairy cattle, results in less mastitis and higher quality milk. And using natural substances instead of antibiotics means that antibiotic resistance is less likely to develop in animals or humans.

The experiment was relatively cost efficient as well. Since eggs and honey are fairly inexpensive, the process only cost about $50 to make approximately a gallon and a half, enough to treat about 35 cows. But because the substance does not store over the long term, it has to be mixed and used fresh.

While Santy does not live on a farm, he has working experience on dairies. His interest in science and willingness to help out an employer made it an easy decision for him to develop the idea for this project.

Santy says his goals for the future are simple. He would like to see his discovery assist dairy farmers in producing a higher quality product. But he needs to work on finding a way to preserve the substance and give it a longer shelf life. Since the eggs are used fresh, the only option now is to mix the substance on the farm and then discard any extra. He intends to become an agriculture instructor and advise an FFA program to "teach agriculture and all areas it encompasses."

"For an institute that values excellence in teaching, these awards are especially important," said CAS Dean Terry Brown. "These faculty are an inspiration to their colleagues for their dedication and commitment to helping students learn."

Arts and Humanities Division: James Mulvey  currently serves on a number of committees for the University and the English Department . "This is my second Arts and Humanities Teacher of the Year award," says Mulvey. "I have enjoyed my 26 years of teaching here at UWRF and have been rewarded by working with so many wonderful students who keep me engaged with and enthusiastic about my teaching."

Sciences and Mathematics Division: Eileen Korenic  is an associate professor in the physics department where she has taught since 1999. "The teaching award means a lot to me since it comes from students," says Korenic. "I believe in lifelong learning and I hope I share that enthusiasm with students so they will continue to grow intellectually on their own."

Social Sciences Division: Wes Chapin  was received the Outstanding Advisor award for the social sciences division. Chapin is a professor of political science, head of the international studies program, chair of the Faculty Senate, and an International Traveling Classroom advisor. "I've been privileged to work with many excellent people over the years," says Chapin, a UWRF alumnus who rejoined UWRF as faculty in 1997. "The fact that there are so many faculty and staff willing to assist and teach each other in our efforts to better serve students is ... an extremely important component of the quality of this institution."

Arts and Humanities Division: Jennifer Willis-Rivera  is an assistant professor of speech communication and theatre arts. She has been with UWRF since 2004. Willis-Rivera also serves as advisor to the UWRF National Communications Association Student Club. " I really am so honored to be selected for this award," says Willis-Rivera. "Helping students is the main reason I became a teacher. The fact that I was nominated by students makes th is even more special. Students are the main reason I came to UWR F; I wanted to be a part of an institution where everyone participated in the mission of educating the next generation."

Sciences and Mathematics Division: Elaine Hardwick  is an assistant professor in the biology department. "I was surprised and humbled by it," Hardwick says of the award given to her by her advisees. She came to UWRF in 2003.

Arts and Humanities Division : Peter Mak  has taught art for more than 20 years in a variety of settings including Arizona and Hong Kong. He also has a number of works on permanent display in galleries across the nation. "I think I am greatly honored by the award, " says Mak. "To be recognized by our peers for the quality of work produced in a sustained period of time is a powerful encouragement and motivation."

Sciences and Mathematics Division: Clarke Garry  is possibly better known as "the bug Man" who taught at UWRF for 30 years before retiring in spring 2006 and is a former two-time winner of the Outstanding Faculty Member of the Year award (1993 and 2004). He is also noted for his work with the Kinnickinnic River and travels to Alaska and Canada to research paleo-environmentally significant beetles. "I hesitate to recall the hours, weeks and years that I spent on ongoing research projects throughout my several decades at UWRF," Garry said. "Of course, I did it because of my love of the subjects, whether fossil insects or aquatic invertebrates. It was just great to have it recognized in the form of this award."

Social Sciences Division: Cynthia Kernahan  is an associate professor in the psychology department and has been at UWRF since 1999. She calls the award very significant and important to her: "In winning this award it feels like a confirmation of the work and a testament to the importance of doing research that involves students and investigates student learning," says Kernahan. "I think that this is especially important on a campus such as ours that values teaching so greatly and I feel especially honored to have been recognized in this way." She recently received a grant worth nearly $40,000 for her collaborative research on student thinking.

University Service: Tricia Davis  is an assistant professor in the department of Sociology, Anthropology and Criminal Justice as well as UWRF's assessment coordinator. "It is really an honor to be recognized by my colleagues for the work that I have done for my department, college and university," says Davis. "Since starting here in 2000, there have been wonderful opportunities to help me grow professionally here at UW-RF, and I do appreciate all the people I have worked with, helped and supported me in those positions."

Community Service: Gorden Hedahl  is a former dean of the College of Arts and Sciences as well as a professor of theatre. "The CAS community service award recognizes all of the work that our faculty do to reach out beyond the campus to serve the local community and region," Hedahl says of the award. "I assisted in the development of several of the CAS faculty awards and the planning of the Awards Wall [in the Kleinpell Fine Arts bulding], so I am particularly humbled and honored to be selected for recognition."

"Occasionally, a graduate student or two might attend AIRUM," said Cindy Crimmins, the director of institutional research at UWRF who worked closely with Lavant. "To our knowledge, no undergraduate student has ever attended, and has certainly never presented."

Lavant's paper--"Learning in the Swirl: Transfer Student Retention"--focuses on retention rates among transfer students and incoming freshmen. Crimmins recalls an "aha!" moment--when Lavant tested her first hypothesis and found that retention rates for transfer students at UWRF are much higher than the literature shows. "Words like exuberant, voracious and insatiable best describe how Sage approached her project from that point forward," Crimmins said.

The McNair program is designed to assist low-income, first-generation college students to prepare for and enter graduate schools with the ultimate goal of a Ph.D. Accepted students receive paid internships, funding to attend to research conferences, waived GRE and graduate school fees, eligibility for graduate fellowships and assistantships (up to $40,000 per year) and more.

DEC. 4, 2006--A new pilot program at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls aims to help students become successful and well-orientated members of the campus community by assisting them as they transition to and through college.

Launched this academic year as part of a two-year pilot project, the First Year Experience office sponsors programs and services that connect new students and transfer students with the UWRF campus community. Co-directors Miriam Huffman and Sarah Egerstrom want the FYE office to be a one-stop source for information, resources, and support that students need to be successful at UW-River Falls and beyond.

In addition, student's families are also encouraged to foster a strong connection with UWRF. "Close family, no matter if it is parents or grandparents, is an important factor in the success of an individual student, as they are there for that little extra nudge in the right direction," says Egerstrom. "Parents are great partners in the educational experience and should not be left out."

Toward that aim, the FYE organizes a family day on campus in the fall to help ensure the incorporation of family into college life. Families of students were invited to campus to sample the life of their college students. Athletics, recreation, entertainment, presentations, tours, children's activities and other events took place.

Other programs sponsored by the FYE include new student registration, Academic Day, new student and family communication vehicles, establishing a national honorary and emerging leaders program, and partnerships with faculty and staff that connect students with academic and co-curricular activities.

Because the FYE office is so new, staff is still working on developing the program. Ultimately though, Huffman and Egerstrom hope to improve the on campus retention rate by making students' everyday life on campus a little easier. Both have experience working directly with students in other capacities.

Egerstrom continues to work a half-time schedule in her former office, the UWRF admissions office, and coordinates student orientation services. Miriam Huffman has worked with student events and activities and had coordinated the fall opener event, Weeks Of Welcome (WOW) on campus. Both say it will now be much easier to synchronize the programs that introduce college life to incoming students and encourage the development of community while students learn on campus.

"As the No. 2 ranked farm in milk production in Pierce County averaging 27,000 lbs. of milk per cow per lactation, we feel our cows are very appreciative of the compost bedded pack barns," said Kelm. "This works well for us."

The grant helped purchase a tractor-pulled compost turner to aid in the composting process, said Kelm. Farm staff used bedding pack manure from the open front dairy heifer barn when it was cleaned out in the spring. The material would be placed in windrows and composted on a field near the barn. Only the heifer manure was composted as the milk cows were housed in a tie-stall barn with a liquid manure handling system.

At first, the farm accepted local city leaves along with grocery store fruit and vegetable waste, which was mixed with the manure to compost. However, problems arose, says Connolly, when too many plastic bags, metal and rocks came with the off-farm materials from careless separation procedures. It finally got to be too much to separate the materials, so the farm quit accepting these items and decided to use only bedding and manure.

About three years ago the lab farm abandoned the tie-stall barn with its liquid manure system and decided to go for the openness and comfort of a compost bedded pack barn. Two open-front hay barns adjacent to the old tie-stall barn were converted to compost barns.

"Tie-stall barns may have been useful and spacious for cows in the 1960s, however, now cows are bred to be larger," said Kelm. Benefits from the compost barn have included better herd health, higher milk production and fewer feet and leg problems among the herd.

Connolly, dairy farm manager John Galgowski, and equipment operator Mark Watrud as well as  compost manager Carl Sackreiter (above), an agricultural business major from St. Charles, Minn., have been instrumental in facilitating the compost process, assisted by Kelm, and animal science Professor Larry Baumann and agricultural engineering technology Professor Bob Butler.

Kelm says achieving good compost results is a process. First, a deep layer (8 to 12 inches) of organic bedding such as sawdust or wood chips is spread down. The lab farm requires a semi-trailer load of about 16 1/2 tons of wood chip bedding for both the milking barns.

An implement such as a field cultivator is used to stir the pack. Kelm said the most important factors are tilling deep (at least 10-12 inches) and making sure it is stirred twice a day. This way any wet bedding or manure gets buried in the pack and new drier material is brought to the surface. This also increases the porosity of the pack, which is necessary for the aerobic composting to proceed.

Two to three inches of new bedding is added every two to three weeks. The barns are completely cleaned after three or four months. The bedding and manure is put into windrows to continue the composting process. Microorganisms, including bacteria, generate heat in the material here, as well as earlier in the barns. Temperatures can reach up to 155 degrees F in the windrows and 120-130 degrees in the barns, according to Connolly.

Depending on temperature and moisture, the windrows will be turned once or twice a month. After a few months, the composting process is essentially finished. For the farm's field crops, the composting manure can be used at any stage in the process, much like manure to provide nutrients to the growing crops.

Besides providing cow comfort and a finished product for the public, the compost also provides research experiences. Kelm is currently conducting research at the farm on the impact that different tillage methods have on characteristics of the pack. One barn is used for deep tillage 10 times a week where it is cultivated 10 inches deep. Then twice a week a chisel plow is used to reach a depth of 18 inches. Once down to 12 inches, the material is 10 percent drier, said Kelm.

The other barn is concentrated on the shallow tillage method. A rototiller is used to reach 4-6 inches deep. The pack remains fluffier while still being deep enough to keep the compost going. Kelm's research, since July 1, has included six trials to compare shallow, moderate and deep tilling. These trials will conclude in the next few weeks.

Both Kelm and Connolly feel that compost barns are a viable method in addressing dairy cow comfort and health and generating quality manure.  They can be economically, environmentally and cow friendly and reduce odors. Plus the surplus may be sold to the public in the composted form.

"Bottom line, we would like to create an environment in which dairy farms can co-exist with the public," said Connolly. "Waste is a useful resource, and when used properly, it will help grow corn, alfalfa, and other crops."

DEC. 4, 2006--Campus and community members showed up for the unveiling of a mural Nov. 28 in the west hallway of the Wyman Education Building at UW-River Falls honoring the late history Professor Ed Peterson. The mural, composed of six different stances portraying the professor in action, was created by Garrett Bergemann, a senior fine arts major from Bloomington, Minn. While Bergemann noted that he never had taken a class from Peterson, he wanted to make an image that would inspire the campus community. "When you're making something like that, it's hard to get all of these things together. So I thought I'd focus on what I thought was the core of the community, which is the teacher and the student and the interaction that takes place." Bergemann chose to represent Peterson for his passion, evident in classroom photographs. "You can see the passion and the movement of one person in his acts...I see all these images of Ed Peterson in the middle of his teaching, and I was just amazed at the passion and the amount of expression and the dedication to his craft." Peterson's wife Ursula, of River Falls, attended the event.

Garlock emphasizes the comic value of the production--often found lacking in holiday pieces, as some can be a tad maudlin. "It is a fun holiday comedy that strays from the traditional "Christmas Carol," she said.

So instead of watching Tiny Tim wheeze, the production is a great alternative, she says.  In addition the effort that the all the actors and designers have put into it has made "Sorry! Wrong Chimney" a very funny show for the whole family, said Garlock. "It will be a unique experience for everyone who has the good sense to come and see it."

"I look forward to returning to a role in a campus community," said Trende, who served as a resident assistant in college and who has frequented UWRF classes as a guest speaker. "As a resident assistant and counselor in college I enjoyed dealing with student issues. It was particularly challenging because it was during the anti-war student movements near the end of the Vietnam War."

While Trende said he enjoyed the summer off after retiring from the HPD in May, he had every intention of returning to the work force in a new capacity. This fall he had been considering several opportunities and was pleased to be selected to serve as interim director until a formal search can commence.

While with the HPD, Trende was active in the Counteract Program, which he helped develop with Hazelden Health Promotion Services; Community Action, which offers substance abuse prevention and education in schools and youth groups; UWAZO, an aftercare ministry program for offenders as well as youth sports including referring for area high school football games.

UWRF will gain acreage immediately adjacent to the west and northwest of the farm, which adjoins Country Road MM northwest of River Falls. K&S will receive acreage south of the county road, directly across from the existing laboratory farm.

Proposed plans by K&S include developing the acreage for rural residential purposes, possibly including an elementary school, retail services, a fire substation, parks and a playground, according to UWRF Campus Planner Dale Braun.

The university will use the newly obtained land for the College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences. According to Braun, a land assessment conducted by the college indicated it needed another 295 additional tillable acres beyond the 398 acres currently available.

The trade is compatible with the land use planning goals of the Town of Troy, St. Croix County and the City of River Falls, said Braun. The land to be acquired by K&S can be served by municipal sewer and water services. The land to be gained by the University lies within the Town of Troy and is not eligible for city services.

"This is an honor for the campus to have her serving a professional state role like this," said art Professor Lynn Jermal. Gaffer was elected in a state-wide election to the WAEA, serving a two-year term.

"Kathy has strong leadership abilities and she is using them now on the WAEA Board," said Jermal. "I am so happy to see one of our art education students with the initiative to run for a state board position. This experience will give her both state-wide contacts and professional experience in her field. It's hard work, but I hope it will pay dividends for Kathy."

The WAEA is a state affiliate of the National Art Education Association, which is dedicated to serving and representing art teachers. The mission of the Wisconsin Art Education Association is to promote excellence in visual art and design education for all students by providing professional growth opportunities for visual art and design teachers; showcasing student talents and abilities; supporting art and design as academic core disciplines; communicating with other art and design organizations; offering lifelong learning opportunities; and acting on vital art and design education issues.

NOV. 17, 2006--You go out to start the morning chores on the farm, but to your dismay you find that the tractor won't start because you forgot to put it in the shed, the cow waterers are frozen because it is so cold that even a polar bear would shiver, and the manure holding system is overflowing because it hasn't been emptied in a year.

The program is new to UWRF and Wisconsin. Last year it was piloted at UW-Platteville. "We are looking into the feasibility of doing this on a more routine basis here at UWRF especially after seeing the turn out and the evaluations of the first session," said agricultural economics Professor Gregg Hadley.

Sessions and activities included a video case study of a family farm undergoing a transition and an activity where learners were separated into male farm owners, female farm owners, and future successors and explored their future aspirations for the farm. Other activities for participants include Myers-Briggs personality assessment, which was used in explaining the benefits and problems with relating to business partners who have different personality types.

Participants also analyzed farm financial potential and received free financial feasibility studies. Other topics covered were legal issues, teamwork, communication, business arrangements, how the financial aspects are shared among future partners, and overcoming life's challenges that can affect the business.

"We appreciate what the farm has given us and would like to have our kids grow up with the farm influence," said Franklin, a junior majoring in dairy science from Broodlyn, Wis. "The program is benefiting us because it has forced us to make decisions, now we are starting to put our decisions into action. Franklin said she can't imagine doing anything else for a career. She hopes to have a 40-cow dairy operation with 160 acres.

Audet's parents came from Vermont to attend the program. "I have a keen interest in working with animals and in the financial aspect of the family business," said Audet, and like Franklin, said he enjoys the farm lifestyle. "The program brought up some potential issues that my family and I will encounter in the transfer process."

Participants will attend the second part of the Return to the Farm program in February 2007. The goal is to have the families discuss issues that may have came to their attention from the first session.

"We want that session to be very responsive to the learners needs and wants," said Hadley, "so we will be discussing issues that the learners feel are important to help their future farm partnership and transition succeed."

The debate team also received second place respectively.  Team members included: Steve Boe, a senior agricultural education major from Taylor, Wis., Jared Acker, a sophomore food science and technology major from Waunakee, Wis., Gena Polzin, a junior marketing communications major from Cadott, Wis., and Jill Hinrichsen, a senior agricultural education major from Abbotsford, Wis. The topic debated was, "Does the agriculture education curriculum increase student achievement in core academic areas?"

Ashley Wierzchowski, a sophomore biology major from Green Bay, Wis., who placed first in the essay contest last year was in charge of running the essay contest this year.  Leah Johnson, a senior agriculture major from La Crescent, Minn., presented for the Program of Excellence competition as a representative of UWRF. The contest includes four areas: fundraising, community service, social, and professional development. Schools are judged on accomplishments over the past year, member involvement, and overall quality. UWRF received first place in the fundraising category.

The Alpha Tau Alpha (Alpha Mu) Chapter received the Nolan Award at the Platinum level, which is the highest award that can be bestowed upon a chapter. Alpha Tau Alpha (ATA) is an honorary organization that promotes the highest standards of the agricultural education profession by allowing closer relationships with individuals who have chosen the profession of teaching agriculture. UWRF is the only university to win the Nolan Award three consecutive years.

"My research challenges current scholarship on the origins of Southern lynching and the emergence of Protestant evangelical Christianity by linking them to the occult beliefs of British immigrants who settled the frontier," Atkinson explains. "These popular customs reveal how ordinary people used religious understandings of the 'invisible world' to combat disease, affliction, and witchcraft."

"Faculty reputation directly impacts institutional reputation," said Chancellor Don Betz on Atkinson's achievement. "This publication is wonderful for Roark and shines national light on his department, the College of Arts and Sciences, and UW-River Falls. Roark's work has been accepted by Johns Hopkins editors, who have access to some of the best manuscripts available. UW-River Falls will be judged by some to be a strong institution in his field due to this publication. We all benefit from his success as we have from other faculty members' accomplishments."

"In this new option students will study economically viable production systems that promote land productivity, energy efficiency, environmental stewardship, and rural community viability," said Mike Crotser, professor of plant and earth science.

Some of the courses in this option include: sustainable agriculture, organic certification principles and practices, soil and water conservation, farm management, fruit science and production, integrated pest management, and many more.

In their future, sustainable agriculturalists use their curiosity and enthusiasm to solve problems within our current agricultural systems. They also work to sustain rural communities and educate consumers. Many are producers of value-added crops such as organic produce, grains and meats, said Crotser.

Other areas in which sustainable agriculturalists provide assistance include: technical support in crop and animal production systems, development of soil and nutrient management plans, insect and disease control with integrated pest management techniques, and natural and sustainable food products marketing.

This option was initiated by a student request within the college. "Since it was recently approved, we are still waiting for the first student to take on the sustainable agriculture option," said Crotser.

The sustainable community development option is designed for those seeking to apply their unique interests, knowledge and skills to the benefit of their communities. Working with a faculty advisor, each student develops a customized, experientially based degree plan allowing them to focus on a specific sustainability emphasis. Students can choose from community-based agricultural production, food processing, land use planning, nature tourism or conservation/biology. Participants can choose from a thesis or research paper or non-thesis paper or project.

The M.S. program also offers two other options: an initial certification in agricultural education for prospective agricultural education teachers and a professional development in agricultural education option designed for educators in both classrooms and non-formal settings.

The art department is preparing to return to the site this summer with students to work on sustainability projects to add to the students' experiences and skills as well as to benefit Tibetan villagers, says Jermal. The tentative dates are July 21-Aug. 19, 2007.

The internships aim to engage the youth of the village in learning how to use recording technology such as digital cameras and sound recording to capture the work of storytellers, dancers, visual artists, poets, writers, and performers.

One project, Jermal says, will focus on the arts and addresses collecting documentation on the artisans of the villages and encouraging young villagers to visualize creating marketable items in their traditional forms.

The array of works available for purchase includes intricately wrought ornaments, glassworks, ceramics, paintings, fibers, jewelry, printmaking, photography and mixed media. Participating artists range from students, faculty, alumni and local artisans, all eager to contribute to the UWRF art department scholarship fund through their art.

The sale benefits a scholarship fund for continuing students as well as the Art Society, a student organization. Participating artists retain 65 to 70 percent of the proceeds, and the balance goes to the scholarship fund. Organizers say it is great place to find holiday gifts, as every purchase supports local artists and gives back to benefit deserving students.

Brian Schultz and Hamid Tabesh, economics faculty in the College of Business and Economics, will discuss the results of their research on how high school students in west central Wisconsin learn economics.

Described by the Boston Globe as "exquisitely balanced and sonorous" and "first-rate," Artaria's refined and thoughtful playing has brought them critical acclaim in Europe and throughout the United States. Firmly rooted in the great traditions of the chamber music masterpieces, the Artaria String Quartet is also a loyal advocate of contemporary music.

Enthusiasts say that Artaria has a rare ability to offer outstanding performances in both concert and educational outreach settings; it has performed hundreds of programs to thousands of students throughout the United States.

The quartet won the 2004 McKnight Performing Artist Fellowship Competition. It has premiered a wide array of new works and has numerous commissions to its credit. With a mixture of classical and contemporary music, this will be an intriguing and highly entertaining performance.

"Sorry! Wrong Chimney!" is a light-hearted Christmas tale full of mistaken identities and zany foul-ups, with a smattering of slapstick. This rollicking tale is perfect for the holiday season, with a couple of hours of uncomplicated laughter and fun for audiences of all ages.

The play is the annual production of the UWRF student theater group, Masquers. Students produce the play in its entirety from direction and lighting to costumes. UWRF student Kate Garlock, a journalism major from Little Canada, Minn., directs.

Baumann had had to choose between two important events in October as the award ceremony was scheduled the same time as the University's new dairy learning center groundbreaking. "It was ironic," he said, as he had planned to be at the groundbreaking but found out just two weeks before that he had won this award.

Baumann attended WVMA's annual convention held in Madison to accept his award. In addition to recognition at the ceremony he received an engraved plaque.  "It was very meaningful and a humbling honor," he said.

Baumann received his veterinary degree in 1978 from Purdue University. He has been active in the NWVMA for almost 20 years, taking on various tasks and leadership roles. The NWVMA has one of the highest memberships and is also one of the most active veterinary districts in the state.

Baumann says his continuing goals will be to help keep the Northwest veterinary district a strong, active, and vibrant organization.  He would also like to continue educating others, as many veterinarians strive to do.

Their papers were developed from research projects from Geography 401, Senior Colloquium, taught by assistant Professor of geography John Heppen, who accompanied the students to Nebraska as faculty advisor. UWRF had the largest showing of any UW school at the conference, said Heppen.

The focus of both papers was environmental racism. Fox's winning paper was titled "Environmental Inequity: Nuclear Power Plant Location and Race Composition," focusing on environmental racism in regards to nuclear power plants. Tufigno studied the changing social, economic and ethnic composition of Lake Street in Minneapolis from 1960 to 2000 in his paper, "The Changing Face of Lake Street, Minneapolis."

Purnendu Vasavada, Ph.D., was invited by the organizing committee to present a paper on the "Need of Microbiological Testing for Assuring Food Safety" at the congress. More than 900 people from academia, research institutions and the food industry in Brazil and other Latin American countries attended this bi-annual event.

The main theme of the congress was Brazilian food industries in a globalized marketplace with an emphasis on food quality and safety. The technical program included plenary speakers, keynote presentations, research communications and technical poster presentations as well as an exhibition featuring various products and services provided by companies in Brazil and Latin America.

Earlier this summer, Vasavada also conducted a workshop on food safety and microbiology in Sao Paulo, Brazil. "Traveling to international events, such as the Brazillian Food Science and Technology Congress, provides an excellent opportunity to introduce UWRF programs and activities, particularly food science and technology and explore collaborations with universities and industry partners abroad," said Vasavada.  "Even at the Congress people knew about UW-River Falls and our program."

"It is significant to connect with food science colleagues in Brazil and meet with faculty there as resources, in order to bring back pertinent information for the students and faculty at UWRF, said Vasavada. "It was a very good experience."

The students include: Ted Cannady, a freshman from River Falls majoring in agricultural business; Lakiesha Townsell, a freshman from Milwaukee majoring in agricultural business; Howard Anderson, a freshman from Milwaukee majoring in marketing communications with an agriculture emphasis; and Sarah Nielsen, a freshman from Maplewood, Minn., majoring in biotechnology.

The students from Vincent High School were introduced to UWRF while still in high school because of a partnership and pre-college program that exists between the high school and UWRF, said Donovan Taylor, a professor in the UWRF plant and earth science department, who founded the program. Taylor will serve as a faculty mentor for the scholarship recipients.        Started in 2000 by CAFES, Vincent High School and the Private Industry Council of Milwaukee County, this partnership brought high school students to the campus for week-long programs exploring agriculture and environmental sciences during the summer.

One scholarship recipient is very excited about stepping foot in the agriculture world. "I would like to understand more about agriculture and work outside," said Anderson. His dream, he says, is to become a sportscaster as well as educate others on the importance of agriculture.

The purpose of the workshop was not to just teach educators to use software, but to explore how to integrate technology into their classrooms and their students' lives. Mary Manke, assistant dean of the UWRF College of Education and Professional Studies, says that positive learning and teaching opportunities that result from well-equipped classrooms, but problems can arise if teachers aren't taught how to use the technology.

Students in today's K-12 classrooms are a technology-oriented generation of kids, explained Manke, and proper training is essential to keep up with the constantly evolving technology. Not only has interest in technology education grown because of teacher motivation, but also because school administrators are encouraging teachers become familiar with the latest teaching strategies.

Most of the 90-minute sessions were held in the Wyman Education Building's high-tech classrooms and Technology Education Center, and others were held in the computer labs at the Chalmer Davee Library.

Faculty, students, teachers or anyone interested in teacher education is invited. Mike Miller, an assistant professor of teacher education at UWRF, will present at 1 p.m. with time for feedback on his research plan with student teachers and middle school students. From 1 to 2 p.m., Bill Campbell, director of grants and research at UWRF, will present, "Research Grants and Funding: Everything You Need to Know."

The showcase will include scientific posters by students, staff and faculty that have been recently presented at national, state and local events and conferences and research to be presented. Works of art and music may also be presented. A brief presentation ceremony and refreshments will follow.

This lecture will explore trends that show how boys are falling through the cracks at all levels of American schooling. Participants will also have a chance air their own thoughts and feelings and discuss discussing what policy-makers, educators and ordinary citizens might do to address this critical societal problem in the United States.

Student, staff and members of the community are invited to participate in any or all events. Sleep-out participants will be provided with a cardboard box for shelter. Anyone is welcome to participate, and participation is free. Organizers suggest that participants come prepared to brave nights of cold weather, including appropriate clothing, pillows and blankets. Sleeping bags will be provided.

On Nov. 15 a free presentation called Faces of Homelessness will illustrated the vivid images of homelessness through a slide presentation. The presentation is free, open to the public and starts at 7 p.m. in the Abbott Concert Hall of the Kleinpell Fine Arts Building. After the slide show several speakers will discuss their first-hand experience with homelessness.

This program is sponsored by the Campus and Community Fighting Hunger and Homelessness Organization and local businesses including Curves, the Colony Home, and Ben Franklin. Each business has pledged to donate one dollar for every individual who sleeps outside.

Photo caption: Cassie Parsons, a junior majoring in elementary education from Red Wing, Minn., peers through a placard like the ones that will be set up throughout the UWRF campus to encourage participation in support of National Hunger and Homelessness Awareness Week.

Also included with the mini grant was a $2,000 institutional enhancement grant, which was used to purchase copies of a book coauthored by Harvard Univeristy Professor Richard Kadison, called "College of the Overwhelmed: The Mental Health Crisis and What to Do About It." The books were used in addition to the $2,500 mini-grant to run two discussion groups that talked about students' mental health issues and were facilitated by UWRF psychology Professor Brad Caskey. Groups included students, faculty, staff, community members, public health officials and police officers.

Some of the mini-grant was also used to host Professor Kadison, who is chief of Mental Health Services at Harvard University, on the UWRF campus last January. Kadison used the topics covered in the discussion groups as a springboard to address members of the UWRF community about the effects of mental health issues on college students and possible ways to remedy the problems.

Based on what came out of the discussion groups and Kadison's visit, Reilly-Myklebust, licensed counselor Jennifer Elesesser and licensed independent clinical social worker Gretchen Link established a list of goals and objectives to write a proposal for the startup grant.

One of the leading areas of concern is that faculty and staff members sometimes feel the need to help students or advisees with possible mental health problems, but they do not know how to approach students or help solve the issue. Using information from faculty, staff, students and other colleges, the UWRF Counseling Services published a brochure entitled "Assisting Students During Emotional Distress: A Guide for Faculty and Staff."

Brown, Elesesser, Link and Reilly-Myklebust had a few opportunities to present material at the North Central College Health Association conference in South Dakota, the Minnesota College Personnel Association conference in Minneapolis, and AACU's annual conference in Washington, D.C. Among the conferences' attendees were faculty members and administrators from other campuses across the nation.

Other goals and outlined in the grant's objectives include: revamping and maintaining the Student Health Services and Counseling Services Web site, hiring student interns for peer counseling, contracting professional psychiatric services and marketing and advertising the benefits of overall wellness and counseling services more effectively. According to Reilly-Myklebust, educating students about mental health issues is important because these issues are very misunderstood.

According to the UWRF faculty and staff involved in the project, this is the last opportunity UWRF will have to apply for grant money through the AACU's Bringing Theory to Practice Project, but these grants have helped Student Health Services and Counseling Services improve counseling education and treatment that will benefit students for years to come.

On a national scale, says Reilly-Myklebust, the number of UWRF students reporting feelings of helplessness, depression and anxiety is comparable to national averages, according to a study administered by the campus student health and counseling services last year.

"[The data] really show that our students, like others across the country, are struggling with mental health issues," said Reilly-Myklebust. Furthermore, the number of students in therapy or on medications to treat depression and other conditions is increasing, and the UWRF campus needs to be prepared to help students, she says.

Several key speakers discussed ways to approach recent food-borne pathogen issues. Dr. Roy Betts, of the Campden & Chorleywood Food Research Association, Chipping Campden, U.K., was the opening speaker. He described the use of rapid detection methods to assure food safety.

Another highlight of the symposium was Wisconsin's Secretary of Agriculture Rod Nilsestuen, a 1970 graduate of UWRF, who discussed the food situation in Wisconsin and what needs to be done in order to solve problems like the spinach outbreak and raw milk safety issues.

Dr. Michael Robach, vice president of corporate food safety and regulatory affairs at Cargill, Inc. in Minneapolis, was the symposiums banquet speaker. He explained issues affecting the global food industry and the future outlook of the industry.

Amy Robak, a conservation major from Foley, Minn., and who is majoring in conservation with a minor in soils and agronomy, was named the national winner in the area of Environmental Science and Natural Resource Entrepreneurship-Placement.

This award was presented to Robak because of her progress within the past two years working with the U.S. Department of Agriculture Natural Resources Conservation Service (NRCS) within the Benton County Soil and Water Conservation District (SWCD). In these two short years, Robak went from overshadowing others, sorting papers and filing to working one-on-one with landowners developing nutrient management plans.

Robak said her FFA advisor, Alan Stemper, realized her passion for conservation and pushed her toward this career option. The first six months, Robak served as a volunteer for the SWCD, to see if she enjoyed the work.

Two years later, besides working with land owners, Robak has used Arc-view software to lay out different conservation practices, performed irrigation pivot checks, taken soil and manure samples, scouted crops, performed tree flagging, has worked on planning and installing new shelterbelts and evaluated drainage ditches.

Robak attributes much of her success to growing up on a dairy farm. "I think it's the concept of experiencing it, I've seen what conservation tillage can do," said Robak.  She feels this makes the landowners more comfortable with her plans. Robak also wants "to get it done in a timely manner," she said, which is another benefit growing up on a farm has given her.

She is working to start a new proficiency in the Emerging Agriculture Technology-Placement based on the research of her nutrient management plans. Robak would also like to apply for the Star in Agri-Business Award based on her NRCS employment.

She will  work with the NRCS over semester break, spring break, then full-time in the summer. Robak also wants to work in parts of northern and southern Minnesota to get experience with different types of land.

The national competition was held in Minneapolis in October with more than 20 state beef ambassadors competing for five national ambassador spots. The contestants were judged on a five to six-minute speech and a one-on-one interview with a panel of judges.

"It is an honor and a privilege to represent the agricultural industry on a national stage," said the 18-year-old Minnesota native. Along with being named the fourth place National Beef Ambassador; Johnson received a $250 scholarship.

As a National Beef Ambassador, Johnson will travel the country promoting agricultural as well as the beef industry.  "It's pretty amazing the opportunities that are available to educate the public about the impact that the agricultural industry has," said Johnson. That education is the reason that Johnson choice to run for beef ambassador.

"Sometimes when you are involved in the agricultural industry, you take for granted that not everyone knows and understands what happens on a farm," Johnson said.  Hoping to help bridge that knowledge gap, Johnson will use her agricultural background to inform the public through her role as a National Beef Ambassador.

"I loved growing up on a farm and just want to share that love with the public," she says. The family farm consists of 550 acres and raises all their replacement heifers along with finishing out the dairy steers.

All events are free, open to the public and suitable for all ages. Dressing for the weather is advised. Interested people are advised to check the UWRF physics department Web site (www.uwrf.edu/physics) and click on "observatory" or call 715-425-3560 on the night to see if skies are clear enough.

Known as the Midwest's foremost authority on the supernatural, Norman has written six books about Haunted America published by Forge Press. His latest shares more than 100 stories that have haunted the countryside. Norman is a playwright, actor and former chair of the UWRF journalism department.

Skillfully interweaving story, music and dance with history and present perspectives, the Fast Horses entertain and educate audiences of all ages. The performance is free for UWRF students and $5 for adults and $3 for 18 and under. Tickets are available at the door starting at 7 p.m.

Tribal people around the world have always expressed their subconscious through song and dance by bringing their dreams into reality by painting, sculpting, beading, singing and dancing.  As accomplished dancers and singers, Fast Horse preserves their heritage through the old ways of their culture.

Native American culture is portrayed through a living history of the 1800s by utilizing outfits, as well as tools and crafts, which are made traditionally by hand. The performance features a presentation on the holistic lifestyles of the native influence in the fur trade era and focuses on the evolution of Native music and dance, as well as its influences on, and similarities with other cultures.

UWRF economics Professor Glenn Potts, who is director of the program, will present an overview followed by a question and answer session. Designed for the working adult, the Master of Management program offers the education and skills needed for advancement within a professional field or a new career direction.

All students admitted into the program are required to have at least two years' post-baccalaureate work experience, so that their real-world experience can enhance their classroom learning. Requiring 30 credits to graduate, the program is schedule friendly for full-time working adults, meeting only one night per week.

In a recent survey, current Master of Management students gave high marks to the program's real-world curriculum, small class size, faculty, as well as diverse academic and work-experience. The varying career goals of the students enrolled in the program, which leads to a diverse classroom experience, also received high marks.

The Kingdom of Morocco is truly at the crossroads of the world, according to UWRF art faculty member Steven Derfler, who will lead the tour.  For thousands of years, Morocco's location at the northwest tip of Africa has allowed it to absorb elements of European, Sub-Saharan African, and Arab cultures in its quest for identity. As a result, its culture, history, religion, art and politics are a unique blend among nations today, Defler says.

"We will discuss the hurdles that women face in their efforts to balance professional achievement and family success," Tubre says. "The presentation will provide a very brief background on the economic, legal, sociological and psychological factors that have precipitated the mass entry of women into education and the professional workforce."

The presentation will focus on two issues: "The first is whether educational and professional pursuits affect women's likelihood of forming intimate partnerships and having children," Tubre says. "The second is whether making time for finding a partner and having children affects women's career opportunities. We will discuss the two issues with an emphasis on how work demands, societal expectations, and human developmental biology present women with significant hurdles in their efforts to 'have it all.'"

"The unit has high-quality students who have a sense of career aspirations in journalism," the report stated. "Many of them chose the University as transfer students for its journalism program, small size, faculty involvement with students, and immediate access to working on the student media."

"Obviously, we're very pleased with the team's report," said Colleen Callahan, department chair. "It reaffirms our mission and focus. Outside reviews are extremely important, not only to assess the present, but to help guide us toward the future."

Team members were Dan Lattimore (team chair), vice provost of extended programs and dean of the University College at the University of Memphis; Paul Smeyak, professor and graduate coordinator at the School of Journalism and Broadcasting at Oklahoma State University in Stillwater, Okla.; and Carolina Gonzalez, a consultant and freelance reporter from Brooklyn, NY.

"[It is] hard work in preparing for this important process," said Terry Brown, dean of the College of Arts and Sciences. "I want to extend a special congratulations and thanks to all of the journalism faculty and Colleen for her leadership."

Though it's a reminder of the bumpy ride reminiscent of elementary school, there is much more meaning behind it, according to Amanda Moeller, an Americorps VISTA member working on the UWRF campus through the Wisconsin Campus Compact program. "This is important because it signifies to the schools that our UWRF students are there to learn as well," says Moeller.

From the Falcon Tutors' perspective, tutoring younger students has its pleasant aspects. Matt Loosbrock, a senior from Lindstrom, Minn., echoed this notion. "The most enjoyable aspect is the variety of minds I get to work with," he said.

The ROTC gives students the opportunity to complete officer training while attending college. According to LTC JoAnne Parks, assistant professor of military science at UW-Stevens Point and coordinator of the program for students at UWRF, the goal for students is to get an education while improving their military skills and training to become an officer.

Unlike the Army National Guard, in which a student enlists as a private and serves one weekend a month with an additional two weeks of training annually, ROTC students are not enlisted. When an ROTC student signs a contract, he or she owes the military a commitment of eight years at the completion of training. This eight-year commitment can be served in a National Guard unit in the reserves or on active duty.

Physical training is every Monday, Wednesday and Friday morning. The training consists of running, push-ups, sit-ups, and sports such as basketball. There is an emphasis on teamwork, camaraderie and bonding.

During the leadership labs the cadets practice skills that they've learned in the classroom such as proper use of maps, small weapons training, drill, moving as a squad, and other maneuvering tactics. The leadership labs are designed as a culmination of what the cadets have learned in the classroom.

Parks said the most difficult aspect of being a cadet in ROTC is the time commitment, especially with the busy schedules of most college students. There's an hour in the classroom, a two-hour lab, and three hours per week of physical training to earn only one or two credits.

One weekend a semester, the cadets travel two hours east to Fort McCoy. At the fort the cadets complete confidence and navigation courses, ride in a Blackhawk helicopter and work on rappelling from a 200-foot tower.

Parks hopes military science will eventually become a minor at UWRF, as it is at UW-Stout. Provost Charlie Hurt, vice chancellor for academic affairs, said there is some interest to investigate establishing a minor at UWRF, although the formal process has not started.

"It's still in the preliminary state, " said Faculty Senate Chair Wes Chapin. "Nothing formal has actually occurred other than conversations. I'm sure we'll be hearing from them in the next couple of weeks with a proposal for action."

According to Chapin, the process for a program to be established begins with an evaluation of the need for the program, the resources available and the environment it would require. The process requires approval by the Faculty Senate, Chancellor Don Betz, and the UW System Board of Regents.

For example, a new student group at UWRF, called the Socialist Alternative, included in a recent meeting agenda the goal of  "eradicating the Army Reserve Officers Training Corps program from campus."

A controversy at UW-Stout ensued when its chancellor issued a decision banning ROTC from campus due to his views that the program went against the university policy on diversity. Chancellor Charles Sorenson later reversed the decision after considering the implications for UW-Stout because banning the program violated UW System Board of Regents policy and federal law.

Also re-elected to another term as vice president was Kari Stanek of Reedsburg, Wis. Stanek, communications and public relations coordinator for Accelerated Genetics, graduated from UWRF in 1998 with a Bachelor of Science degree in animal science with a dairy, business and communications emphasis.

Among the activities sponsored by the association includes alumni receptions at Wisconsin Farm Technology Days, World Dairy Expo and other agriculture-related events. The association also hosts a senior breakfast for CAFES students and sponsors various awards.

Leading the team at the Harrisburg contest was Johnson, finishing 2nd high individual overall, 4th in Guernseys, and 1st in the Jersey breed. Cooper finished 17th individual overall. Penn State topped the team division.

Top finishes at the Madison contest included winning first in the red and white breed as a team and taking 5th high team in oral reasons. Individually, Muenzenberger finished 5th high individual overall, 1st in red and white, and 2nd in Guernseys. Lauderdale was 13th high individual overall, 3rd in red and white and 4th in Holsteins. Johnson finished 2nd in jerseys, 4th in red and white and 9th individual in oral reasons. The UWRF team finished in the top five in four of seven breeds.

Seventh and eighth graders in Cindy Lander's classes have enjoyed the project so far, said Michaela Molter, president of the UWRF Horticulture Society. "The kids take to it," said Molter, a senior majoring in horticulture landscape design and society president who is from Cadott, Wis. "It's fun, hands-on, and they can get their hands dirty."

Landers contacted the Horticulture Society in hopes that the project would be educational and fun for both the middle school students and the college students, said Molter.  The project has been going well and a strong partnership exists.

The project began in early October when a group of UWRF students went to the middle school to discuss new layout plans and began digging and removing plants. The project is on hiatus with the onset of cold weather but the students will continue with their plans in the spring, as early as April.

According to Molter, plans are to design and assemble an irrigation system, install a pond, and plant perennial divisions around the south side of the school in the quarter of an acre courtyard area.        Both Landers and the club members hope that the middle school students will learn proper planting procedures, installation processes, and plant identification, as well as how to make plant cuttings.  "It's an educational experience for them and a way for us to engage our knowledge," said Molter.

Six members of the Horticulture Society have been involved in the project. Schwarz and Branch have been designing plans for the perennial garden. "We will be using the plants that are already there, but using placement so the students may effectively view, observe, touch, and learn from the plants," said Schwarz.

Molter, Tiffany Nohl, a freshman horticulture major from Manitowoc, and Chelsea Stimson, a senior horticulture major from Lindstrom, Minn,. have been planning the installation of the pond and irrigation system.  Nick Kuehl, a senior horticulture major from Kewaunee, has also assisted. Molter said other members are willing to contribute their labor in the spring.

The Horticulture Society members enjoy giving back to the community, so Molter thought this would be the perfect opportunity for them to serve the public while also gaining some helpful career experience.

"This project allows us to work on a design for our portfolios. We are able to use what our teachers have taught us," said Branch. "We are able to enhance the minds of younger children. It also provides a great atmosphere in which students learn."

The Horticulture Society is a very active student organization advised by horticulture Professor Terry Ferriss within the College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Science. The club is affiliated with the Mid-America Collegiate Horticulture Society and the American Society for Horticultural Science, which has recognized UWRF's club as the Best Large Collegiate Horticulture Club in the nation, based on member interest and participation. Membership is open to any student with an interest in ornamental plants, landscaping, turf, fruit/vegetables, or gardening in general.

OCT. 30, 2006-- "UW-River Falls is indeed fortunate to have attracted an exceptional group of new faculty and staff," says Chancellor Don Betz. "They are joining the university family at a moment of change and opportunity. Their experience, dedication and passion for teaching and learning will directly contribute to our success, and to helping students learn."

Student teachers receive University credit for their work, which usually continues for one academic semester. Interns receive both credit and salary, are on contract with cooperating schools and assume greater responsibilities than student teachers.

"Stronger Together: An Educational Partnership for the Changing Economy," was one of only five joint grants awarded by the Title III program of the U.S. Department of Education in the current year. Title III awards funds for developing academic programs to meet regional workforce needs.

Chancellor Don Betz hailed the award, the third such provided to the UWRF in the past 15 years. "This highly competitive award will provide much needed resources for developing alternative delivery methods for courses and programs. The five-year award will support faculty and staff training, support systems for students and program development," Betz said. "Importantly, this is a true collaborative effort with CVTC, and the synergy that continues to develop between our two institutions will serve the increasing educational interests of the people of west-central Wisconsin."

CVTC President Bill Ihlenfeldt noted that the grant strengthens the region's economic vitality through the expansion of online courses. "Technical and university education offer Wisconsin's St. Croix Valley the means to gain competitiveness in a highly competitive era," said Ihlenfeldt. "The concentration of higher education in western Wisconsin is a great advantage to our local economies. This grant will help build a larger and more educated workforce and that is clearly needed."

Katrina Larsen, UWRF outreach director and Title III project director, said the collaborative effort responds to rapid growth in western Wisconsin. "To thrive, UWRF and CVTC must increase programs aimed at working adults through nontraditional means of delivery: online instruction, combinations of online and face-to-face, interactive TV, webcasts and flexible scheduling," she said. "'Stronger Together' will ... complement each institution's strengths."

Norman, a broad area social sciences and education major with a minor in international studies, heard about the opportunity sponsored by the American Youth Scholarship Foundation in a class taught by UWRF Professor Davida Alperin. From there Norman took the initiative to go to Washington. "It's good to step out of your comfort zone every once and a while," Norman says, "and expand your perimeters."

Each attending student represented one district and was then placed on committees prior to coming to Washington, D.C. to propose and write bills for their mock legislature. Once in Washington, the students were coached in parliamentary procedure by the same person who works with incoming legislators, worked in their respective committees in the congressional chambers and debated for their bills on the actual floor.

The students were privy to the 'inside the beltway' culture. "It was interesting to see Washington in action--the political nucleus of the country," Norman enthuses, describing the cavalcade around the visiting president of China, protestors outside the White House, and numerous field trips to Washington sights as well as seminars and lectures given by speakers from the State Department, the Treasury, and other ranking officials.

Professor Alperin described Norman's enthusiasm for the experience as "infectious." She said, "I have heard at least one student say they planned to apply based on hearing Jane talk about her experiences. Jane is a great student--intellectually curious, and well-organized--and was the perfect student to represent UWRF and Wisconsin."

Founded in 2002, the American Youth Scholarship Foundation is a nonprofit organization established for the betterment of community through assistance in educational pursuits. The U.S. Model House of Representatives Program is a nationwide civic engagement and leadership program for college students who are active in their communities.

Reilly will address the UW System's current "Growth Agenda for Wisconsin" that has been approved by the Board of Regents, which advanced it to Gov. Jim Doyle and the Wisconsin Legislature for consideration.

At the heart of the Growth Agenda initiative, which carries a $27.3 million price tag over the next state two-year budget, is the production of more bachelor's degrees in such critical areas as teacher education in math and science; engineering; nursing and health care professions; nano-technology; science; and business.

Betz will speak to UWRF's ongoing extensive strategic planning process that will consider expanding the size of the student body, which is currently at 6,100 undergraduate and graduate students. This year is the eighth time in the last decade that the campus has set an enrollment record.

This seminar provides solutions to overcome the challenges of working in a multi-generational workplace, including an understanding of why generational differences have an impact on productivity, how organizations can work toward overcoming age-related differences, and how to identify strategies for boosting the quality of supervision between age groups.

Workshop facilitator Sally J. Field has more than 18 years of human resource and management experience. As president of Sky's the Limit Coaching and Consulting, she has developed training seminars, workshops and individual coaching sessions.

Participants will also learn historical events and cultural icons of each generation and how they influence work ethic, perceptions and attitudes as well as how to foster understanding among co-workers and how to help the transfer of knowledge between veteran employees and their younger counterparts.

The UWRF Art Society is made up of students interested in pursuing extracurricular artistic endeavors. The organization is very active on campus, participating in the annual fall outdoor art installations, the art department's scholarship sale in December as well as fundraising activities for group trips to Chicago.

Reilly will address the UW System's current "Growth Agenda for Wisconsin," that has been approved by the Board of Regents, which advanced it to Gov. Jim Doyle and the Wisconsin Legislature for consideration.

"The more Wisconsin citizens who hold college degrees, the more we can attract high-paying jobs, bolster the state tax base, and improve our quality of life," Reilly explained. "One of the reasons Wisconsin's economy has not been as robust as it could be is that, when compared to other states, a lower percentage of Wisconsin residents have four-year college degrees - just 25 percent, compared to 27 percent nationally and 33 percent in Minnesota."

Betz will speak to UW-RF's ongoing extensive strategic planning process that will consider expanding the size of the student body. UW-RF currently enrolls 6,100 undergraduate and graduate students. This year is the eighth time in the last decade that the campus has set an enrollment record.

"As UW-RF's strategic planning process unfolds this fall, we'll consider expanding our enrollment to meet the increasing educational demands of the dynamic St. Croix Valley. We'll explore a range of initiatives: distance-learning classes; teaching at other locations; admitting more transfer students; adding undergraduates; and launching new graduate and certificate programs for adult learners. We'll be asking future Legislatures to help with those funding needs," Betz said.

University records show nearly 6,800 UW-RF alumni reside in Pierce, Polk and St. Croix counties. A total of 1,655 students are enrolled from those counties this year in undergraduate or graduate programs. The University also has been active in providing expertise to many communities across the three-county area as they address issues of growth and change.

The Wisconsin Broadcaster Association College Radio News Network is designed to offer student journalists and Wisconsin broadcasters a valuable resource. The network functions like a news feed service with student radio reports and public service announcements that have mass appeal uploaded as  MP3 audio files to a shared Web site.

Six months after the network was proposed by UW-Milwaukee lecturer Maryann Lazarski, it is well on its way to fulfilling its mission as a resource, according to Sandy Ellis, associate professor of journalism at UWRF.

The Wisconsin Radio Network and its 50 commercial radio affiliates have partnered with the WBA College Radio News Network. As a result WRN stations will be able to access student-produced stories and sound bites to use on their air.

Ellis agrees: "It's absolutely a win/win situation. The students get the experience of producing news stories that will not only air in the River Falls area, but potentially could be heard all over Wisconsin."

Hague said the network is particularly valuable in these times of tight broadcast budgets. "Anything that we can make available to our affiliates, in terms of sound, coverage, and color [commentary] are good things for us and our affiliates," he said.

Student journalists recognize the long-term benefits from network involvement. "This experience will not only allow us at UWRF to have a better news cast, but it will also get our own stories and voices to a wider audience," said WRFW producer Melissa Latourelle, a senior journalism major from Hastings, Minn. "That is the kind of exposure and experience that can make a difference after graduation."

WRFW reporter Anjali Ranieri, a senior journalism major from St. Paul, believe that hearing other students' work will help her be a better journalist. "We all benefit from hearing others' stories," said Ranieri, "because we pick up on new things that make their newscasts sound good and then can incorporate them into our newscasts to improve them."

Minnesota Public Radio reporter Art Hughes heard about the network at the national meeting of the Society of Professional Journalists in Chicago in August. "It's a happy marriage between old-school media and a more flexible, digital world. It's a great outlet for radio producers and a more comprehensive resource for listeners."

In addition to the feed service, a half-hour program is under construction. It will feature the "best of" stories from the network schools in addition to talk and carry segments ranging from the best college bands to the hottest high-tech gear. The program's production will rotate between member schools each semester; currently it is housed at UW-Madison. The first program is tentatively slated for late November and will be available for all member schools to air on their radio stations and Web sites.

Now, 10 years later, Cordua has completed that dream. His Web site, Mineralogy in Wisconsin, receives thousands of visits each year and lists all the different types of minerals that can be found in the state.

Sparkling diamonds, lustrous pearls, gleaming gold, or shimmering topaz all have one thing in common, says Cordua. They have all been found in Wisconsin. Not necessarily discovered here, he says, but they have been located in different counties throughout the state.

"My Web site is basically a one-stop shop to learn about minerals and rocks," said Cordua. On the Web site, visitors can find which counties possess each mineral, along with descriptions of the minerals.

"I literally found everything I could about Wisconsin minerals," said Cordua. So after 10 years of working on this project, which was completed officially in 2004, he has succeeded in using the site not only as a teaching tool to his students but also to other students, teachers, rockhounds and others across the world.

The Web site has been receiving a lot of visitors since it was created. Cordua says this is probably due to the fact that geology teachers assign students a certain unique mineral and they are directed to his Web site through a search engine.

Cordua says he has several goals for his Web site: keeping it current; adding more pictures of minerals so people can easily recognize them; and having some fun links. For example, there are links to amateur geological clubs throughout the state so that someone who finds a rock or mineral can help get it identified. There is also a list of Wisconsin geological attractions, minerals first reported in the state, mineral uses, and more.

With technology similar to that of the United States in the late1970s to early 1980s and difficult land conditions, this country is anxious to learn new dairy management tactics and find out ways to be more competitive within the industry, said Hadley.

So when Hadley and three UW-Madison colleagues, including Dave Combs, Paul Fricke, and Pam Ruegg, ventured down to Ecuador to teach dairy workshops this past summer, many of the country's dairy farmers and stakeholders were excited and ready to begin learning.

Topics taught by Hadley and his colleagues included: the 2006 world financial performance outlook for dairy farms, the financial and production records required by dairy farms, how to assess the profitability of a dairy farm, and the financial implications of dairy modernization and expansion.  In addition, the UW-Madison faculty members gave four seminars each in their specialty areas of nutrition, reproductive physiology and animal health.

Hadley said one major difference from dairy farming in the United States is that the managers of these farms believe Ecuadorian Holstein cattle are not acceptable for these altitudes, so they milk Normande cattle instead. Ecuadorian Holsteins have been used before and seemed to be susceptible to pulmonary edema at those altitudes, he said.

Each fall the campus grounds come alive with colors, textures and objects. This year with 38 installations and more than 50 students and professors participating, the event has clearly become a campus institution.

Despite the destruction of some "fair weather" pieces, overall the art department's effort to connect with the campus as a whole succeeded in varying ways, say the organizers, which included several art department faculty.

"The outdoor nature of the exhibit brings the creative works 'closer' to the viewers who might not otherwise visit the artwork if they were displayed in a gallery inside some building," says Peter Mak, an associate professor of the art department. "Many of the artwork are site-specific and the artists 'interact' and design their work with the environment and nature in mind."

This was evident in Mak's piece, "The Immigrant," between the Kleinpell Fine Arts Building and the library. "It is an image about people from all over the world coming to this beautiful land of ours in search of liberty, freedom, a better life and dreams," Mak said.

The installations work as both a teaching tool and a showcase for all involved. Art department lecturer Meg Vossler has participated with her Introduction to Art class (art 100) for the past five years. "The students are always amazed by the high quality of their group installation, and they get so much positive feedback that it really helps them recognize their own creativity," said Vossler.

Professor Lynn Jermal recognizes the learning potential in the projects, specifically the "Pied Piper" tape mural on the Kleinpell Fine Arts Building. "The group of students ... had to grapple with multiple individual ideas, compromise and work to design and execute one piece as a team," she said. The piece was inspired by a group of artists who do "tape art'' in hospitals, disaster sites and community events as a healing tool. "Maybe theirs has the power to give us a skip in our step on a day we are 'dragging' our body across campus," Jermal muses.

As always, art is an exchange--the artist's expression is designed to elicit reactions. "Though this project we are trying to peak aesthetic interest and change the space, and perhaps educate the campus about the range of visual ideas," Jermal explains. "But a closed mind can be impervious to new insights, and if a student automatically rejects all pieces every year instead of giving each the contemplation required to understand the nature of art, any education and possibly joy or communication a piece has to offer is lost on that viewer."

The book includes more than 100 stories from coast to coast, including many spectral events of all kinds including banshees, poltergeists, mysterious women in black, and even a ghost named George who has become an accepted resident in a North Carolina home.

Norman was chair of the journalism department before he retired to pursue full-time writing. He also served as director of the UW River Falls Press and director of the Midwest Writers' Conference for many years. He is a member of the Authors Guild, the Dramatists Guild and the Society of Midland Authors.

A playwright, Norman has written several plays, including Entering the Circle: The Lives of Pioneer Farm Women  for the Wisconsin Sesquicentennial with support from a grant by the National Endowment for the Humanities. The play used diaries, memoirs, letters and other reminiscences to tell the story of rural women Midwestern farm women. He also wrote Nye and Riley Tonight!,  a play based on the 19th century lyceum programs of Indiana poet James Whitcomb Riley and humorist Edgar Wilson "Bill" Nye.

"I hope to help people understand that the field is not actually new, that there are many types of stem cells, not just human embryonic cells," Lyden says. "I also hope to communicate that that basic stem cell research in general is leading to revolutionary insights into our understanding of how cells, tissues and organs develop, grow and repair themselves throughout our lives."

The talk is about more than stem cells. "I hope to give people a basic idea of what 3D cell culture is all about and how we are using it at UWRF, along with fetal stem cells from chickens to develop artificial organs in culture."

"Perhaps the most interesting and potentially huge changes are coming in the form of new insights into the development of cancers," Lyden says. "What is very exciting here is that if treatments are designed to specifically kill the malignant stem cells, then complete cure for a tumor should become possible and perhaps even fairly simple."

However, due to the cultural polarity on the subject, such innovations may be long in the coming or not at all. Lyden says that polarity stems from an improperly informed populace and the political gain that comes from over-simplification.

A kind of give-and-take needs to occur, Lyden says: "Politicians need to be well-informed and scientists need to be effectively communicating with them to ensure that debates about science are actually based on real science and not some other agenda."

While the political climate around the subject is icy at best, Lyden hopes to go beyond that and demonstrate how exciting the science is as well as how "...students at UWRF are involved in learning, not just the ethical and political aspects of stem cell biology, but also the practical scientific skills and knowledge to become tomorrow'sleading scientists and technicians in this important field of inquiry."

The Community Classroom Series, sponsored by the UWRF College of Arts and Sciences and the Office of Outreach and Graduate Studies, is designed to help people explore the vital concerns of the contemporary world. Presentations are informal, free, and open to the public. No reservations are required to attend.

The Midwest Renewable Energy Association (MREA) will be putting on the workshop.  The main focus is to provide students, faculty, staff and the community with a basic understanding of the technology so they can coherently advocate for renewable energy.

The UWRF student ECO (Earth Consciousness Organization) Club has existed for several decades. The group focuses helping create a sustainable university and community. It currently has 25 active members. For more information about the workshop or joining ECO, contact the club president Matthew Meyer at matthew.meyer@uwrf.edu .

Activities at the day-long event, sponsored by the UWRF Student Center and the First-Year Experience Office include breakfast with administrators, deans, faculty and staff, a pig roast, kids' activities, open skating, a movie, comedy performance and Falcon men's and women's hockey games. Participants will also hear from various campus offices including admissions, career services and international studies.

Organizers encourage participation in Family Day as a great way for families and students to have quality time together while enjoying the beautiful UWRF campus. The cost: $10/person and registered UWRF students and children under 5 years old are free. Admission includes meals, tickets and admission to events.

"The goal of the event is to raise money to support a cause, bring people in the surrounding communities together, and get some people motivated to get in shape," said Tania Battoli, the event's advertising and publicity coordinator.

Those interested in registering on race day should do so between 8 and 9 a.m. in the Knowles Center lobby. Included in the registration fee is a Turkey Trot t-shirt, but shirts will only be available while the supply lasts. All proceeds will go to the local Special Olympics fund.

The Food Microbiology Symposium runs features speakers from academia, industry and regulatory agencies that will provide an overview on various topics including: the pathogens, toxins, and contaminants that may occur in food, water, and the environment. The emphasis will be on practical application of food and quality problems.

There will be workshops that include demonstrations and discussion of various tests, instruments and kits available for detection and characterization of food borne organisms, for assessment of food quality and shelf- life and rapid hygiene monitoring in food processing facilities.

A special event follows the symposium. 3M's division of microbiology invites those attending the symposium to visit its new customer innovation center and meet key scientists, researcher and others on Tuesday, Oct. 17, from 1 to 5 p.m. Transportation from the symposium will be available.

The Food Microbiology Symposium attracts a diverse community of attendees from education, industry and business. The program is suitable for food scientists and technologists, quality assurance supervisors, food laboratory directors, microbiologists, consultants, researchers and graduate students interested in food microbiology.

Registrations for the symposium are accepted on a first-come, first served basis. The $600 fee includes conference manual, abstracts of the presentations, meals, breaks, and the banquet on Oct. 16. The symposium is free to UWRF students and faculty.

Huffman has an undergraduate degree in mechanical engineering from Iowa State University, an M.B.A. with a finance emphasis and a Ph.D. in management from the University of Minnesota, and an M.S. in computer information systems from Boston University.

Huffman's research interests include exploration of big picture ideas in strategy, especially operations strategy. Huffman's other areas of interest include computer skills such as programming and business simulations in Java. He has recently had his research published in Insights for a Changing World and Emerging Issues in Business & Technology .

Charlie Corcoran, professor of finance, won an award in the publication category. Corcoran, who has a B.S. from Georgetown University and M.B.A. and Ph.D. from the University of Minnesota, has research interests including large databases, literature reviews, and random sample surveys. He has recently had his research published in the Journal of Business and Economics Research , and The Journal of Accounting and Finance Research .

Claire Kilian, a professor of management, won the Outstanding Advisor of the Year awarrd. " Students have honored me with this award, and I'm humbled by that," she said. "However, I believe I am also just doing my job. Many other faculty here do a great job of advising as well ."

According to Brian Shultz, associate dean of the College of Business and Economics, the awards for Outstanding Teacher and Outstanding Advisor are decided by polling graduates from two and four years ago. Awards for publication and outstanding research are chosen by a panel consisting of the last three award winners in the college, he said.

This past summer was devoted towards developing materials and planning the study. "Because we are coordinating four instructors over numerous classes, this took quite a bit of time," Kernahan explains. "We also have a D2L (an online learning) site that had to be further developed, and we had to decide about things like discussion questions and guidelines for our classes, the plan for analyzing data, etc."

The grant has allowed for initial data gathering and student input. "At this point we are still collecting information from students and analyzing the data," Kernahan says. "This will continue throughout the academic year and then we will work on writing up the results next summer."

With diversity courses an integral part of campus curriculum, it makes sense for students to examine their thought processes and why they think they way they do, she says. "We all teach diversity courses at our respective campuses and were interested in how teaching students to 'think about their thinking' might enhance their learning." The grant focuses around one central question: What happens when students engage in metacognitive reflection on their own and their classmates' learning in diversity courses? The potential implications of the study transcend borders and will prove highly beneficial to administrators and instructors putting together coursework as well as the students themselves, says Kernahan.

"We hope to publish it," Kernahan says. "We certainly plan to use our findings to inform our teaching and potentially change the way we teach. Part of the reason we were all interested in examining this is because all of us had moved toward this in our classes--that is, we had all begun to informally focus on teaching in a way that helps students to 'think about their thinking.' Thus, this project was a way for us to confirm its importance."

Teaching down under was very different, said the teachers-in-training. "The things we did over there were totally different than the techniques here," said Kavanagh, comparing teaching styles between the American and Australian classrooms.

One of the big differences is that every corner of the classroom is designed to keep students focused on productive tasks to keep them from acting inappropriately. "The kids were so polite," said Gliniany.

Teaching styles and procedures were different as well. Unlike having lesson plans set several weeks in advance, the teachers in Australia didn't make plans for the next day's class until the current class was done. The style allowed more adaptability, but for the student teachers, it was difficult to get used to at first. "It was like taking off one hat and putting on another," Kavanagh said.

Most of the eight weeks were devoted to teaching, but the group had several opportunities to tour and sightsee most of Australia. While in Queensland for the first part of the trip, students enjoyed snorkeling and scuba diving in the Great Barrier Reef and trekked into the Australian rainforest. The group then headed west through the Outback to see Uluru (Ayers Rock) and Rottnest Island. Other activities included seeing the ancient stromatolites, kayaking and watching a corroboree--an assembly of Aborigines singing and dancing.

Ward enjoyed herself tremendously and was proud of the students' teaching performances abroad," said Ward. "I loved that they were such outstanding student teachers at the five schools where they were placed. They impressed their cooperating teachers by their eagerness to learn new ideas about education and the Australian culture."

Most of the students are elementary education majors, but all are a part of UW-RF's Early Childhood Certification program, which is designed for students who want to teach kindergarten and pre-kindergarten.

"I think that keeping books from people is a major anti-democratic crime," said Karolides. But simply opposing or challenging books isn't the worst part of censorship, he admits. Teachers don't teach certain books in their classrooms and librarians don't buy other books fearing they may lose their jobs. "It becomes a major social problem as well as a major education problem," he said.

Trying to write a book in addition to teaching several college courses can prove to be challenging, says Karolides. There are many factors that contribute to completing a task of this magnitude, but after 15 successful tries, Karolides has demonstrated that his time management skills are in fine working order. "It's a matter of organization, time, and hoping that you can keep up with the reading and papers," said Karolides.

"It was too much maintenance, it didn't make sense to keep replacing posts and boards all the time," explained Mitchell Whyte, the Rodeo Club's vice president and a junior animal science major from River Falls. So the club decided to start looking at replacement options.

The next day they found out that the arena would need to be taken down and moved by that weekend. Dan Baugh, a Rodeo Club member an sophomore crops and soils major from River Falls, along with alumnus Don Hamlin, drove out to Colorado, disassembled the arena and brought it back to River Falls.

Whyte said that the club is applying for additional grants to raise the arena area and install drainage ditches. It also plans to acquire the assistance of the agricultural engineering department in surveying and mapping the area.

Rodeo Club members will reassemble the arena.  If all goes well, Whyte said, the club expects to start making the changes in order to get the arena up next year, in time for the start of the 2007 UWRF Falcon Rodeo.

"I chose the veterinary technology program because I didn't want to go to school for eight years to be a veterinarian, but I still wanted a career working hands-on with people and their animals," said Burton, from Menomonie.

The program was approved this past May. It gives students a shorter school term option while still being able to work in the veterinary field and receive a bachelor's degree, according to Larry Baumann, professor in the animal and food science department at UWRF.

While the veterinary technology emphasis is still new, six to eight students are currently enrolled or interested in enrolling. Baumann has been the driving force behind the vet tech program.  "Students who want to work with animals as a career can now get a degree without the full route of becoming a vet," said Baumann.       The program is designed so that students will spend about three and a half years at UWRF taking general classes with the animal science major and then will go on to take another year and a half of the vet tech classes at Madison Area Technical College (MATC) or another university that offers them.

Students who complete the program  earn a a bachelor of science degree from UWRF as well as a two-year associate degree in applied science  from   Madison Area Technical College or another university with the vet tech program. Currently a partnership exists between MATC and UWRF for the program since MATC is the only college in the state that offers these courses.

"The work I have done with Madison Area Technical College has been a pleasant experience," said Theresa Theobald, a junior from Sheboygan Falls, Wis. However, some students have also chosen to go to Argosy University in the Twin Cities.

Baumann said they are working to have the vet tech program become nationally accredited. As part of the program students must intern in a veterinary clinic for the entire summer. Students can also use the program as a segue to other degrees.

There are basically three types of degrees in the veterinary field. First, is the two-year degree (A.A.S.), which will enable students to become a veterinary technician. The second is a four-year bachelor of science (B.S.) degree with students becoming veterinary technologists. Last, is the seven- to eight-year Doctor of Veterinary Medicine (D.V.M.) degree with students earning the licensed veterinarian status.

Most veterinary technologists will work in companies and corporations than in clinical practices, says Baumann, and often they take a career path in  pharmaceutical company research laboratories. Veterinary technologists usually serve as supervisors of the veterinary technicians.  The demand for veterinary technologists is becoming greater due to the creation of so many new drugs and products on the market.

Burton agrees. " I would definitely recommend this program to others because it is a well organized program that not only gives you the chance to get a bachelor's degree but builds on the pre-vet classes," said Burton. " I would like to work at a veterinary clinic, with mostly small animals and a few large animals. I would like to do what veterinary technicians do and even more."

A number of unconventional shapes that seem like they've been rescued from the trash are inside the first floor gallery--disembodied heads, crows, mirrored candelabras and Grecian-style urns decorated with plates familiar from grandma's collection. However upon examining the works the fluidity and interconnections between the pieces are obvious as well as each artist's distinct style.

Peterson's primary focus with his works, he says, is to "embellish the gardens." It's impossible to pinpoint Peterson's primary influences with his works; his training as a painter is evident in his use of color but with influences and designs range from Celtic knotwork to Navajo rugs.

His urns are particularly entrancing--most use a four-panel orientation that allows for each side to demonstrate a different awareness through design or the vintage china that often make a kind of faceplate.

"Everything is found," Peterson stresses. "I love junking, it's basically junk I found that I liked for one reason or another." A piece of junk has an interesting historical and cultural significance, says Peterson. On his globe piece, there is a shard of glass representing Iraq that actually came from one of Saddam Hussein's palaces, according to Peterson.

In contrast, de Raad's approach is much different from Peterson's in that she says she approaches each work with a definite purpose. "I want to tell a story," says de Raad, who has taught at regional art centers and the UW-River Falls Pigeon Lake Field Station in Drummond, Wis.

Over the past 17 years Riana has created more than 40 figures that make up a sculpture garden at her home in Beldenville, where she offers public tours by appointment (for more information go to http://www.concretemosaicsculpture.com/ ). Some of her works recreate life, such as depicting a family hanging out clothes, or are symbolic in other ways, such as a scene in Gallery 101.

The story being conveyed revolves around the central figure--an old man, the last member of the Tuesday Club, Riana calls him--surrounded by crows accustomed to his presence and know not to fear this virtual relic. The connection between crows and death is not coincidental, as seen by the angel behind the old man. It is necessary to see the installation to understand the full weight of the work; the interplay between the dullness of the old man and the brilliance of the angel as well as the near-sheen of the crows displays her incredible prowess in this field.

Born in Holland, Riana has a long history with the River Falls area. She obtained an education in fiber arts at UW-RF and also ran the Ragstock store in town for 18 years, an eclectic, funky place fondly remembered and missed by thrift and vintage shoppers in the region. She ran it solely on her own. "I handpicked everything that was in the store," she said.

Employers get the chance to recruit new employees as well as interns during the process. And fair-goers receive the opportunity to meet with companies, speak with others from their field of interest and with potential employers, as well as seeking out jobs and internships.

Students at any level can benefit from attending to the Career Fair and gaining knowledge into fields in which they are interested. First and second year students will benefit by learning of possible internships, part-time work, and career information. Seniors will be exposed to an array of future job opportunities as well. There will be 45 new organizations attending the event and 105 participating employers and graduate schools are represented, according to the Career Services Office, which organizes the event. Last year some 900 UW-RF students attended the fair.

Mary Mack, a widely known folk humorist, will take the stage and deliver her stand up comedy at 7 p.m. in North Hall Audtorium on Wednesday, Oct. 16. She will also hosting a lip sync competition in North Hall Auditorium.

The medallion hunt and Mack's performance, along with many other activities during the week, leads up to Friday, Oct. 20 with a concert by the Johnny Holm Band at 9 p.m. in the Knowles Arena. Some describe the Johnny Holm Band as "the most entertaining band they have ever seen," according to the band's Web site.

Dawn Hukai, accounting faculty member in the College of Business and Economics, will explore the existing literature by examining the value relevance of foreign currency translation adjustments when parameter estimates are permitted to vary by cross-section.

"She Stoops to Conquer" was written by Irish dramatist Sir Oliver Goldsmith as a "laughing comedy" in the 18 th century, with the aim of countering the popular but formulaic "sentimental comedies" that held sway at the time.

"With his brilliantly complicated plot based on misunderstandings, practical jokes, mistaken identities and commentary on the customs and manners of the time, Goldsmith created a new model for comedies," said Hedahl. "All the strands of the plot are wonderfully tied up and tied together."

Hedahl has directed more than 50 productions from a range of theatrical periods and styles as well as has experience in several areas of theatre, as a drama and film-making consultant, and a guest instructor for schools and workshops.

In conjunction with the National Community Education Association, UW-RF developed the online graduate-level community education certification program in response to the scores of after-school programs that have formed as a result of the No Child Left Behind Act.

According to the National Community Education Association, community education advocates the creation of opportunities for community members -- individuals, schools, businesses, and public and private organizations -- to become partners in addressing community needs.

All courses in the program will take place online, and participants will be able to can earn a graduate-level certificate in community education upon completion. Because the course is online, all students pay Wisconsin resident tuition regardless of their residence. For more information about program curriculum, send an e-mail to stanley.j.potts@uwrf.edu .

While most Americans associate Vietnam with war, it is also a country with a 4,000-year history, 53 culturally distinct ethnic minorities, magnificent scenery, and some of the friendliest, but poorest, people in the world. Participants on the tour will see Vietnam in a new light as it is rapidly changing and embracing tourism and economic development.

"With ongoing increases in the cost of energy, now is the time for Wisconsin to take control of our energy future. By committing four of our campuses to energy independence by 2012 we are tapping into the ingenuity of the UW System and laying the groundwork for a cleaner, more energy independent future in Wisconsin."

Doyle told about 200 persons who attended the announcement, "UW-RF is obviously a natural to be selected for this pilot. This is a campus that has been devoted in so many different ways to conservation and to renewable energy.

He said the initiative's intent is to have the campus produce as much energy as it consumes. By using innovative energy generation methods and buying "green" energy produced by local utilities without the use of fossil fuels, the campus is expected to break even on its energy costs in five years.

According to the Governor, his staff will work with UW-RF to develop an energy plan and then seek money from the Legislature as a front-end investment in technologies and research. He said the money will be recovered by cost savings.

"We're doing the right thing in River Falls and doing the right thing across Wisconsin. Now it's up to us to take the next step forward. I'm really proud of all of you here," Doyle told the students, faculty and staff.

"This is going to be up to your planning and ingenuity. This is going to be a great campus project. We hope that in your classrooms and in your laboratories you will be discussing and focusing on how to make this campus energy independent."

"Sustainability is a way of life at UW-River Falls. We believe that sustainability is a core value as well as a practical objective that should be pursued in many ways both on our campus and in the St. Croix Valley region that we serve.

"Sustainability should be ecologically based, so that we are good stewards of our natural resources. Sustainability should be sociologically oriented, so that people and communities are able to live and work and contribute to society in meaningful ways. We believe that sustainability also should be economically driven, so that society benefits from new efficiencies that generate savings to be reinvested in other productive ways to enhance our communities.

"This designation will motivate us to rededicate ourselves to modeling the way on sustainability, whether the benefit is to other institutions or to communities. We embrace the trust that has been placed on us to lead the way, to achieve success, and to share our successes with others," the chancellor said.

UWS President Reilly noted, " The campuses selected to be pilot partners in this initiative are leaders in energy conservation and sustainability. I commend the campus leadership and all those in the communities of UW-Green Bay, UW-Oshkosh, UW-River Falls, and UW-Stevens Point for keeping sustainability as a university priority. Some of these campuses are pioneers in using 'green power' - and others plan to do so in the very near future. I congratulate these campuses for their aggressive conservation efforts, and I commend their persistence in seeking out new renewable energy options. "

The facility will be 40 percent more efficient than similar contemporary student centers. It includes a 48,000 gallon storage capacity of collected rain water that is used for grey flush water. The structure incorporates natural building materials, with a white roof to reflect sunlight, along with many other features. An educational kiosk will also be on display in the Great Hall, which will monitor various elements of the building's resource consumption.

The Food Microbiology Symposium is Oct. 14-17 and features speakers from academia, industry and regulatory agencies that will provide an overview on various topics including: the pathogens, toxins, and contaminants that may occur in food, water, and the environment. The emphasis will be on practical application of food and quality problems.

The symposium attracts a diverse community of attendees. The program is suitable for food scientists and technologists, quality assurance supervisors, food laboratory directors, microbiologists, consultants, researchers and graduate students interested in food microbiology.

Agricultural economist Marcos Campos and veterinarian Azahel Salazar, both of ITA-25, a four-year technical college in Altamirano, Guerrero, Mexico, participated in this program to become trained in adult producer education and agricultural markets as well as infrastructure development issues. While on campus, the professors received both formal in-class training and experiential training in these areas.

They have already started a producer school in their region, according to Gregg Hadley, a professor in the UW-RF department of agricultural economics. Because the school is the first of its kind, their state government gave them the first business incubator site in the state, said Hadley.

As the artist hired by the Phipps Center for the Arts to design the project, Jermal worked with Anastasia Shartin, visual arts director at the Phipps, and Liz Malanaphy, the Hudson Destination Imagination coordinator.

The idea for "River Bench" came from children in the DI program. Several Saturday workshops were held, which introduced the youngsters, ranging from age 5 to 16, to Hudson history, the different methods of sculpture.

The students chose the river theme in the form of a fish in three sections as their favorite and proceeded to make suggestions to improve or change the sculptural quality of the design. "The students were very astute and creative," Jermal said.

With a taped outline to scale on the floor of her studio, Jermal consulted with area contractors including Bob Dabruzzi, who helped design the cement slab, and Rob Bosworth, who volunteered his expertise to laser etch marble fragments with history facts.

Jermal also collaborated with Don Hammer, a metal artist from Stillwater, who fabricated the rebar armature. About 10 Hudson teens helped coat the armature, first with metal lathe and then two layers of cement.

All the images created in mosaic had themes relating to the St Croix River, including nature, wildlife, early scenes and student self-portraits. In August the art team completed the bench by coating it with a concrete mortar to secure the mosaics.

Parents and family also joined in on the creation as well as passers-by. "The Brown family came and worked on mosaics after talking to us while we were fabricating the armature in the Park," Jermal said.

"I have a new appreciation for the gifts of the river, how it enhances our community and has always been a life giving and inspirational force," said Jermal. "A touch of the spirit of each person involved in creating the River Bench resides in its colorful surface. The students who worked on every stage did such a terrific job, and the parents who pitched in on the process were full of energy and enthusiasm. Sometimes the children were trying to get their parents to stop working and go home--the art process can be addicting."

Herlache's piece is one of fifty chosen for the exhibition, which featured entries in three categories: wall hanging, functional and sculptural. The Schaht Student Showcase is open to all students currently enrolled in U.S. fiber arts programs and aims to create a better awareness of the next generation of weavers and explore the direction in which handweaving is moving as well as raise the profile of textile art students and the schools they attend, and to create an important dialogue with the weaving community and the general public.

Schaht Spindle Company, Inc. is celebrating its 37 th year as one of the largest handweaving loom and spinning wheel manufacturers in the world with over 400 dealers worldwide. Founded in 1969, the company is known for creating quality tools designed for performance and appearance.

Funny and perceptive, "She Stoop to Conquer" is a celebrated story of class, courtship and dysfunctional families. Charles Marlow, tongue-tied and uptight, needs a lesson in the art of love. He longs for a wife, but finds it easier to have a bit on the side. The barmaid seems fair game--but there's more to her than meets the eye. The production is directed by theater professor and former dean of the College of Arts and Sciences Gorden Hedahl.

"Take The Lead" is the true story of a former professional dancer named Pierre Dulaine, who is played by the widely known actor Antonio Banderas. In the film, Dulaine volunteers to teach dance in the New York public school system. At first clashing with his students' taste in dance, together they create a completely new style.

The last two Wyman Series events during fall semester in North Hall Audtiorium include Fast Horse, a Native American family of performers, who will perform Tuesday, Nov. 14 at 8 p.m. The Fast Horses are a Minnesota-based Lakota group who has been known worldwide since 1998. Mixing age, language, and culture, the performance focuses on the evolution of native music and dance.

The next will be the string quartet, Artaria, at 8 p.m. on Wednesday, Dec. 6.  A warm, rich sound and what the Boston Globe described as "exquisitely balanced and sonorous," has led to Artaria's critical acclaim throughout Europe and the United States.  With a mixture of classical and contemporary music, this performance is sure to be highly entertaining.

When Pettingill arrived at Allina in 2002, he knew that the health care system needed radical change but thought that the change would be incremental and evolutionary. He set his sights on transforming Allina--taking it from a decentralized holding company to a high performing operating company, poised to be a national model for quality, community benefit and low-cost health care. Pettingill will cover the innovations implemented by Minnesota's largest health care organization to improve health care for patients and communities.

President and CEO of Allina Hospitals and Clinics since 2002, Pettingill has a diverse background that includes spending several years at a premiere academic medical center,  a district and community hospital system, and Kaiser Permanente, one of the nation's largest integrated health care systems.

Guest speaker Pamela Miller is the faith and values reporter at the Minneapolis Star Tribune, where she covers trends in the faith culture, breaking news in religion and writes profiles and other stories.

Miller graduated from high school in Lake City, Minn., and from the University of Minnesota with degrees in journalism and anthropology. She earned a master's degree in English from the University of Minnesota a few years later. Prior to joining the Star Tribune 18 years ago, she worked as a copy editor and reporter at the Duluth News Tribune and the Anchorage Daily News.

The Working Journalists Seminar Series highlights the richness of diversity within the journalism field. Each semester the journalism department brings to campus professionals who represent a variety of perspectives or reporting experiences involving race, ethnicity, sexual orientation, gender, religion, disability or economic status.

UW-RF, in partnership with the national Youth Leadership Council, developed an online graduate-level certificate. The program assists educators and other to plan and apply service-learning methods in their classrooms and communities.

The certificate program is offered entirely online with a cohort of peers and completed within one year. It uses a variety of multimedia tools for an interactive learning experience. Much of the skills learned can be applied immediately to classroom and community settings.

According to the Learn and Serve America program, some 1 million students participated in service-learning last year. Educators across the country are discovering the rewards of incorporating hands-on service projects with established curricula to increase student involvment and enhance academic achievement, citizenship and character development.

A historian and archaeologist, Derfler has researched ancient civilizations and participated in excavations for more than two decades. He has also been involved with educational institutions in Israel and the Midwest, and his articles and reviews have been published in magazines and newspapers such as the Israel Exploration Journal and the Middle East Review. For more information, contact Dr. Steven Derfler at UW-RF: (715) 425-0639 or steven.l.derfler@uwrf.edu .

"UW-River Falls is situated perfectly in the St. Croix Valley, which is the fastest growing region of Wisconsin," says Betz. "We intend to continue to increase our student enrollment to meet the educational needs of our region."

According to Betz, UW-River Falls is launching a strategic planning process that will consider the appropriate size of the campus to meet the increasing growth and educational demands of the region. The chancellor indicated this could be achieved through a combination of distance-learning classes; teaching at other locations; admitting more transfer students; additional undergraduate enrollments; and new graduate and certificate programs for adult learners.

UW-River Falls, which currently requires incoming freshmen and sophomores to reside on campus, has filled all 2,568 residence hall beds, with 120 students assigned to temporary housing. Returning sophomores were given the option to live off campus this year to open up rooms for incoming freshmen.

Betz also noted that the strength of UW-River Falls academic programs and faculty, as well as its attractive setting and tradition of personalized education, makes it the university of choice for many students who are seeking to enroll.

The intense excitement could be felt among the audience as frantic steers ran from galloping horses. Cowgirls leapt from their speeding horses in the goat-tying event. As rodeo enthusiasts clapped and cheered for more, cowboys could be seen grasping tightly onto bucking bulls in their efforts to receive the eight-second count.

And these were just a few of the breathtaking events witnessed by attendees which also included the crowning of 2006 UW-River Falls Rodeo Queen Amanda Johnson, an animal science major from Kendall, Wis. The rodeo would not be successful without the help of the many sponsors and volunteers, according to the UW-River Falls Rodeo Club.

Presenter Patricia Berg, an associate professor of the journalism department, delves into the uncertainties of our country's future: Are we prepared for what will happen when it's time for today's younger citizens to take the helm of government? How do members of all generations move beyond the Internet to harness the power of the American media, and to have our voices heard as "citizen journalists" and future leaders.

The Community Classroom Series, sponsored by the UW-RF College of Arts and Sciences and the Office of Outreach and Graduate Studies, is designed to help people explore the vital concerns of the contemporary world. Presentations are informal, free, and open to the public. No reservations are required to attend.

The concert, called "The Big Event," is part of the mission of Building Tomorrow, is a nationwide nonprofit initiative encouraging philanthropy among college students by raising awareness and funds to build and support educational infrastructure for vulnerable children affected by poverty and HIV/AIDS in sub-Saharan Africa. Archbishop Desmond Tutu serves as  Building Tomorrow's honorary chairperson.

Building Tomorrow Executive Director George Srour will talk with concert-goers, and the event will feature educational booths for HIV/AIDS awareness and volunteer opportunities in the Twin Cities area. Through the efforts of events like "The Big Event, organizers say that American college students will witness the impact of their actions and gain a greater understanding of a commitment to global change.

According to the Building Tomorrow organization,  42 million children in sub-Saharan Africa have no school to attend.  In Uganda, only 18 percent of children have the opportunity to continue to secondary education, and more than 1.1 million children  are classified as orphans or vulnerable children are not enrolled in primary school.  Building Tomorrow searches for and purchases a plot of land within close proximity of potential students.  With the help of the local community,the group constructs an eight-room school with a kitchen, toilets and soccer field.

Building Tomorrow opened its first school, Meeting Point Kampala, in April 2006 with money collected by college students in the fall of 2004.  Since then, the initiative has grown with more than 450 students participating in activities sponsored by nearly 10 university chapters across the country.

The talks will be held in Room 271 of Centennial Science Hall. The viewings take place on the 3 rd floor outside deck of the same building; viewings typically run until 10 p.m. and please dress for the weather.

Chancellor Don Betz welcomed the group. " We are recognizing those among us who this year have earned our highest adulation and respect," said Betz. "Their recognition is really reflective of a life of contributions, rather than it is just of a year. We are honoring those who model the way for others through their power of example. They model how we play this every day and how we help those around us."

Charlie Hurt, provost and vice chancellor for academic affairs, recognized Kelly Cain, professor of plant and earth science, as Advisor of the Year and Nate Splett, professor of agricultural economics, as Distinguished Teacher.

At UW-RF, Woolsey advises university departments on creating and maintaining web pages and maintains the University's top-level web pages. Woolsey has been active in the community as a member of the United Way Olmsted County, the River Falls Utility Commission, and River Falls Cable Television Advisory Committee. In addition, he has served as an interim city council member for District 1. A River Falls resident, he is married and has two children.

Matt Fitzgerald is a 1989 graduate of Hudson High School and a 1996 graduate of UW-RF. He worked in a technical capacity for a financial printing company before being hired at UW-RF in information technology for the career services office. Fitzgerald manages the "Hire A Falcon" online job service and the "Mentor Network" system and has presented workshops on career-related topics for students.

He is an alderman for District 4 in River Falls and is a member of the River Falls Park Board, the Housing Coordination Team and the Cooperative Boundary Commission. Recently he completed the River Falls Chamber of Commerce "Leadership River Falls" program. On campus, Fitzgerald is an advisor to the racquetball club. He is also a volunteer webmaster for the Wisconsin Racquetball Association. He has also served on the board of the St. Croix Valley Employers Association and a member of the Wisconsin Association of Colleges and Employers, which awarded him with its President's Award for Excellence. He lives in River Falls and is married with one child.

Dale Braun has a long association with UW-RF; he also received the Chancellor's Award for Students for helping to install the first campus-wide computer network. A graduate of Osceola High School, he started as an undergraduate in 1979 and worked in various capacities as a resident assistant, in the computer center, and as an educational services assistant. He graduated with honors in 1988, taking a double-major in history and geography, and subsequently beginning employment as the campus planner.

Over the years, Braun has been involved in the planning and budgeting phase of many building projects on campus, including the remodeling of South Hall, remodeling and addition of the Chalmer Davee Library, construction of the Wyman Education Building, the CHILD Center and George R. Field South Fork Suites, as well as the Hunt/Knowles locker room addition. Currently he is involved with the new student union, set to open in 2007, and in the planning stages for the new Dairy Learning Center.

In the mid 1990s, Braun was the project director of Collaboration Across Campus, a program established through a federal grant that utilized the campus as a learning laboratory for students in various disciplines who were interested in design and space projects.

Cain teaches undergraduate and graduate courses at UW-River Falls and manages community service projects in sustainability-based planning and management. His work in international projects ranges from China and Trinidad to Bolivia and Nicaragua, and currently he has embarked on a sabbatical during the 2006-07 school year, working on sustainability issues in China for fall semester and South America during spring semester.

Splett's experience combines teaching and research with experience in agri-business and the public schools. He was a vocational agriculture instructor in the Barron and Turtle Lake (Wis.) high schools, a loan officer for Production Credit Association, a supervisor for the Farm Credit Administration, has served as a consultant to agriculture-oriented financial institutions, and taught economics at UW-Stout.

Splett has received several grants from the USDA and the Wisconsin Humanities Council for a documentary film on farms. His scholarly and research articles have been published in numerous industry journals.

Splett holds a Ph.D. in agricultural economics from the University of Illinois at Urbana-Champaign. He also farms in Barron and Chippewa counties. A native of Barron County, Splett lives in Bloomer with his wife.

Anderson Performance Improvement helps companies plan and implement creative, innovative solutions that accelerate business performance. Anderson founded the company and is author of "Cream of the Corp.--An Ingenious Way to Get People Doing Things That Accelerate Profits Now."

WOW is designed to give students the opportunity to meet other new students, connect with upper class group leaders, and get to know the University, while engaging in fun and educational events. This year the event also gives students a chance to get involved in the community, including a door-to-door food drive in River Falls, volunteer work at a Habitat for Humanity home site in Hudson, a Kinnickinnic River clean-up along the South Fork and other "WOW Adventures" on Saturday, Sept. 9.

While classes begin on Sept. 6, Tuesday, Sept. 5 is full of events. Dubbed "Academic Day," students can meet faculty, staff and other students in their major and college. A student involvement fair is at 11 a.m. on the Student Center east end lawn, showcasing various student organizations. From 9 a.m. to 4 p.m. in the Presidents Room, Student Center, commuter and transfer students can attend a welcome-back event. The evening culminates with a free "Big Ole Block Party" featuring games, prizes and singer/songwriter Jason LeVasseur from 5 to 7 p.m. on the west end lawn of the Student Center. LeVasseur's style fuses together numerous influences creating a "charismatic propulsive acoustic pop" sound.

On Saturday, Sept. 9, some 100 new and returning students will embark on a "WOW Adventure," push up their sleeves and get out into the community to work on volunteer projects. The group Campus and Community Fighting Hunger and Homelessness will canvas River Falls neighborhoods collecting non-perishable food donations for the local food shelf.

The UW-RF Earth Consciousness Organization will assist in a community cleanup of the South Fork of the Kinnickinnic River. The campus chapter of the Smiles for Kids organization will lead a craft activity at Gillette Children's Hospital in St. Paul. The group KinniConnections will take an overnight trip to Ontario, Wis., to help with clean-up and trails and prairie restoration at Wildcat State Park. Meal and camping gear will be provided to the volunteers.

The first week of WOW events culminates with renowned singer/songwriter Shevy Smith, who will perform Saturday, Sept. 9 at 9 p.m. at the Wall Amphitheatre. Growing up on a farm in Kansas, Smith began playing the piano at age 4 and picked up the guitar at 14. Her songs are based upon first-hand experience and laden with emotion and imagery for the listener.

Bringing students, staff and community members together, the Symphony Orchestra provides a rich tapestry that benefits all musically and personally with the common goal of musical growth, says Tjornehoj.

"We are immersed in a visually-mediated atmosphere, continuously besieged by globally disseminated gender-based images  that serve as food for aesthetic contemplation or as anesthetization," says Smith-Shank, who is author of the book "Semiotics and Visual Culture: Sights, Signs, and Significance" (2004).

"While these images may offer liberation, they can also host a plague of fantasies, not necessarily a bad thing. Some of the most potent visual signifiers crossing cultures and centuries are ones that portray woman as the goddess or witch; as maiden, mother, or crone; and as an object of desire or fear," says Shank, in addition to depictions of temptress, nurturer, warrior, and destroyer or sexuality including asexual, heterosexual, bi-sexual, and lesbian.

"Many contemporary artists and designers working within a feminist tradition have built on the concept of desire and/or repulsion connected with these images of woman/witch/goddess," maintains Smith-Shank.

Visual artist and storyteller Beverly Cottman has researched the oral traditions of African and African-American cultures and learned stories from all over the world. One of the artists with work in the exhibit, Cottman's recent visits to Africa have shaped her work in the exhibit; her chair represents a claim to a place in two cultures. Her performance to be presented as part of the exhibit premiered at the Walker Art Center in Minneapolis. Storytelling helps Cottman realize two goals, she says: to bring stories and the inherent values of the oral tradition to a wide audience and to equip people to release the stories inside themselves. She has presented interactive storytelling workshops in school districts throughout the state and at national conferences. She is affiliated with the Multi-Cultural Center of Minneapolis.

The Global Kids program meets once per week over eight-weeks. Classes in Chinese, Spanish or German for elementary school-age children are offered. The fee is $80 for eight weeks plus a $5 materials fee.

Instructors are chosen for the unique blend of teaching and language abilities. Educators note that learning a second language has multiple benefits including enhanced brain development, improved ear for listening, improved cognitive and academic skills, and an improved understanding of the English language. Learning a foreign language helps children develop a global attitude and greater awareness for other cultures as well, according to the course sponsors.

"Of the 6,050 incoming students coming to the University of Wisconsin-River Falls community, among them will be 1,300 new freshmen, so get ready," said Betz. "Welcome back ... to the world we share, the calling to teach, to mentor, to create an atmosphere for learning, and to enrich the power of learning."

"This institution was the only game in town for me," said Richards. "Without UW-River Falls, our city would be another ordinary small burg in west central Wisconsin. With it I think our town is something special."

After an introduction of new faculty and staff and a summary of faculty and student accomplishments, Betz stressed several key initiatives based on the university's newly redefined mission, vision and values in his keynote address. These included retention of first- and second-year students, a commitment to civic engagement and service-learning, globalization and international linkages, sustainability, and leadership.

"Change is really part of our daily lives," says Betz. "It's a dimension of the human condition that has accelerated for all of us in this time of globalization, flattening worlds and the geometric proliferation of choices. The challenge of change multiplies with each crisis, and it often painfully reminds us that not only is no man an island, but neither is any nation or people or state or even a university."

Among the endeavors, Betz outlined the installation of a new Chancellor's Leadership Council; preparations for re-accreditation from the North Central Association Higher Learning Commission; a new First-year Experience/Students in Transition office; creation of a leadership institute on campus; strengthening of the new Center for Interdisciplinary Study, founded by an alumna gift to the university; and the start of a new committee to explore, promote and strengthen sustainability efforts on campus.

He also stressed smart growth on campus as directed by the UW System. "We are fortunate in that UW-River Falls is strategically placed geographically to maximize that enrollment growth potential," he said. Betz also pointed out that the UW-River Falls Foundation had a banner year with alumni support at an all-time high.

"By what we say and what we do, what we think and what we value, by what we embrace and what we reject, we shape and define our lives and our communities. Much of that influence will be actualized in the thoughts and deeds of those students. As a university, a community of scholars, teachers and learners, it is our expressed intention that we create each day the optimum possibility for personal growth and a sense of social responsibility ... and it is equally imperative and intentional that we do this together.

Photo, above: Chancellor Don Betz and Provost Charles Hurt greeted faculty and staff this morning at the all-campus hospitality hour on the Student Center mall prior to the opening-day program in Abbott Concert Hall. The event kicked off the new academic year as faculty and staff prepare for the first day of classes on Wednesday, Sept. 6.

This is the 7th year of the WBA educational grant program, which has awarded a total of more than $68,500 for equipment, hardware of software used in teaching broadcast education programs. UW-RF has received grants for four of the seven years since the grant program's inception.

During the meetings, the students participated in a dairy quiz bowl among dairy clubs, business meetings, various competitions including the Undergraduate Paper Competitions, and a "Leaders in Training" career symposium where students participated in a job fair in the exhibit hall. In addition, an awards luncheon included ADSA pioneers who visited with the students about important events in the history of the organization and the industry. Students also attended symposia, oral sessions and poster sessions presented by professional members of the organizations.

ADSA was established in 1906 as a scientific and educational association to serve the dairy and dairy-related industries. It facilitates the discovery, application and dissemination of dairy science knowledge and information.

The course is designed for regular classroom teachers, administrators, guidance personnel, school psychologists and other educators who wish to become acquainted with issues specific to learning disabilities.

Upcoming seminars include an exploration of the value relevance of foreign currency on Oct. 13; decision-making factors in failing projects on Nov. 3; organizational challenges in launching new products on Nov. 17; and economics literacy in high schools on Dec. 1.

All seminars are free, open to the public and designed for students, educators, business people and community leaders. A refreshment and social time precedes each seminar at 3 p.m. in Room 317, South Hall.

The mission of the CER is to assist and encourage research that supports the mission of the UW-RF College of Business and Economics as well as other colleges within the university. The center also provides a Web-based outlet for research efforts at www.uwrf.edu/cer .

The matinee was added after the production's opening night performance before a near sellout audience Aug. 4 was cancelled due to an almost 24-hour power failure on campus last Friday and Saturday, according to Robin Murray, SCVST managing director. The power outage affected a large portion of the UW-River Falls campus, including the fine arts building.

The popular Chiefs Experience will be back this year. An obstacle course, a precision course, as well as a field goal chip shot and catching stations will all be part of the fun. Participants will receive a report card rating their performance.

Fans will also have an opportunity to get autographs and take pictures of their favorite players and coaches. The autograph session will be from 6:30 to 6:50 p.m. on the main Ramer practice field. Fans will then be able to watch the Chiefs offensive and defensive units practice from 7 to 8:30 p.m.

Family Fun Night is a special way for the Kansas City Chiefs organization to say "thank you" to fans, the community and UW-River Falls for the support and help given while they make the campus their summer three-week home.

With music by Alan Menken and lyrics by Howard Ashmann and Tim Rice, the musical stage version is still playing to sold-out audiences on Broadway. The show is based on the Academy Award-winning animated feature written by Menken and Ashmann, the team responsible for "Little Shop of Horrors." Lyricist Rice has written lyrics for "Aladdin," and "Aida."

"Disney's Beauty and the Beast" unfolds in a small French provincial town where the lovely Belle lives with her father, Maurice, a doddering inventor. When her father disappears after attending a local fair, Belle sets off to find him. She discovers he is being held captive by a horrible Beast in an old castle. She trades her freedom for his, and "a tale as old as time" unfolds.

How Belle tames the ill-fated Beast and his ultimate transformation into a handsome Prince is a heart-rending and poignant story for audiences of all ages, with unforgettable characters, comedy galore, and memorable songs, including "Be Our Guest," "No Matter What," "Human Again," and the title song, "Beauty and the Beast."

Music director Linda Ruth Short has supervised musical direction this summer for both "Forever Plaid" and "Sisters of Swing." She teaches speech communication at UW-RF, but has four decades of experience performing opera, arts songs, gospel concerts and recitals. She has a vocal performance degree from Luther College with further studies at the Peabody Conservatory of Music. Choreographer Denise Baker (Hudson) is in her fifth season with SCVST. She choreographed "Sisters of Swing" this season. Her previous credits as an SCVST choreographer include "Pirates of Penzance" and "State Fair." Scenic design is by John Dalziel, an assistant professor of theater at Alma (Michigan) College, lighting by Michael Burgoyne, costume coordination by Deb Murphy and sound design by Jason Unseth.

The story of the siblings' lives and loves, coupled with their unforgettable music, unfolds in the musical conceived and written by Twin Cities playwrights Beth Gilleland and Bob Beverage. The play is based on a concept by Ron Peluso, and with music arrangements by Raymond Berg. The musical originally premiered at St. Paul's Great American History Theatre.

During their heyday, the Andrews Sisters, who were born in Minneapolis, were the most profitable stage attraction in the country, earning an estimated $20,000 per week. They appeared in 17 Hollywood films and had their own radio show. Their recording achievements are legendary: nine gold records, more than 700 recorded songs, more than 100 songs on the Billboard 100 charts, and becoming the first female group to have a record go platinum. Noted for their distinctive brand of harmony and rhythm, they had more songs in the top 10 charts than Elvis or the Beatles.

"I was pleased to welcome Secretary Heinemann to our campus," said Betz. "She was most complimentary about the university. We discussed the entrepreneurial opportunities in this region and the impact of UW-River Falls and its graduates on the dynamism and vitality of western Wisconsin."

The group talked about the St. Croix Valley Angel Network because Heinemann a deep interest in angel financing and her role in the state network, said DeWald. "She's very interested in the forms and methods we developed based on the Kauffman Foundation's screening checklists. We also discussed the SBDC's role in helping entrepreneurs and new businesses get started, move along and obtain financing.

"She also was particularly intrigued that we were able to use one of our master's of management students, Fred Pierce, who is also a UW-RF employee, to develop a marketing plan for one of SBDC's clients," said DeWald. "She found it unique that one of the things we do at SBDC is try to involve both UW-RF students and faculty in the business development area outside of campus."

Edwards was named the team's 10 th head coach on Jan. 9. "We selected Herm Edwards because he is without question one of the most qualified head football coaches in the NFL today," said Chiefs President Carl Peterson. "Herm knows what the National Football League is all about. He coaches all aspects of the game and he coaches them well. He is a man of integrity, family and great passion for the game of football."

The FFA operates on local, state and national levels. Student members belong to chapters organized at the local school level. Agricultural education instructors serve as chapter advisors. Chapters are organized under state associations headed by an advisor and executive secretary, often employees of the state department of education. States conduct programs and host annual conventions. Founded in 1928, the former "Future Farmers of America" brought together students, teachers and agribusiness to solidify support for agricultural education. The Wisconsin FFA Association was founded in 1929.

The 1950s-themed favorite--"dedicated to the 'good guys'... who wheeled the projector carts for the AV Club"--tells the story of the last earthly performance and one-and-only recording of a harmonious crooner quartet.

The award was established in honor of Bob Sievert of New Richmond, who served as director of university centers for a number of years until his retirement in 2005. The new annual award is given to one student who goes above and beyond, exemplifying good customer service.

"Sarah's nomination stood out from the others because of the variety of tasks Sarah has done in the Student Center and because they are always done at the highest level," said Michael Stifter, director of student life facilities. "Her attitude and work ethic are exemplary.

His sculpture, "New Immigrant," was honored with the top award. The seven-foot collection of some 40 nylon shopping bags includes images of homes lost to urbanization and progress. The collaged and painted images on the disposable bags reference urban dwellers' "struggle to find and hang on to shelters and personal space," according to an entry in the exhibition guest book.

Another comment stated that the work "symbolizes life faced by the new immigrant - the overwhelming struggle and challenge of language, jobs, education, home ... and fitting in socially. Once again, the shopping bag is a way of life, a means of transporting - a way of carrying one's belongings, culture, experience and identity from the old country to a new land of hope and dreams."       Three of Mak's other works in the show, "Immigrants & Shelters," "Shadow Dancing 1 - Red Light" and "Shadow Dancing 2 - 3 of Us," received the Special Recognition Merit Award.

"In "Immigrants & Shelter" the concept of inhabitants, secure placement and orderly arrangements is colorfully displayed," said Bradshaw. In his work "New Immigrant" the message is striking because of the size and the use of the United States passport image and ticket. The red, white and blue bag reinforces the idea. ... his work in this show connects with the notion of moving from place to place."

In "Love Letters," playwright Gurney traces the lifelong yet bittersweet relationship between the serious dutiful lawyer, Andrew Makepeace Ladd, III, (played by Michael Norman) and the energetic, unpredictable artist Melissa Gardner (played by Sandee Blakeley). In this unique play the pair reads from the letters they've written to one another over five decades. The story unfolds from what is written, and what is left unsaid, in those letters.

This summer, seven students are completing the first-year fellowship program, called Falcon Fellows. "The program started last spring, and we participated in the in the American Reads program, as well as tutored at the elementary and junior high schools in River Falls," said Lloyd. "We partnered with River Falls Public Library to put on three reading programs--Boxcar Children, Dr. Seuss's Birthday, and Reading around the World. These events were pretty well attended by the community."

This year's grant allows the Falcon Fellows program to expand to host five or six reading events with the River Falls library. The program is also now composed of two groups, including first-year students who will work with the reading program, and sophomores, juniors and seniors who will work with the Upward Bound program and precollege camps at UW-RF.

"Our division's prolific grant funding is unlike anything I have ever seen outside the faculty ranks," said Blake Fry, dean for student development and campus diversity.       Committed to integrating education with civic engagement among campuses across the Midwest, The M3C Fellows Program is a nine-state initiative led by the Wisconsin Campus Compact.

The M3C Fellows Program is an AmeriCorps Education Award Program. Students who are involved in this program will receive an education award to use toward tuition, loan payments, etc. in return for community service. The program seeks to foster a deep appreciation and understanding of democratic values and citizenship among participants, and nurture the knowledge, skills, attitudes, and behaviors that lead to a lifelong commitment to active community and civic engagement.

Students who receive the scholarships are working on projects such as tutoring elementary, middle school and high school students in reading, mathematics and other subjects; building Habitat for Humanity homes; working with Boys' and Girls' clubs and Big Brothers/Big Sisters; or working at humane societies or volunteering at healthcare organizations among other activities.

After graduation, Zweifel worked for noted horseman Jack Brainard and then apprenticed with the NRHA Two Million Dollar Rider and Hall of Fame member Tim McQuay. While working for Brainard, Zweifel met Pietro Artinghelli and return with him to his home country of Italy. There Zweifel and Artinghelli work for Roberto Cuoghi at Impresa Agricola Cuoghi, a facility that has consistently bred, raise and/or trained winning horses.

Earning more than 50,000 Euros riding Master Snapper in Europe, Zweifel and Cuoghi felt it was time to enter the horse in U.S. competitions.  There were other firsts as well. "This was the first time they every saw me show in person," said Zweifel of her parents and family who watched the victory, greeted by a standing ovation. "It was really super special that my family was there to see it."

Each spring, WSPA recognizes one school psychologist in the state who has been recommended by colleagues for his/her efforts and excellence in their professional practice. The award is presented to the candidate who demonstrates exceptional dedication, proficiency and leadership in their work with children and colleagues.

Cullen described Houston as an exemplary school psychologist who is always willing to go the extra mile to assist students. As school psychologist, Houston has been instrumental in the development of several projects including all-day kindergarten, Brener Buddies, a mentoring program for students at Olga Brener Elementary School, and a parent group at Brener Elementary. In addition, he serves on several district-wide committees and is a vital resource to staff, students and parents, according to the WSPA.

The program would be geared for those seeking to enter or advance in those fields, practitioners who need to brush up on skills used in these careers, or professionals seeking to refocus career skills from another field. The program could be designed as a credit course or as a non-credit offering.

Participants will gain an appreciation of the aesthetic, economic, social, and environmental qualities of various residential development approaches and an understanding of the variety of development options available today.

The class will meet weekdays and one Saturday from 8 a.m. to 5 p.m. and is geared to students, professionals and interested members of the public. Noncredit participants will pay $280 for the class. Students who want undergraduate credit will pay applicable tuition and campus fees.

"Dr. Coombs was the unanimous recommendation of the Provost Search Committee," said College President Joseph G. Burke. "Throughout her distinguished career, she has championed a wide variety of programs that enhanced academic quality and faculty development. I am confident that she will be a great academic leader here at Keuka College."

"I am honored by the appointment as provost and vice president for academic affairs," said Coombs. "Keuka's mission of educational access addresses the commitment to serve all learners and is vital to higher education goals in the 21st century."

Coombs is chair of the American Conference of Academic Deans and a member of the Association of American Colleges and Universities Board of Directors. She has delivered numerous presentations on student learning and professional development, and is the author of several professional articles.

"Dan brings a wealth of higher education experience to this position. He is well-known among his colleagues in the UW System and, being a graduate of UW-River Falls, is also well known on this campus."

He spent several years with UW-Madison Learning Innovations, where he was associate director of student services. Vande Yacht also was employed for three years at the Milwaukee School of Engineering, serving as an undergraduate and graduate admissions counselor and then registrar.

At UW-RF, he earned a bachelor's degree in secondary education. While pursuing an M.S.E. in supervision and instructional leadership, he also spent two years as an assistant coach for the Falcon football team.

As registrar, Vande Yacht will be responsible for expanding online services, enrollment strategies, registration, and graduation clearance as well as managing student records, supervising registration, generating course schedules and supervising eligibility certification for intercollegiate athletes.

These estrogens are found in the environment in the waste stream from discarded CDs, eyeglass lenses, shampoo bottles, helmets and food cans. Scudder is continuing to apply her research to investigate whether this model affects other species, including humans.

Jodie Deshler, UW-RF biology department lab manager, says that Kendra is very passionate about her work. "She would bring the worms home with her on the weekends to observe, or even come into the lab on weekends," said Deshler. "She was very dedicated."

The national Council On Undergraduate Research (CUR) hosted the annual undergraduate poster session on Capitol Hill April 25. Sixty competitively selected student posters were displayed in the Capitol rotunda and a late afternoon reception brought the researchers together with their respective legislators.

Participants attended an orientation session on the morning of April 25 and also, with their faculty mentors, visited the offices of their representatives and senators. Their visits will help members of Congress understand the importance of undergraduate research by talking directly with the students.

Bill Campbell, director of grants and research at UW-RF, said Scudder is an exceptional student. " Two years ago, she thought of a way to analyze the causes of estrogen-induced sexual abnormalities, using laboratory worms, and she has been pursuing it ever since.  Her results are both impressive and scary. She has a very bright future."

The UW System has helped her with her research that she has been working on for the past two years. The grant awarded her $2,000 for salary and benefits and an additional $150 to cover supplies, expenses and travel.

"I am truly proud of Kendra's selection to participate in the national 'Posters on the Hill,'" said Chancellor Don Betz. "She will represent with distinction the clear commitment that UW-River Falls has made to undergraduate research. She and her colleagues carried the UW-River Falls banner for research to Madison as well for the 'Posters on the Rotunda.' I believe that this type of learning will become a preferred mode for many students and faculty in the near future. Bravo for Kendra and her faculty mentors."

One continuing project is the new student union building, which is scheduled to open in January 2007. Projects this summer include the construction of the parking lot and landscape/site details. "The contractors and consultants have been excellent to work with, and the finished building will significantly enhance the built environment of the campus," said Waldo Hagen, director of facilities management at UW-RF.

South Hall, the oldest building on campus, is scheduled to have the north, east and west exterior doors replaced. In addition, areas on the north side of the building next to the foundation, which dates to 1876, need to be excavated. The foundation in those areas will be repaired, and drain tile will be installed to prevent further water problems from heavy rainfall. The area will then be re-landscaped.

The siding of the penthouse of the Agricultural Science building will be replaced. This fall activity will begin for the $9.3 million Dairy Learning Center, recently approved by the UW System Board of Regents.

Some residence halls will get a face-lift, including replacing hardware, remodeling bathrooms, replacing doors, installing new electrical devices, insulating pipes, and installing new carpet and lighting among other regular remodeling and repair projects. In addition, many student rooms will be painted, and some kitchens will be remodeled.

"It's your chance to 'kick the tires,' so to speak, on business plan development to satisfy your entrepreneurial urge," says Steve DeWald director of the UW-RF SBDC. The workshop is also geared toward small business owners who are thinking of a business expansion.

The workshop will address questions such as: Will your business idea work? Is it a good investment for your life savings? Should you take the next step? Do you want to participate in the American dream of owning a small business?

In a setting rich with history at Dalkeith Palace in Edinburgh, Scotland, the Chancellor's Global Leadership Colloquium will provide an overview of the theories related to and skills necessary for the practice of effective leadership from a global perspective. Leadership is explored as an integral component of any student's career and life plan.

The international setting will provide students with an immersion in another culture while being introduced to leadership theory in order to enhance skills and discover passion for global and cultural change. The course provides a cross-cultural framework for understanding effective leadership and developing a long-term, personal leadership philosophy.

"The course promises to be a unique opportunity to understand and address some of the major global issues with classmates in the context of effective leadership principles," says Betz. "I look forward to working with students truly interested in advancing their leadership capacities by addressing actual world problems and collaborating to find solutions. We will also explore the issues confronting Scotland and learn about its peoples and their world views."

The cost of the trip is approximately $2,950 for travel, room and board plus the tuition for three undergraduate or graduate credits. Students will have the opportunity to explore Scotland as well through such activities as back-packing in the Highlands, discovering the city life of Edinburgh and attending the region's cultural events.

"This course will guide students and get them to define what leadership is themselves," says Turner. "It is cool because this experience will help students start at a big picture and see how they fit in a global setting and hopefully bring that perspective back to River Falls. It opens their eyes to the culture and even themselves. We hope to continue offering this course each summer."

"Sandy has worked in several areas of enrollment services during her career," said Alan. In addition to financial aid, she has been involved in student records and advising, and information systems management. Her technical expertise will be a valuable addition to the University ."

At UW-RF she'll oversee a staff of seven and will be responsible for all policies and practices that support service excellence for students and families throughout the enrollment cycle. She will also have a role in advising parents, students and educators on higher education financing as well as ensure compliance with all federal and state financial aid regulations including institutional scholarship and grant programs, federal grants and need-based loans, federal and institutional work study, and all supplemental loan programs. Moreover, her duties include emphasizing the placement of financial aid and enrollment services on-line.

At CSU, Oftedahl's responsibilities included directing financial aid activities, directing enrollment management information systems, and managing such academic services system as the Degree Audit Reporting System and other technology systems.

Hampton and Casey have also been recognized for their research on sexual harassment in organization settings as winners of the Psi Chi Midwest Regional Award given by the Midwestern Psychological Association. The pairs' work was showcased in a special paper session for Psi Chi award winners. Hampton also gave a presentation on their research findings and was presented with a certificate and a check for $300 at the award ceremony in Chicago.

The McNair program supports promising, academically talented student from populations that have been historically underrepresented in higher education, including low-income, first-generation, and minority college students. The program seeks to increase students' confidence and support undergraduate research to better prepare the scholars for graduate study.

Lawrence-Porter also praised the pair's faculty mentors. "The work the psychology department does with its majors is obvious in the quality and caliber of each McNair Scholar we have had from that department. I believe a lot of what O'Neal and Maureen have achieved is due to the systems and structures put in place by the department to assist their graduates in getting to the graduate level and in introducing them to the various aspects of the profession, which they seek to enter."

The UW-River Falls outreach and graduate studies office and the health and human performance department is sponsoring the conference and workshops, which are tailored for elementary and secondary physical education and health education professionals.

The keynote speaker for the conference on July 26 is Rick Schupbach from the PE4Life Institute in Grundy Center, Iowa. He will present "The Way It Should Be: Health and Physical Education in the 21st Century" and discuss how a nationally recognized physical education program has expanded beyond the classroom to energize and educate its students as well as the greater community. In addition, morning and afternoon breakout sessions will offer tracks specific to elementary, secondary and health education areas. The conference fee for July 26 is $60 with a $10 discount for WAHPERD members.

Two pre-conference workshops focus on timely topics associated with physical education and health education. On July 24, Karen Kedrowski and Monica Owsicheki of the Wisconsin Department of Public Instruction will present a workshop on 21 st century nutrition education. Fee for July 24 is $60.

"Graduates, we believe that your UW-River Falls education has prepared you well to seek your future, guided by the power of gratitude, the power of encouragement, and the power of service," said Betz. "We trust that, just as you have had excellent roles models in family, friends, faculty and staff, you now will 'model the way,' as positive and powerful examples for others. We wish you every success in the years ahead."

Barbara Werner, professor speech communication and chair of the Faculty Senate, along with graduate and outgoing Student Senate President Nicholas Cluppert. offered congratulatory messages to the cohort.

"My fellow graduates, this is a day measured and honored with success. The road to success is not without obstacles and is often paved with difficult choices. Only by perseverance do we as human beings move into a real filled with hope and inspiration. ... I hope that when all the layers are peeled off that the core of your inner being is compassion. That is what the future of our world needs."

O'Hern also noted that education is a lifelong journey. "Few would argue that graduation is the end of academic growth and emotional development. It is vested with new insight so future endeavors can be accomplished ... When one journey ends, another begins."

Dodge spoke about the relationships built as a collegian. "The people that we met in college have had a significant influence on the transformation from the person we were on day one to the person we are today. It may be as simple as that friends who made you stop and look at how beautiful the trees are or as significant as finding the one person you couldn't imagine your life without."

Dodge also spoke about a blossoming worldview. "Never did I think I'd have friends from Japan next to me in class. ... We are half a world apart and yet connecting on so many levels. Never did I think sitting next to me would be an incredible friend, a student, and a soldier. ... They have fought in a war worlds away and now they are sharing notes with me. These are the people who impact our lives every day we have been here.

"This university is the way it is because of the incredible people who give themselves wholeheartedly to the cause of education and the college experience. ... This university has been our home away from home. These people have been part of our family."

The Western Wisconsin Intergovernmental Collaborative, the product of a year's discussion, seeks to be a resource to local governments as they cope with change and growth as the Twin Cities continue to spill into west-central Wisconsin.

The organization arose following a series of five forums in the three-county area that were hosted by the University of Wisconsin-River Falls in 2004-05. Facilitated by the university, more than 100 issues related to rural-to-urban transitions were described by local residents and government leaders.

Among them were economic development opportunities, transportation, land-use planning, waste-water and storm-water pollution, leadership development and finding ways to ensure new residents are encouraged to become contributing members of their communities.

"This new collaborative will provide a network for communities to share information on the problems they are confronting and the best practices to solve them," said Buck Malick, chair of the St. Croix County Board and one of four interim board members. "The time is ripe for an organization like this, since it will allow us to consider a regional perspective as we address issues that are common to all of our jurisdictions."

According to Johnson, the impetus to create the collaborative came from a meeting at UW-River Falls last year. At that session, representatives from some 30 town, village, city and county governments unanimously agreed to form the organization.

"The forums throughout the three counties were an eye-opener for everyone involved," Johnson said. "Residents in each community thought their issues were unique to them. But they weren't alone in the problems they faced, or their desire to find the best way to resolve them. The issues confronting local government are the same for Pierce County, or Osceola, or Amery, or the Town of St. Joseph.

Since that discussion, the communities have been meeting on a quarterly basis to share information. Meetings are now held at the Wisconsin Indianhead Technical College New Richmond campus. Among the topics explored have been an extensive overview of population demographic changes, industry cluster development, Smart Growth , the impact of methamphetamines and the implications of the planned Stillwater bridge on transportation corridors in the three-county area.

Soltis said the next steps will be to recruit more jurisdictions to participate in the collaborative and to elect a formal governing board. Collaborative bylaws allow for the election of either the chief elected officer of a jurisdiction or a key administrator.

"We're excited by the opportunity to assist local governments by drafting model ordinances, offering workshops and developing seminars and educational programs that can help local leaders adopt the best practices as they lead their communities forward," said Chancellor Don Betz.

"We'll bring our faculty and staff expertise to this process, and we'll provide hands-on learning experiences for our students, too. UW-River Falls will work with our partners in UW-Extension and other agencies and organizations to identify those with the best knowledge to effectively serve as resources to WWIC," Betz said.

Potentially providing some of the economic support for the collaborative is mitigation funding arising from the planned Stillwater bridge. Resources are expected to soon be available to WWIC and UW-RF to assist in workshops and forums, the WWIC board members said.

"A clear demonstration of UW-River Falls' attraction is that good people come here and stay," said Betz. "These honorees have served up to 40 years and have directly contributed to the spirit of community that is a characteristic of this university. We honor them for their loyalty and their appreciated work."

Splett, agricultural economics professor and interim dean of the College of Agriculture, Food and Animal Science. Splett teaches introductory agricultural economics, advanced microeconomic theory, agricultural law, farm management and horticultural management. Along with teaching, he has received several agricultural grants and his research has been published in journals including Agribusiness, Agriculture Financial Review, Journal of Dairy Science and others. Splett was also awarded Advisor of the Year in 2005.

Commencement speakers are from the student body. Selected to address their peers, professors and guests at the ceremonies are: Michelle Dodge, from Trego, Wis., majoring in speech communication with a professional/organizational communication emphasis and a minor in public relations, and Thomas O'Hern, of Maplewood, Minn., a science in education graduate student.

Boehm, a 1969 graduate of UW-River Falls, is senior vice president and president of manufacturing at Cinncinnati-based Kroger Cos. After graduating from UW-River Falls with a bachelor's degree in agricultural economics, he attended Purdue University where he earned both his masters' and doctorate in agricultural economics. Boehm has a longstanding involvement with the National FFA organization and Alpha Gamma Rho Fraternity, which have recognized him for his contributions to agriculture and the food industry.

Babbitt, a 1942 graduate of UW-River Falls, was an international pioneer in pediatric radiology. He received his M.D. degree from the Marquette University School of Medicine in 1946 and held professorships at the Medical College of Wisconsin and the University of Wisconsin-Madison. Dr. Babbitt's research was instrumental in the discovery of pancreaticobiliary maljunction, a disease of the pancreas, and he was known as the world's leading expert in this area. He was committed to providing children with excellent medical care regardless of health insurance status. Babbitt's wife, Dr. Katherine Babbitt, will accept the award on his behalf.

Splett holds a B.S. in agricultural education and an M.S. in agricultural economics from UW-River Falls as well as a Ph.D. in agricultural economics from the University of Illinois at Urbana-Champaign. He was a research assistant and fellow at UI and has also been a visiting lecturer at the Academy of National Economy in Moscow, Russia.

Prior to teaching at UW-River Falls, Splett was a vocational agriculture instructor in the Barron and Turtle Lake high schools, a loan officer for Production Credit Association and a supervisor for the Farm Credit Administration. He has also served as a consultant to agriculture-oriented financial institutions and taught at UW-Stout.

Splett teaches introductory agricultural economics, advanced microeconomic theory, agricultural accounting, agricultural law, farm management and horticulture management at UW-River Falls. Splett received the Advisor of the Year Award in 2005.

In addition to teaching, Splett has received several agricultural grants and his research articles have been published in journals including Agribusiness, Agriculture Financial Review, Journal of Dairy Science and others.

Since that time, Onan has been known for his significant contributions to the college, university and community. Besides his duties as an associate professor of animal science, Onan coaches the UW-RF livestock and meat animal evaluation teams. He is an assistant coach for the Pierce County Livestock Judging Team, which won the state 4-H contest in 2005. Onan is also the advisor for the UW-RF Association of Women in Agriculture.

Two pieces were selected by the UW-RF administration for purchase and will be entered in the University's permanent collection. Ginny Coombs, provost and vice chancellor of academic affairs, presented the awards.

Cassandra Torhorst, a senior from Oregon, Wis. majoring in animal science, will be working with animal science Professor Gary Onan to analyze the relationship between lysine, backfat depth and fertility of the University Lab Farm sows. Matt Rahmlow, a senior from Mishicot, Wis. majoring in agricultural business, will be working with Professor Stan Schraufnagel and Farm Operations Director Bill Connolly to develop a record-keeping system for the swine enterprise on the University Lab Farm that addresses the unique issues the farm faces as both a teaching facility and a business.

Honor Societies and has more than 75,000 members worldwide. Undergraduates must be in the upper one-third of their class and have completed at least three semesters of full-time college work and three semester courses in physics to be considered for membership. Students who are not physics majors may be members, but must have a demonstrated interest in the field of physics. Inductees receive membership for life.

"As life-long members of Sigma Pi Sigma these students will remain connected to the physics community no matter what career path they might follow," says Earl Blodgett, professor of physics and UW-RF alumnus.

OMC gave the University a gravity table, which is used for sorting seeds and grain for cleaning. The most recent equipment addition to UW-RF, the gravity table, sorts the good seeds from the bad based on the seeds density. The lighter seeds are discarded because they have been found to produce less well as the heavier seeds.

Kamal Adam, UW-RF agricultural engineering professor, helped in orchestrating the donation. While teaching at Iowa State University, Adam was head of seed conditioning. He would conduct on-site training with Oliver Manufacturing Co. equipment to teach students and industry people how to use seed and graining cleaning machinery.

The knowledge students gain through the use of the gravity table will open up numerous doors once they graduate. He also hopes to establish a training program so others involved in the seed and grain industry are able to learn the proper techniques of the gravity table.

Matthew Vonk, professor of physics, said it took four months for the entire process--to write and apply for the grant. The odds arent in his favor; he says that only one out of every seven people who apply typically get a grant approved.

Vonks grant goals are to purchase state-of-the art equipment that will give students computer recorded measurements and provide students with hands-on experience working with robotics. Vonk's grant takes effect July 1 and runs for two years.

NSF also funds equipment that is needed by scientists and engineers but is often too expensive for any one group or researcher to afford. Examples of such major research equipment include giant optical and radio telescopes, Antarctic research sites, high-end computer facilities and ultra-high-speed connections, ships for ocean research, sensitive detectors of very subtle physical phenomena, and gravitational wave observatories.

NSF-funded research is integrated with education to help ensure adequate numbers of skilled people available to work in new and emerging scientific, engineering and technological fields, as well as to ensure capable teachers to educate the next generation.

Individuals or teams must be currently enrolled undergraduates at any two or four-year school within the UW System and an active participant in an original business plan. Teams are encouraged to seek input from faculty, staff and the business community. There is no limit for entries per school or the number of members on a team, however, it is recommended that most teams should have three to five members with varying skills and interests. Teams may also have received limited funding before but it must be disclosed on the entry form.

The business plan format should include an executive summary, business overview, market opportunity, market solution, market analysis, management team, potential risks, financial analysis, social/environmental quantitative impact analysis, proposed exit or harvest strategy and a funding request.

The festival will also feature nature art displays from local artists and a historical presentation of River Falls. As a sponsor of the event, the University of Wisconsin-River Falls will have a tent and exhibits for the public as well.

All are welcome to attend KinniFest to help celebrate, protect and enhance the Kinnickinnic River. For more information please contact festival coordinator Joyce Mattson by sending an email to jycmttsn@yahoo.com.

The golf event will be a handicapped, four-person scramble with a shotgun start at 1 p.m. Prizes will be awarded to the top teams and for course competitions such as longest putt in this 18-hole tournament.

Immediately following the golf tournament will be a reception, silent auction, and dessert auction at the clubhouse. A dinner buffet will be served at 6:30 p.m. Cost for the dinner for non-golfers is $30.

Dinner participants will have the opportunity to bid on a variety of visitors activities in the valley including golf packages, stays at B&Bs and lodging establishments, gift baskets from retailers in communities throughout the valley, clothing, and recreational adventures.

SCVRTA, an all-volunteer organization supported solely through membership dues, grants and fundraising events, serves as an educational resource for the history, culture, and natural resources of the Lower St. Croix National Scenic Riverway. It also works to increase the economic impact of tourism in its service area community through cooperative promotion of the Scenic St. Croix Valley (www.saintcroixriver.com).

Senate President Nicholas Cluppert, who presented the chancellor with a  falcon, carved by local artist Dave Helberg, on behalf of the student body; Academic Staff Representative Sarah Egerstrom, who, on behalf of academic staff, donated a cache of leadership books and literature for a special library collection, and Classified Staff Representative Greg Elliott, who bestowed Betz with a tree to be planted on campus.

While the voyage was cut short because his ship was frozen in and later crushed by the shifting ice of the Weddell Sea, Shackeltons leadership and human acumen saved the lives of the entire crew, which was stranded for more than 500 days in the vast icy reaches of the Antarctic continent.

Shackelton abandoned his lifelong expedition goals and dreams, but not his crew. Using three small lifeboats from his ship, aptly titled Endurance, they made their way to Elephant Island. With scant supplies, crew journals, a banjo and the 23rd Psalm torn from a Bible left behind, Shackelton then led a smaller crew on one boat through nearly 800 miles of the Southern Ocean and the wicked Drake Passage to South Georgia Island where he knew whaling stations would mean certain rescue.

Along the way, peril after peril such as a hurricane and currents leading them off course challenged his unwavering leadership, including a terrifying human toboggan ride down a mountain. When they finally arrived on the inhabited side of South Georgian Island, the filthy leader and his crew were unrecognizable by the head of the islands whaling industry, who had dined with them in inaugural celebration more than a year before. Four attempts later, he saved his entire crew, a few on the remote side of South Georgian Island and the remainder left stranded on Elephant Island.

Shackelton was a renaissance man of sorts, successful at all of his many endeavors. Professor Baughman, who teaches history at the University of Central Oklahoma, noted that he was even more determined to lead after he was said to be unfit for duty after an illness on a prior expedition under fellow explorer Robert F. Scott. But he persevered, Baughman said.

He rewarded them with extra food, held a Christmas celebration months early, and kept personal council with each and every member. Every day, Baughman said, Shackelton had to make decisions regarding life and death.

Subsequently Baughman has made more than 30 trips to Antarctica. He is currently at work on a book about American involvement since 1948 on the southernmost continent that is run by international agreement fostering scientific and ecological tourism collaborations.

Falls. Physics Professors James Madsen and Glenn Spiczak and their students have a long and current involvement with the AMANDA (Antarctic Muon and Neutrino Detector Array) IceCube Project with an international team of academic institutions, scientists, engineers, and technicians on the massive neutrino telescope at the South Pole.

Regan, from Deerfield, was awarded the Rochelle Junkman Seymour Award for top senior academic honors. The award goes to the graduating senior with the highest grade point average within the college. Regan was also awarded the Dr. Earl Hildebrand Memorial Award as outstanding CAFES senior.

During her four years at UW-RF, Regan, a horticulture major, has been an exemplary student being named to the Dean's List every semester. Regan graduates Summa Cum Laude with a perfect 4.0 grade point average and will attend graduate school at North Carolina State University this fall.

"Chris Jumbeck is highly energetic, friendly and personable leader in the field of agriculture," stated Gerald Matteson, former agricultural education instructor at UW-RF. "It has been our experience that outstanding leaders, such as Chris, have a trait in common, and that is she possesses a passion for what they're doing. To Chris it is not a job, but a wonderful experience to become an outstanding high school educator."

Jumbeck virtually took a non-existent department and developed it into one of the best in Wisconsin. While at C-FC she has developed a curriculum of diversity and interest that is testified by the 40 percent of students in the high school who are enrolled in agricultural courses.

C-FC also had the first place Quiz Bowl team, three state proficiency award winners and two national proficiency finalists. Jumbeck has also produced five sectional vice-presidents and two state FFA presidents.

Candidates nominated for this award have made significant contributions and demonstrated a "vision" for long-term growth and success of Wisconsin agriculture. The Wisconsin Distinguished Agriculturalist Award was first presented in 1970.

After arriving in Macomb, the team took first among other four-year universities in the NACTA National Quiz Bowl. A panel of experts read questions that included topics related to molecular biology, genetic engineering, micro and macro economics, business theory, plant propagation, remote sensing technology, crop production, soil fertility, soil edaphology and pedology, applied economic law, fluid and hydrostatic power, reproductive physiology and animal nutrition.

Eckblad, along with 75 youths from the United States, will participate in one year of involvement with the Congress-Bundestag Youth Exchange for Young Professionals in Germany. The goal is for us to become integrated into German society and be diplomatic representatives of the U.S., says Eckblad.

Kinnickinnic River, a major tributary of the St. Croix River, from source to outlet. Features to be explored include springs, river processes, delta formation, and environmental issues related to surface water and groundwater.

Designed for adults, the workshop includes some hiking on level to moderately steep, mostly well-maintained trails, with some crossing of irregular ground in fields and woods. No climbing is required, but there may be some wading in shallow water.

The UW-River Falls Graduate Studies and Outreach Office provides lifelong learners with academic, professional development and enrichment programs that are practical, flexible, convenient and affordable. A complete list of summer and other courses is available by visiting the web site or contacting the outreach office.

Residential developments reflect aesthetic and environmental sensibilities of a regions population as well as economic and social realities of the times, according to Eric Sanden, professor of land use planning at UW-River Falls and workshop instructor.

In an increasingly affluent country, new subdivisions offered affordable housing and easy commuting to cities served by newly established highway networks. Although convenient and efficient, these developments are viewed by some as being homogenous and sprawling. Traditional U.S. neighborhoods were more compact, contained more diverse types of housing, and were pedestrian-friendly.

The residential building boom of recent years has boosted demand for people who understand how to use these tools, says Sanden, who designed the course, Residential Design Options, in response to these needs of students, planners, government officials, land developers and concerned citizens.

The course is open to students, professionals and interested members of the public. Participants will have opportunities to see examples of and examine different approaches to residential development. Noncredit fees for the class are $280, and participants who want undergraduate credit will pay applicable tuition and campus fees.

Studies will host its annual reception honoring meritorious students and scholarship recipients. Awards for outstanding cooperating professionals in the community and outstanding students will be given out. A reception will follow the ceremony.

Food and Environmental Sciences will display collegiate activities on the theme of globalization during inauguration week. The display will showcase the colleges international activities from the past, present and future. The exhibit will also be displayed during the social hour of the annual banquet, at RSCA Day on April 27. Free.

The theme for this years ceremony is Harvesting the Knowledge of the World. The annual banquet is a celebration of academic achievement, the outstanding teacher award, outstanding senior and scholarships. The Distinguished Agriculturist award will also be presented. Tickets for guests and visitors are now on sale for $12; call 715-425-3535 for reservations and more information.

UW-RF Social Work Program Director Ogden Rogers will present his work in developing and implementing a social studies curriculum that educates students about the Geneva Convention and its requirements. His work has been translated into many languages and used around the world. The discussion will also include Humanitarian Law with a presentation by the International Red Cross.

Nest, Hagestad Student Center. Celebrate the research, scholarly and creative activities of UW-RF students, staff and faculty. Almost 100 posters will depict the work of the campus community, including books, abstracts, journal articles, research projects, scripts, monographs, book reviews, grant activities, artwork, academic posters, photographs, choreography and more.

University of Central Oklahoma, will retell the story of Sir Ernest Shackleton and the Heroic Era of Antarctic exploration as a model for leadership in times of great conflict and danger. Shackletons 1914-17 exploration was one of the most amazing adventures of all time and began with the hope of being the first to cross the whole of Antarctica on foot. Baughman studied in the Marie Byrd Land in Antarctica and has published numerous works on the topic of polar history. Free. For more information call the Phipps Center for the Arts at 715-386-2305. A reception follows the presentation.

Betzs address about the future of the University is titled Roots and Wings for the Global Century. He will speak to the inauguration themes of diversity, globalization, and service in the St. Croix Valley.

"The 2006 UW-River Falls Chancellor's Award winners represent some of the finest collegiate talent in the region, said Chancellor Don Betz. Each of the recipients will be graduating secure in the knowledge that they have made valued and lasting contributions to the institution. Collectively, they are bright, committed, accomplished, persistent, collaborative and multi-talented."

The recipients of this award are typically juniors or seniors who are nominated by a faculty or academic staff member or student peers through the Student Senate. A committee that reports directly to the chancellor considers each nominee. After select interviews, the committee provides their recommendations to the chancellor, who makes the final decisions.

Tracey Gladstone-Sovell compliments Cluppert on his dedication. During my 20 years at the University, I have sat on any number of committees with student representatives. I cannot remember a single student on any of those committees who has been more diligent and committed to the work of the committee than Nick, say Gladstone-Sovell.

Hampton has also been an active player on the Falcon Football Team. Hampton has been selected to serve on a committee charged with exploring ways in which more African-American athletes can be attracted to join the football program. He serves as a volunteer coach for the universitys summer football camp and has also worked with the Kansas City Chiefs training camp for the past three summers.

In the nomination form Lawrence-Porter noted that Hamptons character is exemplary. ONeals solid character is evidenced by four major qualities: consistency, dependability, excellence and humility.

Justin Hauer wrote in a nomination form that above all of Jicinskys accomplishments is her greatest asset is her passion towards others. Stephanies greatest asset is her genuine compassion for the well-being of others.

Kulsrud has also held leadership positions in various organizations such as: the Performing Arts Committee, Collegiate Music Educators National Conference, Leadership Programming and Development Board and Commissioned Composer.

Learman has been involved in many on-campus activities including, an aid to the Chancellor and intern/peer advisor in the Office of International Programs and has held many positions through residential life.

Learman has an immense amount of international exposure, including travel to Scotland through the Wisconsin in Scotland program. Currently, Learman serves as the program coordinator of the Wisconsin in Scotland Ambassador Program. Learman is also a participant of the international mission on diplomacy to Eastern and Central Europe and has worked with 4-H Exchange to Japan.

Schenk has been involved with the Hurricane Katrina Relief efforts, participating in the J-Term Destination Gulf Coast relief trip and was also the director of the Adopt-a-Student program. In this program UW-RF faculty, staff and students adopted 48 students from the University of Southern Mississippi and who had been affected by the hurricane.

Turner said in his nomination of Shenk that her greatest strength is within the relationships she builds with others. "Carolyn's greatest strength is her presence on campus and ability to relate to both students and faculty.

Said Chancellor Betz, "Each of this 'magnificent seven' has unique perspective, accomplishments and aspirations. They represent a much larger group of their peers here at UW-River Falls who are also committed to excellence and service, to scholarship and leadership. They truly have earned this honor and we join with their families and friends in celebrating their work."

The contest is open to teams of students around the world, and students choose one of two problems supplied by COMAP to work on. The UW-River Falls team chose a problem related to irrigation. They were asked to design an irrigation system using "an algorithm to determine how to irrigate the rectangular field that minimizes the amount of time required by a rancher to maintain the irrigation system."

"In my view, simply participating in the contest is a tremendous accomplishment, says Kathy Tomlinson, an associate professor of mathematics at UW-River Falls. Brian, Ashley and Tony have worked as a team to do research, apply mathematics, and write about their results.

The central purpose of NACTA is to recognize those individuals whose efforts represent the very best in agricultural higher education. The NACTA Teacher Fellow Award is a criteria-based award and is reviewed by a committee of NACTA members. Criteria included in the evaluation are the instructor's teaching philosophy; evaluations submitted by current students, alumni, administrative officers, and peers; a self-evaluation as well as factors such as availability to students, teaching innovations, and departmental/institutional activity.

May joined the UW-River Falls faculty in 1982 in the department of agricultural economics. He holds a doctorate in agricultural economics from Washington State University as well as a bachelor's and master's degrees in the same field from the University of Nebraska.

NACTA is a professional society whose members are post-secondary teachers of agriculture, and related resource and life sciences. The NACTA has an on-going commitment to improving teaching and learning, and to fostering the professional development of its members.

Betz April 28, was purchased from and installed by the Verdin Company of Cincinnati. It is constructed of finished cast aluminum with four back-lit dials and weighs 570 pounds at 16 feet 7 inches high. The 24-inch acrylic clock faces offer consistent light diffusion, and the master clock controller provides automatic daylight savings time changes. Hanging plaques note the campus founding in 1874.

Arts Building. Constructed of anodized aluminum, it is the largest vertical-face sundial in North America. Because it is accurate to one minute on the hour at any given time of the year, it is also the most accurate sundial in the world. Most other sundials are accurate only to within 15 minutes.

Named in honor of the former dean of the College of Arts and Sciences, the sundial was designed by UW-RF physics Professor John Shepherd, who is now retired. It was constructed and installed by donations from alumni and has been a source of fascination for students and visitors to the campus. Artist Gene Olson of Elk River, Minn., was commissioned to construct the sundial.

As the pair signed the agreement to explore future partnerships, they also exchanged gifts; Nolan gave Betz a charango, a guitar-like stringed instrument hand-carved and decorated in mother-of-pearl by one of the students at UAC-CP. Betz gifted Nolan with a new resident goat for the UAC-CP Goat Project, an initiative that employs 18 university students and helps supply milk to several dozen neighborhood schoolchildren. The goat was on loan from Judy Moses and Larry Jacoby of the Shepherd Song Farm in Downing, Wis., and the real goat will be purchased in Bolivia.

UAC-CP offers degrees in five fields: agriculture, veterinary medicine, nursing, teacher training and eco-tourism. It also has institutional partnerships with South Dakota State University and the College of St. Catherine. UAC-CP has been designated by the United Nations as one of the seven most effective initiatives to eradicate poverty along with a $1 million grant to assist the efforts.

He earned a graduate degree in agricultural economics from UW-River Falls in 1975 and moved to California to pursue his career. He became an early investor in the growth of the Silicon Valley and formed SIH Investment Inc. in 1981. The company specializes in real estate development.

"Hopefully, we'll have good weather," said UW-RF professor and swim team coach Bill Henderson, who is putting on the event. "The events are just for fun and I encourage participants to challenge themselves and be safe."

The registration fee for students, faculty and staff is $5, and $10 for non-university member participants and is to be paid at the registration table the morning of the event. Registration will take place on the hill next to Karges Center just north of the parking lot.

Registration on the day of the walk begins at 9 a.m. and is $20 for adults and $15 for seniors and children under 12. T-shirts will be provided while supplies last and a raffle will be held following the walk. UW-RF, Eta Sigma Gamma (the campus chapter of health education honor society) and the River Falls Area Hospital are sponsoring the walk.

Eifler will be traveling to Baden, Austria, where she will be working at a college for future teachers, from Sept. 25 until May 31. In Austria, Eifler hope to promote mutual understanding of German language and culture.

The Fulbright Program, established in 1946 by the U.S. Congress under the sponsorship of former Sen. J. William Fulbright, annually awards grants for study, teaching, lecture and research. Fulbright grants are awarded to scholars who have academic or professional qualifications and the ability and willingness to share ideas with people of diverse cultures.

Wisconsin-Eau Claire for four years and then transferred to UW-RF in 2005 where she finished her undergraduate degree with a double major in social studies and the German language. Eifler is now pursuing her initial certification for secondary education, which is part of a graduate program at UW-RF.

Many experiences have aided in Eifler's success. In high school, Eifler participated in the German American Partnership Program. GAAP was very influential for Eifler and it encouraged her to continue her education in the German language.

While attending the UW-Eau Claire, Eifler took advantage of study abroad opportunities. Eifler studied in Germany for a semester. She was also participated in the National Student Exchange program, where she spent a semester at Michigan Tech.

Not only have her experiences assisted Eifler's success, but also the people she has named as her mentors, including her father Mel Buckmaster, Johannes Strohshank and Geoffrey Sheurman. "He has always been there to tell me what needs to be done, and tells me how it needs to be done," says Eifler about her father.

Johannes Strohschank, a professor of German at UW-EC, has had a large impact on her life. "He was my advisor, he's very smart, very nice and very encouraging," says Eifler. Stohschank said he has a lot of confidence in Eifler's success in Austria. "With her sparking personality and her abundance of good will, Ms. Eifler will thrive in the Austrian classroom, engage and enrich the children and make them appreciate the benefits of learning another language and culture," says Strohschank.

Eifler said Scheurman, who is part of the teacher education department at UW-RF, really enjoys his job and it shows. "He also knows how to be caring and professional at the same time," says Eifler. Says Scheurman of Eifler, "Beth Eifler, like many of our exceptional graduate students seeking initial certification, is hungry for every experience she can get. This Fulbright opportunity is another example of Beth's willingness to get her hands dirty. She is already teaching in a private school and does high caliber work in our courses and field experiences. This is what it takes to develop into an exemplary teacher."

Eifler has also received a summer scholarship through the American Association of Teachers of German. Eifler will spend four weeks in Germany and four weeks in Rome learning how to teach English as a foreign language.

The AASCU Sasakawa Fellowship is offered each year to faculty members in the United States who are not experts in Japanese culture, but who teach courses that could incorporate Japanese culture into their course.

Cinema and Freshman English, which has often had portions of the course devoted to international issues. As an advisor to many students from Japan, Toman also wants to be more informed about their culture as well.

Osceola: Kyle Thompson, a junior computer science and information systems student, presented work titled, "Semantic Networks Relations as Nodes Allowing Relational Hierarchy, Abstraction and Instantation."

Cooper spent her time talking about the importance of Alice in Dairyland in Wisconsin and the impact agriculture has on the economy. She also discussed the process of becoming Alice and her activities during her year-long reign.

Alice in Dairyland promotes state food and fiber products and businesses and appears at about 400 events, 100 school visits and hundreds of interviews resulting in media coverage for Wisconsin agriculture. She will serve in the one-year agricultural marketing position as a staff member with the Wisconsin Department of Agriculture, Trade and Consumer Protection.

Steve Kelm and Dennis Cooper, spent two days listening to motivational speakers, participating in break-out sessions on various topics such as cow comfort, employee management and animal welfare. Students were also able to network with farm owners and members of agriculture-related organizations.

Many of the UW-River Falls students attending the conference were participating in the PDPW Mentorship Program. The Mentorship Program serves as an opportunity to expose college students to different dairy operations and to serve as a networking tool.

Students are paired with mentors who offer them insight into the dairy industry. Students spend on day on their farm as a job shadow to learn more about their operation. Then, the mentor and student attend the PDPW conference to learn more about PDPW and have the chance to meet with other farmers.

Students who attend the PDPW conference are able to take what they learn and implement their knowledge into their own operation. PDPW focuses heavily on the on the business side of the dairy industry by increasing awareness on finances, human resource management and employee well being.

PDPW continues to have a positive impact on the dairy industry through the resources it provides, helping enhance the dairy industrys impact on the state. PDPWs mission is to share ideas, solutions, resources and experiences that help dairy producers succeed.

Sigma Tau Delta is an international honor society for English majors, minors and qualifying non-majors. The UW-RF chapter of Sigma Tau Delta is Kappa Sigma. Kappa Sigma is an academic and service organization, which recognizes high achievement of students in English language and literature, promotes interest in literature and the English language across the campus and River Falls community, and fosters the discipline in all aspects, including creative and critical writing.

Falcon Daily competed against other entries submitted in such areas as advertising, public relations, corporate communications, graphic design and web sites. The entry was submitted by Public Affairs Director Mark Kinders, who noted that UW-RF's newsletter was submitted in an "other" category under web sites because a specific category for electronic internal newsletters did not exist.

"Considering that Falcon Daily was a labor of intellectual enterprise and creativity rather than an investment of substantial resources, we did pretty well, Kinders noted. We are still an emerging communications tool on campus. It's particularly noteworthy that we received this national recognition when we were publishing only for the final two months of the two-year entry window."

Mike Woolsey and IT staff members Gary Knigge and Marlys Nelson with resolving complicated technology and design/delivery issues, as well as providing top-notch editing and photography to make Falcon Daily an award-winning publication.

Peterson had not missed a day of teaching during his UW-RF teaching career, which began in 1954 and ended when he died during spring break in March of 2005. He was an author of several books and the recipient of numerous honors, including the 2004 Distinguished Professor Award. A bronze plaque in his memory was installed outside of room 224, his favorite classroom.

Part of a national research project involving more than 100 communities across the country, the Arts and Economic Prosperity Study will be conducted by the Americans for the Arts. The study will assess the economic contribution of arts and historical organizations to the local economy, including the related spending of the audiences who attend such events over the next nine months.

The study is specific to the lower St. Croix Valley and watershed and includes nonprofits in river towns along the Minnesota border as well as Wisconsins Pierce, Polk and St. Croix counties. It will build on data from a similar statewide study recently completed in Minnesota, but focus only on the bistate region of the St. Croix Valley, which was under-represented in the Minnesota report.

The study will include a confidential expenditure survey collected from local nonprofit organizations; confidential surveys of audiences attending local events; and an analysis by project economists using a customized input/output model based on local census and economic statistics.

Americans for the Arts will also provide project partners with a series of advocacy tools to support the case for private- and public-sector arts funding. Other national participants include rural towns and urban cities ranging in population from 50,000 to 3 million.

Rowlings phenomenal character and the imprint the series has left on the literary world and the world of popular culture. Klemp holds a B.A. from Wilkes College, M.A. degrees from the University of Toronto and Oklahoma State University as well as a Ph.D. from Pennsylvania State University. Her areas of specialization include teaching English to speakers of other languages, linguistics, language acquisition, science fiction and fantasy fiction.

Vikings and the Green Bay Packers. In 1999, he played in the Super Bowl with the Atlanta Falcons. Tuaolo felt that he needed to hide his sexuality, which eventually led him to drink excessively and to contemplate suicide.

Center in the lower level of the library. From 10 a.m. to 2 p.m., visitors can tie-dye a shirt, get a Henna tattoo, participate in the traditional Hmong Sport of Kato or watch Tibetan Monk create a colorful Mandala with sand.

"The readings were again very successful this year, with visiting writers and our own writing students, continuing to create a strong sense of community among writers, including writers in the River Falls area," says Jennifer Brantley, advisor to the series and professor of English.

Readings are free and open to the community. An open mike follows the student readings, allowing others to read or discuss works. The reading series is organized by students; Brantley advises the group.

"The Butler Did It is a play on the classic 'who done it,'" says Iris O'Brien, a senior history major from Rhinelander, Wis., and director of the production. "It is a play within a play that is filled with interesting characters and a dizzying storyline.

"The Butler Did It" is the latest in a long line of shows produced each year by Masquers. The play is completely student organized, from the props and costumes, to the lights and set. O'Brien says, "the production serves as a way for the students of River Falls to see a show where all acting, design, technical and artistic aspects are done and accomplished by fellow students."

The Women's Agricultural Leadership Conference is for anyone with an interest in agriculture, but it is specifically aimed at women who are actively involved in all forms of agriculture as a career or who are students with the intent of entering an agriculturally related career.

Pre-veterinary students from across the nation attended the symposium to gain educational opportunities in the veterinary profession. Attendees experienced dynamic laboratories and lectures, interactions with other pre-vet students, and a chance to further their understanding of the role of veterinarians across the globe.

Some of the topics the students presented were on how women are portrayed in advertisements, the friendship and love between men and women friends, how men and women define "love," and how physical appearance is depicted in children's cartoons.

"Giving students the opportunity to interact with scholars outside of the university not only connects them more closely to the discipline, but opens their horizons to career possibilities they may never have thought of otherwise," said Jennifer Willis-Rivera, UW-RF speech communications and theatre arts professor.

The National Communication Association is the oldest and largest national organization to promote communication scholarship and education. NCA is a nonprofit organization of approximately 7,700 educators, practitioners, and students who work and reside in every state and more than 20 foreign countries. The purpose of the association is to promote study, criticism, research, teaching, and application of the artistic, humanistic, and scientific principles of communication.

The program starts in August and has three phases totaling one year. After two months of language school, Eckblad will spend five months studying at a German University and the next five months completing an internship with a biotechnology company in the country. She will live with a host family.

The UW-RF program is comprised of four, three-credit gradate classes and one, three-credit practicum. The online course format and schedule allows a cohort of students to complete the program within a year and from any location.

Because this program is one of the few graduate-credit certificates in service-learning offered via the Internet, it holds many benefits for participants, including: the completion of all courses entirely online and with a cohort of peers, use of multimedia tools for an interactive learning experience, ability to immediately apply skills in classrooms and communities, gaining credit for work experiences through a practicum, and honing skills necessary for the NYLC National Service Learning Certificate.

More than one million students participated in service-learning last year through the national Learn and Serve America program. When students are engaged in meaningful service to their communities, both they and their communities benefit. Educators across America are discovering the rewards of incorporating established curricula with hands-on service projects to increase student involvement and enhance academic achievement, citizenship, and character development.

All participants pay the tuition rate of a Wisconsin resident for each online course and must apply and meet minimum requirements for graduate study at UW-RF. Visit the web site at http://www.uwrf.edu/ogs and select Graduate Studies>Programs>Service Learning for more information or contact the program coordinator Stan Potts via e-mail at stanley.j.potts@uwrf.edu.

Blake Fry, dean of student development and campus diversity and member of the volunteer speakers bureau of the Center for Victims of Torture, will present "Life after Torture: Political Oppression in Africa."

Minnesota is home to some 30,000 torture survivors as well as large communities of immigrants who fled conflict and oppression in Africa, Southeast Asia and Eastern Europe. The Minnesota-based Center for Victims of Torture (CVT), which is a private, nonprofit, nonpartisan organization founded in 1985, is one of the first organizations of its kind in the United States and third in the world to give comprehensive assessment and care to those from Africa, Asia and Europe.

The discussion will focus on articles from the New York Times that highlight government-sponsored oppression that has taken place in African nations such as Sierra Leone and Liberia. Fry will also discuss how Twin Citians are reaching out to improve the lives of those who have suffered from torture.

April 19, she will select work and coordinate the exhibition. At an informal reception at 3 p.m., she will discuss the decisions she made about what was selected for the show and present merit awards. Student works including clay, drawings, fibers, glass, paintings, photography, printmaking and metals will be included.

In addition, the UW-RF administration will select one two-dimensional and one three-dimensional work to purchase for the Universitys permanent collection. Ginny Coombs, provost and vice chancellor academic affairs for the University, will present the awards.

At 11 a.m. a video documentary, My Life Under Apartheid will accompany a keynote lecture in the Regents Room of the Hagestad Student Center by Eleanor W. Gwynn, interim chair of the department of visual and performing arts at North Carolina Agricultural and Technical State University. Gwynn has more 30 years of experience in the field of education and dance and is also the artistic director of the E. Gwynn Dancers. She holds a doctorate in dance from the University of Wisconsin  Madison as well as a masters degree in dance from the University of North Carolina  Greensboro.

Secretary of CASCADE and president of Theta Chi Fraternity Ryan Stovern says, "It gave them more of a realistic sense of what EMS and fire fighters have to go through in a situation like this. I also think it will make students think twice before drinking and driving."

Jennie Oemig ,a senior journalism major from Cornell and the Etcetera editor for the Student Voice, won second place in news writing. Helen Clarke, a senior journalism major from Woodbury, Minn., and assistant editor, received an honorable mention in news writing. Jen Dolen, a senior art major from Shoreview, Minn., and photo editor, received an honorable mention in news photography. The newspaper as a whole received an honorable mention in the "Best of Show" category for broadsheets published at four-year colleges.

Advisor to the Student Voice is Andris Straumanis, assistant professor of journalism. In celebration of the student newspapers 90th anniversary, current staffers, alumni and journalism department faculty invite Voice alumni back to campus for an awards ceremony, dinner and program on May 6.

The ACP is the oldest and largest national membership organization for college student journalists. Since 1921, ACP has offered members resources to help improve its publications, such as newspapers, yearbooks, magazines, broadcast programs and online publications.

"The purpose was to expose the students to a new culture, and have insight into the business and economy in Taiwan. It was a success and the students had a good time. We look forward to more tours in the future," Miller said.

Accompanying the trip, students were required to take a course providing a general introduction to various aspects of the culture in Taiwan, orientation and lectures as well as maintain a journal during their stay.

Among their meetings and tours while in Taipei, the group was had tea and conversation with Charles Kao, a former professor of economics at UW-RF, now the president of Commonwealth Publishing in Taipei.

The sister institution agreement between the two universities in Taipei and UW-RF began in 1999. In addition to visits and tours, the exchange goes much deeper. Shih Hsin students can complete three years there and come to UW-RF for their last year and earn a dual degree from both institutions.

They also can complete a dual degree in business administration in three years. Each spring, 20-30 students from Shih Hsin visit River Falls for about a week, and a few of these visitors end up as full-time students.

These programs are designed to stimulate creative and critical thinking in a variety of artistic and academic disciplines, and to provide individual and social enrichment through a university campus-based experience.

The event will include many free or reduced cost services such as cholesterol testing, massages, mini-makeovers, blood pressure checks, body composition analysis/body fat measurements, manicures, hearing screening as well as spinal exams and consultations.

Thirty-six students were in attendance to network with people from their area of study. Six alumni representing different businesses and industry gave presentations and answered questions at the lunch. Steve Wilcox, a 1974 graduate from Hudson, Wis. and Derek Cherney, a 1993 graduate from Medina, Minn., answered business questions at the luncheon. Jim Tiedke, a 1981 graduate from River Falls, Wis., covered the agriculture industry.

Hurricane Relief Benefit, which is an album of piano solos to benefit hurricane relief efforts. Currently, he is focusing on live performances and is also studying the playing of the late great New Orleans pianist Henry Butler, the late James Booker, Dr. John and the late Professor Longhair.

The UW-RF Performing Arts Committee as well as the Diversity Awareness committee, both part of the leadership Development and Programming Board, sponsor the free Wyman Series. Funding for the series is provided by student fees, which are allocated to various student organizations and committees for the productions.

The presentation examines what Australian researchers found in dealing with a gene mutation that predisposes members of a family to life-threatening atrial fibrillation events. Varghese will show a computer simulation of the normal and mutated protein to illustrate what it does.

The Universal Dance Destiny features West African dancers with drumming solos and a Cultural Grand March. Fest-goers can learn some of these traditional dances for free. The dancing will take place from 10 to11 a.m.

From his home in Alaska, Adams has created a unique musical world grounded in wilderness landscapes and indigenous cultures, and in natural phenomena from the songs of birds to elemental noise. His music includes works for orchestra, small ensembles, percussion and electronic media, and is recorded on Cold Blue, Mode, Cantaloupe, New World, New Albion and other labels.

As a continuation of the 2005 regional Synergy Conference, the day will be dedicated to addressing rising health care costs and present health care cost management initiatives as well as exhibits from healthy workforce and cost manufacturing organizations and businesses.

The session will begin Tuesday, April 18, and Thursday, April 20, and will continue on those days for an additional three weeks on the UW- River Falls campus. Each class will consist of a presentation, a coffee break and a discussion period.

Classes are held in the Presidents Room of the Hagestad Student Center from 9-11 a.m.,and are open to all area seniors age 55 or older. Limited parking will be available in the lot on the corner of Oak and Spring streets, across from the Student Center. A permit will be issued the first day of class.

Approximately 800 elementary students in grades 1 - 3 attend Farm Day, which runs from 9 a.m. until 3 p.m. Alpha Zeta, an honorary co-ed fraternity for the College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences, work in cooperation with many other student organizations and the River Falls FFA Chapter to organize the educational opportunity.

Farm Day Jubilee is a unique opportunity for elementary students in the area to learn more about agriculture and that food doesn't just come from the grocery store. It's also a chance for students to receive hands-on experience and see animals up pclose for perhaps the first time.

Smith also has three siblings. While growing up, Smith watched her father coach various teams and has pride in his dedication and his ability to make a difference in others lives. "He has impacted many lives, and I have envied that," says Smith.

One of Smith's greatest accomplishments has been working with her hometown community. Four years ago, Smith initiated and developed an age 18 and under softball team, called the Hazel Park Tigers. The team is located in East St. Paul. Participants are women who are enrolled in a high school program or in an alternative learning program. The players are required to attend every practice and all games. As a coach, Smith helps some of the players earn physical education credits to go toward their education.

Smith has also been very involved on the UW-RF campus. She is currently employed at UW-RF Career Services, is a member of the sorority Alpha Sigma Alpha, and is a Ronald E. McNair Scholar. Smith also volunteers 50 hours each semester for Relay for Life and Special Olympics. At her campus job, Smith says enjoys meeting a lot of new people, which has helped with her communication and public speaking skills. Smith has taken on extra responsibilities while working at Career Services from training new employees and graduate interns to making classroom presentations for more than 100 students.

"She has done a great job helping students/alumni members with their career-related questions, mentoring new peer advisors, and assisting the office with outreach events and activities," says Sheri Stover, a career counselor at UWRF.

Being a McNair Scholar has helped Smith to achieve her academic goals, she says. The McNair program supports promising, academically talented students from populations that have been historically underrepresented in graduate study including low-income, first-generation and minority college students. The program seeks to increase students' confidence and support undergraduate research to better prepare the scholars for graduate study. Smith is currently researching African-American political activism and church attendance.

Smith said that Linda Alverez, the multicultural services coordinator at UW-RF and previous recipient of the award, is one of her mentors. Smith says that Alverez has supported her since she arrived on campus.

"Somorae really typifies a student who has been able to establish personal goals and has real heart, says Alvarez. She has a lot of energy in bringing folks along with her. She has such an unselfishness about her-really a generosity of spirit."

During high school Smith was involved with student council and was the captain of her swimming team and her cheerleading squad. "The best advice that I can give future leaders is to be confident," says Smith.

UW-RF Chancellor Don Betz is pleased to have Smith represent the university. "We are delighted that Somorae was selected to receive the Woman of Color award, said Betz. We are proud of her accomplishments and her commitment to serving others. Her success will encourage others to be diligent in achieving their goals. Bravo, Somorae!"

Jenna Wegner, the sale business manager and a UW-RF senior majoring in dairy science from Ettrick, said the success of the sale was due to the dedication of the dairy club members. "We have many dedicated and hard-working members and without them our sale wouldn't have been as successful," said Wegner.

In addition to raising money for the club and providing members with experience in running a sale, the event also served as an alumni gathering. The club was privileged to have several distinguished alumni a part of the sales force.

The University of Wisconsin-River Falls is home to the one of the largest dairy clubs in the nation. With about 120 members, the club promotes the dairy industry, provides contacts with other schools and industry professionals, and serves as a social organization for members.

UW-RF Chartwell staffers gave three weeks of Thanksgiving demonstrations, which were called, "Cooking with Angel." The demonstrations, headed up by Chef Angel Alcantar, were set up as TV show setting. The first week was a demonstration of how to prepare and carve a turkey. The student audience watched and participated in the event and sampled the fixings.

The second week was devoted to side dishes, featuring sweet potato mousse and cranberry relish. The third and final week was dedicated to desserts, including pumpkin pie and apple crisp. Students were able to bring the recipes and some samples home.

This spring, Chartwells Dining Services is sponsoring a dinner that is planned by the UW-RF Destination Gulf Coast organization. All of the proceeds will go to the organization to help fund its relief trips to Gulf Port, Miss., and other areas affected by Hurricane Katrina.

After examining the iPod more closely and attending sessions on podcasting last June at the National Educational Computing Conference, Lueck began to contemplate how his students could benefit from the device.

His graduate-level class, dealing with Kidspiration and Inspiration software, is taught completely online. Lueck says that it's hard to teach someone how to use software without being there in person to assist the students.

By visiting the iTunes store, students would be able to download lessons that Lueck had videotaped and uploaded, giving them the ability to watch the lesson at their convenience, and also to repeat watching it as needed.

Hired as the women's tennis coach six years ago and as an adjunct professor in the fall of 2001, Lueck says that changing gears midway through his career and teaching technology to university students was no picnic in the beginning.

"New teachers face so many obstacles in the field. If I can help them overcome one, that's great," says Lueck. "We've got to equip our kids, expose them to new technology, and get them to understand how to infuse it effectively."

According to Lueck, other faculty members have responded favorably to idea of podcasting. Karen Ryan, director of the UW-RF Education Technology Center, is looking into her budget to try and allocate funds for purchasing Garage Band, a software program that quickly helps create podcasts. However, a few questions have been raised by UW-RF faculty members.

To fellow digital immigrants, Lueck offers the following words of wisdom. "Once you become confident with a program or the technology, something new comes out. You just have to try to keep up," says Lueck.

Donavon Taylor, professor of plant and earth sciences, and his work on a grant titled  Multicultural Scholars Program in Agriculture, Food, and Environmental Sciences," funded by the United States Department of Agriculture.

On the day of the event mock interviews with real employers will be held from 10 a.m. to 4 p.m. Managers from local businesses have volunteered their time to offer students feedback on their interviewing performance.

Presentations will also be made throughout the day. Amy Sebelko, who is a senior health and welfare specialist from AgriBank, Farm Credit Bureau, will be conducting a presentation on understanding employment benefits from 10:10-11 a.m. Sebelko has been with FCB for 25 years and has earned the Professional in Human Resource and Certified Benefits Professional accreditations. Currently, Sebelko is working on her Certified Employee Benefit Specialists accreditation.

Trygve Olson an account executive at AppleOne will also be sitting in on the panel. Olsons duties at AppleOne are diverse: salesperson, recruiter, HR professional and an account manager. Olson is also a staff writer with the Minnesota Timberwolves and the director of business development for Olsen & Son marketing communications.

Phil Baumgarn will also be participating on the panel of human resource experts. Baumgarn is the recruitment director for ACR homes, which manages has group homes and counselors who live or work in the home and provide assistance for its residents.

Peterson taught a wide variety of courses, including sociology, economics and political science, but is most remembered for his outstanding love of history, and served as the chair of the History Department from 1963 to 1991.

Peterson was also a prolific author, writing several books, scholarly papers, and journal articles. He appeared in many of the university's theater productions, and received numerous grants to continue historical research while teaching.

Share Values Good Measure of Company Performance?" The presentation investigates the relationship between stock prices of the Dow Jones industrial, transportation and utility indexes with several financial and market variables.

The instructor is Charles Buck, a Certified Financial Planner professional and principal of Buck Financial Advisors, LLC. This course is the first in the Financial Planning Certificate program and is a pre-requisite for the other four courses.

All the program courses are taught by UW-RF faculty and qualified professionals in the financial services industry. Classes are held in evenings and on weekends to accommodate working adults and are located in Hudson and River Falls.

Certified Financial Planner Board of Standards Inc. owns the certification marks CFP, Certified Financial Planner and CFP (with flame logo), in the United States. The board awards these certifications to individuals who successfully complete initial and ongoing certification requirements.

Cooperatives for Teachers examines the basic structure and historical development of cooperatives and the range of activities in which cooperatives are involved. This class is offered June 5 - 30 and is available as a graduate-level course.

The new program, developed in response to the needs of Wisconsin and the shortage of school administrators, is approved by the Wisconsin Department of Public Instruction for certification as a K-12 principal and is the first competency-based program in the state.

The practitioner-oriented program is offered in a cohort format, allowing peers to provide support and encouragement to each other. It also allows faculty to track student progress and be responsive to student needs.

Coursework is completed over a two-year period and is focused on the competencies necessary to become a successful principal including leadership, decision-making, supervision and staff development. Courses are a blend of traditional, online, independent and practical experiences. Projects are designed to assist students in creating their work administrator portfolios.

The first class is held on campus to provide access to technology and other services. After the first summer, however, the cohort helps to determine convenient location and meeting times for the remaining classes.

Program faculty and staff have advance degrees, and many are practitioners in the field. Local PK-12 administrators serve as faculty, mentors and evaluators, creating strong and valuable connections to the PK-12 community.

Included in this summers offerings are undergraduate and graduate classes for credit, travel opportunities and professional development opportunities. To accommodate students busy schedules, weekday, weekend and evening classes are offered along with compressed schedules that finish quickly. Each class lasts about three weeks, including one Saturday class. Some courses are offered online.

Traditional students, teachers seeking advanced degrees, lifelong learners, business professionals and community members are invited to apply for summer session to gain valuable knowledge and professional development skills through a summer course at UW-RF. Students home for the summer from other universities can transfer credits to their home institution degree programs.

The workshops will help lead participants in the process of creating an individual mandala. Mandala is Sanskrit for "whole world" or "healing circle," representing the universe and its contents. Throughout history and in many cultures from ancient Rome and Greece to Native American and Tibetan, circles have suggested wholeness, self, unity, completion and eternity.

The circles can depict scenes from everyday life or symbols, designs or objects from the world of nature. The workshops will offer prompts to help participants to think about the mural themes, but people are invited to bring ideas, resources and designs with them to incorporate into their work.

This project was conceived as a way to allow people in the university and regional communities to collaboratively create a visual artwork and to communicate their feelings and visions as they relate to one of the themes. It also provides an opportunity for both individual and group creative endeavors to come together as a gift to the community. In addition, participants will experience a satisfaction in adding to campus inauguration celebration in a tangible way.

Coombs said of Brown, "Dr. Brown has demonstrated her collaborative approach in many of the responsibilities she carried out as interim dean. She is a passionate advocate for liberal learning and an excellent representative of the college."       On being selected, Brown said she is "deeply honored to lead the college at such a dynamic time in the history of the university," and is focusing on continuing the work that she began as interim dean.

"Terry is a person of integrity who has clearly demonstrated that she is capable of providing effective leadership for the college and for the university," says Hedahl. "I certainly look forward to continued opportunities to work with her."

Chancellor Don Betz says commented on Brown's leadership. "Terry is an accomplished and energetic educator who understands the needs of students and faculty, and who models the leadership principles that we value here. Terry will distinguish herself in this leadership position and collaborate with her CAS colleagues to continually advance teaching and learning."

Brown joined UW-RF as an assistant professor of English in 1989, and has had a number of responsibilities since joining UW-RF. Brown has chaired the search-and-screen committee for the new chancellor. She is also chair of the American Democracy Project, a nationwide program designed to promote civic engagement on college campuses. In addition, Brown was also the coordinator for the women's studies program on campus for a number of years.

Brown's previous positions at UW-RF include interim dean, assistant dean, outreach program manager and administrative intern for CAS. As associate dean of the CAS, Brown oversaw and promoted outreach activities for the college, administered to student record-keeping affairs, and represented Dean Hedahl when necessary. Brown has also served as a professor, associate professor, and assistant professor of English at UW-RF. Prior to joining the university, Brown was a graduate teaching assistant at the University of Florida and at Virginia Tech.

Brown has spoken at many national and international conferences on topics such as women in literature and film, women's leadership, gender equity in the UW System, internationalizing higher education, international issues, technology in the classroom and women in the media.

Brown is co-editing "Women Writers in Context: An Anthology of Literature," contracted with Houghton Mifflin and currently in progress. Her scholarly articles have appeared in Feminist Collections, Teaching Forum and Literature Interpretation Theory.

Bowen graduated from Indiana University with an undergraduate degree in physical education in 1966. He served the Hoosiers as a student-manager under two-time National Champion Coach Branch McCracken.

Basketball runs deep in the Bowen family. Like his father, son Matthew was a basketball manager at Indiana University under Coach Bob Knight. Grandfather Vernie Bowen was an Indiana High School coach for 40 years. Nephew Christopher is currently the basketball manager at the United States Military Academy under Coach Jim Crews. Nephew Andrew is currently the basketball manager at Bethel College in Mishawaka, Ind.

After Peterson attended a "Teaching Survival Skills and Ethics" conference she approached Rathburn about how to put her newly learned knowledge to work in a series of professional development courses already within the CBE. The courses now are required for incoming business students in order to graduate.

"In the CBE, we feel it is vitally important for students in management majors to not only know the fundamentals of management, but to understand and integrate into that learning the behaviors and decision making that are central to being a professional," said Peterson. "The CBE series of courses fills that niche."

Readership Program at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls is sponsoring a news series on public affairs, current events and cultural topics called "Coffee with 'The Times'" in the Chalmer Davee Library Atrium on campus throughout the 2006 spring semester.

Hagedorn's career was launched when he won the 1990 Guitar Foundation of America solo competition. He has maintained an active performing schedule as a soloist and a chamber musician. His appearances have taken him to more than 25 American cities and to Canada.

Stargazing sessions are free and open to the public. Each observatory session includes an introductory talk by physics Professor Eileen Korenic, who will highlight recent astronomical news or provide an in-depth look at one or more of the objects visible that night. The discussion for the March viewing session is "Murmurs of EarthAnnouncing Our Existence" at 8:30 p.m. in Room 271, Centennial Science Hall.

A wide variety of dances will be performed including lyrical, ethnic, and contemporary modern styles choreographed by faculty, guest choreographers and students. Students Ruby Lanoux, a senior math major from Oakdale, Minn., Sara Mickens, a sophomore art major from St. Paul, and Penny Reinhold, a sophomore music major from Knapp, Wis., choreographed several of the pieces being presented.

Several of the pieces will include traditional Hawaiian chants as well sacred and modern Hula dances. Having returned from a recent trip to Hawaii to study with Kumu Hula Rich Pedrina of the Halau Hula O Napunaheleonapua on Ohau, Dance Theatre students have been also been studying the Hawaiian language, arts and culture for the past few years to gain a deeper understanding of the Hula. They have also studied with Bierbrauer, who is owner of Halau Hula Ka Hoku Akau (Hula School of the North Star) in Minneapolis. Beirbrauer is a haumana/student of Pedrina and is currently in the Uniki/graduate program through Kumu Pedrina.

The series is an opportunity for all UW-RF students to read original poetry, short fiction, and creative nonfiction to fellow students, faculty, staff and community members. Guest poets and writers are also invited to read once a semester.

After 1949, however, the production of Qingdao (Tsingtao) Beer came under the control of Chinese Communist government that has utilized nationalism and consumerism to stimulate the development of beer industry and to increase the sale of Qingdao Beer both in Chinese and overseas markets.

By presenting concerts and sponsoring numerous musical events on- and off-campus, the UW-RF music department aims to provide diverse educational opportunities in music and cultural enrichment programs for the University, its students and the community.

Session III began Tuesday, March 7, and Thursday, March 9, and will continue on Tuesdays and Thursdays for an additional three weeks on campus. Each class will consist of a presentation, a coffee break and a discussion period.

Classes will be held in the Presidents Room of the Hagestad Student Center from 9 to 11 a.m., and are open to all area seniors age 55 or older. Limited parking will be available in the lot on the corner of Oak and Spring streets, across from the Student Center. A permit will be issued the first day of class.

The KCACTF is a year-round program in eight geographic regions in the United States.  The goals of KCACTF is to encourage, recognize and celebrate the finest and most diverse work produced in university and college theater programs; to provide opportunities for participants to develop their theater skills and insight and achieve professionalism; to improve the quality of college and university theater in America; and to encourage colleges and universities to give distinguished productions or new plays, especially those written by students. It bestows awards in overall production excellence and individual student artist recognition through awards and scholarship in playwriting, acting, criticism, directing and design.

Students will also be given the opportunities to participate in paid internships, undergraduate student-faculty research projects, and employment opportunities in the University pilot plants, greenhouses and farm enterprises, as well as professional development activities.

"Through the Multicultural Grant we hope to expand the diversity in CAFES and create a network of support to help these students from non-farm backgrounds achieve more knowledge," explained Taylor. "As ambassadors, these students will return to their high schools and let the students know that being a part of agriculture can create a diverse array of opportunities."

As part of their scholarships, these students will return to their schools and share their success stories with prospective students and their teachers and parents. By doing so, this will encourage other under-represented students to pursue opportunities in higher education, specifically careers in agriculture and related fields, resulting in a more diverse professional workforce.

"Our conference benefited many different organizations in Ohio," said Kyle Fogt, co-coordinator of the conference. "Without the students from UW-River Falls the conference would not have been as successful as it was."

This annual conference brought together nearly 150 collegiate 4-H leaders from college campuses throughout the country. Conference participants learned from their peers and 4-H professionals in a series of intense leadership development workshops, listened to nationally renowned motivational speakers, and engaged in meaningful community service work in Columbus.

The highlight of the weekend was the start of a national service project.  This new initiative was kicked off Saturday, Feb. 25 with volunteer activities benefiting the Memory Project and Ohio University Extension.

While memoir writing has faced criticism in the wake of an Oprah Winfrey book club selection that contained fictional accounts, Hanson says that memoir writing is still an important genre. "It is very important for people to record memories of loved ones," says Hanson. "It is the only way the next generation will know them."

Patricia Condon Johnston, publisher of the Afton Historical Society Press, wrote that Hanson's book, "is a wonderful tribute to your brother ... I have never lost a sibling, but I did lose a daughter several years ago ... so I know what you mean about 'unspeakable grief.'"

Mu Daiko performs over one hundred times each year for schools, community organizations, arts institutions and corporations. In addition Mu Daiko reaches hundreds of taiko enthusiasts through its ongoing taiko classes and elementary, secondary and college-level workshops and residencies.

As an editor of the special projects team, Stefany coordinates projects between the Star Tribune newspaper and StarTribune.com.  His background is in computer-assisted reporting, graphics editing and national/international news.

Through "Online Learning for Educators," more than a dozen, one-credit online classes are offered. All coursework can be completed at a student's own pace and finished within six weeks. Spring classes begin March 13, and summer classes begin June 19.

"Online for Educators is perfect for those teachers seeking credits for recertification," said Mary Manke, assistant dean of the College of Education and Professional Studies. "Teachers who can't attend class on campus will enjoy the convenience of an online format. And, since all classes meet different DPI teacher standards, educators can select topics that may be used to build their professional development plains under PI-34."

Educators interested in enhancing their technology skills in the classroom can choose from three classes that can also be applied toward earning a Technology for Educators certificate. The courses are designed to help K-12 educators apply technology to meet learning objectives, increase teaching capabilities and integrate educational technology in their classrooms. Two of the courses are available online.

Two other certificate programs offered online include Community Education and Service-Learning, both with introductory courses beginning on June 19. All courses required for each certificate can be completed online, with a cohort of peers and within one year.

"All coursework is provided via the Internet and with other distance-learning tools," said Stanley Potts, program coordinator at UW-River Falls. "The compressed course schedule is also a popular feature. Colleagues from around the country will follow the same schedule and complete the program together within one year."

Another certification program that uses a compressed schedule in the summer is the Learning Disabilities Teacher Certification. This program prepares educators to obtain Wisconsin certifications in learning disabilities. Recent enhancements to the program make it possible for participants to complete the program in just one year, or take a second year if necessary. The program begins in the summer then continues through the academic year.

Master of science in education degrees for secondary education in science, math or fine arts also starts in the summer. This degree program helps educators strengthen their teaching skills and broaden content knowledge. Like most of the other UW-RF degree programs, courses can be taken for professional development without an individual committing to the degree program.

Fine arts educators will inspire their own work with a core of interdisciplinary arts courses and enhance their skills with content-specific electives. Math educators will learn effective teaching methods from mathematical content courses such as geometry for educators, statistics for educators, and technology in teaching of elementary and middle school mathematics. In addition, science educators can blend discipline-specific core courses in biology, chemistry and physics to meet their individual needs and preferences.

This summer, the UW-RF physics department will offer three courses for secondary education teachers with funding from the Wisconsin Elementary and Secondary Education Act's Improving Teacher Quality Program. Enrollment is limited, and stipends and course equipment awards are available to selected Wisconsin teachers. All teachers interested in these ESEA classes must complete an application by March 27, available from the www.uwrf.edu/ogs/programs/programs-index.php/physics/15/gs .

Educators with an interest in obtaining licensure or certification in reading may begin a program with the Reading Summer Institute starting June 19. Three summer courses enable educators to complete eight credits in just three weeks. The degree program continues throughout the academic year with evening courses.

Recent improvements to this program make this an attractive route to a degree. With a reduction in credits needed to complete the degree, students beginning this summer can complete their master's degree and obtain a Wisconsin Reading Specialist license in just 30 credits. A reading certificate can be completed in just 21-23 credits, with most of these courses offered during the Summer Reading Institute.

Last but not least, a new master of science in education degree for educators interested in becoming leaders begins this summer. The Principal Licensure program has recently been expanded from a certificate program to a master's degree, which is required for aspiring principals in Wisconsin. The program begins with a summer Leadership Development Seminar on campus and continues throughout the academic year on dates and locations determined by each cohort of students.

"This program is approved by the Wisconsin Department of Public Instruction for individuals seeking certification as a K-12 principal and was the first competency-based program established in Wisconsin," said Florence Monsour, professor of education and UW-RF program coordinator. Students complete a portfolio providing evidence of the skills needed to meet National Policy Board and Wisconsin Administrator standards in the final phase of the program.

All participants for these courses or programs need to apply for graduate study at UW-River Falls before registering for classes. Apply online at http://apply-wisconsin.edu  or visit www.uwrf.edu/graduatestudies  for application instructions.

"This is a very exciting time to be a part of ACAD," said Coombs. "Our membership has expanded to an all-time high and our annual meeting had a record number of attendees. Academic officers and administrators around the nation are coming to view ACCAD as an essential and valuable resource that provides them with a great network of support. I'm looking forward to working with our newest board members to advance the ideas of liberal education by supporting provosts, deans, and assistant/associate deans in their work."

In addition to providing leadership in the planning, organization and administration of the University's colleges, Coombs has been played a role in coordinating the development of a new general education program and assisting the faculty in the design of new student outcomes assessment programs. She has also developed retention strategies for full-time, first-year students as well as helped establish support for undergraduate student research.

Coombs has written many publications and scholarly articles and is a member of the American Association of Higher Education, American Association of University Women, Association of American Colleges and Universities, American Association of Teachers of German and the Society for Germanic Linguistics and other professional organizations.

Part of the course will consist of students "applying" for and being assigned roles in a field production team that will travel to Mississippi to document UW-RF efforts. The team will be responsible for planning, writing, shooting and editing a finished piece, which will be approximately six minutes in length. The University will then use the piece in a variety of promotional efforts.

Students in the class must attend all classes throughout the semester, but will chose between one of three academic plans where they work on the field production full time over spring break; split their time between field production responsibilities and UW-RF volunteer work; or not go on location during spring break but be assigned additional responsibilities during the pre- and post-production of the film.

"This will give students experience with the creative challenges of making this kind of project in the real world, while producing a piece that the University can use to tell its story," said Johnson. "It gets students involved in different ways."

Don Page, former basketball coach, baseball coach and athletic director at UW-RF, kept score of the close game that ended with an exciting last minute in which the gray team pulled ahead to win 79-80.

Although the two teams were competitive, the atmosphere in the gym was light and fun. Players from the opposing teams joked, laughed and jostled one another on the court and after the game, chatted with their old teammates and friends.

The gym was filled with the wives, girlfriends and children of the former Falcons; several of those family members were born since the last alumni game. Some children came out to play a little ball during half time, and like father, like son, one toddler even tried to get in on the real game.

The reception following the game was filled with talk of basketball and how it is played now compared to how it was in the 1950s. Phil Kuss and Dave Herum, who both played from 1953 to 1957, remembered when the basketball court was in the basement of North Hall.

Herum, who didn't go out for basketball until he was a junior in high school, had a very successful basketball career at UW-RF. "At the time I graduated, I was the 3rd leading scorer for the school behind Roger Kuss and Nate Delong, but since the three-pointers came along, I've slipped way down on the list," Herum said. "I also led the state colleges in scoring for two years in a row," he added.

Current men's basketball coach Rick Bowen followed McGinty and recapped the current basketball season. Bowen also talked about improvements he'd like to see in UW-RF's sports facilities. "We've got to roll up our sleeves and get the facilities at the top in the UW System," Bowen said.

Chancellor Don Betz echoed Bowen's comments. "Out of the eight teams in the conference, our facilities rank 12th ," joked Betz, who noted he is committed to improving the athletic facilities at the university. "I appreciate the legacy of this institution in regards to athletics."

Many of the men attend the alumni game every year, including Jeff Berkhoff, a 1994 graduate of UW-RF and assistant coach for the men's basketball team, and Justin Steivang, a 1995 graduate of UW-RF, who said he doesn't get to see his teammates often because he lives in Arizona. "I come back to have a good time and to see everyone again. I get to see them here, if I see them at all, and once in a while talk on the phone with them," Steivang said.

Herum and Kuss have attended the game almost every year, although they don't play anymore. Whether the alumni are playing or not, the reunion offers a way to stay connected to UW-RF and the sport they once played and still love.

"I can't even remember [the last time I played]," Kuss said. "I think David played about eight years ago, but my wife wouldn't let me run up and down the court then, and now I don't even think I could run up and down the court."

The CAA is reviewing UW-RF's communicative cisorders curriculum. The CAA, which has accredited programs at 264 other institutions of higher learning nationwide, is the only organization recognized by the U.S. Department of Education to accredit or pre-accredit educational programs in audiology or speech pathology.

Travis Tubre, a professor in the psychology department, will present "Gender Differences in Responses to Same-Sex and Opposite-Sex Sexual Harassment." This study examines gender differences in responses to sexual harassment behavior. Implications for training interventions to reduce sexual harassment will be discussed.

This month's selection is "Bel Canto" by Ann Patchett. The book follows along as terrorists enter a South American vice-presidential mansion during an opera performance. With no commonality except music, 58 international hostages are held for months forming unexpected bonds with their captors. The discussion leader will be retired English professor Margaret Odegard.

Some critics argue that boys and girls need to learn together in order to later work effectively with both genders in the workplace. Others say that studies at this time are too limited to undertake such dramatic changes in education. The presentation is designed for parents and educators, as well as business professionals, to learn about the proposed legislation and its implications to education and the future workplace.

Quantitative literacy can be described s mathematics in context. It is an understanding of how numerical data are used to make public policy and other decision is an essential part of the personal civic responsibility of all university graduates. Many colleges and universities have formally integrated quantitative learning in their curricula through various strategies, such as common first year courses, discipline-specific quantitative learning courses, or a multidisciplinary quantitative course requirement in general education. The invited speakers will share their experiences in developing, implementing, and assessing quantitative learning programs.

Session four, from 2:15 to 3 p.m., is an open forum in which conference participants will be given the opportunity to discuss the level at which quantitative learning is already a part of their curricula and strategies for formalizing and/or enhancing quantitative learning programs at their institutions.

The UW System OPID serves as a statewide faculty development resource for University of Wisconsin System institutions. Over the past few years OPID has expanded its emphases to meet the broader professional needs of faculty and academic staff with programming on topics such as student learning, the scholarship of teaching and learning, career stages, and faculty roles and rewards. OPID's council remains essential to its operation, both as an advisory board and as a liaison between System and its campuses.

The FPC program provides participants with the skills, tools and knowledge to begin a career in the financial counseling and planning profession. The program consists of five courses that cover a range of financial planning topics. Participants who successfully complete all five courses meet the educational requirement of the CFP Board's educational requirement for CFP  certification and are eligible to take the CFP  Certification Examination.

For more information, contact the UW-RF Outreach and Graduate Studies Office, which provides lifelong learners with academic and professional development programs that are practical, flexible, convenient and affordable.

One alumnus from each college at CSU is awarded the Outstanding Alumni award each year. The award is given to a alumnus who has brought honor to CSU and him/herself through a distinguished career and service to the University, state, nation or world.

Nylander joined the UW-RF faculty in the psychology department in 1969 after completing his bachelor's and master's degrees in psychology at Colorado State University. He earned his doctorate in experimental physiological psychology from Iowa State University.

Nylander served as department chair and associate dean of the College of Education until he became the assistant chancellor for administration in 1987 and then later vice chancellor for administration and finance.

In her letter of support she wrote, "He is an extremely knowledgeable, intelligent, fair, forward-thinking and well-rounded individual. He has varied talents, interests and experiences. ... Virgil was and continues to be a mentor to many of us [at the university]. ... His willingness to share information and responsibility as well as his encouragement has been instrumental to my success. His approach to problem-solving is very consistent and predictable, and he consistently takes the high road and the most ethical approach. The students and their well-being are primary in his decision-making. ... Within the community of River Falls, Virgil is also well known and has established a reputation for being willing to participate in ... charitable, civic and community events.

The students are also involved with the Student Support Services Program at UW-RF, a program that is designed for first generation or low-income students. " I am extremely impressed with the Falcon Fellow's commitment and passion toward the program," said Amy Lloyd of the UW-RF Academic Success Center. " They have taught me that first-year students have the capacity to both, serve as change agents in their college community and at the same time do well academically."

The majority of the groups service hours have been spent tutoring students in the River Falls school district through the America Reads Program. In addition, the group has also partnered with the River Falls Public Library for the spring semester.

The first event, "The Box Car Children," drew approximately 30 children from the surrounding River Falls elementary schools.  The Falcon Fellows planned various activities including a book discussion, a "Free-For-All" relay race, bingo, art projects and making food donations to the local food pantry.

To be considered for the Outstanding SPS Chapter, the chapter must achieve SPS activities in areas such as physic research, public science outreach, physics tutoring programs, hosting and representing at physics meetings, and providing social interaction for chapter members. The River Falls chapter is one of 48 chapters from one of 18 zones in the country.

The River Falls chapter has visited fifth grade classes, performed demonstrations each year to high school students in the annual science day festival, and attended regional meetings. The chapter works to promote an interest in physics, contribute to research, and create new demonstrations to recruit physics majors.

At Gustavus Adolphus College, UW-RF senior Adam Helbach, a speech communication major from Brule, Wis., earned second place in dramatic interpretation.  Brooke Eglinton, a freshman speech communication major from Caledonia, Minn., competed in the program oral interpretation and took fifth place.

O'Neal Hampton (left) and Maureen Casey (center) have been recognized for their research on sexual harassment in organizational settings as winners of the Psi Chi Midwest Regional Award given by the Midwestern Psychological Association. Psi Chi is the national honor society in psychology.

Hampton and Casey submitted their paper on a research project seeking answers to the problem of sexual harassment to the 2006 annual meeting of the MPA. The paper was accepted, and their work will be showcased in a special paper session for Psi Chi award winners. In addition, Hampton will give a presentation on their research findings and will be presented with a certificate and a check for $300 at an award ceremony in Chicago.

The McNair program supports promising, academically talented students from populations that have been historically underrepresented in graduate study, including low-income, first-generation, and minority college students.  The program seeks to increase students' confidence and support undergraduate research to better prepare the scholars for graduate study.

Each scholar in the McNair program chooses a faculty member to work with on a research project in his or her career field. Hampton and Casey both chose Travis Tubr (center), who is an assistant professor in the psychology department at UW-RF. Because both Hampton and Casey were interested in similar areas in which Tubr does research, they decided to collaborate instead of working independently.

Hampton and Casey began their project in the spring 2005 and are continuing their research in preparation for graduate study. The scholars are investigating sexual harassment at work or in educational settings. In particular, they are looking at differences in how men and women cope when subjected to various types of sexual harassment behavior. Their continuing research will extend their findings to understanding how these gender differences change when people are harassed by members of the opposite sex or the same sex.

Hampton is a senior from Richfield, Minn., majoring in psychology with an interdisciplinary minor emphasizing human resource management. After graduation, Hampton plans on entering a master's or doctoral program in industrial and organizational psychology.

Casey is a senior from New Richmond, Wis., and is also majoring in psychology with an interdisciplinary minor emphasizing human resource management. Casey plans to continue her education by pursuing a master's degree in industrial and organizational psychology.

"I've had a very positive experience with the McNair Program," says Casey. "Njia Lawrence-Porter, who is the McNair Scholars coordinator, is a very good motivator for all of us. She makes sure that we're all on task. I don't think that I would have put so much effort into getting in graduate school without this program."

"Approximately 70 students are in or have gone through the McNair Scholars Program," says Phil George, director of the Academic Success Center. "Forty students have completed the program, and the majority are in graduate school. Others have been just as successful with undergraduate research much like O'Neal Hampton and Maureen Casey. This is a very unique experience for an undergraduate student."

Human "dog" sledding, a new event to the carnival, was the most popular event this year, according to special events chair Marcus Bonde, a senior from Nerstrand, Minn, who is majoring in marketing communication with an agricultural emphasis. The winners of the "dog" sled competition were Alpha Gamma Rho for the race and McMillan Hall for a costume competition.

Comedian Johnny Walker performed his "frozen" comedy act at Brandy's. The frozen T-shirt royalty competition consists of teams thawing out a frozen T-Shirt and then putting it on one of the teammates. May Hall took first place in this competition.

Other new events added this year including human bowling and an all-night party. First place winners of the bowling competition were Alpha Gamma Rho and Alpha Sigma Alpha. The all night Party ran from 9:30 p.m. until 5 a.m. at Hunt Arena on Feb. 10 and included food, games, prizes, bingo, volleyball tournament and free haircuts by Great Clips.

Alpha Gamma Rho took home two first place rankings in the organization competition and the royalty competition. Winning with AGR in the Royalty competition was ASA with a total point value of 727. The overall scores are points accumulated over all the week's activities.

"I believe what made this program such a success was the fact that many different organizations came together and worked as one for the night," says Tom Vierling, the chair of the All Night Party, who is a senior majoring in business administration from Stillwater, Minn.

The dinner will be a buffet-style with roast pork, potatoes, vegetables, beverage and cake. There will be a silent auction, slide show of the students' relief trip to Gulf Port, Miss., as well as a display featuring of the organization. Students who helped out the Gulf Coast over J-Term and students planning the relief trip over spring break, March 13-17, will be walking around throughout the dinner to and answer any questions people may have about the organization or the trips.

Each year Chartwells Dining Service sponsors a charitable dinner and chooses a worthy organization in which to donate their food and services. All proceeds will go to the Destination Gulf Coast Spring Break organization.

Clifford received her bachelor's degree in art with a fiber emphasis from Beloit College, and a master of fine arts from Cranbrook Academy of Art. She has exhibited her work in major cities around the world including Minneapolis, Boston, Chicago, Washington, D.C. and Tokyo as well as designed work for several commissions and collections.

The exhibit features two distinct and sophisticated investigations of the figure. Oostdik's sculptures explore her struggles with the portrayal of the female form in her own life and in society. Her ceramics delicately envelop the female body through rourgh textures and elegant lines; the end work portrays a sensitive exploration of the figure as form.

"I have adopted my own version of what the ideal female is and I use this idea of a female to shape my pieces," says Oostdik. "They are meant to be modern-day Venus forms, more iconographic than representational figures. I treat the forms as if they were blank canvases. I manipulate the clay in slab form to create exaggerated volume and depth. The slips and glazes I use are meant to give a primitive feeling, as the forms draw upon a theme used repeatedly throughout history."

Ptacek's prints tell the stories of the struggles and hope within her own life and those around her. Her prints are immersed with texture and seek to draw in the viewer with the poetic use of emotion.

"The idea of journey is what surrounds my most recent group of prints," says Ptacek. "The constant tension between struggle and hope in my life makes it a continuous journey. I wanted to be able to capture these journeys, or stories, in my work. My audience may not see the entire story as I do, but I want them simply to be able to understand that the light, and the hope, will always be there in the darkness."

New to this year's sale will be a "worker auction" where eight UW-RF Dairy Judging team members will be "auctioned" off for to donate labor for one eight-hour workday to a winning bidder. Proceeds from the auction will go towards the Dairy Judging team to cover expenses for various competitions.

The heifers for the Dairy Club sale were consigned from Wisconsin, Minnesota, South Dakota and Illinois. Money earned from the sale goes to fund Dairy Club trips, educational seminars, scholarships, a spring banquet and to help with any new opportunities that may arise to benefit the club members.

During his presentation, Smith will outline the development of the Lydecker plum from original hybridization to release. He will also discuss along with efforts aimed at Midwest commercialization of the plum. The presentation is free and open to the public.

Smith's plum variety, named after the late UW-River Falls Chancellor Ann M. Lydecker yields fruit as large and tasty as any California-grown plum. More importantly, it also withstands subzero temperatures and is highly productive, producing completely round, purple to black plums.

He received the WiSys award for the development of the plum that stands up to Wisconsin's harsh winters. He created the new cultivar by crossing a plum variety adapted to Wisconsin's frigid winters with a Japanese dessert plum.

In order to be eligible for the AgStar Scholars program, students must be entering their senior year or fifth year at UW-River Falls and have at least a 3.0 grade point average. In addition, scholarship winners have a good chance at obtaining an internship with AgStar.

Gregg Hadley, UW-RF AgStar Scholars project coordinator, says the research project helps develop the students' critical thinking skills as well as becoming more prepared for careers within the agriculture industry.

The Dairy Challenge is an innovative competition developed by industry and university professionals exposing students to promote a vibrant future for the dairy industry. Working in four- or five-person, mixed university teams, students assessed all aspects of a working dairy farm and presented recommendations for improvement to a panel of judges and the participating farm families.

During the competition, students are given two hours to evaluate one of two dairies. After the farm visits, herd owners entertained questions from both students and judges about their farming operations. Armed with detailed productions and financial paperwork from the farms, as well as their own observations, the participants developed a presentation about what they saw and suggestions for improvement. During the presentation, students are given 20 minutes to offer their suggestions, which was then followed by a question-and-answer session and a critique by the judges of their presentation and recommendations.

The North American Dairy Challenge was established as a management contest to incorporate all phases of a specific dairy business. It strives to incorporate a higher-learning atmosphere with practical application to help prepare students for careers in the dairy industry.

The students are members of UW-RF's Dance Theatre, a popular modern dance group. Accompanied by their advisor and UW-RF faculty member Karla Zhe and two instructors, Todd Bierbrauer and William Grier, the eight students attended the school of Hula 'O Napunaheleonapu.  In a program conducted by a internationally renowned hula dancer, the students took classes in technique, sacred chanting, language, history and cultural traditions, and also learned both traditional and modern hula dances.

One such landmark is a blow-hole on the island of O'ahu. Blomberg and the rest of the students learned sacred chants and stood on cliffs on either side of the water, watching as the waves seemingly rose and fell with their cries.

The program instructor, Kumu Rich Pedrina, is an award-winning hula dancer and teacher who has performed internationally with Hawai'i's finest dancers. Hula, an art form combining dance with chant or song that tells a story, was created by the Polynesians who originally settled the Hawai'ian islands.

While the students were unable to perform their newly learned hulas in Hawai'i, they will get the chance at their annual spring concert, held this year at its annual spring concert from March 28 to April 1.

Ron Berg, curriculum director of the Somerset school district, and Debra Heyerdahl, director of instruction and staff development at the New Richmond school district, co-presented with Manke. The three were introduced during Manke's first year at UW-RF and have worked on various projects jointly since then.

"I was very pleased with the conference," says Manke. "The presentation went very well, and it was professionally rejuvenating." Manke also states that many attendees approached her following the presentation to express their approval.

Working with the North Carolina Baptist Men and the Disaster Relief Operation Center, the UW-RF contingent spent each day rebuilding homes: repairing roofs, installing sheet rock, insulating walls and roofs, and removing trees.

After the initial interest, Turner decided to take a group of students down south during winter break to help in the relief efforts. He first contacted University of Southern Mississippi's Assistant Dean of Students Michael Mitchell. UW-RF worked with USM on an a Adopt-a-Student program this fall after the hurricane in which UW-RF students donated money and items to help 100 students at that institution harmed by the storm. Turner then contacted the organization Volunteers of America, which is a clearinghouse program for volunteers.

"I expressed that we wanted to be in Mississippi, and they said that Gulfport was one of their biggest needs. It's a smaller community than New Orleans and a lot of students from Southern Mississippi are from that region," says Turner.

The students completed six training sessions before leaving for the trip, emphasizing the definitions of service, diversity, reflections and the importance of these themes. The idea of coping was addressed as well as reflection on the entire experience. "The most meaningful thing for me is to help students reflect on themselves," says Turner.

Students kept individual journals throughout the trip as well as group journals. Turner would like to have the students look at what they accomplished and see the effects and look to see what they can do next, even in their own communities.

Many students have kept in contact with other volunteers and Gulfport residents and are planning to return in a trip planned by the University during Spring Break. Other students plan to create a web site about the experience with photos and links.

The presentation is part of the Student Development Workshop series sponsored by the Office of the Dean of Student Development and Campus Diversity. For more information contact Judy Kubera at ext. 3711.

The presentation will involve "The Case of the Rock and Roll Partnership," which is an exercise for undergraduate law students that demonstrates how business and law knowledge applies to real life. The exercise is intended to bridge the gap between the classroom and actual situations. Rogers and Kilian will explain how the exercise was evolved and adapted for classroom use and evaluation techniques for simulations.

The reception will showcase works from faculty and staff including authors, editors, scholars, performing artists and musicians who have had work released during the 2005 calendar year. The reception is free and open to the public.

The choir has brought audiences to their feet at churches, schools, prisons, conferences and festivals. Their music ranges from inspirational spirituals to rocking contemporary gospel tunes. The Gospel Choir strives to share the "good news" of gospel music with diverse audiences, leaving them energized, hopeful and filled with spirit.

L to R: Adam Helbach, a senior from Brule, Wis., plays the character Michael, a college professor in Beirut, Lebanon, who is taken hostage by Islamic fundamentalists. Kate Garlock, a sophomore from Little Canada, Minn., plays Lainie, the wife of a hostage who lashes out against government policies, triggering a startling conclusion.

Sponsored by the UW-RF's African-American Alliance, the celebration combines skits, singing, dancing, interpretive dance, slide shows and music. The performance will be presented as a timeline and will finish with contributors of today and also honor influential African Americans who have recently died including Rosa Parks and Richard Pryor.

"We want to make it clear that the African American culture is distinct and we want the audience to understand the historical aspect of the traditions," says Tyra Nelson the multicultural advisor at UW-RF and advisor for the alliance.

"At this historical moment, with globalization speeding us ever more rapidly towards a toxic and uncertain future, environmental writing reminds us that how we treat the earth is not separate from how we treat one another," said Gaard.

"Home Is Where You Are," her current creative nonfiction book, is a departure from her books of traditional scholarship. It combines her experiences from rock climbing and glacier travel to volunteering in soup kitchens and meditating on mountains in order to explore the relationships between humans and nature.

Gaard is a founding member of the Minnesota Green Party, and she continues her activism by serving on the board of directors for the Environmental Association for Great Lakes Education (EAGLE). Next year Gaard will be teaching a new general education course in English, "Literature of Environmental Justice," that she has developed.

Gaard has been reading, writing and teaching environmental literature for more than 20 years. Before joining UW-RF she was an assistant and associate professor of composition and women's studies at the University of Minnesota-Duluth. She also was an associate professor of humanities at Western Washington University in Bellingham.

Her presentation is part of a series sponsored by the English department that is designed to acquaint its majors and minors and the larger community with the writing interests of the department's faculty. The next faculty presentation will be Monday, April 24 on "Academics and Fans Unite: A Harry Potter Conference/Convention," presented by Annette Klemp.

Upcoming stargazing sessions include March 27-30 and April 24-27. Each session includes an introductory talk highlighting recent astronomical news or providing an in-depth look at one or more of the objects visible that night.

It is often best to arrive sometime after the start of an observing session to avoid waiting in line. In addition to the main telescope under the dome, one or two smaller telescopes will be set up on the observing deck.

A physics department faculty member, student or guest astronomer will staff each telescope and be available to answer any questions. Observers are encouraged to stay and look at as many elements as possible and feel free to request personal observing targets.

"We always try and do a little bit better than we had in preceding years," Campbell said. "These things fluctuate a lot so we use a three-year rolling average. We want to submit more grant proposals than we have in the last three years and receive more dollars."

"UW-River Falls faculty members have pursued external grants this year with continuing success," said Betz. "These grants represent a margin of excellence and opportunity for faculty and students. Securing grants is important work for our institution, and those involved are to be commended."

The College of Education and Professional Studies received a continuing grant of $334,624 for the campus Upward Bound program. Upward Bound is a federally funded program that prepares participants in the skills needed for postsecondary education. Jill Moe, director of Upward Bound, submitted the grant.

College of Arts and Sciences Dean Doug Johnson received a UW System grant to establish a center for the scholarship of teaching and learning on campus. Physics Professor Jim Madsen's ongoing research and participation in the IceCube project in Antarctica was funded from the National Science Foundation. Chemistry Professor David Rusterholz received a WiSYS technology grant to fund a project investigating capsaicin analogs for analgesic effectiveness.

"I enjoyed working with the professionals who taught the classes," said Buske. "Just getting out there to meet the people who have been in the workplace, as well as learning more about how the business works was a reward."

Classes are taught by UW-RF faculty and qualified professionals in the financial services industry. All classes are held in evenings and on weekends to accommodate working adults and are located in Hudson and River Falls.

Krueger was born in Torrington, Wy. Before graduating high school he had lived in 11 houses, in eight cities, and in six states. He says some of the best years were spent in Hood River, Ore. "When people ask me where I am from, I usually lay that [honor] on Oregon."

The library breezeway has been the site of student, faculty and guest-author readings since 1996. The reading series is an opportunity for all UW-RF students to read original poetry, short fiction, and creative nonfiction to fellow students, faculty, staff and community members. Guest poets and writers are also invited to read once a semester.

"Two Rooms" is a drama, written in the 1980s, that tells the story of a couple separated by terrorism and united by fear. It examines the issue of terrorism from both a personal and a political perspective and bristles with tropical relevance for these uneasy times.

The play offers a microcosm into one the most immediate issues of our time: the confrontation of cultures against the background of history and economics. It describes the journey of a man taken hostage in Lebanon, details the anguish of his wife, and examines the social policy surrounding terrorism.

The Western Wisconsin Partnership, created in 1998, has trained more than 400 social workers already in the field to increase their knowledge about current issues and best practices. The partnership consists of western Wisconsin social service agencies, UW-RF and the Wisconsin Division of Children and Family Services.

Jennifer Borup, director of the project, has been with the program since its creation. She was approached by one of the members of the original partnership located at UW-Green Bay about creating a new partnership and finding a university to house it.  Borup, a certified independent social worker with a degree in social work from UW-Madison, looked to UW-RF to be the site of what would become the WWP.

The Western Wisconsin Partnership is funded by both the state and the county, as well as a federal Title IV-E grant. This year it was awarded a continuing grant of $521,477 from the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services. The program works by recruiting highly qualified supervisors from county agencies to lend their knowledge to area social workers.

Other trainers come from around the nation as experts on specific topics. Each trainer is extensively prepared before giving a workshop, and usually a supervisor is paired with an expert to co-present the program.

Workshops are varied in topic, and a few planned for this spring include "Bridges Out of Poverty," "Ethics and Boundaries," and "Working With Non-Offending Parents in Child Sexual Abuse Cases."  The programs are held locally so that the attending social workers do not have to allow extended absences at work to travel.

According to Borup, problems with drug dependencies, especially methamphetamine, are contributing heavily to the caseloads of county social workers.  She also says that she's seeing more children with serious mental illness, a growing concern in the area of social work.

UW-RF faculty and students also attend workshops created by the Western Wisconsin Partnership. Faculty members are then able to take materials back to their classrooms, while students get their "metaphorical feet wet." Borup says that UW-RF social work alumni are a common sight at the seminars.

Directed by music Professor Jong-Won Park, the Concert Choir has earned recognition as one of the top collegiate choirs in the Midwest. It was the only collegiate choir from the UW System selected to perform at the convention.

The choir has received critical acclaim for its enthusiastic musicality and beautiful choral tone, says Park. The choir performs standard sacred and secular choral literature dating from the renaissance era to the 21st century.

The choir has also toured Europe. Last May the choir made its debut Asian tour, performing with the well-known World Vision Children's Choir and the Kang-Neung City Professional Choir. The choir also performed at the world-renowned Muse Concert Hall in Tokyo during its visit to Japan. The choir also performs annually in the United States and travels overseas every other year.

In addition to his administrative duties at UW-RF, Splett also teaches introductory agricultural economics, advanced microeconomic theory, agricultural accounting, agriculture law, farm management and horticulture management. He is a former chair of the UW-RF department of agricultural economics.

The CBE has been working on becoming accredited by the Association to Advance Collegiate Schools of Business International through a five-year process - since 2001 when it transitioned from a School of Business and Economics to a college. Membership in this group of accredited colleges is an honor--only 30 percent of business colleges in the country and 15 percent internationally have earned its approval.

The AACSB International Peer Review Team will meet with the CBE advisory board, faculty, assessment committee, curriculum committee, student organizations, Chancellor Don Betz, Provost Ginny Coombs as well as tour campus facilities and administrative offices that support the College. Reviewers also will meet with students informally and sit in on at least two courses: a business strategy undergraduate course and a graduate finance course.

The team will assess the College's readiness for accreditation and will submit its evaluations to the AACSB International. This site visit could be followed by additional recommendations to achieve accreditation.

"This will make a difference in student and faculty recruiting," said CBE Dean Barbara Nemecek. "It will affect everything from graduates who are job-seeking, to employers who will want to associate with us."

Internationally, the process included producing an almost 500-page document describing the mission statement, the vision and values of the CBE, and how the College and University support them. Other documents have also been completed since then to answer specific questions from the AASCB team.

"The beauty of a memorandum of understanding is that it opens up the dialogue for a thorough review of opportunities," said Chancellor Don Betz. "The commitment to international education is more than alive here at UW-River Falls."

Schoessow is currently a senior at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls, where she is pursuing a degree in marketing communications with an agriculture emphasis. She has been active in 4-H, Agricultural Communicators of Tomorrow, Alpha Zeta fraternity, and Sigma Alpha Sorority.

As Fairest of the Fair, Schoessow becomes the spokesperson for the Wisconsin Association of Fairs, where she will travel to many of the state's county, district and state fairs this summer. She will also serve as the official host of the Wisconsin State Fair.

Three spoken-word artists will perform their politically charged poetry to inspire a dialogue with the audience. The three performers are from very diverse backgrounds: Byonn Bain, is a Harvard Law School graduate who was wrongfully arrested by New York city police; Jason Carney is a former skinhead from Texas, and Kevin Coval is a poet, emcee, essayist, activist and educator from Cape Town, South Africa.

"Human resources management is an ever-growing, complex and competitive facet of the business world," says Sally Field, human resources practitioner and instructor for the course. "No one can afford to forego opportunities to maximize their knowledge and potential in the field."

Classes are held Monday evenings beginning Feb. 20 on the UW-River Falls campus. In the course, human resource professionals and general managers will review the key concepts in human resource management and discuss current issues affecting human resources. Participants will also be able to network with other professionals and share experiences that help them deal with the growing complexities of their field. The course will cover a variety of topics ranging from strategic management to occupational health, safety and security.

The UW-RF Outreach and Graduate Studies Office provides lifelong learners with academic, professional development and enrichment programs that are practical, flexible, convenient and affordable. A complete list of courses, course descriptions and online registration information is available at its Web site listed above.

The story of four young 1950s crooners who finally get a chance to record their one and only album includes such great standards as "Three Coins in the Fountain," "Cry," "Catch a Falling Star," and "Love is a Many Splendored Thing."

The romantic story details the lifelong written correspondence and bittersweet relationship between Andrew Makepeace Ladd III and Melissa Gardner. "Love Letters" will also tour to several cities in western Wisconsin earlier in June, with dates and locations to be announced.

Roles are available for children and adults, men and women. Local auditions for the three musicals are Feb. 18 in the Blanche Davis Theatre and begin at 9 a.m. for college age and older and at 1 p.m. for high school age and younger. Callbacks are scheduled for 6 p.m. that same day.

Chancellor Don Betz was among a select group of 125 chief executive officers from higher education institutions and national secondary education advocacy groups who attended the event on Jan. 5-6 in Washington, D.C.

According to Betz, also observing the summit were numerous U.S. senators, members of Congress, Cabinet secretaries, ambassadors and federal employees, leading to heightened expectations for the future.

He noted, " There were multiple references to our national response to Sputnik in the 1950s and '60s. Our hosts cited the necessity for national collaboration to focus on a new national priority: to be a nation prepared to lead in an increasingly competitive global marketplace and political arena where national security and higher education are linked. "

The highlight of the conference was an announcement by President Bush that he will seek $114 million for a national security language initiative. It will provide money to higher education and school districts for education in Arabic, Chinese, Russian, Persian, Hindi and Central Asian languages. It also will provide funds for additional Fulbright Scholarships to send Americans overseas and to bring scholars to the U.S. to study.

"I'll tell you what's really neat, is to sit down with leaders from around the world, welcome them in the Oval Office or go to their office, they say, you know, Mr. President, I went to Texas A&M, or I went to Stanford -- like President Toledo of Peru," the President related.  "It makes it so much easier to conduct foreign policy and diplomacy when you've got that common ground of being able to talk about a university experience here in the United States. It makes it so much easier to be able to advance the interests of this country when you're dealing with a leader who doesn't have a preconceived notion about what America is all about, because he spent time studying here in the United States."

Undersecretary of State Karen Hughes outlined the administration's initiatives, which closely paralleled issues raised by national higher education associations that advocate for international education experiences.

States, including facilitating easier entry into the nation for bona fide students. Hughes and the other speakers acknowledged that restrictions on travel following Sept. 11 th have become overly stringent, causing international students to seek their education in other nations.

First Lady Laura Bush will lead the first of several delegations of university presidents and chancellors overseas to help rebuild recruitment efforts. New Fulbright Scholarships will be created to bring international students to the states to help in language and international education courses.

"The clarion call from Secretaries Rice and Spellings as well as from the First Lady and Karen Hughes was a commitment to public service, to become involved in some dimension of America's multifaceted international initiatives and programs," Betz said. "We want our students to become the face of  America abroad whether it's via the Foreign Service, Department of Commerce and dozens of other gateways to serving the country by connecting with other peoples and cultures in their native lands."

Betz has long had an interest in international affairs. He holds a doctorate in international studies with his dissertation on the Arab-Baath Party in Syria. He was a staff member for several years in the United Nations working with the International Peace Conference on the Question of Palestine. For 17 years, he was chairman of the United Nations-affiliated International Coordinating Committee for Non-Governmental Organizations on the Question Palestine.

Recently the chancellor was a panelist at a national conference of the American Association of State Colleges and Universities in which he spoke on strategies to engage the Arab world in higher education activities with U.S. universities.

The UW-RF Semester Abroad program is one of the oldest study experiences in the University of Wisconsin System, with students living in Europe each fall while conducting extensive independent research projects.

Most recently, the University launched an International Traveling Classroom in which two dozen students in the spring of 2006 will travel Europe while enrolled in six courses provided by faculty, supplemented by the their travel activities.

Kadison said that students at UW-River Falls face the same stresses and issues that students on other campuses face such as depression, eating disorders and sleep deprivation. Kadison urged workshop participants to consider the individual roles that college personnel, parents and students play in balancing academic demands and mental health needs.

All college personnel can be a part of alleviating the crisis. "Dining hall staff can see eating disorders; residential staff can see behaviors," said Kadison. "Faculty and senior administration must take student well-being seriously and provide resources."

Faculty, staff, parents, administrators, students and community members can all be an active part of the solution if they learn to recognize the symptoms associated with being overwhelmed, Kadison said. In addition parents, faculty and staff can take steps to ensure that students have access to appropriate care and help identify and reduce the sources of stress that pushes too many college students to the edge.

Counseling services on and off campus are available for students, and students should be urged to make use of these recourses. Kadison noted that studies have indicated that students who seek counseling services may achieve an increase in their grade point averages.

Kadison has been a member of the faculty at Harvard since 1994. He received his undergraduate degree from Brown University and attended Loyola University Medical School. He did residencies in both adult and child psychiatry and has special interest in working with student athletes and those with eating disorders.

"Forest," Klefstad's work, will be installed in Gallery 101 Feb. 7 - 28. The subject of the installation features interlocking forms and shifting light patterns of a forest near her Minnesota home. Originally created for the Duluth Art Institute's John Steffl Gallery, "Forest" is a maze-like environment of 4' x 8' plywood panels painted using roofing tar with images of trees and animals. The resulting installation produces a  "cubist forest" in which visual perspective is constantly changing.

Klefstad's desire to examine and translate the forest experience into an art installation stems from her belief that human perception of the natural world helps shape and determine thought processes. By looking at the forms and structures of the forest, Klefstad says she believes humans can gain a better understanding of their relationship to the world.

"As a species, we seem to need to perceive, in a deep way, the appearances of the natural world," says Klefstad. "The vast complexity of a forest is bordering on chaos but is never chaotic, driven as it is by the purposive patternmaking DNA of thousands of entities - organisms as attached to life as we are; organisms that embody their knowledge; organisms that are their own language, their own significance. I think we must trust that our desire to see and know these forms is also significant, and that this desire shapes our own thoughts and understanding of ourselves and our relationships to the world."

"The incredible complexity of all the brachiating organisms, each with its own driving purposes that form its branching directions, layered hundreds deep - this can't really be fully captured by anything but photography," Klefstad notes.

Klefstad returns to the studio with these images and projects them onto sheets of plywood. Next she begins the process of capturing not just the lines of the trees and branches on the plywood, but the energy and spirit of the woods in which she hikes.

"The projections are vibratingly complex as I see them overlaid on the grain patterns of the wood," she says. "I get on a ladder and, with a big graphite stick, start following the flows of the limbs out to the twigs, quickly, so the line stays fresh and informative. This is a kind of mindless state, given over to nothing but seeing and following the lines of the trees. Where there are pools of darkness - the thick foliage of pines that shade into black, or the deep shade between trees - I wipe the graphite across the dark, creating spreading outlines of depth."

Klefstad responds to the interplay between the natural grains of the plywood surface on which she is working and the texture of the projected forest. When she feels she has captured the essential space of the forest she picks up her asphaltum-soaked brush and begins painting.

First focusing on the deep voids between trees, Klefstad brushes the tar deeply into the surface of her preliminary drawing. "It's like carving, digging into the surface with the dark tar, which lifts the trees and pushes them into the foreground. The effects become uncannily spatial," explains Klefstad.

Beyond the trees and scattered deer that inhabit the "Forest," the artist has added an imaginary population she calls "the elementals." These leafy-headed humans, posed in dramatic gestures, add a layer of imagination to the forest.

"It was a desire to lighten the idea of the forest, to ensure that humans of many forms and levels of reality had a home there - just as Shakespeare's comedies, Greek pastorals, and fairy tales take place in forests, [the work suggests] realms of life more intensely lived than is possible in our overly civilized cities and towns," explains Klefstad.

Klefstad graduated from St. Olaf College with a triple major in fine arts (sculpture), English, and a self-designed major in philosophy and the aesthetics of metaphor. She has completed graduate-level study in visual arts, literature, critical theory and aesthetics. Klefstad is also a critic and scholar of the relationship between art and everyday life. She also writes reviews, editorials and critiques of contemporary art for mnartists.org and teaches writing at the University of Minnesota-Duluth.

Palmquist teaches applied voice, vocal and choral pedagogy and class voice. She has a B.A. degree from Bethel College, an M.A. degree from Eastern Michigan University and a doctor of musical arts degree from the University of Minnesota. She has performed, toured and recorded with the Dale Warland Singers through its final season in 2004. She has also sung with the Chicago Symphony Orchestra and with Dominick Argento.

Bartsch is a very active freelance accompanist/pianist. He appears frequently on the recital stage at a wide variety of venues and is also in demand as a competition and audition accompanist. As a solo keyboard player, Bartsch has released 18 recordings on the Liquid8 label. He is an organist and choir director at the Temple of Aaron Synagogue in St. Paul, Minn., and an organist at St. James Lutheran Church in Crystal, Minn. He lives in Bloomington, Minn., with his wife and daughters.

"A well-thought out business plan is one of the most critical aspects of going into business," says Steve DeWald, director of the University's SBDC. "It is a key requirement in securing a business loan. In addition, it serves as an important road map for your business."

At the end of the 12-week session, students will have produced a comprehensive business plan. The course covers all aspects of creating a business plan from the mission statement and objectives to marketing, financials, legal structures and future growth.

In addition to training sessions, the SBDC offers one-on-one confidential business counseling to persons who would like to start a business, have recently started a business or are thinking of growing their business. The SBDC also counsels small business owners seeking help in resolving a business issue. There is no charge for the one-on-one counseling sessions at the center.

To be eligible for an MNLA scholarship, applicants must possess a "C" grade average or better, present letters of recommendation from instructors and employers, and submit an essay stating their career goals and objectives.

The UW-River Falls College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences offers a major in horticulture with two options: professional horticulture or landscape design and contracting. Since 1912, the College has earned an outstanding reputation for excellence in education and service to the state, region, nation and the world.

The Minnesota Nursery and Landscape Association is the state's largest green industry trade association with more than 1,500 member companies. Members include nurseries, garden centers, landscape contractors, landscape designers, irrigation contractors, commercial flower growers, tree care specialists, professional gardening services, and turf and landscape management professionals.

In announcing the selection, Chancellor Don Betz cited Gallenberg's expertise in his discipline, extension experiences, skill at administrating and collaborating across numerous academic departments, and his strong record of assisting in the economic development of the agriculture industry.

"As a member of UW-River Falls leadership team, Dale will collaborate across the University and throughout the state to ensure that Wisconsin's agriculture industry continues to prosper and advance," Betz said.

Gallenberg holds a bachelor's degree in plant pathology and horticulture from UW-Madison. He received master's and doctorate degrees in plant pathology from Cornell University, where he also served for six years as a research assistant.

He joined SDSU in 1984 as an extension plant pathologist and faculty member. He held that post for 11 years, developing and implementing statewide educational programs in plant disease management. On an annual basis, Gallenberg was in direct contact with some 2,500 producers and others in South Dakota's agriculture industry.

His responsibilities found him collaborating with other extension specialists and researchers from SDSU and other universities, county extension agents and educators, state and federal government agency personnel, commodity group representatives, crop consultants, industry personnel and the media. At SDSU Gallenberg was an active researcher as well, receiving numerous grants for work on a variety of topics. He was also involved in undergraduate and graduate teaching.

In 1996 he was selected to serve as the head of the plant science department where he also is a professor. That department is the largest at SDSU and is multidisciplinary with a broad scope of programs in teaching, research, extension and outreach, as well as technical service. Gallenberg directed more than 100 faculty and staff members in crop science, soil and water sciences, entomology, plant pathology and weed science.

In his current position he has extensive experience partnering with South Dakota's crop commodity groups and other agricultural industry organizations, including the Crop Improvement Association, Wheat Commission, Soybean Research and Promotion Council, Corn Utilization Council and Oilseeds Council.  Additionally, he served as chair of the board of directors of the South Dakota Foundation Seed Stocks Division.

"I sincerely appreciate the opportunity being given to me to join the UW-River Falls family as the next dean of the College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences. The institution is filled at all levels with people who are dedicated, energetic, effective and professional in how they conduct themselves and their programs.

"I look forward to working with the faculty, staff and students in the college, along with the rest of the university leadership team, and supporters across the state and region, as we move forward in completing the mission of UW-RF and CAFES."

Gallenberg was selected following an extensive national search. Chairing that committee was Professor Douglas Johnson, director of UW-RF's graduate studies program and associate dean in the College of Arts and Sciences.

"The search process attracted a very strong pool of highly qualified applicants and Dr. Gallenberg quickly emerged as one of the top candidates," Johnson said. "His background and experience make him an excellent fit for the college and his campus visit confirmed that he has the qualities we were seeking in a new dean. I am confident that Dr. Gallenberg will be a great addition to the leadership team at UW-River Falls."

The College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences enrolls about 1,100 students, making it one of the largest undergraduate non-land grant programs in the nation.  Founded in 1912, it offers majors in business, education, engineer technology, animal science, biotechnology, conservation, crop and soils sciences, dairy science, horticulture, geology, environmental science, food science and technology, land use planning and marketing communications. The College also offers a pre-veterinary science program.

One of the premiere authorities on collegiate mental health, Kadison will share his expertise with the University of Wisconsin-River Falls in a day-long workshop for faculty, staff, students, their parents, and the community including health professionals on Jan. 19, beginning at 9:30 a.m. in Abbott Concert Hall in the Kleinpell Fine Arts building.

Kadison's workshop, free and open to the public, begins with an hour-long general talk on college mental health issues. At 10:30 a.m., a coffee break is planned in the Kleinpell Fine Arts lobby.  The workshop will move back into Abbott Concert Hall at 11 a.m. for a breakout session in which participants will be given the opportunity to discuss proposed solutions to the problem, as well as examine plans other universities have set into place.  This session is also open to the public.

Kadison will be meeting with the "Campus of the Overwhelmed" reading group for a lunch session. The group was formed after UW-RF received a $2,500 grant from the Association of American Colleges and Universities Bringing Theory to Practice Project.  The grant allowed for the purchase of 30 of Kadison's books, as well as funding Kadison's visit. Members of the group will be able to share their thoughts and feedback with Kadison.

At 1:15 p.m., Kadison will be meeting with faculty members to discuss their concerns, as well as ways to deal with mental health issues of students. Kadison will also hold a session at 2:30 p.m. for university administration, health staff and residential living staff in which solutions to the problem will be talked about.

Gretchen Link, a licensed independent clinical social worker and UW-RF counseling services staff member, says she hopes those who participate in the workshop will gain a better understanding of student mental health issues, as well as learning about how to assist students.

Kadison has been a member of the faculty at Harvard since 1994.  He received his undergraduate degree from Brown University and attended Loyola University Medical School.  He did residencies in both adult and child psychiatry and has special interest in working with student athletes and those with eating disorders.

"We expect about 200 new students, most of whom are transferring from other educational institutions," said Alan Tuchtenhagen, executive director of enrollment services. "Our location, affordability and broad array of academic programs makes us a very popular choice for transfer students."

According to Tuchtenhagen, the majority of transfer students are entering the College of Business and Economics. A number of evening courses and online courses for both undergraduate and graduate students are available, and these offerings are popular with both working adults and transfer students, he said. Student can take either a full-time or part-time schedule of classes.

Classes start Jan. 23 and registration is Jan. 19 for all new incoming students including transfer students. Students must be admitted before registering. On-campus housing is available as is financial aid for those who qualify.

Several courses for teachers are now offered online. One such course is "The Quest for New Teaching Tools: WebQuest." The class features technology training, instruction in using WebQuests, and the creation of a WebQuest for the teacher's classroom. All work will be posted for viewing and discussion by fellow teachers. The course begins Jan. 23, and runs through March 3. Anyone wishing to sign up for this class must first be admitted to the UW-RF graduate program. Insstructor is Trent Bennig, a high school computer science teacher and technology coordinator. To apply online, visit http://apply.wisconsin.edu.

The University of Wisconsin Outreach and Graduate Studies Office provided lifelong learners with academic and professional development programs that are practical, flexible, convenient and affordable. All students must be admitted to the UW-RF graduate program before registering for credit courses.

In the wake of these riots, the tensions in disadvantaged communities are very obvious. Butler will discuss how France is coping with its legacy of immigration and discuss key differences between the way France and the United States deal with issues of ethnic and religious diversity. She will also explore the potential consequences of inadequate solutions to this problem and if France is at risk of becoming the next potential recruiting ground for Islamic fundamentalist groups.

The travelers include an American Zionist who supports the policies of the Sharon government, an Orthodox Israeli settler, an American Jew who supports many of the tenets of Zionism while disagreeing with Israel's current approach, and an Israeli eclectic who favors the eventual creation of a single Israeli-Palestinian state. Because of a terrorist threat, the four fall under suspicion and are detained by Israeli airport security.

The five cast members are from various states and have diverse religious affiliations, but they share a commitment to work toward healing and mutual understanding among Arabs and Israelis as well as Americans concerned about this area of the Middle East. The performance is grounded in the perspective that by honestly engaging with points of contention, respectful dialogue can general new perspectives, new insights and new possibilities.

Senior Outreach at the Phipps offers a series of four sessions centering on a exhibit, performance, discussion or presentation by artists, directors, writers, authors, musicians, historians and other art professionals.

In conjunction with the Prism of Longing art exhibit and the "Peace in the House" performance at the Phipps, the program's theme explores issues of the Middle East, including the differences, connections and commonalities of Judaism, Christianity and Islam.

More than 10,000 schools in this country have community education programs, according to the Charles Stewart Mott Foundation, and few opportunities exist for the formal training to support these programs. Educators say such training is especially urgent with the advent of hundreds of new and continuing after-school programs being developed as a result of the No Child Left Behind Act.

The UW-River Falls program is comprised of four, three-credit graduate classes and one, three-credit practicum. Cohorts begin in January and June and allow students to complete the program entirely online within a year.

This program is designed for anyone who aspires to engage communities in comprehensive and effective school-community partnerships including community education directors, after-school project directors and others such as principals, school administrators, extension agents and adult educators.

This program is offered with assistance from NCEA leadership. This certificate closely aligns and partially fulfills the skill requirements for NCEA's Administrative Competency Endorsement and/or the Applied Professional Program Leadership Endorsement.

Stan Potts, director of UW-RF's program, says that benefits to participants include the ability to complete all course work online and with a cohort of peers, the use of multimedia for an interactive learning experience, the opportunity to enhance credibility by obtaining a graduate-level certificate in community education, and development of skills necessary for the NCEA Administration Endorsement requirements.

Because the course is offered via the Internet, students can attend from anywhere and pay Wisconsin graduate credit. All participants must apply and meet minimum requirements for graduate study at UW-RF. Visit the web site at http://www.uwrf.edu/ogs  and select Graduate Studies>Programs>Service Learning for more information or contact program coordinator Potts via email stanley.j.potts@uwrf.edu.

Students share their research with AgStar employees as well as UW-River Falls faculty and students in special presentations each semester. Several of this year's recipients have submitted their research to agriculture publications, and one student is going to present at a national conference in 2006.        Hadley says the  research project helps develop the students' critical thinking skills. He also said that students  in the AgStar Scholars program will be well-prepared for  careers in agriculture.

Deters, a Wayzata, Minn., native and an art teacher at Cloquet High School in Cloquet, Minn., cites art as her lifelong passion, with special interests in nature and country scenes, as well as calligraphy.

"Ever since I was a child, I knew that I wanted to pursue art. The 'art gene' is in our family," says Deters. "My mother painted in oils prior to my birth. Also, there was plenty of random stuff around the house to entice the creative spirit. We had the best junk drawers, better than a toy box any day."

Probably because of the junk-drawer influence, Deters says she has a fascination with art constructed from recyclable materials. Deters' students use donated vinyl scraps from local sign-makers to create various works of art for Art of Peace, a non-profit corporation which encourages artists to create works which express a message of global understanding.

Students at Deters' school also produced the Deck of Art project, in which 52 works of art created exclusively by the students were turned into playing cards. The cards are sold all over the world, including Israel, Japan, and most recently, Iraq.

"I want my students to realize the creative gifts that they all have.  I want them to realize that their peers all have gifts to offer and each are valuable - that no one should be overlooked or taken for granted," says Deters. "My goal is for them to be able to see the multitude of possibilities in everything.  I want to empower them to see the beauty around them."

Deters has established  "artist residences'" at her school, in which various artists come in and work closely with the students on creating a project. Both a muralist and and a metalsmith visited to share their experiences with Deters' students. "The students worked intensively with these artists and created works of art that connect them with the school forever. Their work was and is meaningful at many levels for themselves and every viewer," says Deters.

The executive board of the Art Educators of Minnesota chose Deters for the extraordinary opportunities she affords her students. Pam Signorelli, then president of Art Educators of America, presented Deters with the award at the association's annual awards luncheon.

Deters says she never regrets her decision to become an art teacher, citing her absolute love of encouraging others to create beauty in the world around them. Her award as Minnesota's Art Educator of the Year has only strengthened her convictions as a teacher.

Growing up among the lush forests, majestic mountains and clear lakes of central Maine, Ridley attended the University of Maine, graduating with a bachelor's degree in biochemistry. After graduation, Ridley served three years with the U.S. Peace Corps, teaching science in Nigeria. He then returned to the University of Maine and completed a master's degree in bacteriology and a Ph.D. in plant science with a food science emphasis.

After graduation, Ridley and his wife, Janet, found the Midwest very attractive, and he gladly accepted the food science teaching position he was offered. In 1980, he was asked to serve as assistant dean while the late Dean Jim Dollahon was on sabbatical. Ridley then served as associate dean under both Gary Rohde and Bill Anderson and became dean of the college in 2002.

During his time at UW-RF, Ridley says he has most treasured his one-on-one time with the students. He also thoroughly enjoyed classroom experiences and hopes that over the years he left a legacy to the graduates. "Students are attracted to our small campus atmosphere to receive more individual attention, and that's what we're all about," explained Ridley. "While other universities may attract students from within a small radius of their campuses, CAFES is continually recognized as having a truly statewide reputation for attracting students from all corners of Wisconsin."

This individual attention has an enduring effect. "Steve has cultivated many long-lasting relationships and is continuously in contact with alumni," says Food Science Professor Purnendu Vasavada, who has worked with Ridley on many research and service projects around the country and abroad over the years. "Many of his former students have benefited from his courses and development."

Ridley says that one challenge facing the University is to maintain a reputation of excellence in teaching while facing budget cuts. "Times are getting tougher, and state funding has decreased dramatically. It will be a major challenge to figure out how to live and work within our means," said Ridley. "Do we compensate by dropping programs and staff? Tough decisions will need to be made."

A new Dairy Learning Center on campus is one goal Ridley and other UW-RF staff, alumni, community members, legislators and industry leaders have worked toward over the years. "I'm very optimistic, and we should know for sure by early spring if it's a go," he said.

Despite the reality of funding challenges, enrollment at UW-River Falls continues to rise, which Ridley says he believes is mainly influenced by alumni accomplishments and the long-standing reputation of UW-RF and the college.

Animal Science Professor Tony Jilek believes Ridley's vision has also been a major factor for increased enrollment within CAFES. "CAFES is already well recognized, but Ridley has helped maintain our reputation as well as the outstanding qualities our college possesses," said Jilek.

As Ridley's job description evolved from teaching to administration duties, he says he's especially enjoyed the professional working relationships within the college and across campus.  Ridley is also quick to credit administrators and deans from the other colleges for their ability to work well with one another and to create an open spirit among the faculty, fostering cooperation and collaboration across campus.

"Dean Ridley will definitely be missed," says Jilek. "He has been a fixture in the college for many years. He has an excellent grasp of the college and what it means to us. It will be hard to find his replacement."

Vasavada has known Ridley since he joined UW-River Falls in 1977. "Steve is an excellent leader who has provided mentoring to the junior faculty, especially within the food science department," says Vasavada, who also noted that CAFES has made tremendous progress since Ridley has been dean because of his vision of the future of CAFES. "He is always open-minded to new and exciting opportunities and has always encouraged faculty to go after them."

As an alumnus having taken classes from Ridley and now a food science professor at UW-RF, Bonnie Walters feels he's just as supportive of the students now as he was then. "Steve is very student centered," said Watters. "He's always been there to support students and the college's organizations--not just in food science--but also for students throughout the college."

In addition to his campus responsibilities, Ridley is also active in numerous organizations. He is on the board of directors for the Wisconsin Rural Leadership Program and is the University of Wisconsin representative to the Wisconsin Agriculture Education Leadership Council, which studies and makes recommendations about agriculture education in Wisconsin schools and universities.

UW-River Falls Chancellor Don Betz offers his sincere thanks for Ridley's service to the university as well. " His years of dedicated service leaves a lasting impression on students, colleagues and his disciplines. I thank Steve for the countless ways that he has served this institution and its students and has advanced UW-River Falls professional reputation."

Ridley was honored at a campus-wide reception on Dec. 21. As his days as CAFES dean wind down, Ridley has plenty of plans for retirement. He intends to spend time with his family, travel and catch-up on projects at his home. He's also interested in writing projects and open to working part-time if the right opportunity arises.

Developed in partnership with Watchable Wildlife, Inc., a Marine-on-St. Croix, Minn. nonprofit organization dedicated to promoting ecologically sustainable tourism, this graduate-level certificate program is designed for conservationists, educators, community leaders, planners, and recreation and hospitality providers to build the skills necessary to effectively preserve the natural resources and generate revenue for their communities. The program focuses on the basic knowledge and skills necessary to achieve positive economic impact and enhanced quality of life through the conservation of natural resources and managed tourism.

Learman, who is employed at the Office of International Studies, discussed the various scholarly international visits in which students from UW-RF are participating. Other topics talked about included the McNair Scholars Program and Plan 2008, a system-wide initiative to promote and increase diversity in both students and staff in the UW-System.

Regent Smith expressed interest in the scholarly lives of the student representatives present, asking about their plans after graduation.  Chair of the Board of Regents committee on student discipline and other student appeals, he also asked the students on their opinions ofnstudent segregated fees.

"Brent clearly appreciated our hospitality and our clear commitment to helping students learn and excel," says Chancellor Betz. "He also understood the challenges we face. I believe that he will be a consistent supporter as we pursue our goals. We look forward to visits from  other members of the Board of Regents in the coming months."

Sabbatical opportunities give faculty members uninterrupted time for projects that will increase their expertise in their fields, make new courses available, revise existing courses and create new scholarship, according to Ginny Coombs, provost and vice chancellor for academic affairs.

Kelly Cain, professor of environmental science, will be developing both Chinese and Spanish language versions of the Wildlife Recreation and Nature Tourism Graduate Certificate, an online course and the first of its kind in the United States, during his sabbatical. The Chinese version of program will be developed in partnership with Yunnan University, the Southwest Forest University in Kunming, China, and the Chinese Exploration and Research Society in Shangri-la. The Spanish versions will be in collaboration with the National Agrarian University in Managua, Nicaragua. The Chinese and Spanish language versions of WRNT will provide international internship opportunities for UW-RF students.

Jennifer Brantley, an associate professor of English, will spend a semester sabbatical in fall 2006 producing a monograph of multi-genre and interrelated nonfiction literary essays about Lake Superior and its ties to women. Brantley teaches courses in creative writing, poetry and classes for the women's studies minor, all of which will benefit from her work during the sabbatical.

Ruth Wood, professor of English, plans to use a semester long sabbatical in spring 2007 to improve a rubric used for assessment of student expository writing. She will use an initial rubric developed by UW-RF graduate student Paul Christiansen and revise it to reflect writing teachers' belief in the importance of content, organization, style, mechanics and voice. The result will be a more effective tool for assessing students preparing to be teachers and also for evaluating learning in English department courses.

Marshall Toman, professor of English, will use a full-year sabbatical to continue his work in Czech literature. He will translate selected sections of the second and third volumes of An Overview of Literary History , which deal with the literary history of Czechoslovakia throughout the 20th century. His work during the sabbatical will contribute to a new course for the university requirement in global perspectives.

Bernice Ficek-Swenson, professor of art, will use a spring semester sabbatical to begin work on a series of five photogravure etchings, exploring the relationship between water and stone. She will spend a two-week residency at the Athens School of Fine Arts in Greece as a visiting artist, and travel to Epidaurus and the Palace of Knossos in Crete. The content of her scholarship in Greece will be implemented in the studio courses she teaches at UW-River Falls.

University students split into two groups; each group was then designated to work at one of the schools. The university students spent about three class periods at the schools where they taught art lessons to the middle-school students.

The theme for Battle Creek Environmental Magnet Elementary School was "natural environment." The sixth grade students wanted the theme to reflect the natural environment such as flowers, plants, animals and bugs. UW-RF supplied the paints and other materials used to create the murals, however, students paid their own transportation to and from the schools.

Kelly Aherns, a junior English major from New Richmond, Wis., competed in informative speaking and oral program. Denise Burce, a freshman agricultural education major from Alma, Wis., competed in informative and persuasive speaking. Brooke Eglinton, a freshman speech communication major from Caledonia, Minn., competed in impromptu, persuasion and music interpretation. Melissa Lutes, a sophomore pre-professional major from Apple Valley, Minn., competed in persuasion and music interpretation.

January through April is a great time to visit the valley for wintertime activities as businesses, attractions and communities "Celebrate Winter on the Sparking St. Croix" as part of a promotional campaign, "Celebrate Winter on the Sparkling St. Croix," sponsored by the St. Croix Valley Regional Tourism Alliance. Many valley lodging establishments are offering special discounts and packages for skiing enthusiasts and other visitors.

Its Web site, www.saintcroixriver.com, features details on indoor cultural events and museums, hot air ballooning, downhill and cross-country skiing, state parks activities, an events calendar and lodging discounts.

Nestled between Minnesota and Wisconsin, the lower St. Croix River flows between bluffs of limestone and sandstone, beginning as a narrow gorge with steep vertical walls, then slowing and widening into the scenic Lake St. Croix.

In 1972, the 52-mile section of the river known as the lower St. Croix was designated a National Scenic Waterway, assuring that visitors will enjoy its natural treasures for years to come. Six state parks, more than 50 public and privately-owned parks and preserves, and scenic overlooks along the St. Croix make the region's natural beauty available for public use all year. In the winter, many of the state parks feature torchlight cross-country skiing, hiking or snow shoeing events. The spectacular Interstate Park in Wisconsin also offers customized nature tours.

This winter will heat up with Hudson's Hot Air Affair, a hot air balloon festival that features daily launches and a torchlight kazoo parade. Don't miss ehe exciting Moon Glow of balloons that lights up the winter night. Dates in 2006 are Feb. 3-5.

Visitors can stay at a cozy inn or bed-and-breakfast, enjoy pampering at many spas or antique shopping and sprees at the valley's scores of fine retail shops. Other outings can include stops at community museums and heritage centers, visits to art galleries and theatre performances, or a scenic drive along the river, followed by dining at outstanding restaurants. For others, a visit may include snowmobiling on area trails, an early spring round of golf at one of the valley's 24 courses, or attending a community event.

Walker's speech, titled "Maintaining our Commitment to Equal Opportunity," looked back at the history of equal opportunity and discussed how it remains relevant today.  He urged graduates to develop and foster a social conscience as they enter the world of work.

"We are not isolated individuals who always have an exclusive right to pursue our interests in any way we see fit ... Surely we have our interest, automony and individual rights," said Walker. "But we are also organically connected and have our responsibilities to each other. There has to be a certain willingness to share."

Walker also addressed the continuing trend of tax cuts in the competitive marketplace. "The evidence strongly suggests that education is central to expanding our productive capacity. At the same time increasing access to higher education has been instrumental in promoting a more equal distribution of income. We should be continually seeking to improve our educational system and expanding our access to higher education."

Walker teaches political economic discrimination, history of economic thought, modern economics, micro/macro economic principles, intermediate macroeconomics, statistics for business and economics, and ethnic studies.

Walker also was involved in the development of the ethnic studies minor at UW-RF. His recent research, completed during a sabbatical last year, included a survey of self-employed individuals in St. Croix County. Other research interests include gender and cultural differences in compensation and earnings.

He has served the campus in various capacities including interim chair of the department of economics and serving on various committees including general education, chancellor's award for excellence, faculty development and student affairs.

Schultz is founder and president of BioDiagnostics Inc., a seed testing and molecular breeding service laboratory in River Falls. Biodiagnostics has opened its doors to students and faculty for learning and research, providing more than 90 internships for UW-RF students and hiring more than two dozen graduates.

Palmer has served on the UW-RF Foundation Board for almost eight years. During most of this time he has served on its investment committee. Palmer assisted in the UW-RF C.H.I.L.D. Center building project and the planning and financing of the facility, which serves student, faculty, staff and community families. He has also served on UW-RF's chancellor search and screen committee and the College of Business and Economics Advisory Board.

"Mr. Palmer has been an extraordinary partner and advocate to the UW-River Falls as a skilled leader, as a legislative advocate and as a community partner whose commitment to building an effective partnership between the University and our surrounding communities all have been one of the first order," said Kinders.

Palmer has partnered with UW-RF on economic development initiatives and also served the community of River Falls as both a founding member and fundraising chair for the River Falls YMCA. He was instrumental in establishing the First National Bank of River Falls Compass Scholars scholarship, which gives a $5,000 annual, four-year scholarship to a student of color majoring in business as well as a part-time work during the school year and full-time employment during the summer. Current recipient DiAnna Steines, of Elk Mound, Wis., is a sophomore at UW-RF and an employee at the bank.

"I very much enjoy Tom's energy and 'can-do' attitude. His commitment to the University and the River Falls community is obvious in his words and actions," said Mary Halada, vice chancellor of administration and finance at UW-RF.

Faculty and staff who nominated Palmer agree that his attitude and commitment make him a worthy recipient of the award. "In the few short years that Tom has been in River Falls, he has become a leader in our community.  His willingness to give of his time and talents has been extremely advantageous to the University," said Halada.

Nearly 90 students have worked there as interns or in cooperative research capacities, and some two dozen UW-RF graduates have been hired at BioDiagnostics to date. The relationship between the University, Biodiagnostics and its president Quentin Schultz has become an important learning tool for many students as well as a research tool for faculty at the University.

" BioDiagnostics maintains an 'open-door' policy with regard to faculty research, student field trips, access to the facilities for tours and for allowing students to view procedures and technical operations," said Steve Ridley, dean of the College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences.

Schultz's commitment to the University doesn't stop with employing UW-RF alumni and students. He has consistently supported UW-RF in meetings with Wisconsin legislators and served as a community representative on the chancellor search and screen committee.

Schultz is also committed to the River Falls community. He spoke with governmental leaders at the 2001 Wisconsin Economic Summit II with a message about the importance of biotechnology and advanced economic development in western Wisconsin.

UW-RF biology Professor E. Katherine Miller said: "It was fortunate for the city of River Falls that Mr. Schultz chose to locate BioDiagnostics in this community. We can only wish for the continued success and growth of BioDiagnostics."

The Outstanding Service Award was established in 1983 to recognize individuals outside of the university community who have contributed to UW-RF through their support of the institution's goals and who volunteer their time on the University's behalf.

Concerns about the mental health of college students have risen substantially over the past decade. Numerous studies all point in the same direction: serious mental health problems are growing on campuses, and more professional resources are needed to solve them.

According to the National College Health Assessment survey administered to the University of Wisconsin-River Falls student body in 2003, some 96.3 percent of respondents "felt overwhelmed" by all they had to do one or more times within the last school year.

During fall semester, Brown, Caskey and Reilly-Myklebust facilitated two discussions, which were supported by grants from the Association of American Colleges and Universities and UW-RF. The sessions focused on student mental health issues on campus and explored opportunities to help alleviate the crisis.

Some of the many reasons why students are suffering from these problems are because students are over-committed, lack of sleep, grade pressures, depression and overall stress from work, school and life, says Caskey.

According to Reilly-Myklebust, from 2000 to 2003 more students have sought professional  counseling from the university's personal development staff. Because the university cannot meet the increased need, it offers students three sessions with an off-campus counselor contracted with the University at no cost.

The fall semester discussion sessions have given faculty, staff and the community a better understanding of the issues students deal with on campus, says Brown. Knowledge and understanding about what to do when a student is in need are two key elements to helping address the problem.

Caskey also says that as faculty, staff or professors have to get involved. "We have an obligation to help people grow intellectually and as human beings." He said ff problems are not identified early, it is possible that "student problems will spill over to the police and other community members."

Caskey said that student mental health problems are increasing because the world today is different than what it used to be. In the past, the drinking age was lower therefore there weren't concerns of underage consumption. Students today are more independent and consequently deal with more struggles. The pace of life is faster due to technology and globalization and can affect stress levels. There is a more diversity among the student body; for example students with disabilities self-identify as to their need of supports and services to attend college.

The next step, says Brown, is to complete additional grant applications to facilitate such efforts as providing more counseling services, creating programs to enhance safety and health on campus, and offering more information via University web pages on such health issues.

DEC. 16, 2005--The phrase "thirsty Thursdays" has been ingrained into many college students' minds since the fall of their freshman year. Such stereotypes of certain weekdays spawning habitual binge-drinking episodes have been linked to college campuses for several decades.

At the University of Wisconsin-River Falls, while alcohol abuse is always a concern, students are drinking at a lesser rate than the national average. Even more so, there is less drinking going on than students believe is occurring.

The survey also revealed in the previous two weeks that 50 percent of UW-RF students had at least five drinks in one sitting, which is slightly lower than the national average of 54 percent. University health officials define imbibing five or more drinks in one sitting as binge drinking.

The UW System Alcohol and Other Drug Use Survey destroyed another typical assumption about college students' drinking habits. A majority--54 percent--reported they were drinking at the same level or even less than when they first arrived on campus.

A campus and community coalition comprised of representatives from the campus, school district, police department and city government, hopes to reduce the rate of binge drinking from 50 percent to 46.5 within the next two years. The University Coalition on Alcohol, Tobacco, and Other Drugs hopes to achieve that by educating and creating awareness among students  about the consequences of irresponsible alcohol consumption.

UW-RF also conducts training for juniors and seniors athletes living off-campus on how to be a responsible host for a party. Students receive brochures that offer suggestions on how to make house parties safer. Athletes are given an interactive workbook called "CHOICES" that provide reflections, facts, risks, strategies and choices.

The objective is to help students think through their actions so as to make mature decisions about their drinking behavior. "We meet with athletes to address how alcohol impacts their performance and team cohesiveness," says Syverson.

According to Syverson, UW-RF is continually working with faculty and staff to address how alcohol abuse affects students' academic performance. In 2004, faculty reported that 60 percent have been personally aware of a student whose academic performance has been affected by alcohol or other drug use. The goal is to keep faculty and staff educated about services and resources. With a student-to-faculty ratio of 19-to-1, Syverson says the campus hopes to capitalize on that close-knit relationship to have faculty intervene quickly if they see a problem developing.

UW-RF also implements a social norm campaign. This campaign aims to break through students' perceptions of how much drinking is occurring by sharing the reality of what's really happening. For example, posters around campus show that while students think that 99 percent of students have used alcohol in the past 30 days, the actual figure is that 72 percent of students have used alcohol in the past 30 days.

Nathan Hansen, a junior history major from Austin, Minn.,  took fourth in his persuasion speech about "Legalizing Hemp." Brooke Eglinton, a freshman speech communications major from Caledonia, Minn.,  was in fifth place after her persuasion speech about "Car Fires."  Nicole Kearns, a high school student from Ellsworth, Wis.  taking university classes in the youth options program, took sixth place in her persuasion speech about "Death with Dignity."

Economics Professor John Walker, the 2005 Distinguished Teacher, will address the graduates with a speech titled "Maintaining our Commitment to Equal Opportunity."        Walker came to the university in 1990 after earning his doctorate with specialties in political and labor economics with an emphasis in the history of economic thought. He now teaches several economics courses in the College of Business and Economics.

Walker is also the interim chair for the department of economics along with serving on the general education committee, chancellor's award for excellence committee, faculty development committee and the student affairs committee.

In 1996, Schultz founded BioDiagnostics Inc., a seed testing laboratory and molecular breeding service laboratory, in River Falls. BioDiagnostics helps students and faculty by opening its doors for learning and research. Nearly 90 students have interned at the company and over two dozen have been hired. Schultz has supported UW-RF in meetings with the Wisconsin legislators and was part of the Chancellor's search and screen committee. He also spoke with governmental leaders in 2001 about the importance of biotechnology and advanced economic development in the St. Croix Valley.

Viesselmann, a crop and soils major and a Spanish minor, conducted research this summer at UW-Madison. As Wisconsin is one of the nation's top producers of sweet corn, Viesselmann investigated the effects of brittle-1 and sugary Allele combinations on the eating and seed quality of sweet corn.

Her research was recently presented the Sweet Corn Breeders Convention in Chicago; the National Conference of Students in Agronomy; Soils and Environmental Sciences in Utah. Her research offers insights on what combinations yield the best taste and best germination rates.

Since Pakistan doesn't have a positive public relations image, raising funds to help relief efforts has been difficult, said Hanson. "Financially, the Tsunami relief efforts received $350 million whereas the Pakistan earthquake has received $9 million," he said.

Pakistan, which is about the same size as Wisconsin, has such an extreme terrain that search and rescue efforts are taking much longer than anticipated. "The people of Pakistan are dealing with issues they've never dealt with before and with an area that receives over 25 feet of snow, we've got to keep these people warm and supply them with food," declared Hanson.

Shih Hsin President Paul Tzing-tsann Mu and the students visited classes, met with UW-RF students who were a part of the exchange and those who would like to participate, and took part in other activities.

The partnership between the universities gives the opportunity for two UW-RF students each semester to have tuition, room and board covered at the Taiwan institution and pay about $2,000 for airfare, insurance, an international program fee, a visa and personal expenses. The students learn Chinese and help teach English while staying there, and are offered courses that count toward general education requirements.

In exchange, Shih Hsin students can complete three years there and come to UW-RF for their last year and earn a dual degree from both institutions. They also can complete a dual degree in business administration in three years. Each spring, 20-30 students visit River Falls for about a week and a few of these visitors end up as full-time students.

The universities are working to create ways to exchange more students and staff. A potential plan is to have a Taiwan professor teach the beginning of a UW-RF course while a UW-RF professor teaches a similar class in Taiwan, and switch places mid-way through the semester while possibly bringing a group of students along.

Shih Hsin was once a community college focused on training journalists and has evolved into a liberal arts university offering a full range of studies. Many students are still enrolled in media studies.

"This is such a valuable experience for students, to be able to continue education in their province," said Brent Greene, director of international studies.  "We are keeping the relationship alive by designing more ways for more direct exchanges."

Students from both schools have the opportunity to learn at ZEI or UW-RF to enhance their educational experience. ZEI is located in the garden city of Hangzhou and is the national model institutions of higher learning for adult education in China. It has 10 professional schools, including humanities, sciences and engineering, educational science and administration, art, computer information and contemporary education technologies, vocational education, foreign languages, economics and business, resources and environment, sports, and Zhejiang Qiuzhi College for sub-degree studies. ZEI also has several training centers for school personal, teachers and administrators. A rapidly growing campus, it currently has 20,000 students and 3,000 trainees.

One of the first stops made by the group was the River Falls High School. Greene said they want to share the Chinese language with the high school and to see if Xia could teach the Chinese language to them.

Newly appointed advisory board member Mark Lindberg, who is a business administration/management information systems major from Perham, Minn., shared the same sentiment. "I like taking an active role in and having influence on the direction of the college," he said.

Six students from last year remain on the board, and the two new members were selected through an application process. The students have status on the board until they graduate, and are chosen to represent different majors and class levels throughout the college.

"I love being a part of the student advisory board," said board member Anthony Harstedt. "There are not many universities that give students that opportunity to meet their dean on a nearly one-on-one basis. It is one of the many advantages of UW-RF."

The board held a dean's forum for students to interact with CBE Dean Barbara Nemecek. Members received training and worked to advise non-majors with CBE advisor Ellen Schultz. At the beginning of the semester, they also went on a retreat. The members also have the opportunity to see firsthand how the CBE accreditation process is coming along.

"This board serves in an advisory capacity to the dean on key issues of the college, in addition to representing CBE on campus and at off-campus functions," Nemecek said. "We have an excellent cross-section of student representatives and I look forward to working closely with them in supporting our college's educational experience."

"So many faculty and alumni were anxious to show their support," said Michael Padgett, chairperson of the art department and who also was a contributing artist to the auction. "We were doing the best we felt we could do, using our creativity to help victims of this tragedy. It was like giving a little bit of yourself to help out."

Global Kids classes have taken place after school one day a week on the University campus. Each class is taught somewhat differently, but the reactions from the children in each class has been that it is fun. Lots of smiles and enthusiasm were evident and parents have echoed that sentiment in the feedback they have given.

UW-RF students and leaders from the United Council of UW Students will come to the River Falls to give a certificate of appreciation to Harsdorf for her work on the recently passed Add-a-Regent legislation.

The series headlines with a presentation called "Drink Think," which will be on Dec. 6 at 7 p.m. in the North Hall Auditorium. An ambulance will be parked on the front lawn of the Hagestad Student Center the same day of "Drink Think" to create awareness. The ambulance will have its lights on, and there will be a resources and information for students, faculty, staff and community members.

The goal of the presentation is to be, "a frank, non-preachy talk about the choices every college student faces today about the use or non-use of alcohol," says Barnes. This program is uses interactive multi-media to reach students. Barnes says he strives to have his presentation come off as an adult-adult conversation. He acknowledges the real life decisions that students face and encourages them to make the best choices.

He will address the signs of alcohol poisoning and the signs of each stage of alcohol poisoning. Stovern will discuss the different blood alcohol levels along with how they can be detected by simply looking at a person.

"I'm motivated to speak about alcohol, because is I grew up around it and I know what it does to families and friends," says Stovern. "It can wreck a lot of things that people have going good in their lives."

"We hope students will take this opportunity to become more informed of the effects of alcohol on their health, school, friendships, and life in general," says Sean Blackburn, UW-RF student organization coordinator. "Rick's presentation has been described as non-preachy, and we hope this approach will be more welcoming to students than scare tactics. This program was selected by students and sponsored by many student organizations. It's great to see the students take this difficult topic on in a responsible and practical way."

Readings are open to the community. An open mike follows the student readings, allowing others to read or discuss works. The reading series is currently organized by students. All advertising, promotion and announcements are created and sent out by students. English Professor Jenny Brantley advises the group.

Students will be completely immersed into the Hawaiian culture for five days in January through classes in technique, sacred chanting, language, history and cultural traditions of both traditional and modern hula dances.

"Conditions in Pakistan have taken a turn for the worse as the seasonal cold weather is now creeping into the mountain areas," says Hanson, a 1975 graduate of UW-RF. "Just as winter comes to Wisconsin, it visits Pakistan, too. Sadly, the cold will kill people displaced by the earthquake, especially children. All of us are challenged to ponder on what really happened in this part of the world ... and what may happen in the coming weeks and months unless we can do more to help."

Kelm and the team are extremely excited about the outlook for next year. "While the outcome of next season is unknown, we have a good group of judges coming up next season to fill the gaps," said Kelm.

For team member Leah Johnson, it was an easy decision to stay involved with the judging team when she came to UW-River Falls. "I judged in 4-H and FFA and it was something I really liked to do. My favorite part of judging is giving reasons," she said. "It's also a great way to meet a lot of people, travel and connect with the dairy industry."

Kelm also believes that as students start searching for jobs within the dairy cattle industry, employers like to see dairy judging experience and the fact that they understand dairy cattle and have developed public speaking skills through judging.

Playwright Edward Albee introduces the audience to a deserted stretch of beach and a middle-aged couple. The couple relaxes after a picnic lunch, talk idly about home, family and their life together. She sketches, naps and then suddenly two sea creatures - lizards that have decided to leave the ocean depths to come ashore and join the couple.

Initial fear and suspicion of each other, are soon replaced by curiosity and, before long, the humans and lizards (who speak English) are engaged in a fascinating dialogue. At an advanced stage of evolution, the lizards are contemplating the terrifying, yet exciting, possibility of embarking on life out of the water.  For the couple, whose life has grown routine, the lizards hold the answers to their most urgent questions. The answers are given with warmth, humor and poetic eloquence, and with emotional and intellectual reverberations that will linger in the heart and mind long after the play has ended.

The tournament included two preliminary rounds plus finals in 11 individual events, including prose, dramatic duo, extemporaneous speaking, after-dinner speaking, communication analysis, persuasive speaking and others as well as parliamentary debate.

Kelly Aherns, an English major from New Richmond, Wis., placed 6 th in informative speaking. Aherns presented an original, factual speech on a real subject to fulfil the general aim to inform the audience.

Adam Helbach, a speech communications major from Brule, Wis., placed 3 rd in dramatic interpretation. This event includes the student representing one or more characters from a play or plays of literary merit from screen, stage or radio.

Melissa Lutes, a pre-professional major from Apple Valley, placed 6 th in persuasive speaking. She presented an original speech designed to inspire, reinforce or change the beliefs, attitudes, values or actions of the audience.

The Model Academy also seeks to build professional relationships and academic alliances.  Participants will take these ideas for improvement back to their districts and evaluate their effectiveness.  Evaluations are then assembled and disseminated to institutions across the state in order to share knowledge with additional educators.

The Model Academy is made possible through a federally funded Teacher Quality Enhancement Supplemental Grant. The grant initially lead to the creation of the PK-16 Leadership Council, consisting of representatives for the governor, legislators, various Wisconsin higher education systems, including the UW System, as well as other education-related organizations. The council then implemented the idea of the Model Academy.

This year Falcon Foods Cheese Gift Boxes are available with 16 varieties of cheese along with a stick of Wisconsin's finest summer sausage. Selections of cheese are available in either 8 oz.  or 1 lb. blocks. Cheese varieties can be combined to form a 2 lb. or 4 lb. gift box.

Falcon Foods are produced by UW-River Falls students in the university plant, which has been in operation since 1983. Students work under the direction of a full-time plant manager and produce a variety of products.

Students get the unique opportunity to work in a commercial plant setting. The dairy plant uses raw milk from the University Dairy Farm and is primarily self-supporting. The meat plant gets some of its animals from the University Lab Farms.

The online survey, which was conducted through October, sought opinions in seven areas. Respondents were asked to describe the campus, offer what its core values should be in the 21st century, and describe their vision for the institution. In addition, respondents could offer an opinion on UW-RFs strengths, suggest its future defining characteristics, offer what changes would be needed to accomplish those characteristics, and weigh in on how Chancellor Don Betz should be spending his time.

On Tuesday some 150 persons participated in a town-hall meeting led by Betz, who summarized and shared the survey results. A Powerpoint presentation on the data is online at http://www.uwrf.edu/vision/.

Advice directed toward Betz was to ensure he continues to be accessible to students. He also was counseled to spend additional time in Madison securing resources, developing new funding sources, and leading the change as the campus prepares for growth and change in west-central Wisconsin.

The survey information will next be used as UW-RF moves forward to review its mission. Survey data will also serve as a basis for decision-making in an upcoming strategic planning process and as the groundwork to describe the University as it prepares for an upcoming accreditation review by the North Central Association.

A cohort default rate is the percentage of a school's student federal loan borrowers who enter repayment and default within the fiscal year. A federal fiscal year is from Oct. 1 through Sept. 30 of the following year, while a fiscal year at UW-RF is from July to June of the next year.

A variety of situations can put a student into default including not making monthly payments after the six-month grace period or starting to pay the loans, but then stopping due to personal circumstances. A student is not in default, however, if they are working with their guarantor and making some payment each month, even if it is not the full amount due.

In the past, the benefits of having a low default rate have been noticeable by students. Assistant Director of Financial Aid Beth Boisen said that in previous years, a low default rate meant that the 30-day waiting period for financial aid refund was lifted for incoming freshman.

Boisen also said that a benefit in the past has been that students who only attended college for one semester of the year didnt have to wait to get the second installment of their financial aid refund; they could receive their entire refund at the beginning of the semester.

Although these were benefits in the past, Boisen said that the Department of Education has changed the policy. The main benefit for UW-RFs low default rate this year is that it puts the University on a pedestal.

The marathon gave 125 participants the chance to show off their dance moves for eight hours. The team Stratton Hall raised the most money overall, and student Hayley Hagmann, of Eau Claire, Wis., raised the most individually with a total of $380.

"This year I am a resident assistant and I really wanted to get some of my first-year students in on the fun, and hopefully it would be a good memory for them to keep and hold throughout their experience at UW-RF," says Hagmann. "I thought that dance marathon was pretty fun overall."

One highlight of the event was hearing personal stories from families who have members who have been patients at Gillette Children's Hospital. The Hadlich family from Hudson, Wis.,father David, mother Cindy, and children Sara, Alex, and Gracieshared their story at the marathon about how the specialty hospital affected their lives. Gracie, 5, has been diagnosed with Spina Bifida; she was crowned the "Princess" of the Dance Marathon.

The University Foundation has created the CAS Fund for Excellence for undergraduate students. The fund is intended to support student participation with faculty in educational opportunities that go beyond the classroom. The students will use the support for research, scholarly or creative activities. The grant provides students with supplies, project expenses, research travel, conference participation and other useful tools related to their study.

"This grant expands the opportunities for students to put to use what they learn in the classroom," said Terry Brown, dean of CAS. "By taking the initiative, it shows that a student is willing to go beyond what is expected."

These grants are intended for students who are working on projects outside of the classroom. "This grant does not support a grade in the class, it is merely for their own experience," said Brown. "Students would not be able to do this without the funding."

Alyson Gerstmann from Hager City, Wis., will study the art, writings and religious practices of ancient Egypt and is presenting a display of the research in the River Falls Public Library. Gerstmann was awarded $250. Her advisor is art faculty member Steven Derfler.

Karine Wilson from Hudson, Wis., will mount and display a new series of paintings for senior exhibition based on New Orleans experiences and the devastation of Hurricane Katrina. Wilson was awarded $500. Her advisor is art Professor Michael Padgett.

LeAnne Ptacek from River Falls, Wis., will purchase materials for large-scale intaglio printmaking. The prints will be displayed in the senior show during spring semester. Ptacek was awarded $493. Her advisor is art Professor Bernice Ficek-Swenson.

Janice Syverson from Menomonie, Wis. will purchase a hydrogen-alpha filter for the physics department camera; he will conduct observations of solar activity using the filter and the camera. Syverson was awarded $495. Her advisor is Matthew Vonk, professor of physics.

Eisch, who is from Wisconsin Rapids, has been working on his portable cosmic ray detector for the past year. This December, his work will finally pay off as his detector travels to the South Pole as part of the construction of the IceTop Cosmic Ray Detector.

The IceTop detector is made up of 160 1,000-gallon tanks of ice. These tanks are set over a kilometer-squared area over the IceCube detector. The tanks contain highly sensitive light detectors to identify cosmic rays. These will be capable of capturing information-laden, high-energy particles from some of the most distant and violent events in the universe. It promises a new window to the heavens and may be astronomy's best bet to resolve the century-old quest to identify the sources of cosmic rays.

With AMANDA as its proof-of-concept, the IceCube telescope was constructed to peer deep into the cosmos searching for dark matter that could reveal new physical processes associated with the enigmatic origin of the highest energy particles in nature.

When Eisch arrived at UW-RF as a freshman, he expressed an interest in working on the IceCube project. He spent the summer of 2004 working with the IceCube group at the Bartol Research Institute at the University of Delaware, which is one of his first choices for a doctoral program in physics.

Keynote speakers included Professor Daniel Y.C. Fung of Kansas State University and John OBrien, chief executive officer of the Food Safety Authority of Ireland (FSAI). Fung discussed the future of rapid methods and automation in microbiology as a field of research and study, which has matured into an important discipline in applied microbiology. O'Brien related his experiences with food safety in Ireland and how it compares to the food safety precautions in the United States.

Approximately 110 people attended the five-day event, which focuses on food safety and automated methods in food microbiology. For many of the attendees, it's their first time in Wisconsin, or even the United States. Conference director and UW-RF food science Professor P.C. Vasavada, announced that this year's symposium also had the largest amount of technical posters entered by graduate students. These students are involved with food microbiology and rapid testing methods and are then able to display their research through technical posters.

The Food Microbiology Symposium attracts a diverse community of attendees. The program is suitable for food scientists and technologists, quality assurance supervisors, food laboratory directors, microbiologists, consultants, researchers and graduate students interested in food microbiology.

NOV. 18, 2005-- Greek life at UW-River Falls has set the ambitious objective of doubling its membership so more students will gain from learning through professional development, providing community service to others, and crafting life-long friendships.

"We're small for where we should be for this part of the country and the size of the school, says Blackburn. We should be around 10 percent. Right now we're closer to 4 or 5 percent." He adds that the objective should be to grow and build "brotherhood-sisterhood, it's not necessarily on partying and rivalries."

Several techniques have been tried to increase numbers. One was publishing a new booklet for recruitment week in September. Its objective was to educate men and women about Greek life. A new booklet produced by sorority women was very successful, registering twice as many women as last year.

"It's something that a lot of Greeks are very excited about, said Stratton.  It is an opportunity for sorority women to experience community living with other Greeks, which is something they might otherwise miss out on." The Panhellenic Council includes two representatives from each sorority who meet each week to discuss issues of interest to the organizations.

There have been two communities added to campus: the Greek Programming Board and the Cascade group. The Greek Programming Board is an organization that is now in charge of all Greek socials; the organization will also be involved in Greek programming, education and outreach.

The Cascade group is also starting from the ground up. Cascade was formed last spring and has 25 students. The organization is a national peer education network that educates students to train others on health and wellness issues. The students are sent out to speak to other peer groups. Anyone can join Cascade; the network is half Greek and half non-Greek. "Students want to be involved in a community versus a single chapter, we're tying to portray this," says Blackburn.

One milestone was recently reached to achieve the objective to grow Greek organizations. This year Sigma Alpha joined the campus as a new sorority. It is dedicated to professional agriculture, and immediately attracted 40 women. An anticipated objective is to add another sorority within a year or two and to add a fraternity within a year or two.

From the beginning of the process, students have supported the creation of the major through petitions and the Student Senate. In its first semester, 37 students have enrolled as international studies majorsalmost double the anticipated number. And with around 75 minors, the number of majors is expected to grow.

One student is set to be the first graduate from UW-RF with an international studies major in December. I know that it's very unusual to have a graduate so quickly, but it's a testament both to her commitment to international studies, in particular, and to the fact that so many students have been hoping to be majors for so long, says Chapin.

The program, which began as a minor with six students in 1998, has grown to more than 100 majors, and in past years 20 International Studies minors have graduated every year. The major has been in development during the tenures of three chancellors.

Key to its success are the timingaccording to Provost Ginny Coombs, the right audience provided the window of opportunity. Also, as an interdisciplinary program, it incorporates many readily available resources such as the study options overseas and existing classes, eliminating extra cost to the University.

During the National FFA Convention, a career show was held with 340 exhibitors displaying materials and equipment and giving students the opportunity to talk with staff about careers in agriculture. UW-River Falls was represented with their CAFES booth and gathered 200 information cards from prospective students.

Nearly 160 people participated, including students, faculty and community members, who either ran in a 5K race or walked a mile. Students enrolled in a fitness and recreation management course coordinated the event.

The event was held to prepare people in becoming a certified Red Cross disaster relief volunteer, educate students on what to expect when assisting with disaster and initiate participants in civic engagement.

Femling, a horticulture major from Hastings, Minn., received the opportunity to compete in the national chainsaw competition through plant and earth science Professor Michael Kaltenbergs chainsaw course. While Femling was familiar with operating a chainsaw, he had never used it in a competition until he was invited to the competition in St. Louis, Mo., in September.

During the competition, Femling competed in five different categories: speed cutting, spring pull, precision cutting, creating a hinge and back cutting. Competitors are either awarded or deducted points based on operation of the chainsaw, hazard identification, identification of four areas of the bar and the plan for cutting, which the judges must know before the participant proceeds to cut.

Femling was first FISTA (Forest Industry Safety Training Alliance) certified by the Game of Logging through the chainsaw course because he placed in the top two of a competition during class. The FISTA certification gives him the invitation to the national competition.

For winning the collegiate division of the chainsaw competition, Femling received $1,000, and he also got to keep all the safety gear he used. If he hadnt participated in the collegiate division he would have placed third overall in the landowner's competition, which is extremely well for being the first time participating in the competition, according to Kaltenberg.

Femling had nothing but kind words for the logging industry. He noted that during the chainsaw competition there was also a trade show, which he toured with the other participants. " I was extremely impressed with the logging industry and it was a unique opportunity to see how we get our lumber," stated Femling.

The goal of GOL is to reduce the accidents associated with professionals using chainsaws. Eriksson, who originally came to the United States to help increase safety and decrease workmens compensation-related claims, decided to teach landowners and eventually college students proper chainsaw and safety skills. Eriksson also made a trip to UW-River Falls to aid Kaltenberg in getting acquainted with the course and to demonstrate methods of teaching students proper chainsaw etiquette.

The chainsaw course is offered every fall semester and is open to all majors, but Kaltenberg said that its an excellent support class for conservation majors. The class meets three Friday afternoons and one Saturday. Students will learn the benefits of possessing a good understanding and ability to operate a chainsaw. Besides learning how to correctly fell a tree, safety is a major factor in the class and widely stressed. There is no special course fee and all equipment is provided for the students.

"The Regents Teaching Excellence Award is one of the highest accolades that the UW System annually bestows," said Chancellor Don Betz. "Caskey's selection rightly shines light on his achievements and his consistent dedication and success. Our university is committed to teaching excellence, and Brad's recognition demonstrates that this commitment is an integral part of our daily lives."

Caskey received a $5,000 award for his outstanding career achievement in teaching. The award aims to recognize an individual, academic department, program or unit that demonstrates exceptional commitment to and effectiveness in teaching.

Doyle's first destination was the C.H.I.L.D. Center, the campus daycare center providing care to the children of students, faculty, staff and members of the community.  There Doyle met with Chancellor Don Betz, Vice Chancellor of Administration and Finance Mary Halada, and Mark Kinders, director of public affairs. Angela Kaiser, director of the center, gave Doyle a tour while explaining the center's mission and goals.

After asking many questions about the center and visiting with children and teachers, Doyle traveled to the Wyman Education building where she was welcomed by her cousin, John Laird, a librarian at UW-RF's Chalmer Davee Library.

"It was a unique experience to sit with a person of such prominence and to have her take time out of her day to see what goals we are accomplishing as a university," says Jeremy Bonikowske, shared governance director of Student Senate.  "People with power do have heart."

Topics of discussion included the McNair scholars program, which is designed to help students from low-income families and first-generation college students attend graduate school and obtain doctorate degrees.

Doyle was also interested in UW-RF's Hurricane Katrina relief efforts, and listened intently as Brent Turner, leadership training coordinator, explained the plan to extend both manpower and aid to the University of Southern Mississippi over two trips during J-term and spring break.

Doyle, whose background includes more than 35 years of experience in the field of education and a stint in the Peace Corps with her husband Gov. Jim Doyle, was particularly interested in those students who said their aspirations were to become teachers.

The visit concluded with a tour of the Education Technology Center, the lab in the Wyman Education building that serves to train teachers in the integration of technology into their classrooms.  Karen Ryan, director of the center, explained many of the new technologies that are being taught to students at UW-RF and introduced Doyle to several members of the Technology Leadership Cadre.

"We all enjoyed our time with Wisconsin's First Lady, Jessica Doyle," said Chancellor Betz.  "She commented on the laudable commitment of our students to public service such as the Katrina efforts. Mrs. Doyle openly enjoyed her interaction with the three McNair student representatives, and my sense is that she found the C.H.I.L.D. Center one of the highlights of her time here.  We were delighted to host Mrs. Doyle for her visit to UW-RF, and we look forward to her return."

Earlier in the day, Doyle also visited schools in Menomonie and Prescott, and planned to visit schools in Hudson, Amery and Rice Lake the following day. A former teacher, Mrs. Doyle has visited hundreds of schools in Wisconsin and promotes the "Read Wisconsin" program to elementary students.

Doyle expressed how pleased she was with her visit to UW-RF. "I have had a fabulous visit. The new construction and activities are truly inspirational.  It's wonderful to see how the students and teachers work together here."

Spoli Productions presents this award-winning, one-man, full-length play, which brings to life the brilliant and sometimes controversial theoretical physicist that Time magazine names to be their "person of the century." "Einstein" will present an evening of humor, introspection, science and a little violin.

There is a vast array of artistic selections available for purchase that can make one-of-a-kind holiday presents. Visitors can choose from glass, ceramics, painting, fibers, jewelry, printmaking, photography and mixed media.

Working together toward a common goal builds social capital and a web of relationships that nurtures a sense of connection, belonging and community. I t bonds people with experiences in common and creates bridges between people from different geographic, ethnic, age or income groups. Collectively, such efforts to build community create healthy, safe and vibrant places to live.

With Wisconsin Idea Theater as the backdrop, the forum will address how to nurture community involvement and move people from being observers to participants. The keynote speaker will be Maryo Gard Ewell, daughter of Robert Gard, the author of "Grassroots Theater: A Search for Regional Arts in America."

Gard's book gives a moving account of the struggle to bring his dream of community-building through creative theater to citizens around the country. He traveled across America--from New York's Finger Lakes and the prairies of Alberta, Canada, to the backwoods of northern Wisconsin--discovering and nurturing the folklore, legends, history and drama of the regions.

In addition to the forum, there will be an exhibit with related themes in the galleries from Nov. 11 through Dec. 31 at the Phipps Center for the Arts in Hudson. On Friday, Dec. 2, there will be an open mike event at the Phipps beginning at 6:30 p.m. All events are free and open to the public.

Tickets are available at the door. Admission for the event is $5 for adults, $3 for seniors, $2 for all students, and children five and under are free. For more information check out the River Falls Brass Web site at www.uwrf.edu/brass/ .

The series began in fall 1996 as a way for students and faculty of all disciplines to share their creative talents in an open forum. Typical readings are from 15 minutes to a half-hour in length to an audience from 30 to 100 people, says Brantley. A sign-up sheet is posted outside of the student lounge on the second floor of KFA for people interested in reading original poetry, prose or creative nonfiction.

Miriam Huffman, student involvement coordinator at UW-RF, will discuss an array of first-year experience programs that are currently in place at universities around the country. Free and open to the public, the presentation will also include a discussion regarding specific programs that may be appropriate for UW-RF.

The Student Personnel Development Series is held every third Thursday of the month. The next presentation is Dec. 15 at 1:30 p.m. in the President's Room at the Hagestad Student Center. Gregg Heinselman, UW-RF executive director of student development and Mike Stifter, area coordinator of the student leadership center, will be discussing the progress and the layout of the new student center.

Castore's jewelry ranges from strong linear designs to flat shapes dependent on contrasting surface elements. She uses primarily brass and silver, focusing her designs on the metal's quality instead of using precious stones.

Veterans Day is held around the country in order to honor America's current and previous servicemen and women.  Originally called Armistice Day, and created by President Woodrow Wilson to celebrate the end of World War I, Veterans Day continues to focus attention on veterans and their sacrifices for the United States.

The results of the University's vision and values survey will be discussed along with opportunities for conversations and questions. One focus of the discussion will be the survey results' implications for the University's mission.

The performance features selections from the Tchaikovsky's "Nutcracker" suite, arranged by Duke Ellington and Billy Strayhorn. The Minnesota Orchestra is conducted by Kenneth Freed, and ballet and dance are performed by the Minnesota Dance Theater and Ten Foot Five Productions.

NOV. 4, 2005--The University of Wisconsin-River Falls College of Business and Economics and outreach office is now offering a noncredit Supervisory Management Program as a professional development opportunity for frontline managers, team leaders, new supervisors and individuals wanting to move into a management role.

Each individual four-hour class is $99; discounts are available if registering for more than one class; or $356 for all four courses during the two-day workshop. The workshop is held in Room 129 of the Regional Development Institute building on campus.

The products to replace the 18-year-old floor came from two manufacturers. Robbins Sports Surfacing provided the interior floor in a dusty gray color that brightens up the entire complex over the old green flooring.

The new style floor, Polastic SP, is spike-proof and was installed by Anderson-Ladd of St. Paul . UW-RF is only the second institution in the country to use this flooring, says Stocker. This surface is very smooth and has additional cushioning that makes it easier on the joints of athletes. While the floor is used for multiple recreational purposes, the dominant court boundary lines are for tennis and conform to NCAA rules for conference play by teams in the Wisconsin Intercollegiate Athletic Conference.

Other uses besides athletic was considered in choosing the floor, says Stocker, including the annual home and garden show as well as UW-RF commencement ceremonies. A significant decision-making factor was the floor's durability due to the high traffic in the complex. This project cost $656,000.

"The floor is unbelievable, I'm very pleased," said Stocker. "We were very fortunate to have two really good installers that were contractors affiliated with Unicorp in St. Paul.  All of the feedback that I've received has been very positive."

Online courses include marketing, management, economics, accounting, computer information systems and communications. They will be offered on a regular basis during the spring, summer and fall beginning during the spring 2006 term.

There was a large turnout for a lecture by Executive in Residence David Swensen, who is a UW-RF alumnus and the manager of a $14 billion Yale University endowment fund that has generated a 16.1 percent annual return. He is also the author of two books on financial management.

"The two most important aspects to having a successful approach to managing portfolios is to own assets that produce equity, and secondly diversify yourself and spread assets around to reduce risk," Swensen said.

He also pointed out that as investors, there are three categories to take into consideration. The first is to allocate assets and to diversify stocks with a variety of ratings. Secondly, consider market timing.

Art Professor Peter Mak, the faculty coordinator for the event, said the number of participants for this exhibit totaled more than 400, since at least half of the pieces were collective efforts by entire classes.

Several of the pieces were interactive, and one even included a "living" exhibit with the artist on display. Another work encouraged viewers to "spin me," one let people rearrange a number of boxes any way they pleased, and another asked the viewer to draw Donald Duck. Those brave enough to put their drawing talent on display could use the supplied canvas.

Viewers could also interact through voting for pieces they liked. New this year was a knot system. A piece of string was tied near each installation so that passers-by could make a knot if they enjoyed the piece. The most knots went to an installation by the Art 100 class where each student made a self-portrait. The portraits were placed one by one on the ground along the sidewalk.

"Each one of them had a very unique way of presenting his or her interpretation of the theme--themselves. A self-portrait with a twist, saying something using social icons or symbolism to say who they are," said Mak.

"It's a wonderful opportunity for us, the art department, the students and the faculty, to share our creative efforts and ideas with the campus. It's exciting for us and I think the public enjoys it," said Mak.

NOV. 4, 2005--With more than 135 recognized student organizations and programs at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls, one might think that students have the turf covered. But each year the list continues to grow with several new groups and existing organizations continuing to expand and enhance their presence on campus.

One of UW-RF's newest organizations is a men's golf team, known as the Swinging Squirrels. This group began as a class project when speech Professor James Pratt's persuasion class was assigned to complete a persuasive campaign.  Justin Miller, now president of the Swinging Squirrels, pitched his idea for bringing a men's golf team to some of the students in the class.

The group then began seeking members needed to create a new organization by putting up posters and through word of mouth. Women from the class helped Miller get the ball rolling. At their first meeting, approximately 12 men attended.

Enough men showed an interest, and the team has been out on the course this fall.  Miller says next spring they will be out in full force, and possibly holding tryouts for members as they attempt to make the group become a club sport.

Another new group this semester is Up Til Dawn, a group seeking to raise funds for St. Jude's Research Hospital in Memphis, Tenn.  St. Jude's, a facility that treats children regardless of their ability to pay. The hospital requires $1 million a day to function.

Other student groups can participate in Up Til Dawn by forming a team. Each team member then sends 50 form letters seeking donations from friends and relatives.  Teams can register by Nov. 8, and a meeting of all the teams will be held on Nov. 29 to write the letters.

After a surge in membership surrounding the last presidential election, the organization has continued holding weekly meetings, campaigning for local candidates, and hosting fun events like bowling and movie nights.

Muck also says that Joey White, the current chairperson of the organization and a columnist for the UW-RF Student Voice who is from Rhinelander, Wis., says he tries to not take a one-sided stance in his editorials.  Muck says that White's column is more balanced as compared to previous members of College Republicans who have also been Voice columnists.

Cheer and Stunt, also known as Falcon Cheerleading, has seen a significant increase in its membership in the past two years, due to the addition of a competition squad and to their increased presence on campus.

Claiming that promoting school spirit is its main mission, Cheer and Stunt has begun performing at half-time at basketball games as well as cheering at all home football, men's basketball and men's hockey games. Members of the organization will also be helping out with Family Day, painting faces and taking photos of students and family members with Freddy Falcon.

The cheerleaders also competed in the Homecoming organization competition and royalty contest and the parade. In addition, Cheer and Stunt procured the convertible for UW-RF Chancellor Don Betz to lead the parade in.

In the future, the organization is looking to have its competition squad compete nationally, with larger squads. The cheerleaders also aspire to hold clinics for local high schools during the summer and continue to hold an annual day clinic for Girl Scouts from around the state.

"I am ecstatic about the progress that has been made since I first joined the organization," says Michelle Dodge, president and competition squad coach, from Spooner, Wis. "It is all owed to the women and their hard work and dedication."

Another group seeing a significant increase in membership is InterVarsity Christian Fellowship. InterVarsity, an international organization that began at the University of Cambridge in England, is so named for the community ideal (inter) and the British term for collegiates (varsity) that come together to form the group.

The organization consists of both large and small group meetings. The large group meetings are every Thursday at 7:30 p.m. in North Hall Auditorium.  There are also 17 smaller groups that meet at varied times during the week.  Some groups have a special emphasis, such as one group that consists mainly of sorority women.

The chef who has become widely known through the St. Croix Valley--Chartwells Executive Chef Angel Alcantar--was recently honored by his employer for the excellence he brings to the campus dining experiences.

Alcantar was selected from among of hundreds of salaried employees of Chartwells, an international food giant, as the central regional salaried associate of the year.  Alcantar was nominated by the managers on the UW-RF campus.  The award is given out to one hourly and one salaried employee.

"I can think of no one more deserving of our regional ABC (Above and Beyond the Call) Salaried Associate of the Year award than Chef Angel," said Chartwells Regional Marketing Director Stacy Shaw. "Not only does he have a vast culinary knowledge but he is reliable, works very hard, and is passionate not only about food but about the people he serves."

Alcantar takes personal satisfaction in making his dishes delicious and unique.  "He has a special talent and has gained a reputation as an excellent chef," says Gerda Benedict, former director of University Food Services. "He takes personal pride in presenting his menu creations. Angel has always been a pleasure to work with and is very deserving of this special recognition."

The UW-RF faculty and staff showed their support for Alcantar's nomination by sending many letters. Two words that they often used to describe Alcantar are: dedication and creativity. "UW-River Falls is fortunate to have Angel Alcantar as a member of our University community.  He is a dedicated member of the food service team," says Benedict.

Many faculty and staff at UW-RF are enthusiastic about Alcantar's work and have positive comments on his tasty dishes.  "It is such a treat to be a guest at a catered event and listen to Angel describe his creations," says Vice Chancellor Mary Halada, who oversees administration and finance. "He genuinely loves to invent new dishes--there's rarely a repeat when you give Angel the flexibility to do what he does best. He uses such unique combinations--even the names of his recipes sound good!"

From highly visible top-level leadership positions such as co-chair of the UW System Committee for the Study of the Status of Women, she provided an improved climate and opportunities for women and minorities to move into leadership positions in Wisconsin higher education. In 1999, she directed a rigorous analysis of the experiences of women students, faculty, and staff in the UW System and co-authored a report that was accepted and endorsed by the UW System president and Board of Regents.  This report's recommendations created a blueprint for action to improve the status of women at UW System institutions.  In 2001, she became an acquisitions editor and in 2004 acquisitions manager for Eau Claire-based Thinking Publications. She is on leave from the business while serving as interim chancellor at UW-Eau Claire.

On Oct. 21, Hannah Rosenthal, executive director of the Chicago Foundation for Women, a human rights advocacy group focusing on women and girls, delivered a second keynote address. Formerly the head of the Jewish Council for Public Affairs, Ms. Rosenthal previously served as Midwest regional director of the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services and spent eight years as the executive director of the Wisconsin Women's Council. A past recipient of the Wisconsin Equal Rights Award, Ms. Rosenthal has worked tirelessly for policies that have improved the lives of women and girls throughout the country.

During the conference, Carol Sue Butts, provost and vice chancellor for academic affairs at the University of Wisconsin-Platteville, passed the WWHEL presidential gavel to Mari McCarty, executive vice president of the Wisconsin Association of Independent Colleges and Universities, a consortium of 20 private colleges and universities.

There were 89 businesses and nonprofit organizations at the fair, a significant increase from last year's count, which was 67. Representatives said they appreciated UW-RF students' skills, leadership experience, previous work experience and the overall first impression they created.

There were two main changes in the 2005 Career Fair. One was that the organizations could register online. "We were able to increase the number of organizations invited and generate new businesses to attend," says Ewings.

There were 50 new organizations in attendance, which was a record. "The Career Fair was a great success," says June Schubert, college recruitment coordinator "There was a wider variety of organizations participating this year, many being new to our campus, which presented new opportunities to our students"

"The experience gained from having this internship has translated into very successful job searches for all past interns," says Ewings. Five organizations that took part in this sponsorship were Fort Dodge Animal Health, The Brickman Group, ACR Homes, AgStar Financial Services and Partners Advantage.

Crohn's disease and colitis are more commonly known as Irritable Bowel Disease, which affects hundreds of thousands of people in the United States. Each year CCFA holds the walk to raise money to put toward finding a cure for Crohn's and ulcerative colitis.

The web site doesn't just look different; it is different.  "We wanted to make it easier for people who are not yet students here to find out about our programs and courses," said Katrina Larsen, director of UW-RF outreach.

The new site features a class schedule lookup function that allows visitors to find both credit and noncredit classes and course descriptions, as well as a list of program requirements for all graduate degrees and certificates. The site also includes a new search function and site map for ease of navigation. In addition, visitors can register online for most courses.

Information on the site is grouped into logical categories including Graduate Studies, Continuing Education and Community Programs.  "We understand that different people have different information needs," Larsen said.  People pursuing graduate degrees or certificates can go directly to a Graduate Studies section, she explained.  Those interested in just taking a course or two can find what they are looking for in Continuing Education.  And, those looking for community or youth events can find them under Community Programs.

Smith is in her third year at UW-RF, working on a bachelor of fine arts degree. She transferred to UW-RF from Inver Hills Community College, where she started her work with ceramics. She has been involved with the Northern Clay Center in Minneapolis where she works with children teaching them beginning sculpture. Her functional ceramics focus on unconventional design with traditional glazed surfaces.

Jacobs' work deals with her interest in American culture and folk art. She spent a semester in Italy studying figurative ceramics. She has recently visited the Haystack School in Maine and the Anderson Ranch in Colorado where she attended ceramics workshops. Her work deals with figurative sculpture and functions forms.

Wilson is a graduating senior. She's been painting for most of her life; her most recent paintings completed after Hurricane Katrina. Wilson is returning to New Orleans in January to help volunteer with schools that her children were attending when the hurricane hit. Wilson is establishing a nonprofit organization to help with rebuilding relief and which will be funded by sales of her art.

Janicke, director of teaching and learning for Independent School District 622, which serves North St. Paul, Maplewood and Oakdale, Minn., will speak about the effects that the national legislation has upon public schools.

The No Child Left Behind Act, introduced to Congress by President Bush in 2001, is an education reform that pushes for stronger accountability and more parental choices in public schools. Passed into law on Jan. 8, 2002, the act implemented mandatory testing of third through eighth graders in the subjects of reading and math, and created the ability for parents whose children go to failing schools to transfer them to better performing schools. No Child Left Behind is also intended to strengthen teacher quality and promote proficiency in speaking English.

"The gala allows students to practice and become familiar with presenting in a comfortable environment here on campus and helps prepare them for the spring schedule of meetingsn which includes the National Conference for Undergraduate Research."

The title of his presentation is, "Does customer orientation lead to customer commitment?" Kilic will discuss how there is research being done on customer orientation but there is a lack of investigation of the firm's customer orientation and the link to customer commitment. The research model was developed and a questionnaire was derived from the SOCO scale of 450 dealers of a leading jeans producer in Turkey. The presentation is meant to give insight to distribution channels, channel member behavior and the level of commitment of channel members in an international setting like Turkey.

Imtiaz Moosa, a professor in UW- River Falls department of history and philosophy, will discuss the teachings of Jesus and the Koran as well as compare and contrast them to emphasize what is unique and distinctive about each faith.

"The main goal of Smiles 4 Kids is to help children at Gillette Children's Hospital," says Michelle Abts of La Crosse, co-president of Smiles 4 Kids. "We help financially, as well as volunteering our time to go to the hospital for an hour to socialize with the kids. During that time we coordinate craft activities that promote motor skills."

Dance Marathon is open to anyone who would like to participate. Information on registration is located at the front desk of the Leadership Center in the Hagestad Student Center. Prior to the event, teams of 10 are encouraged to be formed, and they are asked to raise a minimum of $150. Each participant also must pay a $15 fee. It covers the cost of a T-shirt as well as food, music and games on the day of the event.  Throughout the day contests will be held and prizes will be rewarded.

Students will also have the opportunity to make emotional connections with families who will be coming to speak at the event. Five families that spoke last year, and this year organizers hope to have just as many if not more.  A deejay from the radio station KS-95 will also be appearing at Dance Marathon.

"This event is open to the public, and we encourage everyone to come," says Abts. Community members and sponsors are able to come and see what the organization is doing to help the children's health issues.

The Falcon Flute Choir is the newest addition to the music ensemble scene. It is directed by Janis Weller, who teaches on campus but also moonlights as an author, artist and founder of the Elision Institute. The choir is made up of both campus and community talents, and plays a range of music from classical to jazz.

One of the most visual ensembles on campus and in the region is River Falls Brass, comprised of music faculty members Tom Barnett and Craig Hara on trumpets, Andrew Parks on horn, Rick Gaynor on trombone and Charles Wazanowski on tuba. This renowned group has played with artists ranging from The Temptations to the Minnesota Orchestra to the Moody Blues. The RF Brass is set to perform a free concert on campus next on Nov. 20 at 8 p.m. in the Abbott Concert Hall of the Kleinpell Fine Arts Building.

The Trombone Choir, directed by Rick Gaynor, is in the process of making itself a campus presence. On Nov. 12, declared Trombone Day, area students from grades 7-12 will descend upon the campus for various clinics and rehearsals on trombone.

Business leaders and area residents are invited to participate in the open houses. Legislative ideas collected at the meetings will be pared down to four or five issues that will be presented to legislators in Madison in February or March 2006.

The joint effort is intended to maximize efficiency. "We can choose to travel to Madison separately, but it is far more effective to work together under one banner," said Trudy Popenhagen, president of the Pierce County EDC.

The group, composed of UW-RF faculty, Sister Damon Nolan along with the vice president, vice chair and executive director of the Carmen Pampa Fund, last met in April where they began to discuss "where to go from here" possibilities for both institutions. Sister Damon said her school's greatest need was for a program in English as a Second Language (ESL) and teachers. Another mentioned need was that of tourism.

Kelly Cain, professor of environmental sciences, runs the Wildlife Recreations and Nature Tourism Graduate Certificate program in the College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences at UW-RF. Students from various countries are enrolled in this program online, and several have limited experience with the English language.

An eco-tourism degree program at UAC-CP would benefit the surrounding community as well as students, said school officials. Guided nature tours would be offered to visitors to the area, helping the economy of the community.

Klemp said there seems to be three areas in which help is neededpractical English for the guided tours, academic English and a total preparation course which would help students wishing to attend graduate school in an English-speaking country, or take their career elsewhere.

The attending members from the UW-RF English department, along with Matel, agree that the priorities for UAC-CP should be to teach English, but also to help students perfect their grammatical skills in their own language. Sister Damon said what she would like to do is "either develop a program" or use an existing program to help with these needs.

Sister Damon said the "biggest challenge" was in the education department at UAC-CP, and that there is a need for teachers because currently many of the school's teachers have a very traditional teaching manner.

"The teachers that we have were prepared in the same method that we're trying to change," she said. Sister Damon continued, saying that typical classroom materials in rural Bolivia consist of "a notebook, a pencil and chalk." Students copy down what the instructor writes, take their notebooks home and copy the information into their "good" notebooks. She says that a more creative teaching style would benefit students in the education program.

"The turn-out was great," says Karen Ryan, director of the Education Technology Center and one of the leaders of the TLC. "The attendees are still in the process of writing their reflections on the event, but those we've already received have been very positive."

Students can get ahead in their career program by taking an extra class or two over the winter break. Undergraduate students may get into classes that they couldn't during the fall semester because of high demand.

J-Term opportunities mixing study and travel include several trips that are only available over the January term. These include study trips to Ireland, Egypt and Italy. Some of these study trips are open to adult non-credit learners as well as students.

Zimmerman says he tried to make something unique out of the theatrical production by incorporating video segments from the cult classic, which are not normally a part of the stage version. The cast dusts off the 30-year-old cult classic that has now crossed into its third generation of ardent fans to give it a newer rock feel with a fresh approach to the character with all the classic camp that has made Rocky Horror the icon of cult films and musicals, says Zimmerman.

The story is an outrageous ensemble of characters including two kids from middle America confronted by the complications of morality in the 1970s and represented by the mad Dr. Frank N. Furter, a transvestite from the galaxy of Transylvania.

Some might be under the impression that all education students have to do is pass courses like Advanced Crayola Studies or Issues in Dr. Seuss Literature, but entrance into UW-River Falls' teacher education program requires rigorous academic and professional standards set down by the college and Wisconsin law.

October marked the deadline for admission to the College of Education and Professional Studies teacher education program for spring 2006. Students applying for admission must complete a questionnaire to be reviewed by the Dean of Student Development and Campus Diversity office. They are also required to have two recommendations from faculty members and a plan sheet with their advisor's signature. A current criminal background check must also be in the student's file.

"You have to put forth 110 percent of your effort," says senior Kara Coughlin, who was admitted to the program the spring of her sophomore year. "You have to make sure that you are on top of your studiesthere's not a lot of room for procrastination. We have to be classroom-focusedwe affect children's lives."

UW-River Falls' admission to education process is unique among most other education schools around the country. According to Mike Martin, academic advisor and database manager for the College of Education and Professional Studies, most colleges use the "funnel approach." This method admits large numbers of students into the program and slowly allows competition, in areas such as GPA, to weed out students who achieve less. This results in students having completed semesters worth of wasted credits.

UW-River Falls, however, uses what Martin calls a "stove-pipe model." This approach admits only a certain number of students at the beginning of their college careers as the department will be able to handle until the completion of a degree. This is the main reason why it is hard to transfer into the education program from another major.

State law heavily influences teacher education program admission requirements. Wisconsin law PI 34, which went into effect on July 1, 2004, details teacher standards, program implementation, program approval, and appellate regulations, among other areas.

Students who are denied admission receive detailed information on the appeals process. The appeals committee then reviews their complaint and makes a decision. State law allows up to 10 percent of those who appeal to be exempted from one requirement. The UW-River Falls appeals committee typically uses anywhere from 7 percent to 10 percent of those exemptions.

Perkins says that the admission process usually takes about two weeks after the deadline, and the appeals process another two weeks after that. Appeals have to happen quickly because otherwise students will not be able to register for the right classes in time.

"I've mostly seen people be denied on the basis of undergraduate GPA and/or Praxis test scores, but there are also other reasons someone could be denied, such as documented unprofessional behavior," says Perkins.

"It's not a decision we take lightly, says Perkins. What we decide has an impact on student's lives. We have a professional responsibility. If they're denied, we try to direct them into another area of study."

"These units are used to carry our signal from a remote broadcast to our studio," said Rick Burgsteiner, station manager and journalism instructor. "The new equipment will primarily be used for our sportscasts."

The journalism department is replacing the old equipment that it had received from Wisconsin Public Radio in the late 1990s. The old equipment was already used before the university even received it; this created uncertainty and hesitation regarding the life span of the old equipment.

The new equipment is lighter and easier to use. It also provides a much clearer signal and is much more likely the station will be able to continue bringing live coverage of local college and high school sporting events throughout each academic year.

The WBA Foundation has awarded grants totaling around $57,525 within the last five years. Students interested in making a career related to broadcast journalism have the opportunity to apply for scholarships within the association. Each year four $2,000 scholarships are awarded to broadcast-driven students.

Pat Dillon, the WEN director for the northwest region, will be the workshop instructor. She has consulted with hundreds of companies in the SBIR and STTR programs and helped emerging technology companies win more than $20 million in research awards.

Bob Baker, professor of plant and earth science, Bill Cordua, professor of plant and earth science, and Ian Williams, professor of plant and earth science, led several activities for the students. Students went on a field trip that focused on fossil collecting and offered a session on rock and mineral identification. The most popular session was on the geology of disasters.

Learn how to make your own venison sausage and jerky at a workshop on Nov. 8 from 6 to 9 p.m. in the Food Science Addition located in the Agriculture Science building at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls.

Wood, who came to the University in 1991, said she was surprised to win the award and attributes winning the award the "mysterious combination of qualities worked with" the voting alumni. "It's a great thrill," said Wood.

A student who voted for Wood had high praise. "Through her I was able to take my writing to a whole new level," the alumnus said. "She encouraged and inspired me in writing, and also as a person, as a student and as a future writer."

His students also value the time Petzold has spent mentoring them. "Petzold has been very influential in my life," said one graduate. "He helped me though the process of applying and choosing a graduate program."

Terry Brown, interim dean of the College of Arts and Sciences, said she has worked closely with all of the professors and knows they work hard at teaching. Having won the CAS Outstanding Teaching award herself in 1996, Brown said that of all awards it is one of highest achievement for teachers because it decided exclusively by student nominations. The alumni who voted this year are from the 2001 and 2003 graduating classes.

The Outstanding Teachers award is in its 20 th year and is the only CAS award based solely on student nominations and exclusive to teaching. One teacher from each of the three divisions, Arts and Humanities, Science and Mathematics, and the Social Sciences is awarded each year. A display of winners and list of past recipients is in the lobby of KFA.

The award was announced at a September pepfest at Medcraft's school. Judy Jax, chairperson of the Wisconsin selection committee and member of Phi Delta Kappa International, presented Medcraft with the award.

Planned use of the award money includes purchasing a pug mill, which is a clay-grinding machine, for Osceola High School. Medcraft chose to purchase this because of her students' participation in the Empty Bowls Project. For this project, her students create pottery bowls, and then in conjunction with the Spanish department, serve a meal to the community. The event raises money for the local food shelf and for Heifer International, as well as creating awareness about world hunger.

"Peg had great enthusiasm for clay, and no doubt carried that on into her work," says Wild. "It's wonderful to me that I've had a number of former students that have gone on to teaching, especially at the elementary or high school, because the public schools are left in the dust - prestige is usually at the college level."

Jermal states that Medcraft has been a guest speaker to UW-RF art students numerous times and has worked with UW-RF art students by mentoring them. She also says that many of Medcraft's high school students have gone on to be UW-RF art students themselves.

Medcraft first won the award on the local level, and received $1,000 for her school, a $50 gift card to Wal-Mart to buy classroom supplies, and an honorary greeters vest. She then applied at the state level and was selected from among 85 Wisconsin teachers. Along with the $10,000, she received a one-year membership to Phi Delta Kappa and was automatically entered in the national contest.

OCT. 14, 2005--A plaque destined to be hung in the new student center waits patiently in a North Hall office for its new home to be completed. That plaque honors Bob Sievert, an alumnus and long-time University of Wisconsin-River Falls administrator, who was vital in planning for the hub of student life on campus.

"Bob was instrumental in the vision for that building," said Mary Halada, vice chancellor for administration and finance. "He was one of those who really pushed us to think bigger and better what we could do."

While the new student center will be the heart of the UW-RF campus, the Fireplace Lounge will be the heart of the new student center. Halada expects it's where friends will meet, people will study or settle in with a cup of coffee just to relax.

As the director of student center facilities, Sievert oversaw budget and operations for the residence halls, food services, Knowles Physical Education and Recreation Building, Hunt Arena and also the Hagestad Student Center. He has also served as Interim Dean of Students.

Sievert's made his mark most recently as director of student life operations, where he oversaw the residence halls, the Knowles Building, Hunt Arena and also the student center. In 2002, Sievert received the Chancellor's Award for Excellence, an award given to a non-instructional staff member who has made an outstanding contribution to the university.

In addition to the Fireplace Lounge, an annual award will be named after Sievert as well. The award will be given to one student each year, to someone who goes above and beyond, exemplifying what good customer service is.

During Sievert's time at UW-RF, he worked with students and employees exploring how the campus might "provide a better and more meaningful experience for people." He looked at the hours and prices in the student center, and also how employees react with customers and the student body.

Students will work together across the campuses to strengthen the service-learning initiatives within the areas of agriculture, life sciences and natural resources. Four faculty members from each of the three campuses will participate in training workshops and learn how to incorporate a service-learning component into their courses. Students will also serve as teaching assistants in these courses to help other students adjust to the new concepts.

Hilree Hamilton, campus advisor for the Collegiate Music Educators organization, nominated Kulsrud for the award. Kulsrud is majoring in instrumental music education with a secondary degree in vocal performance.

The award commemorates Gaarder's outstanding service to the WMEA as executive secretary/treasurer and editor of the WMEA publication, Wisconsin School Musician.  It also marks his more than 25 years of teaching instrumental and choral music in all levels of public schools.

Career Services Director Carmen Croonquist visited Reykjavik, Iceland, for a week in September at the invitation of its national counseling association whose members sought to borrow UW-RF's techniques in helping to get students placed in employment after they graduate.

The topic fascinated Kardal, and she wanted to implement the concept in Iceland. Kardal then invited Croonquist to Iceland to offer a series of presentations for counselors and counselor education students.

While Croonquist was in Iceland she presented to three different groups. The first audience was the Icelandic Counseling Association, which was broadcasted on TV and on the Internet. Another group included master's level counseling students at the University of Iceland. The third group included counselors who worked with "Upper Secondary" students, who ages 16 to 20. " I especially loved working with the master's-level counseling students," says Croonquist.

Croonquist informed each audience of the various applications of career portfolios, self-assessment techniques, portfolio creation, and different methods for effectively presenting portfolios to various audiences.

With Kardal they raised the grant money for Croonquist's trip and set the goals for each presentation. Croonquist reports that she has met their expectations based on the feedback she has received verbally and by an e-mail that she received from her Icelandic colleagues.

"Inga indicated that my presentations were a success by in two ways: one was the interaction from the counselor students during her presentation, and the other was that every student shook my hand after the presentation," says Croonquist.

The e-mail sent by Vilhjalmsdottir expressed how Croonquist's presentation is having a lasting effect on her students. "One of my students this morning was referring to his career portfolio and I thought: 'Yes, something is changing!' It is so important for us here in Iceland who are still working as pioneers installing a new service in our schools and employment centers to have visitors like you who really teach us something new and valuable, that we in turn can use for the benefit of our clients."

Croonquist said she is pleased with the outcome of her trip. "It was a once-in-a-lifetime experience for me. All of my memories of the trip are positive ones. I felt fortunate to have had the opportunity to share my knowledge of career portfolios with Icelandic counselors and students," said Croonquist.

Biggs' is a faculty member at Presbyterian Ladies' College in Peppermint Grove, Australia, just outside of Perth. Established in 1915, Presbyterian Ladies' College is a private entity that schools girls from pre-kindergarten through 12 th grade. Biggs shared many of her innovative methods that she uses for middle-school age students.

"My girls don't use texts except for math," says Biggs. Instead, Biggs creates her own curriculum and posts it on the Apple notebook computers that each student has.  Students can work at their own pace, allowing some to work slower without holding any of the other students back. Biggs says that travel is common amongst her students, and that by having all of their work on computer they can keep up with their class without any trouble.

For example, one of Biggs' "WebQuests" involved finding an ocean or sea and identifying its environmental issues. Each girl or group then shared their information with the rest of the students, which resulted in students learning not just about one body of water, but about 25-30 others.

Biggs also involves the "Habits of Mind" and reflective practice in her classroom.  Habits of Mind, a series of skills, attitudes, and traits, helps people to act intelligently when they don't know the answer to something. According to Biggs, people that are highly successful in the workplace are excellent users of Habits of Mind, which is one of the reasons she teaches it to her students. She also teaches her students to use reflective practice, which she defines as "thinking about thinking.". Reflective practice is a multi-step process that involves serious reflecting on your work and your thoughts.

"The education program at UW-RF is wonderful," says Biggs. "I've gained as much from being here as others have gained from me. The best parts of working with students here are that they are open to new ideas, interested in other people, and very friendly."

The Career Fair gives employers the opportunity to attract and inform future employees along with student interns. Fair-goers can improve their networking skills, speak with potential employers, and further their knowledge on their field of interest. Students at any level can benefit from the Career Fair and are encouraged to attend. First- and second-year students will benefit by gaining knowledge about career information, internships and part-time positions. Sophomores and juniors may be able to find possible internship opportunities that will help them vain valuable work experience. Seniors will be exposed to future job opportunities. Last year amost 1,200 students attended the fair.

Space is limited to 100 registrants, and registration is still open for employers. The registration fee is $125, which includes a booth with table, parking, refreshments, electricity for displays if requested, and one lunch for the organization representative.

Swensen joined Yale University's as the foundation's chief investment officer in 1985, and manages more than $14 billion in endowment assets while directing a staff of 20. In recent years the endowment has generated returns of 16.1 percent annually. Prior to Yale, he spent six years on Wall Street developing new financial technologies for such nationally known investment firms of Lehman Brothers and Salomon Brothers.

Former Chancellor Gary A. Thibodeau said Swensen is "an example of a River Falls graduate who has gone into an extremely competitive career in finance, with a rise in managing huge portfolios ... that is amazing for a person of his age."

Interested individuals can bid on art donated by alumni, faculty, former visiting artists and emeriti. High bidders will be informed on Friday Oct. 28 and can pick up their artwork the same day, from 9 a.m. until 5 p.m. and also from 7 to 9 p.m.

Swensen's research mainly focuses on lung cancer screening with Computed Tomography (CT), also known as CAT scanning, and radiologic analysis of lung nodules and masses. Swensen's research uses low-dose spiral CT screening to detect lung cancer at an earlier stage when it is more likely to be cured. He also is investigating the utility of biomarkers, including both genomic and proteonomic signatures of cancer.

In addition to administrative duties, Swensen is the principle investigator of two National Institutes of Health grants, both from the National Cancer Institute. These grants support nearly 40 percent of Swensen's time and are valued at more than $4 million devoted to lung cancer research.

Swensen serves as a member of the Board of Directors of a technology-based venture start-up company called TeraMEDICA, founded by a small team of Mayo Clinic leaders. The company plans to build the largest medical digital imaging archive available on the planet. Ultimately, the Mayo Clinic will become a digital and filmless enterprise with patient images available wherever and whenever. He has been the president of the Society of Thoracic Radiology, president of the Fleischner Society, president of the Mayo Thoracic Society, and currently is president of the American Association of Clinic Radiologists.

The theatrical version is based on the sci-fi, kitschy, goth-inspired rock-n-roll movie, "Rocky Horror Picture Show." The audience interaction that has made the movie a film icon is guaranteed, including cascading toilet paper and all the trimmings. On Halloween night guests are encouraged to dress in costume.

On Saturday, alumni are encouraged to attend a reception with a continental breakfast and refreshments from 10 to 11 a.m. in the deli area of the Hagestad Student Center. The Student Advancement Association will provide a 45-minute guided campus tour, which will depart from the deli area at 10:30 a.m.

Additionally, the College of Business and Economics is holding a pre-homecoming celebration on Oct. 24-28. Former CBE majors will be speaking on campus about their careers and future career opportunities for upcoming graduates. The Executive in Residence will be Mr. David Swensen, a UW-River Falls alumnus and chief investment officer at Yale University. Most CBE events are open to the public. A complete schedule of activities for Homecoming Celebration Week can be found on the CBE web site: www.uwrf.edu/cbe .

John Crawford joined the National Guard in Florida to help pay for his college education. Crawford served for six years to receive money for tuition at Florida State University. He had just two credits left to complete for his B.A. in anthropology, when he received his call for deployment to Iraq.

"The Turkey Trot is a way to join students, faculty, community members and alumni on campus and to help the victims of the hurricane. It is both a social event and an opportunity to be active," Bild said.

The conference will focus on the idea of information literacy and on currently important thinking skills. Information on kinds of classwork that integrates these skills into the classroom will also be shared.

The Center for Teaching and Learning is a place to come together to explore new practices in learning, technology and teaching. A collaborative effort between the Scholarship of Teaching and Learning (SoTL) initiative and the Learning Technology Development Center (LTDC), the CTL sponsors workshops, brown-bag sessions and orientation sessions year round. It also assists with SoTL projects and with integrating technology into the classroom.

Guest speaker for the program will be Terry Ludeman, the chief of the Office of Economic Advisors of the Wisconsin Department of Workforce Development. Ludeman will present "Wisconsin's Approaching Workforce Changes," an examination of recent developments in Wisconsin's labor markets and the pending developments and trends.  The discussion will include a view of industry makeup and the importance of that diversity.

Discussion will focus on the changes in the demand and supply of labor with an emphasis on demographic and economic changes from the past, present and future. The demand for workers and structural changes in industry will be examined. The supply of labor will also be examined, particularly the pending developments, including an aging baby boom generation, the brain drain and a sagging birth rate.

Ludeman has had chief responsibility for analysis of Wisconsin's labor market conditions for 10 years as chief of the Office of Economic Advisors. Prior to that, he was the chief of the Local Workforce Planning Section and also served as the Department of Workforce Development's Labor Market Analyst for the Waukesha, Ozaukee and Washington county area. With an extensive background of experience within the labor market, Ludeman has been involved in developing and providing labor market information to Wisconsin customers since 1988.

PCEDC is a private, nonprofit organization created by business owners and local and county government officials in 1987. The purpose of the organization is to promote economic development, provide direction and coordination to development, assist in finding alternative resources to economic development, research various resources and maintain a central source of information, and to maintain contact with public agencies and private organizations that promote economic development.  For more information on PCEDC or the Progress Pierce County series, please contact PCEDC at 715-425-3811.

Fry comes to UW-RF well versed in the nuances of student life and well prepared from his previous professional positions. He was the director of campus life since 2001 at the University of Central Oklahoma in Edmond. Fry also worked at Avila University in Kansas City, Mo., where he was director of student activities. While a graduate student, Fry worked in the Office of Student Life at the University of Missouri-Kansas City. In addition, he is a former admissions representative for Wichita State University.

One of his first endeavors on campus has been to launch a program, Student Personnel Development Series, designed for professional development of staff and students. The first topic covered in September was bout theories of racial and sexual identity. Fry outlined what causes students to have diverse feelings, thoughts and backgrounds. "It's just not a coincidence, it's just not luck, but there are some theories and foundations as to what we do, and I want people to be aware of them," said Fry.

Presented on the third Thursday of each month, the Student Personnel Development Series will feature upcoming topics such as a presentation on the new Student Center's design and functionality, presented by Heinselman, as well as other topics related to student life, campus diversity and student development.

Fry said his past collegiate experiences have given him insight in to student life. "I had two different college careers," said Fry. "At one I spent most of that time babysitting people ... some roommates had drug problems. It was quite a challenge to make sure that my roommates didn't hurt themselves. I think this is what led me to the students affairs field. When I became engaged in student life ... I really made connections with people who became my mentors in the profession.

Because the first year at college can be the hardest, Fry has some advice for freshman on how to achieve success in upcoming year. "Time management is very important," says Fry. "Students are constantly bombarded with new opportunities, both constructive and destructive. If a student is able to maintain a fairly regular schedule that allows for an appropriate balance between academic and social activities, they are likely to have a successful college experience."

Fry, his wife Michele, who is a speech pathologist, and their two-year-old daughter, Abby, live in River Falls. After some 21 moves--all to large cities--Fry said he was nervous at first to live in a small city, but says that transition has been great and he has thoroughly enjoying the community.

Through Fry's efforts with Hurricane Katrina relief he feels as though he has made some connection with the community, but he feels that it is still a work in progress. "In terms of hearing from alumni and making connections with the American Red Cross, yes. Beyond that I think those connections in River Falls are still being developed," says Fry.

With the new Dean of Student Development and Campus Diversity Blake Fry, Heinselman has been heading up the Hurricane Katrina relief efforts. Another big endeavor is leading the development of the new student center under construction, working with the renovation of the Knowles Physical Education and Recreation Building, and strengthening the living community for the new South Fork Suites.

Heinselman is well prepared for the challenge of the new student center at UW-RF, as he has been involved in launching three student centers. He is working with a team of directors on defining the mission, purpose and core values of the new student center and how it should compliment and support the mission of UW-RF. "We will draft a guiding document to move forward in the future and how we will support student living," said Heinselman.

Student affairs is very familiar territory for Heinselman, who has almost 20 years of experience in the field. He was as the director of student life at Duke University in Durham, N.C., for the past two years before coming to UW-RF. Heinselman has also worked at UW-Platteville for nine years as the director of campus life and university centers. Both are similar in size to UW-RF.

Another big project on Heinselman's plate is the South Fork Suites, designed to be a living-learning community. He is helping the residence hall community define themselves and to embrace their role on campus. "South Fork is a very different type of living environment compared to our other resident halls on campus," says Heinselman.

"It's a beautiful facility," said Heinselman. "I like to think we're starting on the inside where you don't expect it. The floors have been stripped, and the track is being laid. The ice is ready, and the hockey team is practicing."

The new Student Center is scheduled to open January 2007. Coming to the project midstream, Heinselman is trying to familiarize himself with the design of the building, what services will be located in the facility, and how to deliver and provide those services to the campus community.

Heinselman believes that the new Student Center will change the way people act socially on campus. "This facility is going to be used first and foremost as a recruitment and retention tool to the institution; I believe that it's going to have a sweeping impact on the community dynamics here at UW-RF," says Heinselman.

Heinselman has a B.S. in business administration from Northern Arizona University. After graduation from NAU, Heinselman was highly involved in opening a new student center as manager the facility. His M.S. degree is in education administration from Pittsburg State University. He is originally from Pocatello, Idaho, and has lived in Kansas City Dallas, and San Diego. He and his wife, Kari, who is a kindergarten teacher at Westside Elementary, have four children.

Heinselman says he feels that attending campus events is the great way for the community to connect with students, faculty and staff and vice-versa. For example, one well-attended event is the annual Wyman Series, which feature a diverse line-up from motivational speakers to gospel choirs and popular jazz artists such as George Winston.

"We are looking for ways and opportunities to make connections with the community," says Heinselman. "I would like to hope the community feels welcomed and well engaged in campus. I think it is important to get out there to the community what our role is in providing those cultural and educational opportunities."

This summer, six UW-RF faculty traveled with Wong, who is the founder of the China Exploration and Research Society, to the northwest corner of the Yunnan Province in China. Their mission was to create a partnership with CERS to involve students in international development projects and establish internships for biology, food science, eco-tourism, art, marketing, and other students.

"UW-RF has, in How Man, an incredible opportunity to work with a very distinguished and internationally acclaimed individual," said Greene. "The possibilities for student involvement are virtually boundless and will expand as we continue to develop our rich and growing relationship with How Man and the China Exploration and Research Society. UW-RF students have an opportunity that virtually no other university students in the nation have; to work with the very well developed infrastructure and resources of CERS."

The Zhongdian Center, headquarters of the CERS, is the main center where students could live. The center would house, catalog and store collections as well as have tourism information and language tutoring. There are many nearby sites where students could work and experience Chinese culture, such as the Gongbing village, where students might work to develop a bed-and-breakfast inn for travelers.

The Golden Monkey Lisu Hill Tribe is another site where students could research and preserve the area for golden monkeys, and the Tibetan Mastiff site is where pre-vet majors/minors might work with dogs to study DNA analysis.

Wong came to UW-RF as a student in 1969. Having been accepted to three other universities, Wong chose River Falls because the name conjured up images of a wonderful waterfall. Disappointed with the falls, Wong found River Falls a rewarding experience and graduated with majors in journalism and art.

During his assignments, Wong realized that areas of China that were not yet been modernized were disappearing. "Everywhere I went I encountered people and customs that I knew were going to vanish almost as soon as I'd photographed them," said Wong in an interview with Time magazine. "I realized that to be an explorer in today's world, you can't escape becoming a conservationist."

In 1986, Wong founded CERS, a nonprofit organization dedicated to exploring the remote regions of China. The organization also conducts multidisciplinary research, implements nature and culture conservation projects, and distributes information through educational and other channels.

CERS is involved with many projects, including the protection of rare black-neck cranes, antelope, wild yak and wild ass of the Tibetan plateau, conserving Palpung and Baiya monasteries and preserving a Moso village at Luguhu. The village is one of China's few remaining Moso communities.

Endeavor is an online academic journal for student creative writing, art work, scholarly analysis and research articles. Published twice a year, it is a venue for students to share and view original work of scholarly merit.

"It is a way for students to develop new knowledge and present it to the world," said William Campbell, director of grants and research at UW-River Falls and associate editor for Endeavor. "Publishing your work is the final stage of a research project."

To gain acceptance into the publication, students must submit their work online at the Web site. After submission deadlines, work is reviewed by faculty and edited to fit the requirements of Endeavor. Editorial policies and a style guide are posted on the Web site.

"I believe that Endeavor serves a very important role on this campus where students can work to create a well written, high quality manuscripts, submit that manuscript for critical review, and see their final work published and held up to the campus as a significant achievement," said David Rusterholz, chemistry professor and associate editor of Endeavor.

The workshop brought together UW-RF faculty and alumni interested international development to share common interests, consider research collaborations, discuss international components to UW-RF curriculum, and assess grants available to add an international component in the classroom and beyond.

Grants can also fund study tours in developing countries. The most recent visit was to Mexico where students spent 16 days working with communities and experiencing Mexican culture. Edward Robins, professor of sociology, anthropology and criminal justice, is planning a trip to Tanzania, and a study tour to Bolivia is being organized.

The goal of such tours is to increase students' appreciation of the importance of the conservation and diversity. The tours focus on global geography, inequality, population, culture, environmental issues, economics, food, interdependence, political systems and gender roles in developing nations.

"The workshop educated faculty and alumni with the awareness of the developing world," said director of international programs Brent Greene. "By doing this, faculty can take what they learn into their classroom and provide students with the information."

"My vision of a center for international development at UW-RF stems from a desire to make us more visible and able to attract more grant awards," said Brux. "This will help sustain us and permit expanded research and programs."

Workshop speakers included Marshall Toman, professor or English, who spoke about the "Traveling Classrooms" that are now part of the new international studies interdisciplinary major. Speech instructor Pat Hanson talked about her trip to China in August and the internship opportunities for students. Teri Crotty, professor of teacher education, spoke about the Bolivia project and discussed the arrival of a guest speaker from South Africa. Tony Jilek, professor of animal and food science, outlined his sabbatical in Mexico, which developed student internship exchange. Brux discussed improving the material taught in international courses. Pascal Ngoboka, professor of economics, described his summer tour to Uganda and the possibility of opening these tours for the UW System.

They advocate proper training and education for the food industry workforce about food protection practices as very important in preventing and responding to threats or terrorist actions. Past outbreaks of foodborne illness and food recalls indicate that systematic, proactive approaches to food safety may be effective in minimizing the threat of natural or accidental contamination of food with pathogens.

Food chain biosecurity is a relatively new concept in ensuring safe food throughout the food chain from production on the farm, through harvesting, transportation, processing, warehousing and distribution to retail outlets. The U.S. food industry include more than 57,000 food processors, 164 import establishments and more than 1.2 million retail food facilities nationwide.

The broadcast marks the 60th anniversary of the founding of the Food and Agriculture Organization, and the teleconference will focus on the 60-year battle for food security for all citizens. Because the world now produces enough food to feed everyone, yet 800 million people are chronically undernourished, the teleconference will explore a range of solutions to end the world's most enduring human tragedy.

They will meet with Chancellor Don Betz and members of the UW-RF faculty and staff to discuss educational partnerships. Several faculty members and possibly student groups have plans to visit Bolivia this year for various cultural-educational exchanges.

The career fair is from 9:30 a.m. to 2:30 p.m. in the Karges Gymnasium. Participating organizations will have the opportunity to inform and attract future potential employees to meet their specific needs.

This year more than 45 new organizations are participating in the career fair. "This is a very important fact because it gives more students a better opportunity to find internships, jobs and make employer contacts for the future," says Lee Ewings, career fair coordinator. "It is our goal to invite organizations from all areas to cover the programs offered at UW-RF. Hiring new employees is an important investment for all organizations."

Space is limited to 100 registrants, but registration is still open. The registration fee is $125, which includes a booth with table, parking, refreshments, electricity for displays if requested, and one lunch for the organization representative.

Najafi is a computer science and information systems faculty member in the UW-RF College of Business and Economics. He will describe the concept of data hiding using an artificial neural network (ANN) and how the network can be trained to identify pixels in an image that can be modified so that hidden product ID numbers, secret codes or copyright information will not be noticeable to the human eye.

The session is being held to cultivate volunteers for Hurricane Katrina relief efforts, to encourage campus and community members to get involved in civic engagement and to educate citizens on what to expect when assisting with a disaster, according to UW-RF social work Professor Ogden Rogers, the River Falls Hurricane Katrina response coordinator who will lead the training session.

All campus and community residents are invited to participate in the session, which will focus on family services provided by the Red Cross. Prior to attending the session, participants are asked to view the online Introduction to Disaster Services Course at http://www.redcross.org/donate/volunteer/.

This year's tour is lead by UW-RF theater Professor Meg Swanson and includes sites of historical importance and areas of extraordinary natural beauty. The itinerary includes Athens, the center of ancient Greek culture; Delphi, where the oracle once spewed out prophecies that changed the world; Olympia, the site of the original games; Crete, the capitol of Minoan civilization; as well as Santorini and Mykonos.

Swanson has spent considerable time in Greece and is eager to share this very special country with others. "The place is unspeakably beautiful," says Swanson. "It is the natural beauty, the incredible history and the kindness of the people that make Greece such a special destination."

Participants will also have free time relax on the beaches, shop in local markets and explore the culture. Cost of the tour is $3,995 for 15 days; price includes air transportation from Minneapolis (arrangements can be made to pick up the tour at other locations), hotels, in-country travel, admissions to sites of interest, gratuities, breakfasts, and some dinners. Also included are knowledgeable local guides to make the experience more meaningful.

Caskey receives a $5,000 award for outstanding career achievement in teaching.  The award aims to recognize an individual, academic department, program or unit that demonstrates exceptional commitment to and effectiveness in teaching.

The Regent's Teaching Award is the highest honor available for a faculty member in the UW System. A small number of awards are given annually; this year other recipients included the department of biology and microbiology at UW-Oshkosh and UW- La Crosse Professor of Philosophy Kenneth Maly.

Caskey plans on using the award money to further educate himself. He plans to travel to intriguing parts of the world and see other cultures. He then plans to bring what he learns back into the classroom.

"Students need to be actively involved in reading, listening, and thinking," said Caskey. "Having fun is another part of learning; students need to enjoy and look forward to learning each day. Lastly, students need to challenge themselves and what they believe."

Caskey spends much time helping students and fellow faculty and students. He is a mentor to other faculty and helps them build classroom management. He also mentors McNair scholars on campus, who are first-generation college students and is currently the board president of the River Falls United Way. For this involvement, Caskey has also received the Community Service Award and the Outstanding Advising Award from the College of Arts and Sciences. He is a member of the Psychology Society where he does presentations on graduate studies.

"His vast knowledge of psychology, his dedication to student education, and his charismatic teaching style are extraordinary, which sets him apart from all other college instructors," said former student Amelia Versland. Caskey plays an active role in student's academic lives and has an encouraging learning style. "Brad has a special skill in helping students become involved in the learning process, frequently challenging opinions and encouraging active engagement with topics," said former dean Gorden Hedahl of the College of Arts and Sciences.

To qualify for the award, a nominee must complete nomination and eligibility procedures. An award committee is selected evaluate nominees commitment to teaching and learning and use of effective teaching strategies, and to have a significant impact on students' intellectual development. More information can be found on the procedures and requirements to be eligible for the Regents Teaching Excellence Awards at http://www.uwsa.edu/opid/awards/regcall.htm .

Smith received the award for the development of a plum cultivar that stands up to Wisconsin's harsh winters. He created the new cultivar by crossing a plum variety adapted to Wisconsin's frigid winters with a Japanese dessert plum. His plum has all the characteristics to produce a fruit in the Midwest that hasn't been grown here before.

The WiSys Innovation Scholar Award program is an initiative to recognize and encourage innovation among UW System faculty, staff and students. Selection of the award is based on the innovative concept, broad use, value and industrial application of an invention.

Smith's Lydecker plum variety, named after the late UW-River Falls Chancellor, Ann M. Lydecker, yields fruit as large and tasty as any California-grown plum. More importantly, it also withstands subzero temperatures and is highly productive, producing completely round, purple toblack plums.

According to Knowlton, cells are six by nine feet and house two offenders. This has increased the number of conflict incidences within the facility. By mapping out where the prison and rule violations occur, others can see what is documented on paper. Patterns may not be apparent until displayed as a map.

Her project generated a lot of interest from state and national agencies, especially at two recent crime-mapping conferences. Her work for the award was reviewed at the national level with international submissions.

Knowlton sparked interest in the project because she currently works in the correction facility as an investigator. "Overall, I have learned what I need to know here, and now I am applying it to the real world," said Knowlton.

The project was part of a three-credit independent study project with Charles Rader, professor and chair of the department of geography and mapping sciences. In order to complete the project Knowlton spent several hundred hours creating a database that would work to accurately map out the facility. Rader spent about 30 to 40 hours this summer working with Knowlton on the project. "Her project is a great innovative use of the geographic information system," Rader said.

The anonymous survey contains seven short-answer questions, each regarding perceptions and expectations of UW-RF. "Your answers are vital in identifying our strengths and informing the discussions we will have together about planning for our future," says Betz.

"In our 21st century world, the University of Wisconsin-River Falls and all organizations must thoughtfully and intentionally celebrate strengths and plan for the future ... Your answers will provide an essential foundation in shaping our values, vision and mission for the years ahead," says Betz in the preface to the survey.

Oct. 4-An all-campus Katrina relief efforts meeting will be at 3 p.m. in the North Hall Auditorium. The meeting is open to the public and will detail activities staff and student groups have already undertaken and how these efforts can be extended into academic offerings or serve to develop permanent partnerships.

The UW-RF Student Senate is "adopting" 75 University of Southern Mississippi students who have been identified as having lost significant possessions as a result of Katrina. The senate is also exploring the possibility of students traveling to the campus to help rebuilding efforts. Also on campus the Chalmer Davee Library will provide assistance to an affected library through the American Library Association's Adopt-A-Library program. Specifics of these programs and others will be discussed at the meeting on Oct. 4. For more information go to http://www.uwrf.edu/katrina  or call the UW-RF dean of students office at 715/425-3711.

That's exactly what Garth Brooks sang and what University of Wisconsin-River Falls Rodeo fans witnessed September 16  17 at Lab Farm No. 1 on campus. As fans packed the bleachers and children eagerly peered through the panel fences waiting for the next event, the 41st Annual Falcon Frontier Days Rodeo was deemed a success by participants and fans.

More than 3,000 fans watched as cowboys held on with all their might during bareback, bronc and bull riding, and as cowgirls weaved through barrels and wrestled down goats. Allie Burn, of Delano, Minn., who competes for South Dakota State University, has been competing in rodeos all of her life. "I like competing under the lights, she said of the evening rodeo. It's the first rodeo of the year. Everything is just so exciting."

The success of the rodeo wouldn't have been possible without the dedicated members of the Rodeo Club and other volunteers. "This is a very good rodeo for a college, said Brandon Balzer, a UW-RF senior majoring in dairy science from Owatonna, Minn. "I've been to a few rodeos before, and this is pretty impressive."

"I believe everyone can be a leader; it just takes knowledge and learning to foster those qualities," said Turner. "Leadership '05 was a great experience for these students, and the learning didn't end with the end of the conference."

A century ago, Albert Einstein wrote five influential papers that radically changed our understanding of the universe. One of the papers laid a foundation for the field of study that eventually became known as quantum mechanics.

During faculty development days in August, about 30 UW-RF faculty and staff attended a workshop on student mental health, and the year-long conversation and book were introduced, says Brad Caskey, associate dean of the College of Arts and Sciences and professor of psychology.

"Saturday" is a post 9/11-influenced work that follows a day in the life of neurosurgeon Henry Perowne as he deals with questions raised by the event and its aftermath. Retired UW-RF English Professor Jim Delaplain will lead the discussion.

Since January 2005, investors making equity investments in qualified early-stage stage businesses are eligible for a tax credit of 25% of the investment over two years. The workshop will cover which investors are eligible, what companies may be qualified new business ventures, what the tax-credit program limits are and what the steps are for investors from investing to claiming the credits.

Pam Christenson, director of the Bureau of Entrepreneurship at the Wisconsin Department of Commerce will the lead the workshop, give an overview of tax credits and answer questions. She was part of the team that developed and enacted rules and programs including the tax credits.

Born, raised and educated in New York and of Greek descent, Karolides has taught English and literature at UW-River Falls for more than four decades and calls Wisconsin home. He's witnessed and participated in the school's growth from a rural teacher's college and agriculture school to a suburban comprehensive university with international ties.

Over the decades, Karolides founded and has led the annual UW-RF Greece tour, engaging students and community members on an exploration of the classical roots of intellectual freedom. In 2007, he will teach mythology in Greece on the last leg of the touring international traveling classroom, part of UW-RF's new international studies major.

Although censorship may seem like a dusty concept, modern controversies continue to rage about books, movies, song lyrics and Web sites. Karolides' life's work helps ensure that works of literature today--from the Harry Potter series to "I Know Why the Caged Bird Sings"--are not buried under cloaks of suppression and censorship.

"The privilege to read--the right to read--is a significant basis for learning, both on the personal level to help us understand ourselves and others and on the social-political level to understand our world," says Karolides. "As such, reading is a key factor in promoting democratic ideals and practice. Censoring books--in effect--censoring ideas--negates these goals."

His new books--the Encyclopedia of Censorship and "120 Banned Books"--have been recently released from Facts and File--in time for Banned Books Week, Sept. 24 - Oct. 1, an occasion observed by schools and libraries around the world. The encyclopedia's title page contains words by the Greek philosopher and historian Thucydides and taken seriously by Karolides, "Be convinced that to be happy means to be free and to be free means to be brave."

As editor and reviser of the Encyclopedia of Censorship, Karolides's efforts resulted in a 700+page, five-pound hardcover reference--with about 50 percent new material added--covering all forms of expression from the past to the present. Designed in an easy-to-use A-to-Z format--with everything from the office of the censor in ancient Rome to the Internet in the computer age--the 2005 edition includes entries on the "Adventures of Huckleberry Finn," Judy Blume, the Christian Coalition, the Harry Potter series, Stephen King, Howard Stern, and other authors and titles that readers will readily know as well as court cases and countries from Afghanistan to Zimbabwe.

Of the painstaking process it takes to create such works of reference, Karolides says: "It's easier to write about plays or fiction pieces. One that I recently finished, banned on political grounds, was on the Kurdistan-Iraq problem. Spanning the 20th century it revealed the suffering of this ethnic group in Iraq, Iran and Turkey--the calculated bludgeoning of them by the leaders of these countries."

Karolides is the author of many articles and books on censorship, including "Banned Books: Literature Suppressed on Political Grounds," which was excerpted in a 1998 issue of George magazine and is one of a four-volume set on banned books published by Facts on File. Others include "Censored Books: Critical Viewpoints," "Celebrating Censored Books" and "Reader Response in Elementary Classrooms: Quest and Discovery." He is a former editor of the Wisconsin English Journal. He is the co-author, with his daughter Melissa, who has a M.A. degree in exercise physiology, of a book on physical fitness.

The Food Microbiology Symposium is Oct. 15-19 and features speakers from academia, industry and regulatory agencies will provide an overview on various topics including: GMO testing, strategies for controlling E. coli and other pathogens, biosecurity and food safety objectives.

Keynote speakers for the Symposium are Daniel Y.C. Fung and John O'Brien. Fung is a professor of animal sciences and industry and professor of food science at Kansas State University. He is an internationally recognized authority in the field of rapid methods and automation in microbiology for his research. O'Brien is the chief executive officer of the Food Safety Authority of Ireland (FSAI). He has a broad knowledge of risk assessment and food safety management at the international level together with communication expertise.

One objective of the SBDC is to link small businesses with professors or students for assistance in business counseling, including company start-up, computer assistance, business plan help and education.

The first misconception is that many people assume that the bank will loan them the "first dollar" to start a business. This is very relevant in western Wisconsin as the population and new developments are increasing, and many entrepreneurs want to start home remodeling or construction businesses.

The second misconception entrepreneurs might have is that everyone and anyone would be interested in a new product they've developed or want to create. He recommends narrowing their target market and advertising where those people go in order to bring them in.

Toward the aim of getting entrepreneurs to focus, DeWald is offering a new workshop, "Business Feasibility Analysis," to help entrepreneurs decide if an idea is worth the time and start-up money. The workshop will also cover the steps to launching a business and is Sept. 26 from 6 to 9 p.m. in the St. Croix Room at Wisconsin Indianhead Technical College in New Richmond. The course fee is $25 and open to 30 participants.

He will also teach a more comprehensive 8- to 12-week course covering entrepreneurship, finance, marketing and other aspects of a business plan. At the end of the course, the plan is sent to the SBDC in Madison to be approved. If approved, participants will be returned up to 75% of the course tuition as a scholarship.

In partnership with the outreach and graduate studies office, the College of Education and Professional Studies has formed a Shared Inquiry Community model. This two-year curriculum, offered for the first time this fall, enables teachers to gain their degree in a convenient way.

Currently about 35 teachers are enrolled in the program and will complete their M.S.E. in 20 weekends, meeting one weekend per month for ten months a year. With a set curriculum, teachers stay with the same group of people throughout their studies and are given the opportunity to utilize some online courses through the UW System online web-based software Desire to Learn (D2L).

Particularly emphasized in this program is the idea of shared learning; these teachers will conduct an open forum for thought expression and debate. In contrast to some conventional classrooms, those in this series of courses are encouraged to share their ideas and opinions with the rest of their group.

Jennifer Willis-Rivera, an assistant professor in the UW-RF speech communication theater arts department, will lead a discussion to increase awareness of the messages regarding race and gender that are often embedded in children's television and commercials.

Registration for participation in the outdoor exhibition begins Oct. 3. All UW-RF art students are encouraged to participate in this event, displaying temporary pieces of art, which last just three days.

"We asked school administrators what we could do to make it easier for educators to get the education they need," says Mary Manke, assistant Dean of the College of Education and Professional Development. "We listened to them and then created this program."

Experienced teachers, faculty, and administrators will teach the classes and students can enroll from anywhere. No travel to the University is required. Students can earn one graduate credit for each class in six weeks and pay the Wisconsin resident tuition rate regardless of where they live. Course topics are varied and are selected with input from area school administrators and already practicing teachers.

The series Online Courses for Educators is perfect for those teachers seeking credits for re-certification," Manke says. "Teachers who prefer not to attend class on campus will enjoy the convenience of an online format. And, since all classes meet different Wisconsin Educator Standards, educators can select topics that may be used to build their professional development plans under PI-34."

A minimum number of students is not required to "hold" the class, so courses will never be cancelled due to low enrollment. "We will offer the class for just one student," says Manke. Courses will be offered on a rotating basis four times per year.

Participants will receive hands-on training and targeted instruction, based on questions that participants submit in a pre-registration survey. They will also learn how to use existing equipment to convert milk into an artisanal masterpiece and how to control of the production process. Participants will also receive specific tools and resources for artisanal cheesemaking.

Enrollment is limited to 35 people, and registration must be received by Oct. 25. Cost is $350 per person and includes all materials, breaks, lunches, an evening banquet and bus transportation to field sites.

During the question and answer sessions facilitated by Dmitriyeva (pictured) who served as a translator, students and faculty were able to discuss business and economic trends, government policy, educational opportunities and career possibilities. The guests also got the opportunity to talk with students in upper-level business courses and later toured a dairy farm.

"Her expertise in woody plant material greatly enhances the horticulture program at UW-RF," says Terry Ferriss, professor of horticulture at UW-RF. "Our students are fortunate to have access to her background, knowledge and connections to the industry."

Wiegrefe has published articles in a broad array of popular and scientific journals from the American Journal of Botany, Plant Systematics and Evolution, Systematic Botany and the American Beekeepers' Journal to Landscape Plant News, Grounds Maintenance and Seasons magazine.

Previous positions include postdoctoral research associate at the University of Minnesota department of horticultural science, field and research assistant with the UW-Madison department of forestry, lecturer at the University of Illinois, Champaign-Urbana, instructor for the Illinois Arborist Association, summer ag agent for the UW Extension Service, as well as greenhouse worker, nursery salesperson, orchard sales manager and horticultural and curatorial intern for various botanical gardens and arboreta. She also visited Germany on a horticulture exchange program while a student.

"My philosophy is to impress upon the students ... that they need to learn the existence of resources to help them continue to learn once they've attained their degrees and positions," says Wiegrefe. "In teaching about woody plants, I prefer to approach it from a plant geographic perspective so that students come to understand what adaptations the plants acquired from competing in its native plant and soil community."

Horticulture Professor Brian Smith, inventor of the  Lydecker plum cultivar, said: "I am pleased to have Dr. Weigrefe on board as a colleague. She displays the type of enthusiasm for plants that bodes well for the horticulture profession in general and for UW-RF horticulture students in particular."

The former provost and vice president for academic affairs at the University of Central Oklahoma, Betz has considerable experience in educational partnerships and leadership development and has received several awards for excellence in teaching.

Manfred is widely published, with poems in more than 75 magazines and reviews in more than 25 anthologies. "Frederick Manfred: A Daughter Remembers," her literary memoir, was a Minnesota Book Award nominee and an Iowa Historical Society Benjamin F. Shambaugh Award nominee. She has taught advanced poetry at both the University of Minnesota and the University of South Dakota and has presented creative writing workshops or poetry Harvard University, Gustavus Adolphus, and Macalester College and other schools.

The first presentation, "Assessment of Health Care Brand Logos," is Sept. 23. Darryl Miller, a professor of marketing, will present findings from a content analysis of health care brand logos of Fortune 500 health care corporations.

Jones is the executive director and founder of Anchor Graphics, a nonprofit print atelier in the warehouse district of Chicago. In addition to his selection of etchings, monotypes and lithographs created in collaboration with his firm, prints by well-known Chicago artists in the exhibit include Ed Paschke and Jim Nutt.

Prints by Jones in the exhibit follow the tradition of the "family snapshot " and "street photographer"--documenting transitory moments in his life and encounters. His uses a simplified transfer lithographic technique, which he further embellishes with subtle color. The unfocused, ambiguous character of his work is intended to invite the viewer to question content--the where, who and what of the  visual narrative.

Jones holds a B.F.A. in printmaking and painting from the Kansas City Art institute. He has also taught courses in printmaking at Columbia College and at the Art Institute of Chicago. He is the executive director of Anchor Graphics, which is a nonprofit print atelier in the warehouse district of Chicago.

Bill Campbell, director of grants and research at UW-River Falls, will lead participants in the exploration of funding sources as well as writing inquiry letters and proposal narratives and developing budgets.

The course can be taken for two graduate credits in one of six disciplines or as a noncredit option. All participants will complete a proposal for critique by peers, and graduate credit students will be asked to submit a final proposal for review by an experienced reading panel.

The second workshop, "Sausage- and Jerky-Making" is for those who want to learn basic home venison sausage and jerky processing and preparation techniques. Participants will learn recipes, meat formulations, spices, and safe handling, packaging, and storing practices. All participants will take home samples of their work. The workshop is from 6 to 9 p.m. Tuesday, Nov. 8 and cost is $49.

Watters also teaches both workshops and is a lifelong hunter who has many years experience in meat cutting and processing. He has managed the UW-RF meat processing pilot plant for the past 20 years. The plant processes beef, pork, lamb, chicken, and the occasional red deer or ostrich. Watters also teaches classes and laboratories in quality assurance, meat cutting, meat processing and food processing.

Instructor Inna Wolfson, who has worked with ESL learners and educators in various settings for almost 30 years, will direct participants in the course designed to offer the skills of effective teaching to English language learners.

Participants will learn the basics of second language acquisition and factors that affect it. They will explore the cultural and educational background of ESL learners and learn about the various teaching models that benefit both native and non-native speakers. The course also offers new ways to collaborate among ESL teachers, to practice proven strategies that combine the best teaching in the content field and apply these skills to lesson plans.

Conveniently delivered and always available, these one-credit classes are designed to be easier for educators to access professional development opportunities. Classes are developed and taught by experienced teachers, faculty and administrators and are offered throughout the year. Each class can be completed in just six weeks, and all participants pay Wisconsin resident tuition.

Established in 1964 by the late Gerhard (Doc) Bohn, the University Rodeo was one of the first student rodeos east of the Mississippi. The rodeo team competes in about 10 rodeos across the country per year, and the rodeo is part of the National Intercollegiate Rodeo Association and one of 14 collegiate rodeos competing in the Great Plains region.

Participants in the Artists Conversations will find motivation and support from listening to others' ideas and sharing their own at this event. Participation in this event is not required to submit works for the exhibition or the open microphone event. The Artists Conversation at UW-RF is facilitated by art Professor Lynn Jermal.

Also, a display highlighting the U.S. Constitution is set up in the entry case in the Chalmer Davee Library throughout September. Information tables will also be set up at lunch in the Student Center and dinner in Rodli, where students can pick up pocket copies of the U.S. Constitution. Limited copies will also be available to faculty and staff during the opening events.

In the fall 2001, Shorewood hoped to boost its lagging football program, and Messmer was looking to return to the field after nearly two decades without a team. Borowski was granted access to the team--from the locker room to the sidelines--to follow the historic season. The book follows the players, from two "different" worlds in Milwaukee, as they learn about overcoming differences, working together and staring down adversity.

Borowski is a Milwaukee native and the city hall reporter for the Milwaukee Journal Sentinel. An award-winning journalist, he is a graduate of Messmer High School and Marquette University. "First and Long" is his first book.

The workshop will bring together UW-RF faculty and alumni interested in the area of international development; the purpose is to share common interests, consider research collaborations, discuss UW-RF curriculum, and assess grant opportunities in international development.

"Grant opportunities have been used to improve curriculum, fund research, as well as national grants to fund international projects," said Brux."Our hope is to continue to expand to include events such as a regional conference and a center for international development."

Viewers can expect to see a selection of deep sky objects, such as galaxies, nebulae and star clusters. Saturn, one of the most impressive sights of all, will be the only prominent moon or planet of our solar system to be seen above the horizon during the upcoming sessions.

In a slide presentation titled, "The Species Invasion Threat," John Wheeler, a professor in the University of Wisconsin-River Falls biology department, will discuss how these destructive species occur--in the wrong place at the wrong time because they have been moved there by people.

Wheeler, whose efforts at eradicating the invasive garlic mustard plant from the banks of the Kinnickinnic River were documented by regional media this summer, will talk about the negative impacts, predicted consequences, and ways citizens can act as sentries and help prevent future invasions in western Wisconsin.

Biggs is a master teacher who holds two master's degrees in education. She has taught at the early childhood, elementary and middle schools levels. She has also worked extensively with adult learners and is with Notre Dame University Australia.

Topics she can explore with workshop participants as well as university classes include: metacognition, student self-assessment, Habits of Mind, technology in the classroom, multicultural education, integrated curriculum, online learning, thinking skills, ICT in the classroom, curriculum integration from a social studies perspective  and with a literature catalyst, IB-PYP program, and purposeful questioning and listening.

Avishai Cohen knows a thing or two about both conservatory jazz as well as rousing African township music, sleek funk and European folk. He has played with such jazz notables as Herbie Hancock, Roy Hargrove as well as with the London Philharmonic Orchestra, the Boston Pops Symphony.

The free Wyman Series concert is sponsored by the UW-RF Performing Arts Committee as well as the Diversity Awareness Committee, both part of the Leadership Devlopment and Programming Board. Funding for the series is provided by student fees, which are ultimately allocated to various student organizations and committees.

Constructed in 1972, the main theater in the Kleinpell Fine Arts Building was renamed in 1991 in honor of a former chair of the speech communication and theatre arts department, Blanche Davis. Davis joined the faculty in 1949 and directed plays and taught in the department until her retirement in 1973. She was instrumental in enhancing the role of theater on campus and in the community.

"Business Feasibility Analysis" gives would-be entrepreneurs a chance to determine if a business idea is feasible, if it is worth the time and start-up money and how to take the steps to launching a business.

Betz was greeted by laughter as he explained that the pop music was part of a compilation he had put together for a reason: "It was the year our freshmen were born." Other birth-year milestones for this year's incoming freshmen, Betz noted, included Ronald Reagan in the White House, the Iran-Contra scandal, the Twins winning the World Series, movies including "Good Morning Vietnam" and "Robo Cop," and television shows such as "the Cosby Show," "Cheers" and "The Wonder Years."

The speech was interspersed with self-deprecating humor. Saying he was uncertain whether to expect an empty house or a crowd, Betz said he considered coming up with a marketing slogan to draw an audience. He drew laughter as he related that he briefly toyed with "Come meet the geek," before his staff talked him out of it.

The new chancellor also paid tribute to his predecessor, Ann Lydecker, who died in a traffic accident. He became acquainted with the popular chancellor when she served on an accreditation review team evaluating Central Oklahoma University, where he previously served as the chief academic officer.

"When I first arrived, people asked me how I was going to fill Ann's shoes," Betz said. "So, I thought I would tell you. I'm not going to fill those shoes; they were a special size for a special person who did wonderful things for you. But what I will do is to honor her commitment to this institution."

"We are educating and inspiring and mentoring and sculpting the next generation. Who will these people be? They will be the researchers, the business entrepreneur, the civic leaders, the school board members, the diplomats, the global thinkers, the problem solvers, who will lead us for the next 30 years. We are creating the next Wisconsin, and then beyond. We are an inextricable component of society's quest to build a better future."

During the next year, Betz said, he will lead the university community as it moves forward on identifying and articulating its core values to then translate into a mission and vision statement, which will lead to planning for the future. Betz promised to involve the university's stakeholders of students, parents, alumni, community members, faculty, staff, legislators, and others in identifying those values.

Those discussions leading to a shared vision will create an "institutional intentionality" that will define the University's role. Explaining the concept, Betz said this is a question he's asked himself every day since entering the front of a classroom 35 years ago: "What the heck do we show up here for?" Betz said faculty and staff should ask themselves two questions: What are we doing here? How shall we proceed?

Betz asked faculty and staff to pursue three goals this year and into the future. The first is a life of engagement, rather than of separation. He pointed to UW-RF's participation in the American Democracy Project and Campus Compact: two national movements that stress student service-learning as well as their preparation for a leadership role in society.

Betz received sustained applause as he concluded by asking faculty and staff to join in "reaffirming a culture of learning and leading, a culture of collaboration and caring, a culture of authenticity and academics. I can't imagine more noble work."

"I've earned a number of Red Cross cards in swimming, first-aid and disaster relief over the years, but this one is the biggest--I won't be able to fit it in my wallet," said Rogers, who plans to frame the certificate for display in his office.

As part of the requirements for the diploma, Rogers wrote a paper on developing a multi-level strategy of educating more persons in the United States about the content and importance of the Geneva Conventions, the humanitarian law of armed conflict.

The paper was received by the ICRC in Geneva, and a copy was sent the national headquarters of the American Red Cross. Staffers from the American Red Cross have used findings from the paper for a presentation at the Naval War College in Rhode Island.

Rogers, of River Falls, continues to work at national efforts involving teaching about the Geneva Conventions to American secondary school students in a course he's developed titled "Exploring Humanitarian Law." He's been joined by several area UW-RF graduates who are now teaching in the Ellsworth and New Richmond school districts on the nationalproject.

Rich says his work combines direct observation, memory and improvisation. "The paintings are not literal narratives, but speak through physicality," says Rich. "They are not about fixed identities, but about relationships, about the mingling of private and public space that occurs on the street, and within ourselves."

"It might also be someone in the workforce who is interested in changing careers and would like to complete a degree. Whatever their needs, the University has more than40 undergraduate programs and a broad array of graduate programs to choose from," Tuchtenhagen said.

The students who attended the meetings are members of the American Dairy Science Association Student Affiliate Division. The ADSA-SAD is a division of the parent organization that works to develop leadership and promote scholarship among students interested in the dairy industry and to encourage students toward careers in dairy science.  The ADSA has more than 400 undergraduate student members.

Students participated in a dairy quiz bowl among dairy clubs, business meetings and various competitions at the meetings. These included an undergraduate research paper competition, a "Leaders in Training" career symposium, and an awards luncheon. Students also attended symposia, oral presentations, and research poster sessions by professional members of the organizations.

The course is useful to business professionals who want to expand their knowledge of human resources. "Human resources management is an ever-growing, complex and competitive facet of the business world," said Sally Fields, human resources practitioner and course instructor. "No one can afford to forego opportunities to maximize their knowledge and potential in the field."

The course will cover a variety of topics ranging from strategic management to occupational health, safety and security. The course is geared toward human resource professionals and general managers, who will review the key concepts in human resource management and discuss current issues affecting human resources.

Upon completion, certified SHRM practitioners will receive 36 of the 50 credits required for recertification. Participants who are not yet certified will have gained the foundation in human resources principles to successfully complete the Professional in Human Resources (PHR) or Senior Professional in Human Resources (SPHR) certification exam.

UW-RF Chancellor Don Betz commenced the ceremonies by stressing the importance of teamwork as the essence to success. "As we celebrate the 15 years of successful training camp, we're really celebrating a relationship," said Betz.

Visitors from near and far heard Betz, Doyle, and Peterson, as well as quarterback Trent Green and others at the gala, and many toured the 12,300 square-foot  training and locker room facilities. The $2.4 million air-conditioned addition includes two locker rooms, each with 50 over-sized lockers, a whirlpool room, a training workroom, an expanded laundry, and office space.

UW-RF Student Senate President Nick Cluppert highlighted the many opportunities that the Chiefs organization provides to students, including internships, jobs, and other opportunities associated with an affiliation to an NFL organization.

Gov.  Doyle and University officials also noted that the new facility benefits the community, local tourism, as well as current students and prospective students who are considering academic and athletic opportunities at UW-RF. "This will pay for itself many times over," Doyle said. "This is a major improvement on campus as well. The students who attend River Falls and the students who are thinking about where they may attend--when they see this facility it's going to help this school a lot."

The limited-edition, keepsake book is available for sale at www.uwrf.edu/chiefs or at the camp concession stand during the open practices at the Ramer Field Sports Complex, throughout training camp, which runs July 28  Aug. 19. For more information about public practices and special events, visit the Web site listed above.

To be eligible, a junior must rank in the top five percent of the class, and a senior must rank in the top 10 percent of the class. The cumulative grade point averages for selected students ranges from 3.4 to 4.0 on a scale of up to 4.0.

Associate Professor of computer science Mary-Alice Muraski serves as the River Falls chapter secretary and agricultural economics Professor Lewis May is chapter treasurer. Each year the campus chapter awards a $500 scholarship to a deserving student inductee.

College for Kids is one of several summer academic enrichment programs for elementary and secondary students at the University. Students entering grades 4-6 are nominated to participate by their schools on the basis of high academic potential, motivation and talent.

In May, however, Klein and his classmates had the opportunity of a lifetime when a devastating fire swept across 3,900 acres in central Wisconsin, destroying 30 homes and 60 outbuildings. Started accidentally by a man making a fire pit on his vacation property, the fire raged a mile-wide, cutting a six-mile swath through wooded acreage in Adams County. It was described as the largest fire in Wisconsin in the last 25 years. No one was hurt, but 125 families were evacuated.

"We never imagined we'd be called," said Klein, who is the crew boss for the certified hand crew that was fresh from Kaltenberg's course, which is taught each spring in collaboration with the Wisconsin Department of Natural Resources.

"Cale asked him where the incident command post was, and he saw that we were in our garb and directed us to the Big Flats Township fire department," said Klein. "There were vehicles, engines and fire fighters everywhere. We walked into this room the size of basketball court, and the whole thing was full of people wearing yellow shirts and green pants; it was like a Green Bay Packer convention."

A laptop computer projected a detailed map of the fire on the wall, and the students saw the incident commander with his standout vest. "Everything we'd read and learned about in class was coming to life," said Klein.

"When we went out that night, first there was a feeling of excitement and adrenaline and then a humbling feeling--whoa, this is real. We saw houses burned--nothing but chimneys and front steps," said Klein. "We mopped up hot spots, walking along the fire break where they've dozed a big lane through the woods down to mineral soil to stop the spread. After about three hours, Chris's radio started acting up. He was really concerned, and said, 'We gotta go.' That was one of the first things we learned in class: Fire fighter safety is No. 1."

The UW-RF crew spent the weekend on the scene along with 250 fire fighters, four airplane tankers and countless wildfire rigs. During the day they cleaned up and rested at a Wisconsin Rapids hotel. It's better to fight the hot spots associated with the main fire at night, Klein learned in class and on the job, as the wind decreases, temperatures drop, and humidity rises, creating more favorable conditions.

On Friday, Gov. Jim Doyle visited displaced families and firefighters. On Saturday the UW-RF crew worked with the Menomonie Tribal Lands wildfire fighting department. "We saw an old bus, and on the side were thick globs of molten glass," recall Klein. "We saw a 14-foot fishing boat, which looked just fine, but on the other side it was melted into a solidified puddle of aluminum."

The experience was unforgettable, Klein says. "Seeing all the community agencies come together was the neatest experience," said Klein."One night after dinner I saw one of the food volunteers, who had her sleeping daughter on her lap, and she was nodding off. I said, 'Thank you, that was a very good meal.' She said, 'You're welcome.' That moment really got to me, she was obviously working really hard too. I had to go outside and dry my eyes."

Since the course Environmental Management 289 was first offered, students have not had the opportunity to fight a real fire during the school year, says Kaltenberg. Hands-on experience in the course is gained from controlled, prescribed burns done locally and supervised by the DNR.

After successful completion of the course, students can then go on to earn a "red card" that is needed to assist with federal wildfires. They also need to pass a physical assessment every year to maintain this certification.

"Teen University provides academic enrichment as well as an opportunity to explore current thinking and innovation for students demonstrating high academic potential, motivation and talent," says Diane Ballard, youth outreach program manager in the UW-RF outreach office.

The department, composed of 12 faculty including three part-time instructors, has more than 200 majors working toward one of three art degree options, including the Bachelor of Fine Arts degree. Approximately a third of those majors earn certification in art education.

All faculty are active professional artists and bring a unique insight to their selected media, says Michael Padgett, department chair and professor.  "I'm proud of this department, its students, and the contributions it makes to the regional art community," said Padgett.  "The department is well respected in the region, and the art program has grown to be the 10th largest in the University's major areas of study."

Formerly a turn-of-the-century sheep ranch, Anderson Ranch was transformed into an artists' community some 35 years ago, says Jeremy Swanson, director of communications for Anderson Ranch. In 1966, a handful of area artists cleared out the historic barns for studios, set up a gallery and inaugurated an informal workshop program.

Since forming as a nonprofit visual arts community in 1973, Anderson Ranch promotes the imagination of young people, revitalizes the expressive impulse of adults, encouraging the inventive experimentation of talented emerging artists, and supports the intensive inquiry and production of mature artists.

Greg Jacobs, a 2005 graduate from Cumberland, has been awarded a glass scholarship to study at the Haystack School, a renowned art school-residence founded in 1950 on Maine's Atlantic shoreline and featuring top instructors from around the world.

Cara Benedetto, a 2001 fine arts graduate from Wausau, has been accepted into the prestigious Tamarind Institute of Lithography in Albuquerque, N.M. An internationally respected program, Tamarind accepts only four to six students from an international pool of applicants each year. Benedetto was also accepted into the Montclair (N.J.) State University graduate program in printmaking, starting fall 2006.

The group also features a powerhouse horn section, an infectious percussion section and a tight rhythm section. The repertoire of the group features salsa, rumba, son montuno, guaracha, cumbia, bolero, cha-cha, jazz, bachata and other Latin rhythms.

Frederic reaches the age of 21 and rejoices that his forced servitude has been fulfilled. He is now free to return to respectable society. But it turns out that he was born on Feb. 29 in a leap year, and he remains apprenticed to the pirates until his 21st birthday. By the end of the operetta, the pirates, the Major General Stanley, who knows nothing of military strategy, his large family of beautiful but unwed daughters, and a wacky, timid police force all contribute to a riotous discord that can be silenced only by using Queen Victoria's name.

The chorus first performed in the early 1970s, led by music Professor Emeritus Elliot Wold, who responded to a community initiative and brought together summer school students and area residents. "I found a lot of enjoyment working with the group and felt it was important for the community," Wold said.

The chorus is a good opportunity for anyone in the community who wants to sing, Schaefer says. "It is a collaborative experience where a wide variety of singers feel free to offer input and suggestions to prepare for a fine concert," says Schaefer.

A musical adventure for all ages, the concerts features more than 50 local musicians from the St. Croix Valley; the band is now in its 23rd year. UW-RF associate Professor of music Kristen Tjornehoj directs the band.

The River Falls Brass has a varied and impressive background in performing symphony orchestra, jazz ensembles, Broadway musicals, film and television scores and a variety of brass chamber ensembles. It has performed with many distinguished groups including the Minnesota Orchestra, St. Paul Chamber Orchestra, Los Angeles Philharmonic and New World Symphony.

"All aspects of a faculty members responsibilities are reviewed annually until the year of the tenure process," says Ginny Coombs, vice chancellor and provost at UW-RF. "Being excellent teachers is core to our primary mission at UW-River Falls, and each of the faculty being granted tenure and promotion possess superior credentials as teachers who are dedicated to student learning."

Tenure and promotion are granted through a rigorous review and voting process by colleagues of the candidate's demonstrated teaching, research, community service, and professional/scholarly activities.

Stucky, assistant director of alumni relations at UW-RF. "They also enjoyed biology Professor Tim Lyden's phenomenal presentation at the banquet on undergraduate student researchwhat they are doing and where they've presented nationally."

Since then nearly 700 young artists have participated in the program with many going on to excel as performers, music educators, college professors, entertainers, choreographers and top professionals in a wide variety of fields.

Kids from Wisconsin has performed at county fairs, festivals and conventions throughout the continent. The musical revue has helped raise thousands of dollars for worthy charitable organizations. The group maintains a demanding schedule each summer, performing 65 to 70 shows during the months of June, July and August.

Plenty of yellow caution tape, orange fences and gates and gold signs warn of construction traffic as well as a closed area of the campus service road from Sixth Street west to Fourth Street. Vehicle access to Hathorn Hall and Wyman Education Building is restricted to the Third Street campus entry, but access to the Regional Development Institute is still available via Sixth Street.

Camp arrival at the University on July 28, says Tim Thum, UW-RF project engineer. The addition includes locker rooms, restroom and shower areas, a training room and work room, remodeling for offices and a laundry area as well as the installation of air conditioning.

Starting in late August, a new floor will be installed in the Knowles building. While the building is typically closed for public recreation in the summer, it will also be closed in the fall while the new flooring is installed. Call 715/425-3381 for revised hours; schedules are also available in the lobby.

New tennis courts are underway off the paved trail from campus to Knowles and the Ramer Field Sports Complex. The old railroad right-away trail also runs near the courts, which will be open to the public when not in use by university classes or athletic teams. Courts available to the public are also located at the east end of campus near the residence halls and the new George R. Field South Fork Suites.

The new George R. Field South Fork Suites will open its doors to student residents this fall, and meeting and conference rooms are already in use this summer. Community, staff and students previewed the hall at a dedication honoring former Chancellor George R. Field in May. Some 240 students will live in 60, four-person fully-equipped apartments. Each wing per floor also has a community kitchen, lounge area and laundry room. The $11 million facility was funded entirely by student fees.

"We have about 60 projects going on," says Waldo Hagen, director of facilities management at UW-RF. "This is the busiest time of the year for us as this is the time when we can get into buildings with the least disruption for students, faculty and staff."

Both the Kleinpell Fine Arts Building and South Hall will receive new exterior doors. Masonry will be repaired at Prucha and Stratton halls, and the campus expects to resurface the Ramer Field track before the arrival of the Kansas City Chiefs.

"In addition to those projects, there are roofing, roads, parking lots and walk maintenance projects coming up," says Jim Murphy, facilities management engineer at UW-RF. Currently in progress is remodeling of the human resources offices in North Hall and various lab modernization projects, including in the Ag Science Building.

The River Falls Municipal Utility has begun a project to replace the sanitary sewer trunk main at the South Fork of the Kinnickinnic, Murphy said. "This will affect the campus in that there will be pipe extended on the surface near the stream, from the Ag Engineering Building on the west end of campus to a point upstream near the campus heating plant."

"Atypical of most projects, this pipe will be constructed on blocks above ground, one long piece stretching almost the length of campus. Its construction has been coordinated to prevent lengthy closures of the walking trails near the Wall Amphitheatre and heating plant. Once all put together and tested, it will be pulled into a hole directionally bored to the west.

Bentz is a multi-instrumentalist who has performed and composed several album projects, commercials and recording sessions. In addition to owning and operating Brickhouse Music in River Falls, Bentz has two albums of original music with his band and is working on a third.

Fans will get the chance to see the Chiefs up close as they prepare for the 2005 season. Several new players, both draft choices and free agents, will be battling for a coveted spot on the Chiefs final roster. Chiefs coaches, led by Dick Vermeil who is in his fifth season with the team, will be putting the entire team through its paces with high-tempo practices.

The Chiefs again look strong offensively going into the 2005 season with several veteran team members on the roster. Quarterback Trent Green had another top-ranked 2004 season and looks to carry the explosive offense.

After an extensive off-season of shopping for free agents and drafting, the Chiefs line will look fresh, but one familiar face on the line is veteran defensive end Eric Hicks, the rock of the Chiefs defense.

Johnson from the University of Texas, who is one of the most talented players in the draft and was awarded the Nagurski Trophy as the nation's top defensive player. Other draft picks include punter Dustin Colquitt from Tennessee, wide receiver Craphonso Thorpe from Florida State, linebacker Boomer Grigsby from Illinois State, and Alphonso Hodge, a cornerback from Miami (Ohio).

Aug. 6. The Chiefs practice under the lights, and food, music and games will be available, as well as photo and autograph opportunities with players and coaches.The Indianhead Sport Parachute Club kicks off the festivities, and a fireworks display caps off the fun. Admission is $6 for adults and free to those under 18. A new event that evening will be the Chiefs Experience.

Open to everyone, the Chiefs Experience offers some interactive games that will challenge everyone's football skills. A speed and obstacle course, a football throw and a field goal kicking station will be part of the fun.

The band performs jazz, funk, R&B, rock and jam music. All concerts are free and open to the public; in case of rain, the concert will be held in the Abbott Concert Hall of the Kleinpell Fine Arts Building on campus.

Extensive scene and costume shops, sophisticated computerized light and sound systems, a digital audio studio, well-equipped rehearsal rooms and a studio theatre add a little something extra to the summer theatre's performances that keeps ticket holders coming back for more.

"I'm very proud of how the students responded to a challenging news story when it was about a person they deeply cared about," said UW-RF journalism Professor Sandy Ellis. "I think Ann (Lydecker) would have been proud of how they handled that journalistic challenge."

The WRFW reporters spoke with some friends and colleagues of Lydecker and provided coverage of the University press conference held earlier that day. They wanted to tell the community about Lydecker and her impact on the community, said Ellis.

The entries had to be produced in their entirety by full-time students enrolled in any WBA member college or university for the 2004 calendar year. The students had to produce original material using University equipment.

Policy Board necessary to become a successful principal. While Wisconsin requires a master's degree for certification, those seeking principal certification in Minnesota must also obtain an education specialist degree.

Those seeking principal licensure in Minnesota can earn the required educational specialist degree by taking additional courses at St. Thomas. Students can earn a master of arts in educational administration from St. Thomas by completing the 30 licensure credits plus one three-credit class. Students who enter the program with a master's degree may obtain an education specialist degree through St. Thomas by taking two additional classes for a total of three credits.

D.C., at the University of Maryland working with 30 13-year-old girls building eight-foot high roller coasters. Lunn, as the main coordinator for the project, which was funded by the National Science Foundation, taught the general history behind roller coasters and basics concepts in energy, friction, inertia and physics.

While Lunn says not all of her students were captivated by her physics lessons, she said the girls really loved building the loop-de-loops in the roller coasters along with mini-cars meant to ride the rails.

According to Blodgett, "Lunn is like a moving target." As double major in physics and math, a member of the physics honors society and working 30-35 hours a week, Lunn has still managed to stay active in SPS.

Adviser Award, which he won in 2003-04. Blodgett, along with assistant physics Professor Lowell McCann, nominated Lunn through letters of recommendation for the scholarship so she could be formally recognized for her devotion to her studies and SPS.

Field Geology for Teachers and Field Hydrology and Geomorphology for Teachers are two new courses that expose participants to a variety of field experiences and techniques. Graduate students developed observational skills, used field instruments, and interpreted data, which aims to provide new opportunities for geology-related teachers to enhance their curricula.

These three-week courses are taught by two members of the geology faculty and assisted by a master teacher. As an integral part of the course, students took several geological field trips to Michigan, Minnesota, South Dakota and Wisconsin to see rocks from the Archean to Cretaceous ages, including a wide range of rock types, structures and features. Participants assembled their own field project notebooks and shared lesson plans with other students to ultimately integrate those ideas into their classrooms.

Tourism is increasingly providing nontraditional opportunities for significant public education, says Cordua, so he developed the CD at the request of the Pierce County Partners in Tourism. Cordua has led and co-led numerous geological field trips in the county and selected stops along the route to form the CD's loop driving tour. UW-RF geography department chair and Professor Charles Radar produced a geological map of the county for inclusion on the CD.

"The landscape of Pierce County is quite scenic, particularly along the Mississippi River and its coulee-style tributaries. Themes in the tour include bedrock formations, geological history and time, landforms, land use, and water and other resources," wrote Cordua in the abstract for the presentation. "The existence of a commercial cave, diamonds and gold in glacial drift, and a probable Ordovician asteroid impact structure enhances the appeal of the CD to the public."

Advanced Placement U.S. History (APUSH) Review Day is an opportunity for high school students to discuss major themes in U.S. history and see how those themes can be connected in preparation for the APUSH test, which covers all of American history and indicates how well students will do in college.

According to Leichtle, the event takes some of the "mystery and terror" out of taking the test. Leichtle says the faculty were just "visiting firemen" assisting the students with recalling knowledge they've already covered in high school.

Leichtle has been involved with APUSH since he was in high school, preparing for the same future as some of the recent participants. He took two tests as a high school student and says the college credit gave him extra time to do additional activities during college.

The exam was May 6. According to Leichtle, several of the teachers have told him their students felt good about their performance. The proof will come in about two weeks when Leichtle and Zeidel will join about 550 other history teachers in San Antonio to grade all the exams.

Leichtle says he's excited to head down to San Antonio. "I'll be able to talk with history teachers from all over the country about history, their curricula and their students. Plus, I'll get a chance to see how a wide range of high school students respond to college-level essay questions."

On April 29, the following day of the event, Leichtle and Zeidel traveled to UW-Superior, where they conducted another review day with about 50 students. Leichtle says the low turnout was because schools up north are smaller and do not offer APUSH courses every year.

In response to this rising interest in wildlife viewing and nature-related tourism activities, the University of Wisconsin-River Falls is offering a unique online graduate-level Wildlife Recreation and Nature Tourism (WRNT) certificate program.

The 15-credit program was developed in partnership with Watchable Wildlife, a national nonprofit organization based in Marine on St. Croix, Minn., that advances wildlife viewing in North America and internationally as a viable economic and conservation enterprise.

The program is designed for environmental professionals such as wildlife biologists, parks and recreation directors, naturalists, tour guides as well as tourism-related businesses, educators, community leaders and wildlife enthusiasts around the country. It offers the knowledge and skills needed to plan and implement an economically viable nature tourism site while focusing on the sustainability of the site's wildlife and natural resources.

According to Kelly Cain, UW-RF environmental science professor and WRNT program coordinator, the program provides participants with a good understanding of nature tourism and how it fits into the big picture while at the same time offering participants an additional professional credential.

"The WRNT program lays the foundation for professional development in the nature tourism industry," notes Cain. "This is the only nature tourism program I am aware of with a complete online curriculum offering a certificate towards a master's degree."

Core course topics include an introduction to the breadth and depth of the wildlife recreation and nature tourism industry both domestically and internationally, management theories and sustainable methods of human and wildlife interaction, and guidelines to create an entire community-based hospitality infrastructure that emphasizes the idea of sustainability and nature tourism. Methods to maximize the visitor's viewing experience through the development of trails, observation decks, and public facilities, while protecting and even enhancing the natural resources of the site, are also a main focus.

The WRNT program will benefit both participants and their employers. Along with gaining additional knowledge of the nature tourism industry, each participant will develop an electronic business management plan for a specific nature tourism site of his or her choice.

The business plan includes the steps and framework needed to plan, develop and implement a nature tourism site based on all course materials. A business portfolio may be developed for personal or professional use to persuade stakeholders or investors to assist in the development of the new site or to enhance a current nature tourism site.

Regional leaders in business, industry and education are invited to the county forums to discuss issues of human capital, innovation, financial capital, communications infrastructure, physical infrastructure and quality of place.

Wisconsin's own musical ambassadors perform the music of Broadway, country hits, rock 'n roll, swing, jazz and many other styles. KIDS from Wisconsin have been performing a variety of music since 1969. The rain site is North Hall Auditorium. For more information, visit www.kidsfromwisconsin.com.

College of Business and Economics, and Graduate Studies attended the morning ceremony and graduates of the College of Arts and Sciences and the College of Education and Professional Studies attended the afternoon affair.

Excellence, the highest award bestowed upon students, shared his wishes for his colleagues including friendships, a place to always call home, self-confidence, the courage and willingness to change and the opportunity to make a difference.

"When we came to River Falls we moved away from the home we'd know for so long, and started calling River Falls home," said Sirek. "My wish is that you remember you once called this place home, but that you are also able to find a place that makes you give your life to it and you truly live there."

Entering the "real" world after the River Falls experience will have a great impact on everyone the graduates meets, said Sirek. "My wish is that you take the knowledge and experience and lessons you've learned here and use them to make a difference in your communities and workplaces."

Sirek has been active in residential hall councils, UW-RF Student Senate, the Student Center Core Committee and Area Council, which represents nearly 1,100 students on campus. He also worked as a resident assistant, the house manager for theater productions and volunteered as a campus tour guide. Sirek developed a program in Johnson Hall through Big Brothers, Big Sisters, which has grown to be a successful volunteer program on campus.

Smith, of Apple Valley, Minn., who graduates with a B.S. degree in marketing communications, and Sirek, of Birchwood, who graduates with a B.S. in elementary education with minors in language arts and reading, illuminated the common experience of creating a new "home" to which they can return.

Smith discussed the importance of place in the college experience in her speech titled "Falcon's Eye View." She related the student experience with the campus community, calling residence halls places to "build relationships and learn from others" and South Hall as the roots that have inspired and created UW-RF. "Hold on to your roots," she said. "It is the certainty of yesterday that will carry you through the wonder of tomorrow."

Smith "Staring down the homestretch to River Falls on a humid August morning took my breath away four years ago, just as it still does today," said Smith. "Whatever tomorrow may bring, expect to see the sunset painting your sky with perfection."

The UW-RF Foundation grants review committee also considered how the projects advance the stature of the university, college and department, expand the faculty member's body of knowledge and add to the faculty-student experience.

This summer, the St. Croix Summer Institute, a new collaborative educational effort between the University of Wisconsin-River Falls and the National Park Service, will be offering its first two courses where students can discover many of the secrets of area natural resources.

American Continent to be protected for its entire length. Specific course topics include hydrology, geology and biology and are geared toward environmentalists, community and business leaders, historians, educators, land owners and local citizens.

Michael Middleton and Kerry Keen, professors of plant and earth science at UW-RF, will lead participants through this outdoor exploration of the area's natural resources. They will share their extensive knowledge of the areas natural features while the group travels along local hiking trails of low to moderate difficulty. No climbing is involved.

St. Croix Valley gathering data related to waterway health. The collected field data, along with catalogued data from the National Park Service, will then be used to create computer simulation models using STELLA simulation software. The STELLA software allows users to investigate questions and test hypotheses about the environmental effects of abiotic and biotic factors without manipulating the waterway in question.

Scholarly and Creative Activities, said the event is a great way to cap off the academic year. "One of the most powerful ways to engage students is to involve them in projects where they can apply the analytical and creative tools they have learned in their courses to a genuine problem, design a way to answer it, and defend the answer they reach before their peers and faculty."

SURSCA faculty advisor Tim Lyden said the event was a success. "More posters were presented than ever before. Among the presentations were interesting and innovative approaches ranging from music education to drinking water analysis looking at ground water contamination. Participants and the audience truly represented the entire range of research, scholarly and creative activities conducted here on campus."

This program prepares certified teachers for certification in learning disabilities. Participants learn to teach students with learning disabilities through direct instruction or resource programs. They also learn to collaborate with general education teachers having individuals with learning disabilities in their classrooms to be more effective teachers of persons experiencing learning problems.

The program is geared toward individuals committed to working with children who have learning disabilities, including practicing teachers, paraprofessionals, teacher's aides, individuals working toward teacher certification, and individuals from other settings such as service providers and day care centers who work with children with learning disabilities.

Students in this program administer and interpret diagnostic tests and provide direct instruction to school-aged individuals. The core coursework then culminates in a practicum experience under the supervision of a certified teacher of learning disabilities.

"The program, which is originally a two-year program, has been condensed in response to market needs," said Barbara Rebhuhn, program coordinator and associate professor of psychology. "The program was introduced last summer and is a fairly recent option for education professionals."

Rebhuhn has spent 10 years teaching students with learning disabilities at the elementary and middle school level plus seven years as a director of special education and 15 years of teaching learning disabilities educators at the university level.

The classes introduced children to other languages and at the same time focused on meeting education requirements for students. The Wisconsin Department of Public Instruction now requires UW-RF student teachers to teach modern languages to youth in grades K-6 as part of a new teacher licensing requirement.

UW-RF currently offers two teacher education courses to help students meet this standard. However, the new standard presents challenges for UW-RF students because very few area elementary schools offer the opportunity to teach modern languages.

Myhre constructed a classroom, each consisting of two university student-teachers, to teach French, German, or Spanish to 15 elementary students. UW-RF students planned and developed curriculum for each class. Once children showed up for the first class, Myhre grouped them into respective languages, depending on language expertise of the student-teachers.

Myhre believes the classes provided a large benefit to the children. "They opened up a whole new world, another language and another culture," said Myhre. "We hope by sparking an interest in the children, they will learn more about new languages later in life and school. It's crucial they learn to interact now, when they are young. I feel language needs to start in elementary schools, and what better way to start than with these classes, said Myhre."

Deb Toftness, mother of 10-year-old Zack Toftness, commended the classes for exposing her son to a different culture. "He loved to learn a new language. His older siblings have learned other languages in school, and this encouraged him even more," said Toftness. "The students were excellent teachers and really brought the language down to a level my son could understand."

Established by a grant from the Xcel Energy Foundation, the conference brought together students and faculty from throughout the UW System. Teams of students from all majors and disciplines were able to take part in a business plan competition to show their entrepreneurial spirit. Students had the opportunity to find out what goes into a successful business plan, to share ideas with leading business executives and entrepreneurs, and to network with business-minded individuals from all over Wisconsin.

On Friday, April 29, Greg Frankenfield, president and CEO of Magenic Technologies spoke about his experiences as an entrepreneur and some of the lessons he has learned. Frankenfield told students that one of the most important lessons in business is to understand individual strengths and weaknesses, and to find people to work with who complement your capabilities.

Students attended afternoon panel sessions on Saturday. At these sessions, students learned about the resources that are available to entrepreneurs and received helpful tips on approaches to financing. Also discussed was how to access and make the best use of community resources.

Preparation for Secondary Education." Bringing their different perspectives to the presentation, each shared her views on the benefits of a writing center to future English teachers and how to start a writing center in schools.

Lindgren said of the experience, "It was one of the most enlightening experiences so far in terms of gathering knowledge and ideas for teaching English." She continued, "The presentations by other teachers elevated my level of motivation and reaffirmed my choice to become a teacher."

Discussing "Visual Literacy: New Alternatives," the panel examined different forms of media such as 'zines, graphic novels, and advertisements to inform teachers about the benefits of using different forms of literature and analysis in the classroom to enhance student learning.

Johnson said, "I benefited from the experience of working one-on-one with David Beard to create a presentation that taught me how different forms of literature can engage students, and how graphic novels can teach students about international cultures and historic events."

"Preparing a presentation for a conference is a very valuable exercise since it reinforces planning and communication skills future teachers will need to use every day." Furniss added, "It's useful for anyone hoping to attend graduate school as well, where seminar and conference presentations are part of the experience."

Organizing a presentation is work, however, and collaborating professor is priceless. This is echoed by Furniss, "I also think students enjoy traveling and working with faculty in a different context. I know that I enjoy collaborating with students on these projects, and especially watching them represent the university so well."

Outgoing Dean for Student Development and Campus Diversity Roger Ballou received a special award for lifetime commitment to diversity. Ballou will be returning to the classroom and private practice, teaching at Adler Graduate School of Minnesota and working as a licensed marriage and family therapist at Counseling Psychologists of Woodbury, Minn.

Dean Connie Foster kicked off the banquet with a welcome address. She introduced Provost Ginny Coombs, who presented chancellor's awards and introduced the COEPS Outstanding Faculty Member. Awards were also presented included outstanding faculty, outstanding student, academic merit, scholarship, and highest grade point average awards.

Florence Monsour was named the COEPS Outstanding Faculty member. Monsour is a professor and co-chair of the Teacher Education Department. She is a coordinator in the Principal Licensure Program, which is designed to develop the skills necessary to become a principal. Monsour has also served as co-director of the Wisconsin Partners in Service Learning and the director of Wisconsin Principals' Assessment Center. In addition to serving on several University committees, Monsour is an author and co-author of several books and journal articles. She has written many successful grant requests; the largest grant was for National Youth Service Learning totaling more than $700,000.

Two area business leaders were honorary inductees into Sigma Beta Delta, an international honor society that recognizes academic achievement and promotes personal and professional involvement and improvement. They are Robert J. Casey, the president of the CBE Alumni Advisory Board and manager of the River Falls branch of Westconsin Credit Union, and William R. Rubin, the Executive Director of the St. Croix Economic Development Center.

On April 13, UW-RF CAS Dean Gorden Hedahl presented certificates to several faculty members in celebration of their contributions made to the University through numerous academic and service activities.

The faculty awards are selected by a committee of department chairs from the various divisions in the CAS, along with a representative from the deans office based on nominations submitted. Photos of faculty recognized will appear on the College Awards Wall in the lobby of the Kleinpell Fine Arts Bldg.

Art Professor Randy Johnston works to bridge a gap between sculpture and functional ceramics. His artwork has been displayed in 86 national and 23 international shows. Johnson is an internationally known artist for his contributions to the development of wood kiln technology and ceramic slips and glazes.

Mathematics Professor James Senft generously shares his insights and expertise of the mathematical analysis of heat engines with people from around the world. He works to increase student's interest in mathematics and research by including students in his research projects, giving talks on campus to student groups, and applying examples from his research into class discussion.

Tubr is currently conducting two broad research programs focusing on improving job performance measures and strategies for team-based training for complex skills like flying fighter jets or navigating space stations.

Art Professor Michael Padgett is recognized for his leadership as chair of the art department and his service and leadership for the Wisconsin in Scotland and the Pigeon Lake programs. Padgett is credited for increasing enrollment and changing the Pigeon Lake program into a valuable asset for the University and turning the Wisconsin in Scotland program into a success by taking a run-down facility and filling it with furniture, staff and students to improve the program.

Falls High School and is no stranger in dealing with difficult issues associated with deep budget cuts. He's been making annual presentations to the UW-RF Senior Outreach group on campus and is a singer of note in several community choruses.

In a separate ceremony on April 26, the CAS recognized its students receiving academic merit, scholarships, and other awards to acknowledge their effort and motivation throughout their college careers. In addition, the event recognized faculty members nominated by current UW-RF students as Outstanding Advisors.

Professor and Chair of the English Department Marshall Toman provides students with academic guidance, a friendly face and a world's view of literature. According to a student, "He is a friendly face on campus, a plethora of knowledge, and goes above and beyond the call of duty."

Assistant Professor of sociology Tricia Davis has been teaching at UW-RF since 2000 and works with several departmental programs, including being the film studies minor coordinator. A student boasts, "Davis is motivated to help all her students in pursuing the degree they desire. Davis is not only an outstanding advisorshe is a great mentor."

Assistant Professor of biology Tim Lyden has been teaching anatomy and physiology at UW-RF since 2001 and has played a huge role in the Society for Scholarly Undergraduate Research and Scholarly and Creative Actives, which helps students and staff present their research for recognition.

Kathryn Bice, a graduating senior from Trempealeau, was presented with the Ethel McDonald Ellis Award for the highest college grade point average in arts and sciences. She has maintained a 4.0 grade point average in all her classes.

UW-RF Career Services, and a consumer behavior and marketing communications tutor for foreign exchanges students. Starr is also currently an active member of the Agricultural Communicators of Tomorrow and president of the UW-RF Block & Bridle Club. CAFES faculty and alumni recognize Starr as the senior editor of the Fencepost, an alumni publication for the college.

Since that time, Carlson has been known for his dedication to CAFES students, the University and agronomy students nationwide. Besides instructing numerous plant and earth science courses, Carlson also serves as the advisor to the UW-RF Crops and Soils Club and as the national advisor for students of agronomy.

In presenting the resolution, Regent Chuck Pruitt of Milwaukee said he and other Regents who were appointed to the search and screen committee to seek Lydeckers successor were confronted with a daunting task.

"It was an extremely difficult job for myself and my Regent colleagues because we knew that we needed to fill some very big shoesthose of Ann Lydecker. This was at one of the most difficult and heart-breaking times in the history of River Falls.

Regent Toby Marcovich of Superior also expressed his appreciation. He noted that he and Nylander had an opportunity to become more closely acquainted when both of them served on the committee that selected Lydecker. Marcovich said that he talked regularly with Nylander about educational issues and "youve been absolutely great."

The citation noted Nylanders collaborative leadership style, fiscal acumen at leading the University during difficult state budget times, expanding the institutions commitment to addressing the challenges of unparalled growth in the St.Croix Valley, the ongoing construction of three new buildings valued at $44.5 million and which are being constructed without any taxpayers funding, and his advocacy for Wisconsin public higher education.

College of Business and Economics, and Graduate Studies are scheduled at 9 a.m., and graduates of the College of Arts and Sciences and the College of Education and Professional Studies are scheduled at 2 p.m.

Receiving recognition as the 2005 Distinguished Alumnus is Stephen Swensen, who currently serves as professor and chair of the radiology department at the Mayo Medical Clinic in Rochester, Minn. Swensen is an internationally respected leader in cancer research, whose developments have helped influence new discoveries in the fight against cancer. Swensen also is part of a long family tradition at UW-RF. His father, Richard Swensen, is an emeriti dean the College of Arts and Sciences and brother David and uncle Glen Hartman were named previous distinguished alumni.

Nicole Smith, from Apply Valley, Minn., majoring in marketing communications, with an emphasis in journalism, and Nicholas Sirek, from Birchwood, majoring in elementary education with an emphasis in language arts and reading, have been selected to deliver commencement addresses at both ceremonies.

Smith's speech, titled "A Falcon's Eye View," will focus on various buildings on campus and the role they've played in the lives of UW-RF students. Sireks speech is titled "My Wishes," and will highlight the five wishes he has for his friends and fellow graduates.

Gronemus has gained a deep respect for the agricultural industry throughout her life. Growing up on the Barry family farm near Ontario, Wis., farming with her husband Lambert, and being a mother to three daughters, grandmother to five grandchildren, and great-grandmother to two, Gronemus says she has the experience and knowledge needed to represent the individuals within her district and members of the agriculture industry throughout rural Wisconsin.

"She has authored and co-authored numerous agricultural and nonagricultural bills and has been a strong voice for the agricultural industry inside and outside of the State Assembly," noted Shane Westphal, a member of UW-RF Agricultural Communicators of Tomorrow, the CAFES organization that nominated Gronemus.

Gronemus was first elected to the Assembly in 1982 and has served continuously for the 91st Assembly District since then. Throughout her years in office, Gronemus has held many notable positions. She was the first woman appointed as the chair of the Assembly Committee on Agriculture in 1987 and since 1995 has served as the ranking minority and senior member of the committee.

Assembly committees on property rights and land management, a member of the Assembly committees on natural resources and transportation, appointee of the Governor to the Mississippi River Parkway Commission, and as member of the Democratic Party of Wisconsin.

Gronemus has been recognized numerous times for her dedication towardsspecific legislative issues. She has been honored with "Friend of Agriculture" awards from the Wisconsin Farm Bureau, the "Working for Wisconsin" award from the Wisconsin Manufacturers & Commerce, awards from the Wisconsins Career Technical Students Organizations, and numerous certificates of appreciation from organizations and letters from students and families. She was also recognized by the Wisconsin Women for Agriculture for becoming the first woman chair of the Assembly Committee on Agriculture.

"The Wisconsin Distinguished Agriculturalist Award is an honor given to few. And I am honored, as my heart is always in agriculture, and I will continue to work to make it a prosperous industry in Wisconsin," adds Gronemus.

The Wisconsin Distinguished Agriculturalist Award is an annual award sponsored by CAFES, UW-RF and the agricultural student organizations within the College. Selection is based on the candidates success in agriculture, and/or natural resources and the leadership, service and other contributions provided to the agricultural community. The Wisconsin Distinguished Agriculturalist Award was first presented in 1970.

Development, and the Office of Womens Issues presented this award to 17 women from around the state in April at the Pyle Center in Madison, Wis. Each UW System campus selects one woman to receive recognition for their extensive contributions to their campuses and/or communities.

Yang, from Eau Claire, Wis., is one of seven siblings and the first of her family to attend college. She has made a difference in others' lives by mentoring and encouraging Hmong women and leading diversity education programs for public school students as well as students on the UW-RF campus.

Multicultural Student Services Coordinator Linda Alvarez says she was honored to nominate Yang for this prestigious recognition. "I've watched her determination in focusing on her goals, maturing her bicultural and professional identity and offering encouragement to her peers."

Alvarez says, "I have known Myser since she began her studies and have great respect for her and the work she has done at UW-RF. I am privileged to have seen her commitment to people of color and her respect and sisterhood with other young women seeking a deserved place in our educational institutions."

University recruitment efforts. Fluent in Hmong, she has translated college recruitment materials, participated in panel discussions about the college experience at high schools, and met with Hmong parents to encourage young women to visit colleges.

According to Yang, her drive and motivation stems from always knowing she wanted to help others. Yang constantly surrounds herself with women of color who turn to her for help in bridging the cultural and informational challenges of attending college. As an assistant in the UW-RF Admissions Office, Yang coordinated college visits for Wisconsin and Minnesota high school students to UW-RF.

Yang's remarkable linguistic and cultural skills have provided her with the opportunity to collaborate with UW-RF faculty to translate a survey from English to Hmong. She also has been instrumental in assisting Hmong women to navigate the American landscape while sharing their Hmong culture with others.

Serving as an officer for the Asian-American Student Association for two years, she coordinated and publicized a number of programs open to the public. She attended several events, such as "Building Unity" and the "American Multicultural Student Leadership Conference" and served as a camp counselor for economically disadvantaged students.

Prochnow, a retired professor of physics at UW-RF, has been advising college students for more than three decades. As a dean and professor, he has met with thousands of students and parents as part of prospective student programs as well as advising for registration. With this experience, he saw the need for a realistic approach to college.

Prochnow offers a practical, how-to manual on completing a degree and choosing a career. His book, published by Infinity Publishing, is a step-by-step guide through registering for classes, choosing a major, changing majors, connecting majors to careers, and acquiring the right skills for the 21st century.

While at the UW-RF, Prochnow provided the leadership to create the School of Business and Economics within the College of Arts and Sciences, which later grew into its own college. He as been recognized twice as an outstanding science professor, and with his guidance, his three children completed their degrees on schedule. He lives in River Falls with his wife, Karen.

UW-RF in education with an emphasis in counseling. In her first year of employment at UW-RF, Berkholder received a Service-Learning Award for her efforts to inform students about service-learning and provide information to nonprofit agencies. She is an active leader in Discovery Night, a program that provides career development support for students who are unsure about their role at UW-RF. She also has conducted professional development seminars for student teachers. In 2003-04, she was part of a team that received an institutional enhancement grant through the UW-RF Faculty and Academic Staff Development Program for Academic Staff Council activities. Although Berkholder is officially retired, she is still working as a counselor in Career Services. "I'll be here as long as I'm having fun. This is a great work environment and I work with such a wonderful staff," said Berkholder, who lives in New Richmond. "This job has been so rewarding."

Keith Borgstrom came to UW-RF 1999 as a senior media technician/chief engineer for TV services. He attended Northwest Electronics Institute in Minneapolis, was a Russian translator in the Air Force during the Cold War, and worked for 10 years at the Nevada Test Site where he was the supervisor of a closed-circuit TV crew that filmed the testing of atomic devices. He was head of video surveillance and flew around the site in a helicopter filming the underground tests. Serving on his high school reunion organizing committee, Borgstrum is gearing up for his 50th reunion in Pine Island, Minn., this summer. He plans to do plenty of lake fishing at his cabin up by Duluth, which has been in his family for 40 years.

Eunice Filkins began her career at UW-RF in 1988 as a limited-term employee in the agricultural education department. She subsequently worked in the departments of plant and earth science, health and human performance and animal and food science. When she moved into permanent status, she began working in the career services office. She then became the program assistant for the department of economics when it was housed in Kleinpell Fine Arts Building. For the last four years she has continued in that position in South Hall for the College of Business and Economics. In reflecting on changes at UW-RF, Eunice identified the growth and development of technology and noted that "conquering technology" was one of her accomplishments.

Tom Hawk began working at the University in l976 when he was hired as an experimental herd assistant with the laboratory farms after working on a farm near Sisseton, S.D. Before coming to River Falls, Hawk served in the U.S. Navy, serving aboard the supply ship, Niagara Falls, stationed off the coast of Vietnam. Hawk received the National Defense Service Medal, the Vietnam Service Medal with two Bronze Stars. and the Republic of Vietnam Campaign medal. Hawk has worked with all aspects of herd management on the University's farms. He also helps demonstrate herd management to students.

Lee Karnowski joined the UW-RF teacher education faculty in 1985 after completing her Ph.D. in Curriculum at Miami University of Ohio. She earned a B.S. degree from California State University-Northridge and an M.S. from the University of Colorado, both in elementary education. Her university teaching has been enriched by her considerable experience teaching pre-school through 6th grade in Ohio, Colorado, California and in Belgium, England and France. Lees research interests and published articles interests cover a wide range of education issues, including writing and reading pedagogy for elementary students, models of learning, teaching gifted students, and developing literacy through multicultural literature. She examined integrated learning models in British teacher training during a 1994 sabbatical. Karnowski's success as a teacher was affirmed by her students when she was named UW-River Falls Distinguished Teacher in 1985. She lives in Woodbury, Minn.

Lidia Mullenax came to the University in 1988. She was an office manager in the Financial Aid Office and served as a resource support technician/systems coordinator upon her retirement. "She is a nationally recognized expert for PowerFaids, a financial aid information software," said Dave Woodward, director of financial aid. She served on the College Board's national advisory board as a technical consultant and had presented information at College Board national conferences. Mullenax also supervised the Veterans Services Office and worked with students of color as an advisor, mentor and friend. She was a recipient of the UW-System Woman of Color Award in the early 1990s and was recommended for an Exceptional Performance Award. An active artist, Mullenax took many classes from art faculty at UW-RF. She now lives in her native Columbia, South America.

Niedermyer said that over the years one of the most noticeable changes was the drop in inter-campus mail when e-mail was instituted as well as the computerization of mailings. He and his wife Margaret plan to travel, boat, hunt and fish during retirement as well as do some home remodeling.

Air Force, he was employed at UW-La Crosse managing academic computing services. At UW-L he was involved in the development of a regional computing instructional network, which was eventually supplanted by personal computers.

Nierengarten became involved in this new phase of computer technology in 1978. In 1983 he was hired as UW-RFs director of academic computing services. As director, Nierengarten helped acquire and implement various computer systems, networks and computer labs. He also served the wider region as a representative on the WiscNet Board, which eventually obtained an National Science Foundation grant to connect to the Internet all UW four-year campuses, technical colleges and the state's independent colleges and universities. In 1997 when all campus IT services were merged, he became associate director of information technology services. Among Nierengarten's significant accomplishments were assisting with that merger, getting UW-RF connected to the Internet, and developing campus computer labs, the ITS-Davee Library complex and technology enhanced classrooms. Nierengarten lives in River Falls.

His Ph.D. is from the University of Arizona in agricultural chemistry and soils. After joining the UW-RF faculty in 1968, Swanson taught undergraduate and graduate soil science courses, ranging from soil fertility, soil chemistry and soil physics to water conservation, water pollution control and hydrology.

He has taught summer National Science Foundation graduate institutes and environmental education seminars at UW facilities in Pigeon Lake and Clam Lake. In an administrative capacity, Swanson directed the Extended Degree program in broad area agriculture. He was an assistant and associate dean of College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Studies and also served as acting dean of that college. He also was the Dean of Graduate Studies, Continuing Education and Summer Session. He has traveled to Poland, Mexico and Taiwan to work in international student exchanges and cooperative programming. "Serving in so many different responsibilities over so many years has brought me in contact with many talented students, top quality faculty and responsible administrators," said Swanson, who lives in Somerset. "They have all had a positive influence on me, and I hope in some small way I have influenced them. UW-RF will always be part of my life and I hope to be able to continue an association as faculty emeritus."

Steve Thompson retired in 2004 after 30 years with the University. He most recently worked in custodial services and had seen the inner-workings of every building on campus. Thompson, who lives in Baldwin, says he most enjoyed working with University staff. A veteran, Thompson received several awards for his armed forces service including the Good Conduct Medal, Bronze Star Medal, National Defense Service Medal, Army Commendation Medal, and Vietnam Service and Campaign medals.

"It's very important to celebrate the contributions and dedication of the many employees who contribute to our campus culture of close, supportive professional relationships and high quality work leading to excellent education for our students," said Nylander.

Hecker's presentation will provide insights into growing a business with his philosophy, "Good People Helping Good People." The luncheon will begin with networking social at 11:30 a.m., and Hecker's presentation and lunch will follow at noon. This event is open to the public. The cost is $20; tickets are available at the door.

For more than 26 years, Hecker has built a single Chrysler dealership in Roseville into a national automotive empire. Operating under the Walden Automotive umbrella, which employs more than 1,200 people. Hecker has 18 dealerships including 15 in Minnesota. He also manages an extensive leasing and fleet service.

Hecker has also been involved with 39 other businesses in the community, generating total annual revenues of more than $5 billion. These businesses include Denny Hecker Mortgage, American Hometown Title, and Denny Hecker and Holmers Real Estate.

Hecker's business philosophy centers on customer and employee satisfaction, financial performance, market penetration and ongoing improvement. His philosophy is ingrained in the way he and his employees conduct business daily.

The Ronald E. McNair Post-baccalaureate Achievement Program is a federally funded program designed to help students from low-income and first-generation college families or from under-represented groups go to graduate school and earn doctorate degrees. The scholars were recognized for completing the first leg of the program.

In order to qualify for the McNair Scholars Program, students must have a grade point average of at least 3.0, the desire to earn a Ph.D., be a first-generation college student from a low-income family or traditionally underrepresented group in postsecondary education.

Students involved with McNair also receive help from a faculty mentor, assistance applying to graduate school, opportunities to attend professional development seminars and opportunities to receive stipends for summer research experiences. Through the program, graduate school application fees are wavered and travel expenses to professional conferences are paid.

Falls, me," said UW-RF McNair graduate Mary Vang. "I have gained experience with researching, presenting my research at national conferences and learning about what graduate schools will be best for. I feel that being a McNair scholar opened a lot of doors for me to attend many graduate schools nationwide. It gave me credibility by having experiences that other undergraduates may not have."

"I had never really thought about pursuing a Ph.D. before the program but it just seemed like such a positive thing," said Galbreath. "It's a phenomenal program, and I think the principles they instill in the program lay down a foundation for grad school that will most definitely help you succeed.

With a total of 35 presentations, UW-RF was the fourth largest school that presented posters and oral presentations on subjects ranging from political and social science to molecular biology and mathematics.

SURSCA faculty advisor and biology Professor Timothy Lyden said faculty and administrators from across the country commented extremely favorable about the University's presentations and quality of its students, not to mention the size of its contingent.

The national conference is held at a different location each year. This year drew 250 universities across the nation and consisted of some 1,750 presentations in a celebration of undergraduate research and scholarly and creative activity.

The two-day event began on Friday evening with a silent auction, dinner, and live music. Hockey Olympian Karyn Bye, a River Falls native, hosted the event. The sorority greeted the guests of the event and helped conduct the silent auction.

"This was the second year I've worked with the other Sigma women at the event and it's a lot of fun," said Cassandra Tousey, a senior at UW-RF. "You get to meet children that survived leukemia and see first hand where the money is going."

What's unique is those of use who appreciate the outdoors understand the joy of living and for me nothing hardly beets a day on the water. So you gain an appreciation for this type of lifestyle and for people less fortunate and that is a good combination."

Several River Falls community members donated items to help raise money for the event. Jim's wife, Nancy, donated a hand made quilt that raised nearly $300. She is a member of quilting club that is already working on a quilt for next year's benefit. Their daughter, Bridget, donated an original abstract art piece that sold for $175.

Smith's speech is titled "A Falcon's Eye View." She will discuss the various buildings on campus and the role they have played in the lives of students at UW-RF. Smith will graduate with a Bachelor of Science degree in marketing communications.

Smith has been an active leader on campus as a resident assistant and residential hall manager. She has served on residential hall councils, the Leadership in Training Committee and the Leadership Center Search and Screen Committee. Smith also is the founder and co-chair of Extreme Life Christian Organization.

With a minor in journalism, Smith worked at the UW-RF Student Voice as an editor, business manager and reporter. This past summer, she worked as a guest services coordinator for the Kansas City Chiefs training camp and as a summer registration facilitator.

"The University of Wisconsin-River Falls has benefited greatly from having her here as a student these past four years," said Pat Hanson, UW-RF communications instructor. "She has all the markings of a winner."

Sirek's speech is titled, "My Wishes." He will share five wishes he has for his fellow graduates, which include: friendships, a place to call home, self-confidence, the courage and willingness to change and the opportunity to make a difference.

The Chancellor's Award is the highest nonacademic honor a student can receive at the University. It is given to students for their leadership and service to the University while on campus. The recipients were recognized at the all-campus awards reception April 19.

Services Career Counselor Sheri Stover. Gbee is a peer advisor and works as a marketing intern in Career Services. His primary duties are to organize the Walk Thru and Disorientation events. Gbee is one of two founders of the Mentors and Mentees Program, which pairs up incoming students of color with upper-class student role models.

Jeremy Kalal is a senior majoring in broad field science in secondary education and was nominated by Director of Student Life Facilities Michael Stifter. Kalal has been a resident assistant in Stratton Hall for two years and has been recognized with the 2003-04 educational and community service programs-of-the-year awards on campus.

Kalal also accompanies a group of students to the Gillette every other week throughout the school year. Kalal says his efforts are worth it every time he walks through those hospital doors and sees the smiles on the childrens faces.

Kendra Plant is majoring in business administration with a minor in music and was nominated by student Senator Katy Leisch. Plant served as the fundraising chair for Students Fighting Hunger and Homelessness organization, which organizes an annual sleep-out to raise awareness and funds for charitable organizations.

Kendra has served as a student senator and as the Student Senate's women's initiatives director, where she worked to initiate programs such as Campus Safety Awareness Week and the Vagina Monologues College Campaign, which aim to prevent violence against women.

Director of Student Life Facilities Michael Stifter. Currently, Sirek is chair of the Facilities and Fees Board and was a front desk assistant in the Leadership Center. He also was a resident assistant and campus tour guide for two years. In addition, Nick co-developed and facilitated the campus-based Big Brothers-Big Sisters program.

Sirek was a member of the Student Center Core Committee, where he represented the students in the development of the program statement for the new student union being built on campus. He was chosen as a student speaker for commencement, to be held May 14.

In addition, Nick participated in University Theatre as an usher and house manager. He has been an active student in the College of Education and Professional Studies and currently is student teaching in New Richmond.

Mary has served as the co-president of the Asian American Student Association, has been active in the organization CATTs, assisted the multicultural student visit and outreach programs in the Admissions Office, and worked with pre-college camps.

Reilly-Myklebust is the director of student health and counseling services and the co-director of the personal and professional development center at UW-RF. She has a master of science degree in nursing and is working toward a doctorate in public health at Walden University.

"Under her leadership, student health services has grown from a small, almost invisible service into an active, very involved and visible group of professionals who are making a real difference on campus by increasing student awareness of current health issues," said June Schubert, who was one of many to nominate Reilly-Myklebust for the award.

"The creation, development, maintenance and success of these programs belongs to Alice," said UW-RF Senior Counselor Gretchen Link. "Alice is one of the most dedicated professionals with whom I have had the pleasure of working."

Throughout her career at UW-RF, Reilly-Mykebust has organized workshops that address eating disorders, co-directed conferences regarding students' sexual behavior and relationship skills, worked on an annual "M*A*S*H" event to help reduce students' stress during finals, and organized the annual campus and community health fair.

"Alice's leadership to students, parents, faculty and staff during that crisis fostered communication, calmed fears and prevented other students from becoming ill," said Linda Vigars, UW-RF student health nurse.

A native of the Wisconsin Dells area, Reilly-Myklebust also is co-chair of the site council for the Public Montessori School in River Falls. She worked with other parents to write a grant that funded this school and continues to work on grants that will fund a new library. Her two children, Jens and Reilly, attend this school.

"I love my job. It's a great place to work where you feel like you make a difference in lives," said Reilly-Myklebust. "Everything we do is a group effort, and any success I have is everyone's success.

The award was established in 2000 to recognize an outstanding faculty advisor with nominations by graduating seniors and alumni. Those nominations are then considered by the Faculty Senate Advising Committee, which makes the final selection.

Students who nominated Splett noted his genuine concern for their well being. One said, "No matter what your situation, Nate always has a kind word and some advice for you." Another said, "Nate is very knowledgeable in what students have to do to complete their requirements.

In addition to his administrative duties at UW-RF, he teaches introductory ag economics, advanced microeconomic theory, agricultural accounting, agricultural law, farm management and horticultural management. He is a former chair of the UW-RF department of agricultural economics.

"Nate Splett's selection as the UW-RF outstanding advisor is well deserved," said CAFES Dean Stephen Ridley. "Nate takes student advising very seriously. He is very knowledgeable regarding the technicalities of the curriculum, and he knows and understands his students well. He is one of the most effective advisors I have known."

Splett is a recent recipient of an U.S. Department of Agriculture grant to infuse legal content into the CAFES curriculum. He has also received other USDA grants for curriculum enhancement and a grant from the Wisconsin Humanities Council for a documentary film on farms. His scholarly and research articles have been published in journals including Agribusiness, Agriculture Financial Review, Journal of Dairy Science, and others. He has been an active member on various University committees.

Splett holds a B.S. in ag education and an M.S. in ag economics from UW-RF as well as a Ph.D. in ag economics from the University of Illinois at Urbana-Champaign. While completing his dissertation at UI, he was a research assistant and fellow. He also has been a visiting lecturer at the Academy of National Economy in Moscow, Russia.

I think at the core of advising is genuine caring about our students, and I see this every day among our faculty and staff across campus. It is a privilege for me to represent our faculty and staff in their excellent advising efforts by receiving this award. "

Splett says his students make his job very enjoyable. "Our students tend to be highly motivated, have a strong work ethic, are enthusiastic about learning, and they continually go into the job market being highly competent. It is enjoyable to be around them."

Those who nominated Walker said: "John Walker could make any economics class exciting with his true enthusiasm. He was so kind and patient. I never felt afraid to ask for further explanation. He was always a friendly face on the campus."

Another student said of Walker: "John's approach to teaching forces students to prepare themselves for exams better than other professors I've had, and the experience pays off in the end despite his challenge."

A third offered: "Dr. Walker is a wealth of information and is always willing to share it. He has always been approachable and friendly, making him a joy to have as a teacher. His teaching style has helped me grow throughout my years here."

Nylander said in announcing the award, "My warmest congratulations to John on being selected as the recipient of the 2005 Distinguished Teacher of the Year. I applaud you for your outstanding contributions to UW-RF and thank you for being a role model for our university community."

Upon receiving the award, Walker said it is an honor that highlights 15 years of hard, but enjoyable, work at UW-RF because of his passion for teaching. "I like ideas and thinking about theories, and their implications in our understanding of the world," says Walker. "I like mastering ideas, understanding various aspects of neoclassical economics, Marxian theory, Adam Smith's view of economics. There is a sense of accomplishment in that and a desire to share it with people and who better than with students."

Walker's philosophy of teaching is to believe in developing each individual's potential. "I believe in the development of human potential, to try to have each student achieve his or her potential and do the best he or she can. I try to develop techniques to get students involved and interacting with the material so they will develop skills that will help them make a living and be lifelong learners."

Walker joined the faculty in 1990 after earning his doctorate at the University of Utah with specialties in political and labor economics, as well as an emphasis in the history of economic thought. Walker teaches UW-RF's College of Business and Economics courses in political economic discrimination, history of economic thought, intermediate macroeconomics, statistics for business and economics, micro/macro economic principles, modern economics and ethnic studies.

Last fall, Walker took a sabbatical to conduct a survey of self-employed individuals in St. Croix County. Walker has published his findings as well as other research topics including gender differences in earnings expectations, determinants of Mexican earnings, and gender differences in compensation for earnings.

Walker has been involved in the development and implementation of the ethnic studies minor and served as the coordinator of the ethnic studies committee until 2004. He is also currently serving as the interim chair for the department of economics. Additionally, he has served on numerous University committees including the general education committee, chancellor's award for excellence committee, faculty development committee and the student affairs committee.

She is also chair of the American Democracy Project, a nationwide program designed to promote civic engagement on college campuses. In addition, Brown was also the coordinator for the women's studies program on campus for three years.

Brown's previous positions include assistant dean, outreach program manager, and administrative intern for CAS. Brown has also served as a professor, associate professor and assistant professor of English at UW-RF. Prior to joining the university, Brown was a graduate teaching assistant at the University of Florida and at Virginia Tech.

Interim Chancellor Virgil Nylander. "Chancellor Field led the campus for 17 years, coming here at a time of great difficulty socially. He was an advocate for ensuring that students, as well as faculty and staff, had a voice in setting the future direction of our campus.

"UW-River Falls has been like a second home for me." He noted his mother was an Ellsworth native, while his father grew up in Red Wing, and so he was a frequent visitor to River Falls and the region throughout his childhood and adult years.

The facility will be completed this spring and will be used for summer conferences. It will open to UW-RF students in August. There will be 60 four-person suites housing 240 students. Each suite will have four single bedrooms, a living room, a dining area/kitchenette and a bathroom. The entire building will be air-conditioned. Each of the eight wings has a large kitchen/lounge area for cooking meals and a laundry area.

Field, who can see the residence hall from the home he shares with his wife, Marcella, who is a UW-RF alumna. "The design of the structure makes a lot of sense and its very positive in how it functions.

Colorado before entering higher education administration at the University of Wisconsin. His last position there, immediately prior to accepting the presidency at River Falls, was vice president for University Development and State Relations for the state university system.

Field strengthened the shared governance decision-making structure of the University. He brought the Faculty Senate, the Student Senate and later the Academic Staff Council into the policy-making process as they gained statutory authority from the Legislature following the merger.

Field was particularly well-suited to ensuring that students played a much larger role in institutional decision-making. At the time he assumed the presidency at the relatively young age of 39, the campus, like others nationwide, was feeling the stress of the Vietnam War.

During his tenure, Field oversaw the cultural shift of the campus to becoming more inclusive while the campus experienced significant growth in student numbers and expansion of the physical plant. He retired in 1985.

Students enrolled within the program are offered honors sections of many general education classes, take introductory and advanced honors seminars, participate in honors colloquia, complete an honors thesis/project, enroll in a service-learning experience and receive credits for participation in the intellectual and creative life of the UW-RF community. All of these experiences are gained while keeping within the major and minor requirements of an honors student's academic program.

Students must apply and be qualified to participate in the program. Incoming freshman must have a composite ACT score of 27 or higher and/or have graduated in the top 10 percent of their high school class. Sophomores, juniors, and seniors can enroll if their cumulative grade point average is 3.3 or higher.

Honor students benefit academically, have priority registration, one-on-one interactions with faculty, discussion-style teaching, small classes, record of unique academic achievement, and certificate and transcript showing involvement within the honors program.

Hanson, instructor of speech communication and theatre arts department, will lead a discussion that tells her story of many goodbyes and challenges her family faced while trying to obtain social services for their daughter, Molly, who was born with special needs. It is the triumphant story of how the family, including Molly, survived.

The math that children learn in today's schools looks a lot different from what parents remember from their grade school days. Why has math teaching changed so much? What are the advantages of new methods? How can parents help their children learn math?

Ernie and Langford will shed some light on the situation by explaining underlying principles behind new elementary mathematics curricula, including everyday math currently used in the Hudson School District.

Hara currently teaches recording techniques and music appreciation and has taught trumpet at UW-RF and is a member of the UW-RF Brass. He is a freelance musician and teacher, playing trumpet, drums and percussion, Electronic Valve Instrument, and keyboards and synthesizers.

He has played trumpet with the Minnesota Orchestra, the Minnesota Opera, the Minnesota Sinfonia, and the Cedar Avenue Big Band, as well as continuing performances in California with the Santa Barbara Chamber Orchestra and the Asia America Symphony. He has performed in scores for television and films including solo trumpet on the original soundtrack for the show "Chicago Hope." As a drummer he has performed with various Twin Cities artists including the David Singley trio.

Doc Severinsen is well known for his flamboyant Grammy Award-winning music director of "The Tonight Show." He currently travels the country performing with symphonic orchestras, jazz and big band concerts, making recordings and commercials, plus designing and manufacturing trumpets.

Charles Lazarus is the newest member of the Canadian Brass after five years of being a member with the Minnesota Orchestra. Lazarus made his Carnegie Hall solo debut with the New York String Orchestra while still completing his full scholarship studies at The Juilliard School in New York.

Professional Development will graduate the first group of aspiring educators who will have developed electronic portfolios, or e-folios, as part of a new state graduation requirement. The new technological requirement and UW-RF students and educators are featured on Wisconsin Public Television's "Teaching Through Technology" on May 17.

Studies, believes that technological skills provide a real asset to students in a tight job market. "River Falls has familiarized students with classroom technology making them well-known to employers when arriving on the teaching site," said Manke.

The Wisconsin Department of Public Instruction requires education majors to maintain a teacher certification portfolio of their work. In order to be licensed, students must submit this portfolio to DPI, complete all relevant coursework including student teaching, and receive a qualifying score on the Praxis II assessment.

Manke and Mike Martin, academic advisor in the College, reviewed the first wave of graduates' e-folios. Both were impressed with the hard work put into these new showplaces for students' skills. "These are the most effective way to ensure students know hot to use technology," Manke said.

Technology Leadership Cadre, a group of students who serve as technical consultants to students and staff, provides access to the technical support students need in order to complete these portfolios.

"We're one of three campuses in Wisconsin that will be included in the documentary," said Karen Ryan, director of the UW-RF Educational Technology Center. The program airs on Wisconsin Public Television May 17 and nationwide on public television stations throughout the year.

Of the eight UW-RF students who participated, two students received second high individual awards in their respective categories. Shelly Wollerman, a sophomore horticulture major from Fond du Lac, placed second in the cut flowers judging competition and Jamie Davis, a junior horticulture major from Hastings, Minn., placed second in the topiary design competition.

Other highlights of the trip included a visit to the ADM plant where students viewed a large aquaculture facility with hydroponic greenhouses, a tour of the Chicago Botanical Gardens, a visit to Hauserman's Orchids, one of the leading orchid producers, and a keynote speech by Anna Caroline Ball of the Ball Horticultural Company.

Students from all majors and disciplines throughout the UW System were invited to register in March for the two-day competition. Competing students submitted an executive summary and final business plan in April. On April 29-30, teams will present their posters and business plans to the judges and community members.

Awards will be given out for the best poster, best written business plan, best business plan presentation and best overall business plan. The best overall business plan winner will receive the traveling Lydecker Award, sponsored by the St. Croix and Pierce County Economic Development Corporations.

The purpose of the conference is to bring together UW students, faculty, entrepreneurs and business people. The conference gives students the opportunity to find out what goes into a successfully business plan, to share ideas with leading business executives and entrepreneurs, to network with business-minded individuals from all over Wisconsin and to represent their UW institution.

During spring semester, 13 UW-RF students took the course, Directing 1, which focused on giving the students an in-depth introduction to the directing process for theatre arts. Several of the students who directed the one-act plays came from a variety of majors.

The plays being produced are all very unique. The plays range from farcical and intriguing comedies to contemporary drama and classic plays. Several members from the River Falls community also are acting in some of the plays.

The NACTA contest, held annually each spring, draws nearly 500 participants from colleges and universities nationwide. Students compete in a variety of agriculturally related contests including crops, soils, horticulture, dairy, general livestock, equine, agricultural computers, agricultural business, and agricultural mechanics.

"Their performance was remarkable," noted Bill Anderson, UW-RF professor of agronomy and one of three team coaches. "Two of the students on the team are just freshmen and haven't even taken a college soils course yet. None of these students had ever competed in a collegiate soils contest before and they still out-performed some really experienced teams."

The crop judging competition consisted of several sections including general agronomic knowledge, plant and seed identification, agricultural math, and a practical exam regarding identification of insects, diseases, and field and laboratory equipment. Students also responded to questions related to agricultural chemicals and plant morphology.

"Despite a late start in the practice season, the team did very well placing 5th in the nation against some very competitive teams," noted Bill Anderson, UW-RF professor of agronomy and crops team coach.

On the first day of the competition, teams received background information about one of three designated working dairies, including production and farm management data. After an in-person inspection of their assigned dairy, participants interviewed the herd managers. Each team then developed a farm analysis and presentation materials, including recommendations for nutrition, reproduction, milking procedures, animal health, housing and financial management.

Presentations were evaluated based on the team's analysis and recommendations for their assigned dairy. The top three teams at each dairy received a platinum placing. The following three teams received a gold award, and the remaining three teams from each dairy received a silver award.

"It's a good competition and a great experience for the students," notes Larry Baumann, UW-RF dairy science professor and team coach. "I was proud of the team. They had a quality presentation and competed against teams from many top agricultural universities."

The NAIDC was established as a management contest to incorporate all phases of a specific dairy business. It strives to incorporate a higher-learning atmosphere with practical application to help prepare students for careers in the dairy industry.

The stargazing session is free and open to the public. The observatory session includes a brief, introductory talk by physics Professor Eileen Korenic, who will highlight a recent astronomical news or provide an in-depth look at one or more of the objects visible that night. The discussion will be held in Room 271 of Centennial Science Hall.

The Wisconsin Music Teachers Association sponsors the Badger State Auditions, which includes students from local schools, such as Hudson, New Richmond, La Crosse and Eau Claire. Participating students will make UW-River Falls their final stop of the competition. This year, performers must present a minimum of three memorized pieces of mostly piano, flute and voice.

During a trolley ride, Nylander pointed out various campus sites including the excavation area for the new Student Union, the new George R. Field South Fork Suites, the South Fork of the Kinnickinnic River, and the proposed Health & Human Performance building site.

Approved by the Wisconsin Department of Public Instruction (DPI), the program meets certification requirements for K-12 principals in both private and public school settings. Those seeking principal licensure in Minnesota can earn the required educational specialist degree by taking additional courses at St. Thomas.

Students can earn a master of arts in educational administration from the University of St. Thomas by completing the 30 licensure credits plus one three-credit class. Students who enter the program with a master's degree may obtain an education specialist degree through St. Thomas by taking two additional classes for a total of three credits.

Approximately 129 students from 18 schools participated in the competition to test their knowledge of economics related concepts. The overall top scoring team from the top scores at the three sites from each division becomes the state champion and represents the state at the regional competition on April 22 in Chicago.

The presentation featured the collaborative public artworks installed into outdoor school environments as class projects at UW-RF. Jermal discussed artwork from a faculty perspective, while Eisch focused more on the student point of view.

Founded in 1950, WAEA is an organization that promoted scholarship and excellence in art education. It provides opportunities for professional development and encourages study and implementation of discipline practices.

"Today, the programs with highly trained staff are likely to emerge as winners in the race for adequate funding," said Potts, of the Wisconsin Department of Public Instruction. "The shortage of formal, learning opportunities for staff working in community education and after-school programs hasnt helped."

Community Education Association, the premier professional organization for community education staff. Students earn the graduate certificate by completing four, three-credit courses and one independent project.

A new cohort of students will begin with the start of the introductory course in June. An optional, live teleconference on June 28 will help familiarize students to the online software used and the course content.

Fischer paired campus places with prose, poetry and writing from 13 volunteer staff and students. At each outdoor location, a wooden seat invites viewers to ponder the surroundings and read a composition written for the installation.

"The reasons for the chosen localities are varies," says Fischer, in the exhibition booklet. In some cases, I feel the spot serves as a shelter for contemplation. In others, I found specific building projects, new and old, to have a compelling energy. I also chose a few sites because they may be in areas of campus that many of us rarely have the chance to visit. And yet, in other cases I simply wanted to highlight a few spectacular trees and architectural nuances."

Attendees should expect to see a little bit everything, including posters representing student-faculty research, collaborations on honors projects, and creative endeavors from every corner of the campus.

The awards presentation is at 7 p.m. in the Abbott Concert Hall. Students will be awarded academic merit awards, scholarship, other college awards, and individual departmental awards. Tickets are free and available through April 21 at the Student Center Information Desk.

Larry Yazzie, a World Champion American Indian Fancy Dancer, will perform a series of dances in addition to traditional American Indian vocal and flute music. For more information on Yazzie visit http://www.thecollegeagency.com/artists/variety/larry_yazzie/larry_yazzie.cfm.

At 8 p.m. in North Hall Auditorium, sociologist Dalton Conley will speak about white privilege and his experiences growing up as a white minority in a neighborhood of Latino and African American housing projects on New Yorks Lower East Side.

Conley will discuss his experiences growing up as a white minority in a Latino and African-American housing project in New York's Lower East Side and the lessons he learned about race and class that apply to everyone.

Research. His scholarly research focuses on how socioeconomic status is transmitted across generations, racial inequalities, the measurement of class and social status, and how health and biology affect social position.

Werner will explain how to manage conflict and understand how different relationship types communicate. During this interactive presentation Werner will discuss relationship types and show how differences in types affect the communication and conflict that is likely to arise within families and between adults.

All sessions are free and open to the public. Reservations are encouraged but not required. For reservations, call 715/425-3256 or email the office of outreach and graduate studies at outreach@uwrf.edu.

Wolf-Rayet stars. His toolbox includes some of the most spectacular instruments in the world, including telescopes located in the Atacama desert of Chile and the "out of this world" Hubble Space Telescope.

The WYP 2005 is a United Nations-endorsed, international celebration of physics. Through the efforts of a worldwide collaboration of scientific societies, the WYP brings the excitement of physics to the public and inspires the next generation of scientists.

As part of the celebration of Einstein's universal achievements, UW-RF will be holding a number of events on April 28, 29 and 30. Some events will be geared toward the professional, rather than lay, audience. Moffit's presentation is geared toward the lay person.

A buffet dinner and dessert auction will also be offered. Other entertainment includes games, a dessert auction, and a silent auction. The latter features some of the top items and attractions in the Valley: golfing items and golf packages, gift baskets, and certificates to restaurants, B&Bs, and souvenir clothing items from Valley communities.

The registration fee for the golf tournament, which includes green and cart fees, door prizes, a tournament memento, dinner and entertainment is $100 per person. For just the dinner and entertainment, the cost is $30 per person.

"The building will serve as a symbol of what UW-River Falls is all about," said Sievert. "It is a building involving the student body, great faculty and student rapport, and a sense of academic community."

The $34 million facility, funded entirely by student fees, will bring all food services under one roof and provide space for student life programming including student government and organizations. The building will include an entertainment complex, bookstore, bank, coffee shop, convenience store, banquet hall, theater-style meeting room and a conference room.

Mary Halada read a greeting sent by Chancellor-elect Donald Betz. "This building will link the efforts of many groups and individuals," Betz said. "The new student union will serve the living and learning needs of all who look to the University as an integral part of their lives."

The building incorporates features that are designed to be ecologically and environmentally sustainable, including use of natural daylight to illuminate the architecture, the use of recycled building materials, recycling of construction waste and stored rainwater for toilet fixtures.

The north side of the building will emulate the traditional modernist style of existing academic buildings, while the south side will mimic the Kinnis natural ecosystem with a curved "organic" design.

"Costa Rica and Nicaragua lend themselves to both of our areas, especially the ecotourism end of things for which Costa Rica is the best known international model," said Cain. "They also touch the biological conservation end of things with diversity."

In addition, the group had connections in Nicaragua with an instructor at the Universidad Nacional Agraria. Matilde Sombarriba, who attended UW-RF in 2003 through a faculty exchange program, guided, interpreted and traveled with the group throughout the first week of the trip.

Faculty and students spent their first six days visiting points of ecotourism interest throughout Nicaragua. The itinerary included a stay at Selva Negra, a mountain resort of international acclaim combining nature tourism, shade-grown coffee and other sustainable agriculture enterprises; a daylong tour of the El Diablo nature preserve; a boat tour of a unique island archipelago ecosystem; a trip to the El Mombacho volcano nature preserve; and lessons in Nicaraguan history and culture at UNA.

The ecotourism, agri-tourism and New Years celebration within Nicaragua was something that students and faculty will remember for years to come, as is the state of development that both the country and the capital city were going through.

"The experience in Nicaragua is something we will never forget," says Mogen. "To be in a country where virtually every store in the capital city has an armed guard, in many cases with a machine gun, sitting outside the door was an enlightening experience for everybody."

"The beauty of Nicaragua is surely comparable to that of Costa Rica," said De Vriendt. "However, economic and political unrest reflect the missing factors which will metamorph the caterpillar into the butterfly."

Following a lengthy border crossing into Costa Rica, the group began another six days of adventure. Students experienced much of Costa Rica, from guided hikes at the Santa Rosa National Park, the Monteverde National Park and the Tamarindo Wildlife Refuge to sea canoeing, snorkeling and traveling by elevated walkways and canopy zip-lines. The variety of activities allowed them to view the biodiversity in the flora and fauna of the country.

He adds that even with the further knowledge of ecotourism "clearly the international experience was the most critical portion of the trip in the sense of how much it really broadens not only students, but our own perspectives, in terms of we're just that much better in the classroom with a broader world sort of view."

After observing Costa Rica's and Nicaragua's diverse range of flora and fauna including monkeys and a leatherback sea turtle, UW-RF senior Dain Zimmer believes "the hardest lesson of the whole trip was probably that by experiencing [ecotourism and agri-tourism] we could destroy the biodiversity. So the lesson I really learned was that maybe, just maybe, we can save it and still enjoy it."

The 16 teams, each consisting of four undergraduate students, took part in a two-day competition to test their knowledge of animal science, dairy science, poultry science and small animal science. The four-part quadrathlon includes a written exam, a lab practicum, an extemporaneous oral presentation, and a quiz bowl competition.

At the regional competition the team took eighth in the written exam, seventh in the lab practicum, 11th in the extemporaneous oral presentation and ninth in the quiz bowl competition. That combination earned the team an eighth place overall finish.

The Midwest Academic Quadrathlon was sponsored by the Midwest Section of the American Society for Animal Science and the Midwest Region American Dairy Science Association. The competition was also held in conjunction with their 2005 joint meeting, allowing students to attend scientific presentations and to network with agricultural industry representatives.

The College of Arts and Sciences Awards Reception to honor student and faculty scholarship and service is April 13 in the lobby of the Kleinpell Fine Arts Building. The event begins at 4:30 p.m. with a reception, followed by the awards ceremony at 5 p.m. The college will award three scholarships, one each for arts and humanities, social sciences, and sciences and mathematics.

The morning ceremony presents the graduates of the colleges of agriculture, food and environmental sciences, business and economics, and graduate studies. The afternoon session presents the graduates of the colleges of arts and sciences and education and professional studies.

Paulus has been hailed by the New Yorker as "...a bright, fluent inventor with a ready lyric gift." His output of more than 200 works is represented in many genres, including music for orchestra, chorus, chamber ensembles, solo voice, keyboard and opera. One of America's most prolific and accomplished composers, he is among the few who support themselves on commissions from their compositions.

A recipient of both Guggenheim and NEA fellowships, Paulus is a strong advocate for the music of his colleagues. He is co-founder and a current board vice president of the highly esteemed American Composers Forum, the largest composer service organization in the world. Paulus serves on the ASCAP Board of Directors as the Concert Music Representative, a post he has held since 1990.

Conrad De Jong, a faculty member of the UW-RF music department from 1959 to 1990, shared an interest with others in the department for the contemporary music scene. In 1967, they created the New Music Ensemble, which today still plays and promotes music being written by and for todays musicians. The next stepinviting the composers of the musicto campus was a logical extension of the ensemble.

President Eugene Kleinpelland money from a cigarette machine fund back in the 1960sthe Commissioned Composer program debuted in 1967 with the premiere of "Celebration" by noted pianist, composer and educator Vincent Persichetti.

Each year music department faculty meet to decide on a contemporary composer to invite. A contract is signed in which the composer agrees to write a piece for one of the Universitys vocal or instrumental groups (nearly all ensembles have been featured through the years).

In addition, the composer agrees to spend several days on campuspresenting a public lecture, rehearsing with students, meeting with classes, and attending the world premiere of his/her composition. Expenses and fees for the composition and appearance come from the UW-River Falls Student Senate through the Musical Arts Committee under the Leadership Development and Programming Board. Student funds have supported the program from the beginning.

As one of todays pre-eminent composers of opera, Paulus has written eight works for the dramatic stage. "The Postman Always Rings Twice" was the first American production to be presented at the Edinburgh Festival, and has received nine productions to date. Commissions and performances have come from such companies as the Opera Theatre of St. Louis, Washington Opera, Boston Lyric Opera, Florida Grand Opera, Berkshire Opera Company, Minnesota Opera, and Fort Worth Opera, among others, as well as many universities and colleges.

Paulus music has been described by critics and program annotators as rugged, angular, lyrical, lean, rhythmically aggressive, original, often gorgeous, moving and uniquely American. He writes in a musical language that has been characterized by the Cleveland Plain Delaer as "...irresistible in kinetic energy and haunting in lyrical design." The New York Times wrote, "Mr. Paulus often finds melodic patterns that are fresh and familiar at the same time.... His scoring is invariably expert and exceptionally imaginative in textures and use of instruments."

Through transcendent prose, Razor recalls his early years as a ward of the state of Minnesota. Disclosing his story through flashbacks and relying on research from his own case files, Razor pieces together the shattered fragments of his boyhood into a memoir that reads as compellingly as a novel.

Razor is raised by abusive workers who thought of him as nothing more than "a dirty Injun." Cut off from his family and his heritage, he turns inward, forced to learn about the world on his own. After failed attempts to run away from the orphanage, he is indentured by the state to an abusive, reclusive farm family. Beaten, poorly fed, clothed in rags, and worked like a slave laborer, he struggles to attend high school and begins to dream of another life.

Winner of a Minnesota Book Award, Razor's "While the Locust Slept" presents a stark and often chilling story, devoid of self-pity. Razor recalls with haunting clarity the years he, like the locust, patiently waited to awaken and emerge.

As an adult, Razor researched his past and culture and began dancing in powwows and learning to make traditional garments. In recent years, he has received acclaim for the instruments he makes, including hand drums, rattles and jingles.

UW-RF biology assistant Professor Scott Ballantyne, who's been conducting molecular genetics research for nearly 20 years, will review current discoveries, potential applications and mounting ethical concerns surrounding the human genome project.

Like our first space exploits, it was not entirely clear what scientists hoped to discover from DNA sequencing. Ballantyne discusses the benefits of this knowledge, how important this new information is and what we have learned from this achievement.

Jani looks into individual and project factors, which tend to affect project managers and their decision to continue with a failing project. His findings suggest some software programs suffer from this phenomenon.

For almost 30 years, the Juried Student Exhibition has been a favorite tradition among art students. Each year students may enter a variety of work from ceramics, computer design, drawing, fibers, glass, jewelry/metals, painting, photography and printmaking.

American craft. The artwork featured in the gallery reflects Pifer's particular affinity for work that conveys a strong sense of authenticity that shows "the hand of the maker" at work; the processes used to create each piece; and frequently the influence of the particular time or place in which the artist was working.

The trip offers a blend of guided tours but allows plenty of free time for sightseers to explore at their own will. The tour is designed for travelers who want to learn more about the colonial beginnings of the United States, slavery and the history of the Civil War.

Tour leader David Riggs has been a UW-RF American history professor for the past five years and has lead the tour since 2002. Riggs is no stranger to all stops on the tour since he often travels to the tour's selected cities, taking advantage of the research-rich archives along the route.

Riggs says the most rewarding aspect of the trip is to share in the student's enthusiasm for this kind of educational opportunity. "In addition to a deeper historical understanding, the range of emotions trigged in students is inspirational."

Participants can earn two or three graduate or undergraduate credits by attending the tour. For a special course fee of $1,600, the tour includes luxury bus transportation, lodging at three-and-four-star hotels, entrance and admission fees. A noncredit alternative is also available for $1,900.

"The demand for workers with international expertise has increased dramatically over the last decade in almost every public and private sector occupation," says political science Professor Wes Chapin, who, along with other faculty, students and administrators, helped shape the new program.

Gorden Hedahl, dean of the College of Arts and Sciences where the program will be housed administratively, says that many faculty, students and staff from across campus were involved creating the program. "It is clear that our faculty and students recognize the need for this program," said Hedahl. "The international studies major will provide an extremely valuable option for our students to prepare for lives and careers in this rapidly changing world. Our students are increasingly taking advantages of the international learning opportunities provided by this University, and it is essential that we provide an academic framework for students to examine and understand the global and international issues that will impact their lives."

Students will take a core set of courses designed to provide an understanding of critical international issues confronting global society in order to develop research and analytical skills necessary to evaluate international phenomenon from an interdisciplinary perspective.

With that foundation, students will select among directed electives that will give them skills relevant to their career plans, such as in agriculture, business, economics, history or political science. Then majors will pursue one of the University's many study abroad opportunities, such as the new traveling international classroom, led for the first time this year by Chapin, or a long-standing program such as Wisconsin in Scotland or study tours to countries such as Belize, Greece or Italy. In addition, students will also acquire basic foreign language skills as part of the major.

At the completion of the program, students are expected to identify key agricultural, economic, political, historical, social, cultural, and geographic trends and issues at the global level and the linkages to domestic levels.

They will also gain first-hand experience with at least one foreign culture, be able to collect, assess and apply information to the study of international issues, evaluate global issues from an interdisciplinary perspective.

Other areas of competence include communicating effectively, organizing and conducting inquiry and analysis, and demonstrating an intermediate-level competency in a second language, equivalent to at least two years' course work.

UW-RF Faculty Senate approved a requirement that all students complete at least one course dealing with global perspectives. In addition, the UW-RF mission statement directly addresses a "global awareness and sensitivity to other cultures" as well as a commitment to providing "opportunities for students to live, study and travel abroad."

One of the UW System's goals in its 2003-04 Accountability Report is to increase the number of degree recipients who have studied abroad to at least 25 percent of its graduates across its campuses. The new major also meets the UW System mission by strengthening the international dimensions of learning, teaching, research and service.

I believe that it is highly appropriate that this major was approved by the Board of Regents at the same time that they selected our new chancellor, Don Betz, whose field of study is international relations," said Hedahl. "Although he was not involved in the development of the major, it will be fun to find ways that he might connect with the students in the new major."

Chancellor-elect Betz, who starts his post July 1 and holds a master's and doctorate degrees in international relations, and experience at the United Nations on the Question of Palestine and as a journalist in Beirut, Lebanon in the 1970s, was very excited about the program.

"It's a wonderful opportunity for students," said Betz when he visited campus March 14. "Our economy is influenced by the international system, and to capitalize on its strengths and place students in positions of value is definitely a sound investment. This program will make our students strong employees, entrepreneurs, educators and individuals."

The three-year appointment is to the Advisory Council of Communications and Public Affairs. The councils purpose is to work with Congress, the administration and the public to promote broad public understanding of the essential role of public higher education in society and of the specific responsibilities and contributions of AASCUs institutions.

AASCUs membership includes 430 public colleges, universities and higher education systems nationwide that monitor, analyze and develop federal public policy in such areas as student financial aid, education, international programs, economic and workforce development, teacher education and undergraduate experiences. AASCU also provides leadership development opportunities for campus leaders.

He holds a bachelors degree from the Medill School of Journalism at Northwestern University, a masters degree in history from UW-RF, and a masters degree in public affairs through the Executive Program at the Humphrey Institute of the University of Minnesota.

Schott, who's been accepted to veterinarian school at UW-Madison, also was selected a "showcase" speaker, which takes the best of the best to perform and demonstrate how a forensics event should be done.

Also competing in duo interpretation, Renee, with teammate Adam Helbach, a junior from Brule, Wis., who has a double major in English and speech communication, earned a good rating from judges, placing them in the top 20 percent of the competition.

Kelly Aherns, a sophomore English major from New Richmond, Wis., competed in after-dinner speaking and persuasion. In persuasion, she earned an excellent rating for a speech on the need for additional stem cell lines, placing her in the top 10 percent of the competition.

The Readers Theater included all four students doing an oral interpretation entitled, "A Tribute to the Romance Novel." The program tied for first place, but then received second based on a total of speaker points.

Melissa Lutes, a sophomore pre-professional major from Apple Valley, Minn., received an excellent rating in program oral interpretation, placing her in the top 10 percent of the tournament. Program oral interpretation combines prose, poetry and drama into a program around a theme. Lutes subject focused on students who are falling through the cracks in public education.

The College of Arts and Sciences Fund for Excellence provided funding for the team to attend the PKD national tournament. Donations from nearly 500 alumni and friends created the CAS Fund for Excellence designed to support student participation with faculty in specific areas of student interest.

System Race and Ethnicity Grant, journalism students have gathered the stories of fellow students who are refugees in a project called "Shelter from the Storm," sponsored by the UW-RF journalism department and admissions office. Students will share the stories, which will be eventually published on the journalism department Web site at www.uwrf.edu/journalism.

Research indicates children who have early interactive language and literacy experiences by being spoken and read to have more success in learning to read. It is believed that the reading process begins when an individual starts making meaningful connections with books.

Participants will explore characteristics of the pre-verbal, pre-print and emergent reading phases by identifying the tools young children use to explore texts. Strategies will focus on taking meaning from books.

UW-RF English Professor Emerita Margaret Odegard will lead the discussion about this story of a bold and inspired teacher, Azar Nafisi, who secretly gathers seven of her most committed female students to read forbidden Western classics. Immersed in these novels the girls risk removing their veils and intertwining their stories with the ones they are reading. A remarkable exploration of resilience in the face of tyranny, "Reading Lolita in Tehran" celebrates the liberating power of literature.

The book club encourages community members, faculty, staff and students to participate in its gatherings. The club meets the second Wednesday of each month, February through May. The public is welcome to attend and need not have read the books to sit in on one of the sessions.

Alumni, faculty, staff, students, parents and friends are invited to participate in UW Spirit Day by wearing their home campus colors, logo wear, and/or a "spirit badge" to show their UW connection in schools, hospitals, banks, businesses and hometowns throughout Wisconsin.

"They are literally in every community and every public and private enterprise in Wisconsin," said Nylander. "With more than 30,000 alumni from UW-RF and a half-million UW System alumni across the state and their contribution of $10 billion to our economy, it can seem to be an abstraction. But when you see the individuals, the Universitys impact becomes much more apparent.

Amirahmadi discusses the meaning of "lean," "six sigma," and "lean six sigma," during his presentation. In its most simple sense, six sigma is a highly disciplined approach to decision-making that helps people focus on improving processes to make them as near perfect as possible. Done properly, the process will ensure improved efficiency in internal business operations. A goal of lean six sigma is to strive for perfection in the quality of operations at the maximum plausible speed, enabling the business to work out defects and eliminate them.

He has 20 years' experience in education and industry, and is certified by the National Institute of Standards and Technology. He is a former senior management engineer for the Northwest Wisconsin Manufacturing Outreach Center, where he assisted many companies in various industries to increase productivity, reduce costs and improve quality.

Jeanne Adams and her husband Michael, son of Adams and Virginia Best Adams, has operated the 102-year-old, four-generation family business for 30 years. The business, Ansel Adams Gallery, is located in Bests Studio in Yosemite National Park. has had broad experience in the arts, environmental action, higher education, and business. She also has received national recognition for a lifetime of public service.

Fred Poss, one of UW-RFs facilitators, will explain the benefits of the program and answer questions. Interested individuals may join a learning community beginning this fall. The MSE degree in professional development uses shared-inquiry communities, noted as one of the best learning methods for adults.

Robinson is a professional photographer as well as a marketing executive at 3M in St. Paul. He has extensive experience with international photography and is the former chairperson of the journalism department at UW-RF.

High production costs, lack of technology, scant packaging facilities, parasites and diseases, along with few structured agricultural organizations, trade systems, and market knowledge only contribute to the extremely high poverty level in the region.

A grant from the U.S. Agency for International Development will partner the University of Wisconsin-River Falls and ITA-25, an agricultural university with more than 1,200 students, to help build an agricultural infrastructure and a producer education system to overcome the poverty-induced obstacles of Tierra Calientes agricultural industry.

The purpose of the grant is "to help rural Mexican colleges to further develop their faculty's knowledge in subjects that will help to improve their rural economies," says Hadley. "In the end this will hopefully lead to the development of a producers school in the Tierra Caliente region where producers can learn to solve their own problems."

Albarran Farias is the first of seven ITA-25 scholars to travel to UW-RF within the next year and a half. She was selected because she speaks English and has experience working with producers. Recently, she has been working to organize the mango producers and to work with them to create a marketing program.

"Obviously you cannot get a producer who is 50 years old and does not know how to read or write into a standard collegiate classroom setting," says Farias. "Learning has to come through experience and through verbal explanations. So I think this program will help a lot with the idea of bringing education directly to the producers through the use of entrepreneurs' or producers' education programs."

Spending two semesters at UW-RF, ITA-25 scholars will be involved in both classroom training and field instruction. The professors from ITA-25 also will receive training in adult education and classroom training in agribusiness or management to increase their knowledge in economics and the tactics involved with marketing agricultural products.

In addition, through one-on-one work with county- and state-level UW Extension faculty, Farias and the remaining scholars will learn to organize, implement and evaluate extension programs. They will also investigate actual producer-owned agribusinesses throughout Wisconsin.

The endeavor is special one for UW-RF, notes Hadley, as UW-RF's grant proposal was the only higher education partnership grant accepted from a small university not collaborating with a larger one. UW-RF also was the only school to choose to aid and educate one of the poorer Mexican states.

"The producers are very smart, but they don't have the accurate knowledge for so many things," said Farias. "They don't have the tools--financial, or even educational tools that could help to better their work--to make them entrepreneurs."

UW-RF teacher education professor Gay Ward introduced the program in the spring 2004 when she began teaching at UW-EC. In its second year, program has captured interest among students at both UW-RF and UW-EC. "The program allows for response to the incredible demand for teachers skilled in teaching inclusive classrooms," says Ward. By becoming dual-certified, education students will have more job opportunities.

UW-RF student Molly Yoch, the first student to participate in this program, took one course through UW-EC this semester and plans to continue her dual certification by taking two more courses next semester. Ward estimates that more than 60 students in addition to Yoch are interested in enrolling in the program for the summer.

The program prepares teachers to serve young children who possess a wide range of abilities and needs, in order to improve the quality of care and increase education resources. This will provide students with more opportunities for employment and will help schools secure and retain high quality teachers to meet the ever-changing needs of communities.

The program fits a variety of needs by fostering development of inclusive classrooms, which recognizes the importance of parenting, child care and early educational experiences, the need for expanded preparation of child care personnel and teachers, and the rights of children with special needs to share quality child care and early education with typically developing peers.

Students participate in an actual classroom setting by completing three teaching experiences. They teach children ages birth to three, three to six, and six to nine. The teaching sites consist of children developing both typically and atypically. These sites provide a direct supervised teaching experience for students. Students teach a minimum of 18 children, working with 10-12 children who experience single and mild disabilities, and 8-10 children who experience multiple and severe disabilities.

The program requires students to register on both campuses. However, if enrolled in 12-18 credits, the student may avoid paying registration fees on both campuses and only pay it to the home campus. Students also pay segregated fees on a credit basis for each credit taken through the secondary campus. Minnesota residents to notify their home state that they will be taking courses as part of their studies offered by both campuses.

According to the National Center on Education Statistics, by 1999, almost one-third of public schools, which includes close to half of all high schools, included service-learning as part of the curriculum.

"More than one million students participated in service-learning in 2003 through the national Learn and Serve America program," says Potts. "When students are engaged in meaningful service to their schools and their communities, both they and their communities benefit.

Educators across the country are discovering the rewards of incorporating established curricula with hands-on service projects to increase student involvement and enhance academic achievement, citizenship, and character development."

According to a report by the National Commission on Service Learning, the concept is a teaching and learning approach that integrates community service with academic study to enrich learning, teach civic responsibility, and strengthen communities.

The report notes: "For half a century, service-learning has spread in American schools. In the last decade, it was spurred to new growth by congressional and presidential actions and funding. In increasing numbers, schools have provided service-learning opportunities for students that connect their curriculum studies to activities such as tutoring younger children, adopting a river, creating a museum exhibit, or conducting oral histories with senior citizens. In these and similar instructional activities, youth have simultaneously learned to serve and served to learn. They are becoming both better students and better citizens."

This program is one of the few graduate-credit certificates in service-learning offered via the Internet, according to Potts. All courses are completed with a cohort of peers, and participants gain useful skills that can be applied in the classroom.

In addition, participants get credit for work experience through a practicum and enjoy the rewards from bringing a service-learning program into their communities, says Potts. The course also provides the skills necessary to earn the NYLC's National Service Learning Certificate currently under development.

This program is designed for teachers, school administrators, recipients of the Corporation for National Service "Learn and Serve America" grants, and community leaders and others who support civic engagement of youth.

The Youth Options program opens the door to greater learning opportunities for students who are considering technical careers, students wishing to begin college early, or students who want to prepare to enter the workforce immediately after high school graduation.

According to UW-RF Assistant Director of Admissions George Hansen, the program allows junior- or senior-level students to apply to their home school district to take university courses. Typically they take classes that their high school doesn't offer or advanced courses if they have already taken all the courses offered in a subject at their home school.

"Students must be in the top quarter of their high school class before being admitted to the University, and there must be space available," said Hansen. "University students in degree programs are given priority for course registration."

The most common courses that Youth Options program students take are in foreign language, mathematics and geology. Students have also taken courses in animal science, English, environmental science and management, economics, history, music theory, philosophy and psychology.

Students from throughout the UW System who demonstrated an interest in the dairy industry were encouraged to apply for scholarships provided by the PDPW Education Foundation. The PDPW scholarships provide students with registration to the conference and a one-night complimentary hotel stay.

At the conference, students gathered with more than 1,000 dairy producers and allied industry members for a series of informational seminars. Together the students and industry professionals took part in sessions on business management and technical production and heard from motivational speakers.

According to UW-RF dairy science Professor Steve Kelm, the PDPW scholarship provides students with a unique opportunity as "the students start to establish a network with successful dairy producers throughout Wisconsin."

"The alliance promotes the19 communities of the St. Croix Valley as a single destination in major population centers, like the Twin Cities," said Kinders. "We are very fortunate to live in this beautiful river valley, with its extensive scenic panoramas and attractions, and through our cooperative efforts in attracting visitors, everyone benefits."

The alliance serves as an educational resource for the history, culture and natural resources of the lower St. Croix Valley and is dedicated to tourism in its member communities through cooperative promotional efforts.

A full-color, 50-page regional tourism magazine has just been published by the alliance as part of its extensive efforts to attract tourists to the area. The magazine is being distributed throughout Wisconsin and Minnesota, including at the Mall of America. Its Web site, www.saintcroixriver.com, has thousands of visits each month to obtain information from the valley.

"The success of the organization is due in part to the support of government officials at the local, regional and state levels, as well as the involvement and support of the members and communities served," said Kinders, "This is an all-volunteer organization utilizing the talents and abilities of its members to succeed."

Kinders said that new members will gain by the networking and tourism educational opportunities associated with the alliance, as well as increased opportunities for reaching prospective customers. The membership fees will be used to expand the alliances marketing efforts, Kinders said.

Perselli will discuss how teachers, educators and administrators can devise research projects to respond to the diverse needs of learners, at a presentation April 6 at 5:30 p.m. in the Davee Library breezeway on campus. The presentation is free and open to the public.

Associate Dean Mary Manke to investigate how teachers and teacher educators might research their own practice in relation to enhanced participation in education, for students with disabilities for inclusion in the book.

Youth with conditions ranging from mild language or developmental difficulties from Autism Spectrum Disorders to Down Syndrome are increasingly being taught in mainstream schools. "The biggest challenge is to enable these pupils to participate in school life as purposefully as their classmates," says Perselli. "Teachers might modify their language so they are understood by children of all abilities. They should also take into account individual physical or learning requirements when planning lessons."

Perselli will use her trip to the United States to determine the best way to present her findings. "Wisconsin has a strong reputation for teacher education research," she said. "I shall be looking at methods of inquiry that help us to explore our professional practice in relation to enhanced participation for learners."

Perselli leads practitioner research method modules on Kingston's Master in Education and Doctor of Education programs. "Many of my students teach children with special needs, so I am always keen to learn from them what the latest challenges and issues are. I hope my work will positively influence their day-to-day experiences," she said.

Stargazing sessions are free and open to the public. Each observatory session may include a planetarium show or introductory talk by physics Professor Eileen Korenic, who will highlight a recent astronomical news or provide an in-depth look at one or more of the objects visible that night. Discussions are held in Room 271 of Centennial Science Hall.

UW-River Falls will be Tuesday, April 5, at 1 p.m. at the south entrance of the Kleinpell Fine Arts Building on campus. In case of inclement weather, the ceremony will be held in the Kleinpell lobby on the first floor. The ceremony is free and open to the public.

"The new Student Center will be at the heart of campus, linking the east and west end residence halls to the academic core," says Interim Chancellor Virgil Nylander. "This prime and scenic location on the mall and overlooking the river will add much to the campus culture."

The $34 million facility, funded by student fees, will bring all food service under one roof and provide space for student life programming including student government and organizations. The building will include an entertainment complex, bookstore, bank, coffee shop, convenience store, banquet hall, theater-style meeting room and conference room.

Participants will gain awareness of personal health status while obtaining knowledge on a variety of health-related topics. People also can learn about health-related resources and initiative available on the UW-RF campus and in the River Falls community.

For UW-River Falls and other college students, the three-week accelerated sessions provide an opportunity to complete their program requirements in less time than during the regular academic year. Community members can take advantage of the accelerated courses and reap the rewards of higher education without a large time commitment.

"The students represent the greatest hope that we have for Wisconsin, for our communities and for our country," said Betz. "The best investment we can make is in people, and I am thoroughly convinced that Wisconsin students are poised to make an incredible difference."

Betz, 60, will officially begin his new job July 1. He is currently the provost and vice president for academic affairs at the University of Central Oklahoma. His previous administrative positions include provost and vice president of academic affairs at Palmer College of Chiropractic as well as vice president of university relations and dean of continuing studies at Northeastern State University in Tahlequah, Okla.

Research and co-founder of the Oklahoma Center for Arts Education. He served on the original implementation committee of the American Association of State Colleges and Universities' American Democracy Project and initiated the Center for Tribal Studies at Northeastern State University.

Betz also has considerable international experience, having worked at the United Nations on the Question of Palestine, one of his areas of expertise, and having served as an assistant foreign editor for the Daily Star in Beirut, Lebanon, during the 1970s. He holds an M.A. and Ph.D. in international relations from the University of Denver.

"I believe that Dr. Betz's diverse background and experience in higher education will continue to energize the students, faculty, staff and the community in and around this great institution," said Reilly, who was a strong factor in Betz's decision to accept the position as the 12th chancellor of UW-RF.

Betz also said part of his decision to accept the post was the strong national reputation of the UW System. "The University of Wisconsin is on everyone's short list for a great university system," said Betz. "It is very well respected."

"I want to meet a number of student groups, and I hope to be visible and connected with students," said the chancellor-elect, who also said he wants to forge strong bonds with both University and community educators as well as the community and region.

He is eager to continue and strengthen UW-RF's involvement in community and regional affairs. "UW-River Falls has a great future. I hope to meet with every stakeholderon- and off-campusand we will continue to be involved in regional development. There is a definitely a connection between quality of education and quality of life."

Prior to the community reception, Betz addressed local media and then the UW-RF administrative council. "I already recognize some of your faces from our last meeting," said Betz to UW-RF administrators.

While Reilly is only in his "second semester" of service as the new president, he offered ambitious goals and enthusiastic support for the 26 campuses and UW Extension that make up the UW System. Betz will join UW-RF on July 1.

"Wisconsin does well in retaining graduates in the state workforce after they receive their UW degrees, but we rank nearly last in the nation in the number of college graduates," he said. "This is important because states with higher than average personal incomes have a higher percentage of the adult population with a college degree.

"The report we submitted to the Joint Legislative Audit Committee highlights more than 250 cost-saving measures we are pursuing [that] will save an estimated $15 million annually. We stand accountable to all citizens of the state, and we are very administratively efficient when compared to other university systems and to many industry clusters. We intend to be as thrifty with state tax dollars as you would be if they were in your own checking account."

Another initiative is to continue the strong participation of UW campuses with local, regional and statewide economic development. "You were active participants in the Wisconsin Economic Summits that we have sponsored over the past four years. These laid the groundwork for several recent state economic development initiatives, including angel investment networks, more technology transfer, the Wisconsin Entrepreneurs Network, greater regional collaborations, and cluster initiatives such as printing, plastics and paper. These were a good way to get the university, business, government and labor more or less on the same page in planning the state's economic future."

Finally, Reilly noted that protecting opportunities for students and prospective students is a top priority. "The deep state budget cuts to the university over the past two biennia have resulted in some erosions to quality as well as double-digit tuition increases. Our rising tuition and declining state support have closed our doors to many who desire a UW education, particularly returning adult students and students whose families have lower incomes."

Jim Doyle's budget. "The governor's budget was also very student-focused," said Reilly. It included proposals to reinvest $49 million of state tax dollars into the university system, increase financial aid, restore 125 faculty teaching positions, and make tuition increases manageable and predictable.

Challenges to the UW Sytem in the governor's budget, said Reilly, include proposals to cut 200 more academic support positions on top of the 225 administrative positions lost in the previous biennium. In addition, the budget does not address the issue of competitive pay for faculty and staff, he said.

Entrants in the Best of Show category are judged for overall excellence in writing, editing, design and photography. First and second place went to the University of Minnesota's Minnesota Daily and the University of Iowa's Daily Iowan.

While judges did not provide written critiques, Chad Rummel, contest coordinator for the National Scholastic Press/Associated Collegiate Press, recalled reviewing the newspaper. "I had a chance to critique the Student Voice, and I was not surprised when the judges placed it high in the list of excellent papers," said Rummel. "The paper has a strong sense of the campus community in its coverage, and it was clear to me that the members of the staff take their work seriously."

"In my mind, this is actually a first-place win because the Voice came out on top of all the weekly papers at the show and beat out some dailies as well," said journalism associate Professor Patricia Berg, the faculty advisor to the student newspaper. "I see how hard these students work, week after week, and I'm very gratified to see their work recognized."

With a press run/circulation of 4,000 the Student Voice has a staff of approximately 25-30 and is funded by student fee allocations and advertising revenue. It published weekly September through May, except for university term breaks, and is available at campus and community locations.

She has traveled to eight countries and will add a trip to Bolivia this summer to her growing list. She has been awarded numerous grants, published a number of textbooks and scholarly papers, and presented her research at conferences. She is an asset to the UW-RF economics department as a force for international awareness.

Brux became interested in economics her senior year in college during the period known as the "world food crisis" years. It was during this time the problem of world hunger entered into the living rooms of American families via their televisions. By seeing the suffering and working with organizations to reduce hunger, Brux decided to become part of world change.

"I decided in my senior year in college to get an economics minor and then go for a Ph.D. in economics," said Brux, who had never even taken an economics course. "It was sort of a 'calling,' since I was strongly pulled in the direction of helping people in Third World countries."

In Mexico she was a teacher, exposing UW-RF students to poverty many had never seen before. Brux said the students were horrified by the poverty, but added Mexico is one of the more prosperous countries in the Third World.

Experiencing this utter poverty is a shock to anyone's sensibilities, she says. Ghana had the most poverty Brux had ever seen. In the capital city, women had no homes. They slept under awnings attached to buildings and worked during the day as transporters, who moved goods from place to place. Brux was studying economic reform while there.

All the research and experience Brux gains through her travels result in papers or presentations. She has written more than 20 papers discussing international economics issues. Her latest paper, "Rural Development and Micro-Enterprise Credit: Strategies that Work for Low-Income Indigenous Women and Their Families in Rural Latin America," discusses how to integrate women into rural development projects through agriculture extension and micro enterprise credit. This paper has been accepted for presentation at the Minnesota International Economic Development Conference in Minneapolis on April 29-30.

Brux also helped established the CBE International Resource Room, designed for faculty and student scholarly research. For faculty, there are conference and grant opportunities and faculty research papers. For students, there are study abroad options, sources for funding study abroad, international internship or work opportunities, and conference information.

Development (RF-AID), which celebrated its second year last fall. The association's mission is to enhance curriculum offerings, to develop and support research and other projects, to acquire grant money, to serve students, and to participate in consulting opportunities. Additionally, it hopes to better serve and improve the circumstances of students and people in less developed countries such as Africa, Asia, Latin America and Eastern Europe. Brux is currently developing am e-mail listserv for the organization.

If the travel, papers, grants and programs weren't enough, Brux is also an author and co-author of a textbook, Economic Issues and Policy. Brux said she decided to create her own textbook because she thought those available were not very engaging. It has been well received by students and is in its third edition.

Cordua fits the classic definition of a rockhound: one who hunts or collects gemstones as a hobby. It's both vocation and avocation, however, for the geologist who has taught at UW-River Falls for more than 30 years.

He's collected a motherlode of information at his personal Web site, which receives hundreds of visits per month from other rockhounds. His site, www.uwrf.edu/~william.s.cordua, offers a Wisconsin mineral database, cross-referenced by county, as well as a bibliography of state mineralogy. The site also has extensive links including surveys, museums, events and magazines for the geology enthusiast.

He's recognized far and wide for his expertise, including receiving top honors from the Midwest Federation of Mineralogical and Geological Societies as well as being inducted the National Rockhound and Lapidary Hall of Fame. He is a fellow of the Geological Society of America and a member of the Friends of Mineralogy, the Wisconsin Academy of Arts, Sciences and Letters, the Institute on Lake Superior Geology, the Meteoritical Society, and the Wisconsin Geological Society.

While Cordua has explored sites from Iceland to Ireland and Greece to the Galapagos Islands, Pierce County remains one of his favorite places to investigate. So much so that he's put his knowledge of the county's geological wonders on a road trip CD available from the Pierce County Partners in Tourism.

The county's unique geology forms the backdrop for a long history as an outdoor recreation area. Since 1942, visitors have flocked to Crystal Cave, the state's longest cave system discovered in 1881, to marvel at the stalactites that take thousands of years to grow even a miniscule measure.

Other highlighted sites on the CD include the Eau Galle Recreation Center, opened in 1968 and featuring the Midwest's highest earthen dam; the Mississippi and St. Croix confluence at Prescott; and the sandy beaches and limestone formations of the Kinnickinnic and its delta on the St. Croix.

Along with research from other geologists, Cordua recently concluded in the geology literature that it is the site of an asteroid impact millions of years ago. "At the time we were preparing the script, we were still debating its origin. There are still some people who doubt its impact origin. So it's still good that the description on the tape still leaves its origin open."

"Every county has a mix of interesting geology, but Pierce County is so naturally scenic," says Cordua. "It is far enough south where the glaciers stopped so there is some bedrock and some glacial material.

UW-RF art instructor Steven Derfler leads participants on a journey through several seasons of excavation in Israel using maps, plans and imagery to study ancient civilizations, such as those mentioned in the Bible.

Morning workshops include regional partnerships among agencies and tourism groups, customer service and industry trends. A keynote at 9:15 a.m. is by Craig Schowalter, owner of Business Plans, Etc., who will discuss the benefits of optimizing tourism through agency partnerships.

During a working lunch, SCVRTA President Mark Kinders will discuss trends and challenges to economic development and tourism in the bi-state river region, which is home to the St. Croix National Scenic Riverway and six state parks within minutes of St. Paul/Minneapolis. New Richmond Mayor David Schnitzler will also contribute to this session.

Croix River basin and the current tools and techniques used to achieve nutrient reduction. Speakers from industry and government regulatory agencies will provide an overview of research, sediment reduction programs and success stories. UW-RF faculty and students will also present related exhibits, posters and handouts.

Natural Resources deputy commissioner, will serve as a keynote speaker for the day-long workshop. His speech is titled "Green Lands, Blue Waters ProjectToward a New Generation of Agricultural Systems."

The program is appropriate for commercial, industrial and agricultural operators, local government officials, permittees, public works supervisors, land and water conservation staff, wastewater treatment owners and operators, lake organizations, watershed planners and anyone interested in protecting water resources.

Pre-registration is required for the workshop and is taken on a first-come, first-serve basis. The $40 cost of the workshop covers the workshop registration, continental breakfast and buffet luncheon.

To compete, students must submit a business plan, whether as an individual or a team, to be judged during the conference. Schools may have more than one entry. Awards will be given out for the best poster, best written business plan, best business plan presentation and best overall business plan. The best overall business plan winner will receive the traveling Lydecker Award, sponsored by the St. Croix and Pierce county economic development corporations.

Students interested in the competition must complete a registration form by March 30 to be eligible. Registration forms are available online at http://www.uwrf.edu/cbe/youngentrepreneurs and will be accepted by e-mail or mail.

For five days students completing grades 7-12 can attend classes and concerts held in the Kleinpell Fine Arts Center. This summer camp program gives trumpet, trombone, horn, baritone/euphonium and tuba players the opportunity to perform in small groups and improve their sound, intonation, rhythm and range. Private lessons are available for students upon request.

UW-RF's College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences teaching introduction to plant science, corn and soybean production, small grain and miscellaneous crop production, and plant breeding and crop improvement.

He attended the University of Wisconsin-Madison where he received a B.S. in agronomy. Carlson then went on to receive a M.S. in crop science from North Carolina State University, and a Ph.D. in plant breeding and genetics from Purdue University.

Carlson's dedication to students, education, and the University leads beyond the normal classroom setting. He serves as coach to the UW-RF agronomy quiz bowl team, advisor to the University's Crops and Soils Club, and also serves as the national advisor for students of agronomy.

In addition, Carlson has served as the faculty coordinator for agronomy internships at the University since 1978. He has also served on the University's College Recruitment/Retention and Public Relations committees.

The Wisconsin Fertilizer and Chemical Association is a trade association; members are the agricultural retailers, distributors, and manufacturers that provide fertilizer and crop protection chemicals to farmers throughout Wisconsin.

"Direct marketing of agricultural products is a growing industry, and no other UW-RF course was designed to address the nuts-and-bolts of direct marketing," said Onan. Many small farms have implemented direct marketing or niche marketing of their food products to increase sales and ease the pressure from larger farming operations.

The new curriculum will give students direct marketing experience as they work to develop an enhanced market for the UW-RF hog operation. Currently the first of two courses is being offered. The introductory course aims to familiarize the 11 enrolled students with the direct marketing concept through the completion of a mock business marketing plan for an agricultural product of their choice.

The second course offers students a hands-on learning experience. According to Onan and Boetel, co-teachers of both courses, the students will create a limited liability corporation to manufacture, market and distribute UW-RF pork products. Students enrolled in the second course will determine a marketing plan for the products and then serve as production line managers for the duration of the semester. Clubs from the College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences will have the opportunity to buy into the corporation and can also receive added returns by serving as the supply labor for the company. "The goal," says Onan, "is to start marketing the product sometime before next Christmas."

Said CAFES Dean Steve Ridley, "I believe this is a wonderful and unique opportunity for students to participate in hands-on learning activities that require real-world problem-solving and decision-making skills. The Pig-to-Plate program, when fully implemented, will be a student-managed agribusiness venture providing experiences that transcend the entire food chain from animal genetics through production, processing and marketing of food products. Opportunities for success and, of course, failure abound at every step."

The Pig-to-Plate grant offers students and CAFES clubs members' practical experience as an integral part of a direct marketing operation. Faculty hope that within two years the corporation will be running successfully, so that the profits can be used to carry the course and concept on to future UW-RF students.

The contest included a written exam covering animal breeding, nutrition, and production; a lab practicum exam testing ration compilation, meat grading, proper use of lab equipment along with breed, feed, and lab equipment identification; an extemporaneous oral presentation on a current issue in animal science; and a quiz bowl competition with a variety of quick-answer questions on any topic.

Both students' work is derived from personal interests in life. Jacobs work is mainly driven from his fondness for the environment and focuses on the dynamics of interactions that happen in those environments. Jacobs is interested in oceanographic reefs and marine plant life, as shown in more than one of his art works.

Junkans joined Wells Fargo in 1994 as a senior portfolio manager and a team member in private client accounts. In his current position, Junkans oversees investment management process and strategy for private client services.

Tourism is a vital economic force generating nearly $20 billion in economic impact in Minnesota and Wisconsin. The St. Croix Valley of Wisconsin and Minnesota has an array of natural, cultural and historic resources drawing tens of thousands of visitors from near and far each year.

Topics covered include regional partnerships among agencies and tourism groups, customer service and industry trends. The day begins with a continental breakfast and networking session at 8 a.m. followed by a keynote at 9:15 a.m. by Craig Schowalter, owner of Business Plans, Etc., who will discuss the benefits of optimizing tourism through agency partnerships.

Schowalter embodies entrepreneurial spirit. He assists businesses with large-scale economic development plans through his company Business Plans, Etc. in Washburn, Wis. He also owns and operates South Shore Rowing Center, which is also in Washburn. Additionally, Schowalter has created a system of weight loss and lifestyle change in a program, Positive Pursuits.

In an announcement on Feb. 15, scientists and managers of the project declared a successful first season of construction of what will become the worlds largest scientific instrument. This year marks the first year of work on the IceCube telescope, which is being built around a much smaller neutrino telescope called AMANDA, Antarctic Muon and Neutrino Detector Array.

The successful deployment in a 1.5 mile-deep hole drilled into the Antarctic ice of a string of 60 optical detectors designed to sample phantom-like high-energy particles from deep space represents a key first step in the construction of the $272 million telescope.

Building the telescope requires drilling at least 70 half-mile deep holes in the ice using a novel hot-water drill, and then lowering long strings of volleyball-sized optical detectors--4,200 in all--into the holes where they will be frozen in place. The first string of 60 detectors was lowered into the ice in January and communication with the detectors was successful.

Establishing the project at the South Pole, setting surface equipment in place and testing the powerful new drill meant the team had only a two-week window to drill the first hole and deploy the first IceCube string.

"It's all on track," according to Francis Halzen, a UW-Madison phyiscs professor and principal investigator for the project. "This was our first exam. We met our milestones for the season and we can move on to the next Antarctic summer. "

UW-RF has played an active role in helping the IceCube Project become a working reality. The University has been responsible for creating 1,000-gallon water-tanks installed with two light sensors, identical to those deployed deep within the icecap, frozen in the tanks.

Eisch traveled to the South Pole last year to help deploy prototype tanks in preparation for this season's work, and he spent this past summer with Tilsen on a research internship at the University of Delaware helping construct the eight tanks recently installed at the South Pole.

Two out of eight tanks developed by UW-RF were installed this past summer at the South Pole (November, December and January when flights are able to get in and out of the pole). Two tanks are deployed on the surface above each IceCube hole. Madsen says, "The nice thing is that all of the eight tanks that UW-RF has worked on have been successful."

Wrapped around a framework above the tanks are "sunshades" to keep direct sunlight from hitting the top of the water, since at the South Pole the sun simply circles around the sky while staying essentially the same distance above the horizon day after day, finally setting near March 21 and not rising again until Sept. 21.

Spiczak says the shades play an important part in making the rest of the process possible. "The 'sunshades' allow the water to freeze more rapidly, a surprising problem even at the South Pole. Because of the rather large thermal heat capacity of water it takes roughly two months for the entire tank to freeze."

According to Spiczak, roughly 160 of these tanks will be installed over the next several years and spread out over a square-kilometer area above the cubic-kilometer volume of instrumented ice below, completing the world's largest neutrino telescope to study some of the most energetic phenomena in the universe.

When completed, the telescope will utilize a cubic kilometer of Antarctic ice as a detector, and will be capable of capturing information-laden, high-energy particles from some of the most distant and violent events in the universe. It promises a new window to the heavens and may be astronomys best bet to resolve the century-old quest to identify the sources of cosmic rays.

The IceCube telescope will look for the telltale signatures of high-energy cosmic neutrinos, ghostlike particles produced in violent cosmic events -- colliding galaxies, distant black holes, quasars and other phenomena occurring at the very margins of the universe. Cosmic rays, which are composed of protons, are thought to be generated by these same events.

Cosmic neutrinos, on the other hand, have the unique ability to travel cosmoogical distances without being absorbed or deflected by the stars, galaxies, and interstellar magnetic fields that permeate space. Their ability to skip through matter without missing a beat promises unedited information about the early universe and the very violent objects that populate deep space.

The optical modules that make up the detector act like light bulbs in reverse. They are able to sense the fleeting flash of light created when neutrinos passing through the Earth from the Northern Hemisphere occasionally collide with other atoms. The subatomic wreck creates another particle called a muon. The muon leaves a trail of blue light in its wake that allows scientists to trace its direction, back to a point of origin, potentially identifying the cosmic accelerators--black holes or crashing galaxies, for example--that produce the high-energy neutrinos.

News Council Executive Director Gary Gilson and his staff will enact a hearing of a past complaint that was heard by the News Council. They will play the parts of a complainant who felt mistreated by the media, and the respondent, a media representative defending the coverage that led to the complaint.

Students in a course taught by journalism Professor Pat Berg will deliberate the issues raised by the complaint, then "vote" as if they were members of the council. Berg is also a member of the Minnesota News Council.

The council's role has been expanding in recent years to reach out to the media and the public to create awareness that will reduce the reasons for complaints. It hosts public forums, mock hearings, workshops and presentations throughout the region. The council has also created curriculum materials for teachers to stage a mock hearing in their classrooms. It also produces a half-hour public television series exploring issues of media standards, practices and ethics, participates in a radio show on media ethics, and publishes a magazine covering ethics issues and council activities.

Noted landscape photographer Ansel Adams once said, "A photograph is usually looked atseldom looked into." According to Radar, our often-passive consumption of landscape imagery through art, advertising and other media is evidence of this.

Although Radar specializes in teaching cartography and geographic information systems, his work has taken him across the globe and transformed his work by becoming an avid photographer. Radar combines his formal training in cultural geography with his passion for photography in this insightful look at the relationships between imagery and geography.

Brux will discuss on how to integrate women into rural development projects in less developed countries such as Bolivia. To integrate women into the workforce, Brux will explore concepts like agriculture extension and microenterprise credit and will outline the research she will conduct this summer in Bolivia.

Each observatory session may include a planetarium show or introductory talk by Korenic, who will highlight a recent astronomical news item or provide an in-depth look at one or more of the objects visible that night.

Williams is a reporter with MPR's urban affairs unit. At MPR, Brandt has extensively covered issues that concern race and justice, including racial profiling. Before coming to MPR in 2000, Williams was the executive editor of Insight News, the state's largest African American-owned newspaper. Williams grew up in Minneapolis and graduated from the University of Minnesota with a degree in speech communications in 1991. He is married and lives in north Minneapolis.

Comprised of both native Brazilians and other Brazilian music experts, the group plays the familiar samba and bossa nova as well as the heavily African-influenced ax and rousing ferr music of northeastern Brazil. This toe-tapping, movement-based music inspires audience membes to get on their feet.

"Exploring 'U'" is a program created to provide literature, resources and information on various continuing education, youth and senior outreach programs and other opportunities available through UW-RF.

Research indicates that children who have early interactive language and literacy experiences by being spoken and read to have more success in learning to read. It is believed that the reading process begins when an individual starts making meaningful connections with books.

During this interactive meeting, Werner will discuss relationship types and show how differences in types affect the communication and conflict that is likely to arise within families and between adults. Following the presentation, audience members will be encouraged to ask questions and to assess their relational types and conflict styles.

The math that children learn in school today is different from what parents remember from their grade school days. Why has math teaching changed so much? What ore the advantages of new methods? How can parents help their children with math learning? Ernie and Langford speak about underlying principles behind new elementary mathematics curricula, including the "Everyday Math" curriculum that is being used in the Hudson School District.

April 4 - "Buying a Computer." This course is a basic introduction to computer equipment and terminology. Whether you are buying a new or used computer, know what you want the computer to do for you and how much you are willing to spend.

April 11 - "Ask a Computer Geek." Do you have questions about your home computer? Want to know more about your email? Want to copy something off the Internet, but don't know how? Bring your questions to this class.

Renee Schott, a senior from Greenleaf, Wis., who is majoring in pre-vet animal science, and Adam Helbach, a junior from Brule, Wis., who has a double major in English and speech education, combining their talents in duo interpretation as the new state champions.

Schott also placed third in three categories: oratory with a speech on problems associated with the Food and Drug Administration, informative speaking with a speech on the 50th Anniversary of the polio vaccine and rhetorical criticism with a speech on the new politically correct Bible.

Kathy Olsen, director of forensics and instructor of speech communications and theatre arts at UW-RF, said it's unusual and extremely hard for a student to make it to the statewide final rounds in all four events.

FEB. 25, 2005--Top experts within the food science industry along with government officials gathered at Michigan State University in January to continue efforts towards protecting our nation's food supply from the threat of foodborne illnesses.

Specifically Vasavada's goals within the group deal with educating and raising awareness of the threat of foodborne illnesses. Vasavada plans to include developing methods to provide basic knowledge of risk communication and management to both the public and undergraduate students through education and outreach programs.

The NCFPD was established in 2004 to increase the security and safety of the U.S. food supply through the collaborated efforts of research universities, private businesses, and government officials. UW-RF's Food Safety and Microbiology program is among 20 universities nationwide with departments or faculty members involved in the efforts of the NCFPD.

FEB. 25, 2005--An excited group of preschoolers sit in a close circle, waiting for the arrival of the "music lady." Hilree Hamilton, a professor of music at UW-River Falls, bounds into the circle singing a melody. The music lady directly sings to each child inserting his or her name into the song.

When she sings the child's name, the child participates by beating on a large drum. When the song wraps up, Hamilton asks if they enjoyed the music. Wearing wide grins, each child politely answers "yes."

Meanwhile, a graduate student helps another child push a button, which gives him a voice to answer. He lays his hand upon the button, causing a voice to answer "yes." The voice is that of Sheila Behrendt, the early childhood education specialist with the University Preschool and a UW-RF instructor.

Along with University Preschool Director Angela Kaiser, Behrendt prepares programs such as the music lady's visit to encourage interaction between students of all learning abilities with various needs, such as the interaction between the little boy who speaks French and the child who uses a button to speak.

Working together for 15 years as co-teachers at the University Preschool's inclusive classroom, Behrendt and Kaiser are the foundation for the success of preschool. Each teacher recently received high honors for her work.

Behrendt and Kaiser each contribute a unique perspective when working with children. Kaiser specializes in early childhood education, while Behrendt's expertise is in the field of special education. Together they work with inclusive groups to create hands-on experience that foster cooperation and understanding.

They offer the least restrictive environment, which allows children with all levels of needs to succeed. "Each child has differences and needs; some are more obvious than others," says Kaiser. "Not just the children with special needs and disabilities have needs. Some of the other children have needs as well."

The co-teachers strive to teach the preschoolers to accept differences at an early age. They have also set up a program for the children that includes parental input. This is essential to create goals for each child.

The preschool's combination of special education and early childhood education makes it stand out. By including children with special needs, Behrendt and Kaiser provide interaction between students with a variety of needs.

Inclusive teaching provides the key to the successful UW-RF Preschool, and this setting is important to apply to real-life situations. "Communities are inclusive, and the children won't be singled out specially in the real world," says Behrendt.

Although their main focus is the preschoolers, Behrendt and Kaiser extend their practice beyond their young students. In their university classrooms, Behrendt and Kaiser use the same principles to teach older students. In both cases, they focus primarily on goals and needs of each individual.

Both college students and preschoolers are given a pretest to assess their needs. Then goals are set, and the students work toward those goals. When their time of working with the students or preschoolers is up, Behrendt and Kaiser issue a post-test to conclude if the goals were reached.

"The nice thing about working with college students is they also are so willing to learn," says Kaiser. "It is refreshing for us as well, because each day we have a new story from the preschool to tell. It's not like we're always talking about what happened way back when; something new happens each day. The college students enjoy hearing these stories as much as we enjoy telling them. The children keep our lives exciting."

Falls dual certification project, which is now in its first year. This program allows students from both universities to receive dual certification in early childhood education and special education. The student from Eau Claire do not need to travel to River Falls as the courses are taught using distance learning methods. Training in early childhood special education is a vital component for teachers who wish to enter this field. "It is a win-win situation for all involved--students, teachers, parents and especially the children," says Kaiser.

Kaiser was instrumental in the development of an early childhood community task force through the Wisconsin chapter of NAEYC. She also helped develop Project Learning Tree curriculum, used to teach young children about nature.

During the past year, nearly 100 UW-RF faculty and staff participated in scholarly activities outside of their regular teaching and academic duties. Approximately 40 projects were selected for the display.

All work was published, presented, displayed or funded during the 2004 calendar year and represents the achievements produced by faculty and staff outside the classroom seeking to enrich the campus and the community.

Some highlights included art Professor Lynn Jermal's information on a collaborative mural project, "The Life of the Middle-Schooler" that was created by eight UW-RF art students and 40 middle-schoolers from Hudson. John Heppen, a professor in the geography department, exhibited his book reviews of geography texts published in several journals including "Progress in Human Geography" and "Regional Studies."

Professor Claire Kilian's journal articles and conference papers explored business cases involving Ashley Automotive, the Bijani twins, and Zelte USA. Professor Darryl Miller's ongoing historical look at stereotypes of the elderly in television commercials was published in the International Journal of Aging and Human Development.

Since then she has focused on campaigns that reflect Wellstones tradition of reaching out to people who have not traditionally been involved in politics and who work to build strong and diverse coalitions.

Marsden is noted for her portraits of writers, actors, and musicians, and social advocacy work. Her commercial clients include the Minnesota Orchestra, the St. Paul Chamber Orchestra, and the Guthrie Theatre among others.

"Portraits of Women Changing America" presents activism defined broadly. The exhibit documents both exceptional personalities whose names are familiar for public involvement in politics as well as the faces of nameless demonstrators whose presence is just as important to the political process.

SPS Zone 9 Councilor, says he was surprised to "beat out the tough competition." Actually having been nominated the year prior to receiving his award, Blodgett was re-nominated by UW-RF students and faculty who wrote new letters of recommendation.

Nearly 400 SPS chapters exist across the country, and each chapter has a faculty adviser. Each year students and faculty can nominate their adviser to be recognized as the national outstanding chapter adviser. A dozen people were nominated along with Blodgett this past year.

Earl is a wonderfully involved and committed adviser, both for his individual advisees and with the local chapter of the SPS. The University's local chapter has been recognized for its excellence by the SPS for the last few years. This is a testament both to the quality of our physics program and our students, and to the quality of Earl's advising. Our undergraduate physics program is one of the best in the nation and this award helps to verify that."

From introductory courses through advanced labs, Blodgett says he greatly enjoys teaching the experimental side of physics. By constantly re-examining and improving how the University's introductory courses are taught, Blodgett dedicates a lot of his time to learning more about how students learn physics.

Since he was in the third grade, Blodgett says he knew he was going to be a physics instructor. Blodgett said he would pester his sister, who was a physics major at UW-RF, to explain what it was she was studying; for example, how if a person drops something from an airplane they could come up with a simple equation to describe where it would land. He said he knew then he never wanted to do anything else.

Blodgett says the biggest challenge as chapter adviser is getting freshmen involved. "They're always reluctant to get pulled into organizations they're not sure of or even if their schedules will allow it. You've got to encourage them and keep them up to date on what the organization is doing."

Blodgett says the fun starts once a group is established and students feel comfortable taking charge of what's ultimately theirs. "We've had great students who've been active in the chapter for a year or two and then start taking the lead and coming up with ideas or opportunities, which ultimately helps other students get involved."

After playing extended phone tag, DeGeneres finally connected with Fisher on Jan. 11. During that phone call, Fisher also was able to say hello to comedian, actor and producer Carl Reiner, who was a guest on the show that day.

Fla. They were accompanied by Houston, DeGeneres's popular sidekick, and a production crew. They stopped in many towns and cities along the way from Darwin, Minn., to Chattanooga, Tenn., reporting on the quirky landmarks and other events going on throughout the country.

Her career as Ellen's "roving" reporter did not end there. The road trip continued to New Orleans, La., where Fisher and the crew did a live feed from Bourbon Street about Mardi Gras. Houston and Fisher wore beads around their neck and reported in the midst of all the festivities.

"I was amazed when I realized that everyone who worked there already knew me. People chuckled to themselves when I introduced myself," said Fisher. "When we stepped into the control room the entire room cheered and clapped."

Rentmeester was a contract employee for the show for a few days, handling routine PR tasks and recording some footage. The show's editing crew also commended Rentmeester for a job well done on the initial video submitted to the contest.

"For the trip that seemed to never end, I wished it never would," said Fisher, who is from Ettrick, Wis. "But as all good things eventually come to an end, I am forever thankful for the friends I have made and the memories I will always have to cherish."

UW-RF, also took third place in informative speaking with a speech on the eradication of polio over the last 50 years. This was Schott's fourth time finishing in the top three this year, thus qualifying her for the American Association's Tournament of Champions held in April at the University of Kansas in Lawerence. The Schott and Helbach's duo also qualified.

James Pratt, co-director of forensics and professor of speech communications and theatre arts at UW-RF, agrees. "The beauty of forensic competition is that each individual student can compete and advance independently," he said. "Although there are team awards, the awards for each individual event are most important."

Both Olsen and Pratt competed in the Twin Cities Forensics League while they were in college. Pratt was the executive secretary of the league for more than 36 years and has been involved with UW-RF debate and forensics since 1977.

Commons at UW-River Falls on Feb. 11. Dressed appropriately for the occasion, some 122 student teachers created an air of professionalism as they attended the event designed to give them a head start on the season of interviews they'll face as graduates or as they apply for fall internships and student teaching positions.

Career counselor Sally Berkholder conducted the seminar, which was organized by UW-RF Career Services, because career development of student teachers is so much different than that for other UW-RF graduates.

Berkholder kicked off the panel with several frequently asked, such as what student teachers should be most aware of, what qualifications employers are seeking, and issues such as applying for and maintaining certification and licensure.

"Student teachers need to be prepared and respect students with some degree of discipline," said Richards, who said it is critical to respond honestly to work instead of worrying about appearing "nice" to students. She also said that lesson plan variety is good, but that student teachers should not overlook the fact that students thrive on routine.

Students should make the most out of working with their cooperative teachers during the student teaching or internship process. "The teacher takes a large risk by opening up the classroom to student teachers," said Richards. "Fortunately, this allows for the development of a great team. By utilizing the presence of a student teacher, the cooperating teacher can focus on the students who need more attention."

Rogella agrees that beginning teachers need to learn a lot in order to succeed, especially about teacher-student relationships. He explained the importance of establishing respect in the classroom and realizing that the students are the teachers responsibility, even when the teacher doesn't have control over all of the things that happens in the classroom.

Baumann said that student teachers should know their limits and overcome the fear of asking for help. "It is important for beginning teachers to be familiar with different areas, but at the same time not to take on too much," advised Baumann. Sometimes beginning teachers lack a realization of how much work it takes to operate an efficient classroom.

Career Services adviser and recruitment coordinator June Schubert said the Career Development Day was a success. "The student teachers are very appreciative of this event as evidenced by their comments on the 70 evaluation forms turned in at the end of the day," she said.

The comedy encapsulates the troubles of a group of young comedy writers during the turbulent McCarthy era, who are trying to pull together an hour-and-a-half comedy show in the golden age of television.

The play is a memoir told by Simons alter ego, Lucas, a novice writer who is thrust into the crazy and neurotic world of the wackiest bunch of comedy writers ever, who in Simon's real life included Mel Brooks, Woody Allen, Carl Reiner and others.

Max, the head madman, contends with the NBC brass who fear his humor is too sophisticated for "middle America." As Lucas tries to get his bearings among this passionate crew, Max fights to keep his show on the air.

Spanning a period of two years, the writers, dampened by a tightening budget and constrictive political environment, survive several neurotic breakdowns and manage to cling together as a "second" family.

Join the fun and take a peek into the politics and pranks of the early days of television, when all performances were live and the true stories were behind the cameras. Ticket prices are $4 for students and $7 for nonstudents.

When Dorothy triumphed over the Wicked Witch of the West in L. Frank Baum's classic tale, only Dorothy's side of the story was told. But what about her arch-nemesis, the mysterious witch? Where did she come from? How did she become so wicked? And what is the true nature of evil?

Maguire creates a fantasy world so rich and vivid that the Land of Oz will have new meaning for readers. Wicked is about a land where animals talk and strive to be treated like first-class citizens, Munchkinlanders seek the comfort of middle-class stability, and the Tin Man becomes a victim of domestic violence.

The Lion's Paw Book Club encourages community members, faculty, staff and students to participate in its gatherings during the academic year of 2005. It meets on the second Wednesday, February through May. The public is welcome to attend and need not have read the books to sit in on a session.

UW-RF theatre Professors Robin Murray, Ken Stofferahn and Meg Swanson attended the festival with students. "One of the most important things about the festival is the chance it offers students to work with theatre professionals and faculty from other schools," said Swanson.

The festival productions represented diverse types of theatre, including new plays by students and professionals as well as classical plays, musicals, contemporary classics seldom-produced pieces and new favorites.

In addition to attending productions, students participated in a wide array of activities, such as attending workshops, studying the design exhibition, meeting new friends and making contacts, and observing the overwhelming talent in the region.

Cordell Wesselink, a theater major from Beldenville, Wis., learned much from an unrehearsed Shakespeare workshop. "I now see Shakespeare in a whole new light and have a fuller understanding of the plays," he said.

Acting competitors performed in a packed room before judges and peers and received personal feedback from respondents. The region's best faculty members mentored directors, the national critics competitors worked directly with a nationally known theatre critic, and four professional designers offered practical advice.

Bailey wanted students to experience Europe as he had, by being immersed in another world. One man's love for international travel has become a legacy as SAE enters its 42nd year as UW-RF's oldest study abroad program.

The program has a long-running reputation of success, says Gee, with students conducting fascinating research projects spanning the European continent, providing them with experiences that read like adventure novels.

In the past, students have studied architecture in Spain, tourism in Greece, cultural differences in Italy, ceramics in Portugal, dairy operations in the Netherlands, and biotechnology in Ireland, among many other topics.

The SAE program is a long-term commitment, says Gee. Students who are a junior standing or higher and interested in the program must attend meetings the spring semester before they leave in the fall. At these meetings, students are prepped with practical knowledge about travel and also begin to develop their research projects.

The prospect of developing an independent research project can be daunting, says Gee, who insists the students are not alone. "Designing the research project is a cooperative effort, a triangle encompassing the student, their project adviser and the SAE staff member." With support during the project development phase, students confidently establish the direction they will take and submit their proposal in April.

The emphasis of the program is on independent study. Students develop contacts, plan living arrangements, modes of travel, and where they will conduct research. "Students take ownership of the project by carrying out their own plans and meeting their goals. To do this they must have self-discipline," said Gee.

And they do as fall 2003 participant Jamie Wise noted. "Being on my own for 100 days, having almost complete freedom of everything I did on every day that I was in Europe has been one of the most rewarding experiences of my life. I was able to grow up in a sense that I hadn't been able to do before."

Jen Dolen, a fall 2004 student, echoes this notion. "Even with the most careful planning, it's inevitable that a students' project will shift and change I was moving around a lot, and was flexible enough to take the advice of those I metthis is an important thing for students to learnto adjust their plans and heed good advice."

In the fall, the students head to Europe with a group leader. The first destination is Paris, where they spend a week getting used to a major city. Andrew Polski, a fall 2004 participant, enjoyed the orientation.

After a week, the students are released, given a head start by the group leader, who makes rounds checking in with each student and the progress of their project. Gee said the group leader is many things to the studentsfrom a practical resource to a friendly facewhen they are lonely.

"Solitude is a great avenue to personal growth and strength, but can leave room for loneliness," said Dolen. "Any student who is concerned about such things should be comforted to know that the SAE group adviser is there to help them."

At the end of the research period, the students all meet in a location chosen by the group leader. This is a time for the students to share travel experiences, relax and regroup for their last month, during which they can travel, finish up research or begin writing their research paper.

An experience of this kind teaches students many things about the world and about themselves. Gee notes students learn self-reliance, independence, and self- confidence. Although three-and-a-half months is a relatively brief experience, Gee comments it "looms large in their memories."

Programs like SAE answer the need to give students a global experience at UW-RF, said Gee. In an increasingly globalized world, the situation of being immersed in another culture, where there is no barrier between the student and culture, provides an opportunity to learn on both sides.

Studying abroad allows students to dispel their own misconceptions about other cultures as well as others' misconceptions about Americans. International Programs Director Brent Greene agrees. "Our students serve as ambassadors," he says, and they have a very powerful role when it comes to shaping the "American" image abroad.

SAE is one of several international programs on campus that help to make the campus a global community and serves to increase global understanding, says Greene. Studying abroad, Greene adds, "gives UW-RF world knowledge awareness," that is "our one true hope for true world peace."

The course aims to help participants understand the concept of place through a "bioregional" perspective. Participants will explore a personal sense of identity through an examination of the cultural and environmental aspects of where they live. Participants will also investigate what it means to develop and foster stewardship and an awareness of place.

Topics covered include what constitutes a sense of place; intimacy and stewardship of place; learning about an area's bioregion; living, mapping and building a sense of place; and empowerment in protecting place.

"I am confident that Dr. Don Betzs diverse background will energize UW-River Falls faculty, staff and students; encourage continued dialogue with the River Falls community; and invigorate the campus commitment to excellence," Reilly said. "I look forward to having Don as part of the UW System leadership team as we continue to improve this universitys quality, access, efficiency and effectiveness."

Betz previously held several administrative positions, including provost and vice president of academic affairs at Palmer College of Chiropractic, as well as positions at Northeastern State University in Tahlequah, Okla., including vice president of university relations, dean of continuing studies, assistant to the president, director of university relations, and executive director of the educational foundation.

Betz said. "I look forward to becoming a member of the community and university at UW-River Falls, and to building leadership teams to help students learn so that they can become productive, creative, ethical and engaged citizens."

Betz, who has also served as a board member and regular presenter for the Oklahoma Educators Leadership Academy, has made leadership development among faculty, staff and students an integral part of his administrative accomplishments. He has significant fundraising experience and is a co-founder of the University of Central Oklahoma Alliance for Institutional Advancement, an innovative campus-wide collaboration for the advancement of the institution.

"Dr. Betz was warmly received by our students, faculty and staff, as well as the larger community, when he visited us during the selection process. I know that the Regents endorsement will be greeted with great enthusiasm on the campus as well as in the community and region."

He has given presentations on leadership, globalization, civic engagement and higher education and is an international affairs analyst for regional media. Betz earned his M.A. and Ph.D. in international relations from the University of Denver. He has held the position of professor of political science at University of Central Oklahoma and Northeastern State University and has awards for excellence in service and teaching.

Carter's speech embraced his personal, homegrown fundamentals that he promisesonce in practicewill ultimately result in "value and success." Carter emphasized the importance of "accountability, integrity, leadership and teamwork."

Carter's accomplishments are beyond ordinary. In Richmond, 80 percent of students are more likely to end up in jail instead of college, and 50 percent of Richmond students never graduate. All of Carter's players, however, have not only graduated but have graduated with scholarships to attend college.

"98.5 percent" of the movie is true. Carter says he was on the set nearly every day and pushed to have the original Richmond basketball players and their parents appear in the film, as well as his seven sisters, whom Carter credits with much of his own success. His game plays are named after each of their personalities, he says.

Carter ended the evening by giving out his e-mail address and inviting all audience members to send any concerns or questions his way. Carter vowed to reply to each and every request. Coming from a coach who doesn't appear to sway in his convictions, Carter may have a lot of e-mail to answer.

The UW System Alcohol and Other Drug Use Survey will be conducted online each year at UW System campuses to find trends in alcohol and drug use, student perceptions of use, and consequences of use. The process will assure anonymity for the respondents.

"We hope this survey encourages students to be open about their experiences, thoughts and observations about alcohol and drug use," said UW-Stevens Point Chancellor Linda Bunnell, chair of a system-wide AODA committee.

Beginning the week of Feb. 21, a random sample of students at each of the larger UW campuses will be invited to participate in the survey via an e-mail from campus administrators. All students from campuses with fewer than 6,000 students will be invited to participate.

"All the campuses have had input into the development of this survey," says Alice Reilly-Myklebust, director of student health services at UW-River Falls and a member of the system-wide AODA task force. "The survey only takes about 15 minutes and is confidential. No individual information will be shared. The data is not meant to compare campus to campus, but will give each campus their own information."

Keven Syverson, health education coordinator at UW-RF, said he encourages all students to participate in the survey, regardless of whether or not they use alcohol or drugs. "The survey allows students to have a voice as it helps us determine programming and services at the local level, as well as the state level."

Students who elect to participate will receive an instant analysis of the impacts of their own alcohol use, including an estimate of their average peak blood-alcohol concentration, and how their level of use compares to students nationally.

Food and Environmental Sciences will strive to complete a project or solve a problem to benefit an enterprise company. The team of students can provide a business with reports, feasibility studies, design analyses, financial analyses, business plans, presentations, videos, or demonstrations.

Since the course was first offered in 2003, students have worked on a variety of problems. Topics ranged from researching the feasibility of the UW-RF lab farmland swap, researching and recommending improved grain handling techniques to the UW-RF lab farm, and researching methods to improve ventilation in an equine facility.

Rauls, the energy sales manager for Cenex Lubricants, recommends the program to other businesses. "It is a good experience for both students and for the business community to get new ideas for the future," he says.

FEB. 11, 2005--A little blonde-haired girl picks up the doll and holds it in her left arm like it was her own child; she animatedly smashes a bottle against its mouth. A clinician tells the girl, "Feed the baby her bottle. Here you go." The little girl gives the clinician a blank stare. "Just feed the baby the bottle."

The girl throws the bottle away, and the clinician once again picks up the bottle and hands it to the girl. This time the clinician says in a soothing tone, "It's alright, you won't hurt the baby." The little girl clutches the bottle and then in one swift motion sticks it into the doll's mouth.

Established in 1963 as part of the department of communicative disorders, each week the clinic serves between 45 and 50 residents of all ages from western Wisconsin and eastern Minnesota with disorders ranging from articulation and phonological disorders to hearing and cognitive disabilities. Some examples of the types of disorders served include laryngectomy, multiple sclerosis, Lou Gehrig's disease, cerebral palsy, stroke, autism and traumatic brain injury.

Located in the lower level of the Wyman Education Building on the UW-RF campus, the clinic consists of many separate rooms and labs, each devoted to solving communication problems. The augmentative communication laboratory provides the latest technology offering the use of laser devices that allow patients to look in a certain direction causing the laser to point at a picture to communicate their needs. This way the patient only has to move his or her head slightly to make it work.

Another innovation is the use of a small button the patient can press with his or her head to communicate. These are just some examples of the many new devices created to aid in communication for those who cannot speak.

The clinic also serves clients with degenerative diseases. In instances where an illness causes patients to eventually lose their voices, a computer allows clients to use their own voices by storing words and phrases. Voice output devices such as head mounts, light beams and voice analysis also makes life simpler and improves communication.

Another feature of the clinic is hearing testing and screening both on-site at the clinic and in nearby schools. Offered each fall, the clinic performs hearing screening at St. Croix Central, Prescott, and River Falls school districts. In the spring, the clinic offers speech and language screening at those sites as well.

Harris explains that the clinic benefits both clients and the graduate students who work there. "By bridging the gap between theory and practice, the clinic allows students to practice in their future profession and build skills while supervised by a faculty and staff of certified speech-language pathologists," says Harris.

Supervised by department professors and professionals who work in the field, students evaluate clients, create appropriate therapy goals, and implement treatment for clients. Guided and supported by her supervisors, Des Combaz works with clients diagnosed with a wide variety of speech and/or language disorders. "I feel that the clinical experience here at the University has prepared me well for a future career in the field of speech-language pathology," says Des Combaz.

"The clinic is a perfect fit with the mission of the University," says Harris, particularly with outreach and service as well as training future speech and language professionals. The clinic improves learning for clients and UW-RF students alike.

The students' experiences during the 16-day trip were designed to help build bridges between the ag students, as future Midwestern agricultural business leaders, and the Mexican agricultural workforce.

According to Dennis Cooper, UW-RF dairy science professor and course instructor, students will gain lasting benefits from the course that will translate to a positive effect in the workforce. "Traveling to Mexico, learning some Spanish, and becoming more acquainted with the culture and the actual towns where these workers come from will help [the students] to relate to these workers better and in a more constructive, positive way," said Cooper.

Weekdays were spent in a series of Spanish language training and human resource management classes. Each day included four hours of intense Spanish language instruction from the Cemanahuac Education Community, a school that strives to teach the Spanish language and Latin-American culture to students of all ages, levels and professions.

Nathan Wilber, a junior agriculture business major from Trempeleau, Wis., described the Spanish classes as "overwhelming and shocking," because from the moment they stepped into the classroom and until they left each day they were not allowed to speak any English.

Students learned how to successfully manage employees through good communication, motivation and discipline skills. They analyzed the decreasing U.S. labor supply trends that have led to an increased hiring of immigrants. The course also taught students practices associated with hiring Latin Americans, dealing with cultural issues and making ethical decisions.

The Cemanahuac Education Community also arranged to experience Mexican family stays during the week. One, two or three students lived with the family, who provided the students with authentic Mexican meals in a real family setting. It also allowed students the chance to participate in evening lessons in basket-making, belt-making, Mexican cooking, horseback riding and dance lessons.

Weekends were dedicated to traveling, sightseeing and other forms of cultural familiarization. Students spent a day at Teotihuacan, the "City of the Gods" and home to the third largest pyramid in the world. The group also observed Mexico's dairy industry by visiting a large 150-cow Brown Swiss dairy farm with a milking parlor and a small 20-cow farm where the animals are still milked by hand.

Jessica Fraust, a junior animal science major from Ettrick, Wis. describes the emotions of the experience. "At these villages, we were welcomed by friends and family members of John's [Rosenow] workers. They fed us like royalty and were so welcoming and caring toward us. You could see the respect and appreciation that they had for John and everything he has done for their families. At some of the places there were tears shed along with the laughs, and we were always invited to tour the communities."

The experience was a cultural awakening for students. "It was really eye opening to learn about the reality in Mexico, which is why immigrants come to work here," said senior Stephanie Jicinsky, a animal science major from Baraboo, Wis. "They don't come because they want to, but because the Mexican culture values family so much, and working in the U.S. is one way for fathers and husbands to give their families a better life. It means so much that they are willing to go months or years without seeing their loved ones."

The course left the students, who aspire to be future agriculture business leaders, with both a technical knowledge of the Latino labor force and a personal look into the culture, families and lifestyles of rural Mexico.

"We were totally immersed in the culture," said Fraust. "That accelerated our learning process as well as opened our eyes to management skills that are necessary for different cultures and the importance of an employer to understand every individual."

Eggers spoke on the pros and cons of the proposed budget, which include a tuition hike and cuts in administrative positions. Tanner discussed United Councils approach to the budget, which included having many of the UW schools sign doors that ask the Governor and legislature to spare students from another tuition increase and keep "UW doors open to all.

Many students from across the campus took time to sign the doors, which will be presented to key members of the legislature. Slogans on the door displayed a variety of sentiments regarding the budget that included "Im poor," "I cannot afford tuition" and "Keep UW doors open 2 all."

A representative of the student body, Smith talked about financial burdens that students would face with a tuition increase. She also discussed how cutting administrative positions is detrimental to the University. Finally Cluppert discussed the UW-RF Student Senates intent to attend a lobbying day at the Capitol on Feb. 24 as well as a forum scheduled for 11 a.m. on Feb. 28 in Madison.

UW-RF anthropology Professor Ed Robins examines Belize's dependence on its treasure trove of natural resources as well as recent concerns voiced by conservationists over transformation of the resource base.

Robins, the chair of the UW-RF department of sociology, anthropology and criminal justice, also directs an annual student study tour to Belize as well as student internship opportunities in Belize and a joint research program with Green Reef Belize.

The second annual UW-RF production of "The Vagina Monologues" is part of a global movement to stop violence against women. Part of V-Day River Falls 2005 and the V-Day College Campaign, the play is an outreach effort to promote creative events that increase awareness, raise money and revitalize the spirit of existing anti-violence organizations.

V-Day, which stands for victory, valentine and vagina, is a nonprofit organization that distributes funds to grassroots, national and international organizations and programs that generate broader attention for the fight to stop worldwide violence against women.

Kendra Plant, UW-RF business major and music minor from Blaine, Minn., directs and coordinates the play. Plant says, "The play deals with bruises and neglect but also can be very funny and entertaining. People come out after seeing the play with a whole new experience."

Last year 1,100 communities hosted V-Day benefits around the world. V-Day celebrates the work of those nicknamed "vagina warriors," or the women and men working toward ending violence against women at the community level.

Assistant directors Naomi Bielefeldt, a theater major from Altoona, Wis. and Erin Fiser, a music major from Ladysmith, Wis., helped out with casting, directing, marketing and production and were part of the driving force that made the production possible.

Turningpoint, a nonprofit organization serving victims of family violence and sexual assault located in River Falls, Wis. Turningpoint has been in existence for 18 years and is the only shelter program within a 60-mile radius of western Wisconsin.

Center Involvement Coordinator Miriam Huffman, is an event developed by the V-Day College Campaign, which strives to empower women to find their collective voices and demand an end to the epidemic levels of violence and abuse on their campuses, in their communities and around the world by creating a global community against violence towards females.

His accolades include numerous nominations for Minnesota Music Awards, in addition to being a finalist in several songwriting competitions. A native of Minnesota with a background in theology, Mayer is not big on love songs, but prefers delving into science, nature and things spiritual.

The workshop, "Rhythm of Guidance," will provide insight from child-care trainers and UW-RF early childhood development professors who will explore developmental issues including conflict intervention, language development, behavioral assessment, discipline, movement/music experiences, and strategies to guide children with special needs in inclusive classrooms.

The workshop will feature keynote speaker Dan Gartrell, director of child development training and professor of early childhood and elementary education at Bemidji State University. Gartrell will discuss four practices important for building an encouraging classroom: being a guidance professional, using leadership communication, teaching democratic life skills, and creating an encouraging program.

Gartrell has published articles and books on child development and presented at more than 300 workshops, keynotes, and trainings on such topics as guidance, intelligence development and emergent literacy.

Erickson will introduce the idea of the "Badger baby bus tour," which focuses on highlighting the steps that caregivers can take to ensure that the early experiences of young children will enhance their intellectual and emotional capacity.

"Functional assessment of challenging behaviors: Why do kids do the things they do?" Harris will introduce assessment strategies such as the interview process, use of scatter plots, ABC analyses, and functional manipulation of challenging behavior.

Assistant professor of the counseling and school psychology Scott Woitaszewski will speak on "Promoting resiliency in children: Possibilities and cautions." Woitaszewski will review factors related to resiliency in children.

Gayle Ward, workshop facilitator and assistant professor of teacher education, said the importance of this workshop is that it focuss on sharing university work with early childhood teachers and parents in the community, as well with early and elementary education students at UW-RF. "We are responding to needs in the community for guidance strategies in inclusive classrooms," says Ward.

Open to the public, the workshop is geared toward educators, childcare providers and parents. Childcare workers may receive continuing education units through the Wisconsin Registry. Participants can receive undergraduate or graduate credits through UW-RF.

While the focus of the center is on encouraging faculty to engage in scholarly research, it also encourages the presentation of interdisciplinary research to enrich the knowledge of the greater community.

Since its inception, the center has actively engaged and participated in economic development issues in the St. Croix Valley, says director Hamid Tabesh, who is a professor of what at UW-RF. Acting as a liaison for the college to the region, the center helps to identify the expertise faculty can offer to the business community.

The center also assists faculty in the pursuit of grants to fund appropriate research, identifies research projects that meet economic development needs of the St. Croix Valley, supports and encourages collaboration and the exchange of ideas between faculty and staff, among other functions.

"Brain drain" is a nickname given to the fact that 20 percent of University of Wisconsin graduates leave the state to find high-quality, high-paying jobs. Wisconsin Jobs for Wisconsin Grads is a Web-based service designed to reverse this trend.

An online job posting system that connects Wisconsin employers to University of Wisconsin graduates, the program's goal is to add value to Wisconsin businesses while investing in the overall success of the state's future.

"The more we can do to help Wisconsin employers, the sooner we'll turn the tide and keep graduates in the state," said Carmen Croonquist, director of career services at UW-River Falls, who participated in the program's development.

"The job of the UW career services offices is to manage the relationships between the students and employers," said Matt Fitzgerald, web and database administrator in the UW-RF career services office. "Our success is measured by how many students use the system."

"It's really up to the business community to take advantage of Wisconsin graduates and make efforts to pay them salaries that compete with our neighboring states," said economist Karin Wells, of the WDWD Office of Economic Advisors. "I'm really optimistic about growth in Wisconsin.

This is the first time the UW System Career Services offices have partnered in an effort to provide employers with this type of a service. "This is a great collaboration," said Croonquist. "I think it's a win-win situation for the state of Wisconsin."

Previous course offerings have included: chess, origami, Spanish, German, forensic science, rockets, food science, scuba diving, radio production, science subjects, and a variety of art and writing courses.

Jermal's Collaborative Mural class assisted with the project, which also received support from the Campus Beautification Fund and a College of Arts Student Grant, which allowed the class to visit regional mosaic artist Rianna de Raad's studio in rural Beldenville, Wis.

"The project was designed and created to give a 'breath of fresh air' as one descends the steps on their way to the creative departments of the University," says Hawke. "The hopes for this mosaic mural are for it to help inspire creativity throughout the fine arts."

The biography is about a young woman named Ayla, whose life is told from spiritual influences, rather than events, as turning points in the film to demonstrate what's going on and where things are going.

The film's characters speak to the camera and represent abstract ideas, such as death. Steffen says, "When they talk about ideas, they talk about themes that have been the driving force of my life moving forward."

"Her Own Truth" approaches the subject of how people create their own subjective realities, how they can change the way they interact with these realities and the world, and how the choices people make shape and direct their lives.

Steffen looked at her big "mess" of scenes, wrote them on little pieces of paper, spread them out on the floor and began putting order to her chaosadding and subtracting elementseven during shooting.

UW-RF Professor of speech communication and theatre arts Ken Stofferahn advised Steffen through her project. Stofferahn teaches design for theatre, stage lighting, film, stage technology and scene painting.

Starting out as a mass communication major, Steffen's six-year journey as a UW-RF student has offered her a broad range of TV experience, but while working on her first film she decided she that was her first love.

One outcome possibility is finding the funding to make her first feature-length film if the short one is warmly received. She plans to write a feature-length screenplay with UW-RF English associate Professor Jenny Brantley during the 2005 spring semester.

At the premiere Stofferahn will welcome filmgoers and introduce Steffen, who will briefly introduce the film. A reception including question-and-answer with Steffen and cast members will follow the screening.

Rathburn examined the success of new executives to CEO positions from data previously collected on head coach successions, change, and performance in the National Football League. Rathburn's research shows top executive succession positively influences the performance of an organization by studying the timing of the change and the experiences of the new CEO.

Robins examines Belize's dependence on its treasure trove of natural resources as well as recent concerns voiced by conservationists over transformation of the resource base. Belize, a small Central American country between Mexico and Guatemala, was once a refuge for pirates and buccaneers. Today, Belize has been transformed into the ideal retreat for tourists, is latest group of adventurers. Robins, the chair of the UW-RF department of sociology, anthropology and criminal justice, also directs an annual student study tour to Belize as well as student internship opportunities in Belize and a joint research program with Green Reef Belize.

Derfler will lead a journey through maps, plans and imagery to excavation sites in Israel, uncovering the existence of ancient civilizations such as those mentioned in the Bible. The goal of archaeological research is to put "flesh onto the bones" of ancient text, says Derfler, who believes that digging up our religious roots can be historically and spiritually connected. Derfler has been teaching about ancient civilizations for more than 25 years and also conducts study tours to Egypt, Morocco, Greece, Turkey, Israel and Jordan.

The sequencing of the human genome in April 2003 was considered the "moon landing" of the 21st century and heralded as the single greatest scientific feat of the decade. Ballantyne, who's been conducting molecular genetics research for more than 20 years, will review current discoveries, potential applications and mounting ethical concerns. While it was not entirely clear what scientists hoped to discover from DNA sequencing, Ballantyne will reflect on the benefits of this knowledge and what we've learned from this achievement.

Stargazing sessions are free and open to the public and may include a planetarium show or introductory talk by physics Professor Eileen Korenic, who will highlight a recent astronomical news or provide an in-depth look at one or more of the objects visible that night. The lecture hall scheduled for talks is located in Room 271 of Centennial Science Hall.

Since 1986 Cooper has been a Cooperative Extension specialist providing programs in human resource management for dairy farmers and others as well as grazing and dairy nutrition. He will continue those responsibilities as well as those of the Extension coordinator.

As coordinator, his new responsibilities include acting as a liaison between the UW Cooperative Extension and its specialists at UW-RF, CAFES Leadership Group, administration, faculty and staff. He will also chair the UW Cooperative Extension meetings and assist with its internal and external communication efforts.

UW Cooperative Extension is a statewide outreach program that is funded cooperatively by county, state and federal governments and includes county agents as well as extension specialists through the state.

Cooper holds B.S., M.S., and Ph.D. degrees in animal science with emphases in ruminant nutrition, physiology and agricultural economics from the University of Minnesota. He is a member of the American Dairy Science Association and has taught courses in applied feeds, advanced nutrition and dairy cattle nutrition at UW-RF for the past 19 years.

Papers, journal articles, books, playbills, visual art works and material pertinent to successful grant requests produced by UW-RF faculty and staff will be on display in the Harriet Barry Gallery in the Chalmer Davee Library from Feb. 14 to 25. All work must have been published, presented, displayed or funded during the 2004 calendar year.

The experience was the result of a grant from the U.S. Department of Agriculture to the UW-RF College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences with the purpose of familiarizing students with the graduate school setting.

Nick Vreeland took this grant opportunity to further his study of geology and his interest in glaciers. Vreeland's geology professor and academic advisor, Bob Baker, helped steer him toward Iowa State University where Vreeland worked with a doctorate student and faculty members. Together they collected about 1,500 glacial till samples from a quarry in Illinois.

The samples were then taken to the University of Minnesota, where Vreeland helped to test and analyze the samples. According to Vreeland, he was testing the magnetic susceptibility of the samples which showed the direction the till grains were aligned in and thus the direction the glacier was traveling.

He was involved in a variety of studies including examining breeding programs for cut flowers, evaluating perennial plants, studying fruit and vegetable diseases, and analyzing planting depth effects on bulb crops.

Minnesota. Her interest in the horse industry grew as she worked with a graduate student studying thoroughbred horses with recurrent exertional rhabdomyolysis. The disease occurs within 5 percent of all thoroughbreds and leads to tying-up following an exercise period. Golat examined horse pedigrees along with blood and DNA samples of more than 1,000 horses.

She also examined and compared the DNA sequences of dogs with and without a disease called hyperekplexia, which can lead to seizures. The goal was to locate possible locations of genes that cause the disease.

Golat said she thoroughly enjoyed "the aspect of being behind the scene doing the testing and all the work that goes into determining if the animal has the disease." She has a new appreciation for the occupation as well. "There is a lot more lab work than people realize," she said.

Elsa Arnold traveled to Michigan State where her main project was to conduct a feasibility study on a regional anaerobic digester, which would provide heat and electricity for a greenhouse operation. Arnold researched the engineering aspects of the digester, compared it to other similar machines, ensured that the digester covered all government and environmental policies, and determined if it would work from a biosecurity perspective.

Each of the four participants highly recommended this opportunity. The program showed the research in which current graduate students are involved, helped the students develop connections within their industries, and gave the students a real introduction to the graduate school setting.

According to team coach and animal science Professor Kristina Hiney, the contest required the students to demonstrate an immense amount of knowledge of the equine industry comparable to that of professional equine judges.

The contest began on Dec. 2, 2004, with students taking a written rulebook test and a penalty clip test. On Dec. 3, the students judged 20 live runs where they were required to rank all 20 horses in the correct order according to the NRHA judges and then match the score for each run with the actual judge's score.

The third place finish at the NRHA Futurity ended the team's successful fall judging schedule which also included a 4th place overall finish for the sophomore team in the junior college division at the All American Quarter Horse Congress and an 8th place overall finish for the team at American Quarter Horse Association World Show.

Otsuka's debut novel paints the portrait of Japanese internment camps during World War II by telling each chapter from a different point of view. It tells of a mother receiving the order to evacuate, a daughter on a long train ride to the camp, a son in a desert encampment, the family's return to their home and the bitter release of the father after more than four years in captivity.

Outreach and Graduate Studies will lead the group. Featured books are available in the University Bookstore in the Hagestad Student Center, and several copies of each book are also available in the Library's collection.

This program is a comprehensive series of classes in small business fundamentals and business plan development built for both the new and existing business owners. Program components include: legal issues, finance, staffing, accounting and marketing.

Development Center at UW-River Falls, the sessions will offer specialized assistance to small business managers who might have questions on any aspect of management as well as to those interested in starting or expanding a new businesses.

More than 300 managers of prospective and existing small business firms have been served in the area since the start of the business advising program. These represent a wide variety of manufacturing, retailing and service companies, as well as individuals wishing to start new businesses.

His administrative accomplishments include the founding of the University of Central Oklahoma Center for Undergraduate Research and the establishment of the annual statewide Undergraduate Research Day; the establishment of a Faculty Enhancement Center; co-founding of the Oklahoma Center for Arts Education; serving on the original implementation committee of the American Association of State Colleges and Universitiess American Democracy Project; and initiating the Center for Tribal Studies at Northeastern State University.

Dr. Betz has significant fundraising experience and is a co-founder of the University of Central Oklahoma Alliance for Institutional Advancement, an innovative and successful campus-wide collaboration for the advancement of the institution.

Dr. Betz, who earned his M.A. and Ph.D. in international relations from the University of Denver, has held the position of Professor of Political Science at University of Central Oklahoma and Northeastern State University and has awards for excellence in service and teaching.

Dr. Blanchards administrative accomplishments demonstrate his commitment to academic excellence, such as instituting a Teaching Technology Lab the University of Tennessee at Martin and leading the development of online courses at Fort Lewis College, which has been named one of the nations Top 10 "most wired" campuses of its size and mission. Dr. Blanchard has a record of supporting faculty development, having established a special fund, administered by the faculty, for the support of faculty research and instructional innovation.

Under Dr. Blanchards leadership, Fort Lewis College increased the diversity of its student body, enrolling over 700 Native American students, representing over 100 tribes, and significantly increasing the Hispanic student enrollment. As President of Fort Lewis College, Dr. Blanchard secured funds for two building projects, including a Child Development Center, and laid the groundwork for a new capital campaign.

Dr. Blanchard received his Ph.D. in cultural anthropology and M.A. in anthropology from Southern Methodist University, a M. Div. in religion studies and anthropology from Vanderbilt University, and a B.A. in English, history and philosophy from Olivet Nazarene College in Illinois.

She is responsible for developing and implementing the strategic plan at Clayton State University where she reorganized enrollment services and led an enrollment management team that increased student enrollment and retention. In her various administrative roles, Dr. Hoffman has led in the development of academic and outreach programs, launching one of the first undergraduate history majors with a focus on archives at Clayton State University; implementing an M.F.A. in creative writing and support for the literary magazine, the Louisville Review, at Spalding University; and establishing and raising funds for the Institute for Urban Health Partnerships at the University of Wisconsin-Milwaukee, a public-private partnership that delivers health care to over 12,000 indigent families in Milwaukee.

Working with various faculty groups, Dr. Hoffman has been responsible for the development and implementation of over 26 undergraduate and graduate majors. She has considerable experience in fund raising, including three endowed chairs, building renovations, and scholarships.

She engaged the University of Wisconsin-Milwaukee in a faculty and student exchange with Keimyung University in Tageu, South Korea. Dr. Hoffman has held tenured faculty positions in nursing and health services and has taught in Colleges of Education and Business. She is known for supporting the liberal arts and assisting with the development of graduate programs in the arts and sciences.

Dr. Kennedy led the strategic planning process at the University of Maine, which resulted in the creation of a campus-wide Information Sciences Initiative that stresses the life sciences and digital technologies, as well as the creation of an Honors College that emphasizes undergraduate research.

Dr. Kennedy, who has received awards for his commitment to diversity in higher education, led the reorganization of the Native Studies and Franco-American Studies programs into university-wide programs at the University of Maine.

Dr. Kennedy has received federal and foundation grants and private money in support of undergraduate research and student diversity.He has significant experience and success in developing partnerships with constituents outside the university.

Berkeley and a B.S. in plant science from the University of Minnesota, has published numerous articles on plant biochemistry in various academic journals and has received grants for his research from agencies such as the National Science Foundation, the U.S. Department of Agriculture, and the National Institute for Health. Dr. Kennedy has held tenured faculty positions in horticulture and botany.

Under Dr. Ramaleys leadership, the University of Vermont established a center for Teaching and Learning, which enhanced undergraduate learning and support for faculty development, as well as a Life Skills program in intercollegiate sports. She played a significant leadership role in the creation of the Vermont Public Education Partnership, involving the Vermont Department of Education, the University of Vermont and the Vermont State Colleges for the support of pre-kindergarten to postsecondary education.

Vermont increased during her tenure as President, and total giving tripled during her tenure at Portland State University.Under her leadership, Portland State University became a national model for developing a general education curriculum built on community-based learning. At Portland State University, Dr. Ramaley led the initiative that established the Portland Education Network, which supports collaboration among K-12 schools, community colleges, and public four-year institutions in Washington state and Oregon.

Angeles and a B.A. in zoology from Swarthmore College. In addition to the numerous articles in her field of expertise, puberty onset, stress and fertility, Dr. Ramaley has published articles on institutional change and reform in higher education, the "engaged" university, and science education. She has held tenured faculty positions in departments of biology, physiology and anatomy.

"Average is just not good enough. Period." This is the philosophy of Coach Carter, who had oversight of Richmond High School's basketball program in California from 1997 to 2002. In 1999, Carter found himself in the center of controversy when he benched his entire undefeated varsity basketball team (including his own son) to motivate and push his players to improve their grades.

High School students. Using basketball as the common bond, Carter is an advocate for Richmond's youth. He is diligent in providing them with opportunities to build meaningful relationships with their peers and caring adults and recognizes the advantages inherent in a sound sports program.

Other than basketball, the film concentrates on real-life issues, such as the players' relationships with their girlfriends and families, the coach's life beyond the court, as well as the players' struggle to stay academically focused.

Off the court, Coach Carter keeps busy as an author, educator and motivational speaker. He is founder of his own publishing company, Prime Time Publishing, which promotes quality educational books and materials to meet the needs of today's youth.

His presentations aim straight for the hearts of educators, coaches, students and leaders in any field. Carter uses real life examples and a genuine, caring approach to energize and help individuals reach their highest potential.

Daly will discuss Sun Country Airlines business model and how the carrier is unique from the majority of the airline industry. Daly will also forecast on the industry's future. Sun Country's hybrid model blends revenue from tour operators along with the sales generated from direct marketing its scheduled flights.

The CBE's Third Thursday Luncheon and Speaker Series is especially designed for UW-River Falls alumni, students and others interested in business issues. These periodic luncheons feature timely talks by distinguished business professionals and provide networking opportunities for UW-RF alumni, faculty, students, and business leaders.

Witty's love for stand-up comedy began while touring with his parents, who made their living by doing Christian sketch comedy in churches across the country. After moving to Minneapolis, Minn., he hosted the "The Big Bad Movie" show while continuing to perform in A-room comedy clubs.

DREAM (Destiny Re-defining Education through Art and Movement) is a collective of multidimensional professional performance artists combining dance, poetry, storytelling, and rap to create inspirational pieces that are technically powerful, soulfully expressive, and profoundly meaningful.

The racially and ethically diverse group of young men and women brings a message of empowerment and social justice to audiences nationally and internationally. The group's vision of personal and social transformation pays respect to cultural history and values.

The Voodoo Glow Skulls have been together for 16 years. During this time they have released seven albums, sold one million records, and performed in locations around the world. They reach a large audience by singing in both Spanish and English, which has been a trademark for the band since they began.

"The show is popular with the community as it's the first time most of the students have participated in a public exhibition of their artwork," says Susan Zimmer, program assistant and exhibition coordinator for the UW-RF art department.

On Friday, Feb. 4, the exhibit concludes with a variety of workshops for high school students who are interested in pursuing higher education in art. Eighteen of the 20 schools are registered for the workshops, which will be attended by approximately 250-300 students and high school art instructors.

The workshops provide an opportunity for the University to showcase its studio facilities and programs. According to Zimmer, the high school exhibit is a major recruitment tool for the UW-RF art department as high school students interact with art professors, University art majors and others.

The workshop day also joins UW-RF administrators, art department faculty and high school instructors at a luncheon to provide an opportunity for networking and knowledge exchange. "A number of the high school instructors are UW-River Falls alumni, so the exhibit is an important event for connecting with old friends, creating student teaching opportunities as well as fostering recruitment," says Zimmer.

System. Appropriate for human resource professionals at all levels as well as general managers, the course covers key concepts in human resources management and provides a forum to discuss current issues affecting the human resources field.

Participants will be able to network with other professionals and share real-world experiences to help them deal with the growing complexities of their field. A variety of topics, ranging from strategic management to occupational health, safety and security, will be covered.

Upon completion, participants who are certified SHRM practitioners will receive 36 of the 50 credits required for re-certification. Students who are not yet certified will gain a solid foundation in human resources principles needed to successfully complete the Professional in Human Resources (PHR) or Senior Professional in Human Resources (SPHR) certification exam.

Over the last year, Bye has been leading the 3-year-old center to new heights by taking a more active role in the community. "I want to let people know we are here," says Bye. "We want to be a partner with the business community and to be a source people can use."

Working to increase its visibility by offering free business advising classes in the community as well as one-on-one consulting, the SBDC hopes to expand business ownership in the three counties it serves, which includes Pierce, Polk and St. Croix.

The SBDC assists those looking to launch a new business and those who have just started a business. It also helps existing businesses become even better, says Bye. "We provide any and all types of business resources for organizations."

Free business consulting through advising and training sessions are offered by the SBDC. Small business specialists are available by appointment through the center. The specialists are experts in the area of entrepreneurship and can help solve problems that small businesses can face at any stage of development. During these individual consulting sessions, topics can range from business plans, finance, marketing and strategy to helping get businesses organized and running smoothly. Bye said he meets with approximately 6-10 businesses a week in such sessions.

Balsam Lake in Polk County; and Ellsworth in Pierce County. Individual appointments are approximately 75 minutes in length and are designed for anyone who would like to discuss plans for starting or expanding a business or who has problems in any area of business management.

The Entrepreneurial Training Program focuses on starting a business and creating a business plan. The course covers issues such as employee relations, human resources management and basic business management.

A class on QuickbooksTM accounting basics shows participants how to set up and use the software for their business. The SBDC also offers a course on human resources. Additional classes focus on marketing, finances and small business strategy. The SBDC also serves as a resource for businesses to connect with other professionals either in the university or private sector.

By offering training and free advising for businesses, Bye hopes to increase the economic viability in this area. "Our goal is to increase business ownership, not only by launching new businesses but by making businesses already here better and more profitable," said Bye.

The theme of the spiritual film is how we create our own reality, and how the choices we make impact the course of our life. Advisor and theater Professor Ken Stofferahn will introduce the film, and the filmmaker will and cast and crew will be available for discussion during a reception after the showing. Free. 7 p.m. UW-River Falls, William Abbott Concert Hall, Kleinpell Fine Arts Building.

The MFPA offers up to six such scholarships each year to agriculture or food science undergraduates in the University of Wisconsin System, based on interest in the food science industry and academic achievement.

Lee Schulz, a junior agricultural business major from Rosholt, Wis., was also chosen to receive the Kenneth G. Weckel Scholarship, Schulz has been employed at a frozen grocery warehouse, and he hopes to pursue a career in agricultural sales or management.

Schwertel , a senior food science technology major from Galesville, Wis., also received the seventh high individual title overall for the egg production division, which included both live bird judging and product judging.

"We are finding that a number of students decide to change universities at semester time and would like to consider attending UW River Falls," says Alan Tuchtenhagen, director of admissions at UW-RF. "We continue adjust the class schedule and add seats or new class sections to accommodate them."

In addition, the current economy has put increasing pressure on people in the workforce to update their skills and return to school, and attending UW-River Falls can be a convenient and affordable way for them to do that, says Tuchtenhagen.

In addition, the University will host a free financial aid information night for new, returning and prospective students on Jan. 3 from 7 to 9 p.m. in the Abbott Concert Hall of the Kleinpell Fine Arts Building.

The exhibit includes jewelry, such as ornamental nose pieces and armbands, arrows, shields, decorative carvings and "ancestor poles," on which are carved figures representing those recently deceased, whose deaths have not been avenged.

The tribe, first discovered in the mid-20th century, has a philosophy based on maintaining equilibrium, and sees illness, suffering and death as stemming from imbalance. Activities such as avenging an enemys actions by headhunting were seen as re-establishing equilibrium. A Catholic missionary order, the Crosier Fathers and Brothers, first displayed Asmat artifacts in the 1970s and '80s. In the mid-1990s, the current museum was established as an independent, nonprofit organization.

This is the first museum display to exhibited at the UWRF library, which usually focuses on the art of local residents, students and faculty. Putting the exhibit on tour is also a new venture for the museum.

Peterson warns, "I don't think I ever thanked my parents enough, which should remind you graduates to thank your parents before it is too late." To create his own family, Peterson found a person who was hard working, smart and had heart. Smarter than he could've imagined, he says of his wife Ursula, who "smashed any illusion of male superiority."

Peterson recalled one boy, who was clearly learning disabled but who could play his violin better than Peterson could play his trombone. Peterson said he learned that everyone can accomplish great things when given an equal opportunity to education.

While in the service, he said he immersed himself in a different culture and began to see the world from a different perspective. "Controlling the truth is one advantage of winning a war, but otherwise, wars solve one problem and immediately create another."

This short course will help participants understand the uniqueness of their food processing establishment to help ensure that proper sanitation programs are conducted in the facility. The Wisconsin Milk Marketing Board provided funding for initial development of the course.

The course is taught by Ranee May, an instructor in the UW-RF department of animal and food science, who manages the UW-RF Dairy Pilot Plant. She has offered the short courses to small dairy producers for 15 years through traditional classroom instruction. In addition, May has extensive experience providing custom training to dairy companies in the upper Midwest as well as individualized programs for international groups.

The online course will cover the same material in a traditional course, but in a more flexible format. Participants work at their own pace and complete the coursework as their time and schedule permits. Participants will need an Internet connection, a web browser and an e-mail address.

Analysis Critical Control Point (HACCP) System. When sanitation programs are in place, HACCP can be more effective because it can concentrate on the hazards associated with the food or processing rather than the plant environment.

After completing the course, participants will be able to define technical terms and explain their relationship to sanitation; find and interpret pertinent literature regarding sanitation; critique situations and make suggested corrections; and design an SSOP for their processing establishment.

The General Sanitation course is being offered to meet the needs of the growing numbers of dairy artisan producers across the state. The course may be used as the continuing education component necessary for Wisconsin licensure and certification programs. A certificate of completion will be issued at the end of the course.

In order to receive the award, students must achieve junior or senior standing, obtain a 3.0 or better G.P. A., and must provide service to their school or community for a minimum of two years during their undergraduate career.

The primary purpose of the faculty sabbatical program is to enable recipients to engage in intensive study to become more effective teachers and scholars and to enhance their service to the University. The program also recognizes the recipients' past and continuing academic contributions in keeping with UW-RF's mission of teaching, research and service.

To receive approval for sabbatical, proposals from tenured faculty are evaluated on their merit. The University of Wisconsin Board of Regents decides which recommended sabbaticals to approve each December.

Betty Bergland, a professor of history and philosophy, plans to complete a book proposal and finish a manuscript that brings together research examining the relationships between indigenous peoples and Norwegian immigrants in the Midwest. Included in the sabbatical period are planned research trips to northern Iowa to examine county archives on Norwegian settlements and a trip to the National Archives in Washington D.C.

Specifically, Johntson will study how this ancient technology has re-emerged in the mid- to late-20th century and spread from Japan to the United States and Australia. He will explore some of the important issues surrounding wood-fired ceramics such as the current role and purpose.

"I believe a better understanding of the cultural roots and its relationship to contemporary expression will directly contribute to enriching courses that I teach at the University," Johnston said. Johnston has been a mentor to several undergraduate art students in this medium. The UW-RF ceramics program has gained regional, national, and international recognition.

During the 2002-03 academic year, chemistry Professor Michael Kahlow took a sabbatical leave to study the enzyme ribonucleotide reductase at the University of Minnesota. He said his sabbatical greatly benefited his teaching abilities. "To actually work for a year in my area of expertise has really allowed me to bring my education up to date in a field that's rapidly advancing," said Kahlow. "We need to be able to teach students what's current, and sabbaticals allow us to do that."

The finalists should be publicly announced after Jan. 1 by Reilly and will visit the campus at the beginning of February. Those visits will provide opportunities for campus and community members to meet the finalists and give the committee feedback.

The colorful mural, "Views of the Land," was designed and painted by 17 art students from UW-RF is currently on display in the third floor environmental science and management hallway of the Ag Science building.

Commissioned by the Plant and Earth Science department, the mural was created by art students from Professor Lynn Jermal's Collaborative Murals class who worked on the mural over the past six weeks with input from the department.

Michael Kaltenberg, professor of Plant and Earth Science, says that he is very impressed. "What is particularly pleasing to me is the attention the artists have given to detail and the wonderful array of colors used.

The mural should really catch the eye of anyone in the hallway and indirectly draw attention to what our Conservation, Land Use and Environmental Science programs address. From my perspective, Jermal and her class have exceeded my expectations and have made a very positive contribution to the Ag Science building and the campus."

Jermal said the process of creating the mural was rewarding, "Learning how to work on a creative project collaboratively is a very challenging and stimulating process," she said. "It demands a different sort of commitment to the group and the larger community, which is the recipient of the public work by the artists. I think the students have learned some skills but more importantly perhaps, something about themselves by creating this mural. Several students have shown terrific leadership within the group."

Andy LaMere, another artist working on the mural, says that he has enjoyed working on a project with longevity. "Its nice to know this will be here for all to see and that I can say we did that," he said.

The $2,082 grant funds a four-station newsroom software system and the compatible hardware for the existing WRFW newsroom audio board. The equipment will be installed summer 2005 in order to prevent disruption of station operations.

UW-RF journalism Associate Professor Sandra Ellis, who authored the grant, is the principal administrator. Students enrolled in Ellis' broadcast journalism courses serve as the news staff for the radio station, giving them hands-on reporting, producing and anchoring experience.

Ellis says the grant gives students the opportunity to work with a professional integrated newsroom computer system with software capabilities for news gathering, copy writing, audio recording/editing as well as generating on-air scripts. The new equipment will allow students to digitally edit interviews for news and radio documentaries on the computers.

"Todays radio stations are incorporating digital audio in their newsrooms," said Ellis. "This upgrade will make our students better prepared when they begin their careers in the news industry, and the new software system makes WRFWs operations more closely resemble professional stations.

Steines was encouraged to apply for the scholarship, never thinking she would be selected. "When I received the call that I was chosen, I was very excited," remembered Steines. For Steines, like many students, paying for college was going to be a challenge.

Whether the student qualifies for the scholarship is dependent upon the student's ability to obtain federal funding. The First National Bank of River Falls makes up the difference between the cost of school and the money the student is not able to acquire through federal funding. In this way, the student is fully funded for all expenses through their first year at the University.

Steines is impressed with the scholarship and feels honored to be part of this opportunity. "This scholarship is helping me through school by taking a load off my shoulders," said Steines, who adds, "I love working at the bank."

This unique scholarship that partners CBE with the First National Bank of River Falls offers benefits for the University, the students and the corporate partners. "This is a tremendous program and contribution by First National Bank of River Falls," says Nemecek. "We hope additional businesses will participate in this type of program supporting and mentoring our future business leaders."

The study of economics is integral to all curricula, says Brian Schultz, state program director of the CEEs. "The class doesn't need to be economics or math-related. We have even introduced economics in children's literature classes," he says.

The purpose of a CEE is to provide K-12 educators with ideas on how to teach or incorporate economics in their curriculum. It gives students a working practical knowledge of economics through a variety of subjects, says Schultz, economics professor and director of the CEE at UW-River Falls.

EconomicsWisconsin provides financial and administrative support for programs offered by the eight centers in the state. EW is affiliated with the National Council on Economic Education and its nationwide network of councils and centers.

The UW-RF center offers a number of services from workshops, in-service training, and graduate courses, to access to a well-stocked library of resources. The Resource Library in South Hall gives teachers access to an assortment of economics teaching materials including lesson plans, Advanced Placement books, and videos. There are even children's literature stories that help teach children economics. "The Resource Library provides teachers an opportunity to look through materials to get ideas for their lessons," says Schultz.

The UW-RF center offers five one-credit graduate courses offered online.each semester as well as during the summer. The courses are flexible to meet the demands of busy schedules, says Schultz, and provide teachers with opportunities to improve the quality of their courses and make economics interesting for students.

The centers organize the annual Economics Challenge held the first week in April. In the competition, students answer questions on micro, macro, and international trade economics as well as on current events and economic policy applications. Teachers can register up to two teams per school with four students per team. There are two divisions teams can be entered in, general high school economics or the AP/honors division. There is no registration fee.

Peterson, UW-RF's senior faculty member with 50 years of academic service, has not missed a day of teaching class since his arrival in 1954. Peterson has authored eight historical academic books and is recognized as a pre-eminent scholar on Nazi Germany and the Russian Occupation of East Germany and Poland following World War II. Peterson, who served as chair of the social science and history departments from 1963 to 1991, teaches a range of undergraduate and graduate courses with an emphasis on 20th Century European history.

Services, Inc., in Ellsworth, Wis. Healy chairs the advisory board for the College of Business and Economics and has previously served two terms on the College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences Advisory Council and served as its chair. Healy also plays a pivotal role with the Federated Youth Foundation Board of Directors, which has provided several scholarships to UW-RF students.

The competition features questions about technical agriculture, professional education and agricultural education organizations. This year the specific questions within those categories dealt with animal science, foundations in agriculture and the National FFA Organization.

The national AGR chapter awards only one dairy scholarship to an undergraduate student in the nation, and typically preference is given to a student from California Polytechnic State University in San Luis Obispo, Calif.

Established by agriculturist Ole Meland, the award honors an individual who achieve high levels of excellence and pursue a major in dairy science, dairy husbandry, or animal science with a dairy option or emphasis.

Wis., received the $1,000 scholarship for AGR Excellence. One of four scholarships awarded, this scholarship is awarded to individuals excelling in scholarship, leadership, citizenship, activities and fraternal involvement.

In addition to being a faculty member at UW-RF, Cooper serves as an UW-Extension dairy specialist. In the article Cooper shared his knowledge of dairy farms and dairy nutrition to recommend better management styles between first lactation cows and older cows. Older cows may decrease the farm's cull rate of young cows and improve the overall success of the herd, said Cooper.

The classes included ear corn, oats, shelled corn, miscellaneous small grains, soybeans, legume hay, mixed legumes, grass hay, corn silage, haylage, any other Midwest crop, the longest ear of corn, and in honor of Halloween the best decorated pumpkin.

Students in the corn and soybeans production class taught by UW-RF plant science Professor Steven Carlson and the forage crop production classes and taught by UWRF plant Science Professor Dennis Cosgrove, both judged and participated in the contest.

Jill Moe, director of the Upward Bound Program at UW-River Falls, believes the tutoring is a win-win situation. "UW-River Falls students receive quality educational experiences, learn the value of civic engagement and develop cultural competence, while St. Paul schools get much needed assistance in helping their students succeed," said Moe.

Grueb said they scheduled activities that fit in with Ruiz's interests, research, and teaching work. They toured a variety of farms that utilize grazing and attended a grazing conference in La Crosse, Wis. A trip at the end of September to the 2004 Farm Technology Days in Wisconsin's Chippewa County concluded Ruiz's visit.

CAFES' food science faculty Ranee May and Steve Watters hosted the group, for what May called a "train-the-trainers" session. May and Watters had been contracted through Land O'Lakes International to provide training to the Albanians on food safety, formulations, and production methods, so, in turn, the individuals could train other Albanians within the industry.

The project began when Cooper and Dennis Cosgrove, a UW-RF plant and earth science professor, traveled to Serbia-Montenegro to learn about the country's agricultural methods and needs. A few months later, Cooper and Cosgrove returned to Serbia-Montenegro and presented seminars to producers and professionals in research institutes.

The project concluded after seven residents of Serbia-Montenegro traveled to UW-RF for a two-week visit. According to Cooper, the trip gave the young agriculturalists from the developing countries good exposure to American people and American life. They also experienced agriculture in the United States by visiting a variety of farms and attending World Dairy Expo.

A visit from four Romanians wrapped up yet another USDA project similar to that with Serbia-Montenegro. However, this was the second group from the Romanian agriculturalists to travel to UW-RF. The four Romanians were part of the Norman E. Borlaug International Science and Technology Fellows Program, which works to educate scientists in developing countries by teaming them with professionals in the United States that share similar expertise areas. CAFES Professors Steve Kelm, Gary Onan, Larry Baumann and Tom Goerke each served as a mentor to a Romanian during the their five-week visit.

"We've been trying to achieve the Alter award over the past few years by slowly improving our chapter operations," said Jonathan Hill, the Zeta Sigma chapter president. "Winning the award was an unforgettable moment for us."

"I think Theta Chi promotes excellence in young men and encourages them to be gentlemen," said Michael Martin, local chapter advisor and academic advisor for the UW-RF College of Education and Professional Studies. "It shows them the importance of community involvement and connects them to the larger world."

Philanthropy work has become a Theta Chi tradition. Each year the local chapter participates in the American Cancer Society's Relay for Life, a community event designed to raise money to support cancer research, education, and service to patients and their families in the River Falls area. The Zeta Sigma chapter traditionally has a team that participates in the activities and helps with setting up the event. Last year it raised more than $1,000.

The UW-RF Theta Chi chapter also participates in volunteer activities ranging from the Red Cross Blood Drive to bell ringing during the holidays for the Salvation Army. In addition, each year the local chapter spends time with teenagers at the Hudson YMCA during scheduled teen nights.

Members of Theta Chi strive to maintain academic excellence. The UW-RF chapter has a program designed to challenge the brothers by creating an academic competition. Teams of four work together to try and achieve the highest semester grade point average. At the end of the term, the winning team gets a meal paid for by the other competing teams. The overall goal is to keep the combined Zeta Sigma chapter grade point average above the UW-RF men's average and the UW-RF fraternity average.

After receiving the Howard Alter Jr. Award, the Zeta Sigma chapter strives to continue to maintain its overall chapter excellence. "We've worked really hard for the Alter award and now we want to celebrate by having another good year," said Hill.

Masquers produces, supports and promotes all student involvement in theatre, including non-theatre majors. Whether a student is a theatre major or a theatre lover, Masquers welcomes all students and encourages them to act on their interests in the performing arts.

Each year, Masquers produces one major production, giving students full responsibility in all creative areas. This year, the Masquers produce Mula's interpretation of the classic told from Marley's point of view.

Mula said he believes Marley deserves better. Seven years after Marley dies he finds himself in Hell and the only way out is to try and soften Scrooge's heart. Marley is reluctant to do this, but as the story progresses, Marley learns fear and pity and earns redemption for himself as well as Scrooge.

The production is a stretch from the typical portrayal of Scrooge and his encounters with spirits on Christmas Eve. Instead, the production focuses on Marley's visit to his old partner in the attempt to bring Scrooge to a total and complete change of heart. Aided by Bogle, a malicious Jiminy Cricket-type with an agenda all its own, Marley sets out to teach Scrooge the real meaning of Christmas.

Masquers and the University Theatre, says it's exciting to see the theatre department flourish with the number of new students in the show. "Since most of the cast members are freshmen, it's nice to see our seasoned veterans working with fresh talent," he said.

Rachel Burandt, a senior double majoring in theatre and psychology, says she is excited to be a part of the production and honored to be stage manager. "I think the combined effort of all the students working on the show will make the play something that audience members will remember years from now," she said.

Viewers should dress warmly as the observatory dome is unheated. Each telescope will be staffed by a physics department faculty member, student or guest astronomer in order to answer any questions. Viewers can observe many galaxies, star clusters and nebulae, and may request targets of observation.

The decision to cancel the session will be made by 5 p.m. to allow for adequate setup time. Check for daily updates and viewing session information on the UW-RF physics department Web site at www.uwrf.edu/physics/obsviewtime.html.

Marilyn Schuchman, a River Falls community member, will lead a discussion that tells the story of a Julia, a young art expert, who discovers an X-ray inscription hidden in a 15th century painting. Julia becomes involved in the hunt for a Renaissance murderer. As the hunt continues, she meets many 20th century sleuths and suspects in this great game of chess, adventure, love and life.

The club encourages community members, faculty, staff and students to participate in its gatherings during the academic year 2004-05. It meets on the second Wednesday of the month until December and again from February through May. The campus and community members are welcome to attend and do not need to have read the books to sit in on the sessions.

The next discussion is Feb. 8 and will highlight "When the Emperor was Divine" by Julie Otsuka. Valerie Malzacher, UW-RF library director, will lead the group. Featured books are available in the University Bookstore in the Hagestad Student Center, and several copies of each book are also available in the library's collection.

Workshop topics will include economic implications of lameness, management and laminitis, and hoof and leg anatomy. Functional hoof trimming practice, along with lessons on blocking and wrapping will also be included.

Angels invest in technology-based start-up and early-stage companies to provide the additional funding required to help businesses flourish. Examples of business fields invested in include biotechnology, medical, computer hardware and software and telecommunication companies.

Chris Bye, director of the SBDC and the SCV Angel Network, said that angel investment groups primarily invest in fast-growth companies. "These are fairly early-stage companies that are a step or two beyond the 'pure' start-up phase, but are not yet established within the market," he said.

Some of the businesses sought after by investors are high-risk investments that can yield high returns if the business succeeds. While angel networks do fund high-risk equity investments, their focus is on fast-growth companies that are not able to obtain loans from banks or alternative sponsorship.

"Because of a company's relative newness and lack of earnings history, they are not eligible for bank financing, so the only money they have access for growth is through equity partners," said Bye. "That is where the angel groups come into play."

By investing in technology-based businesses, the SCV Angel Network hopes to create more jobs in western Wisconsin. "Technology-based companies generally create high-paying jobs, and that is what every community seeks to attract," says William Rubin, executive director of the St. Croix Economic Development Corp. "Their job creation potential will ultimately help the region's economy."

Equity investments are done on a case-by-case basis. Investment information on candidate companies is only distributed to the network's sponsorsthe angels and/or corporate supportersto ensure confidentiality on all matters involving the network. In addition, the SCV Angel Network provides a limited screening service so that prospective investors can avoid the need to preview a large number of requests.

In its first year, the SCV Angel Network has approached angels, but this is not always necessary. Interested investors, whether an individual or an interested group, often contact the network for additional information.

Student Advisory Board," said CBE Dean Barbara Nemecek. "This board serves in an advisory capacity to the dean on key issues of the college, in addition to representing CBE on campus and at off-campus functions.

The Student Advisory Board provides students with the opportunity to meet with administrators to discuss comments, questions or concerns. CBE's student board meets directly with Nemecek each week. At these meetings students are able to give voice to issues or events occurring within the college and on campus.

This ensemble has been praised by critics and audiences for its variety of vocal performances. Cantus performs art and folk songs in addition to popular songs from Smokey Robinson to Richard Strauss. For more information on the ensemble visit www.cantusonline.org.

Lasar creates art that comments on social issues and humanity but expresses these ideas through abstract forms. Although Lasar uses a variety of printmaking processes, most of her paintings are done in oil.

The seminar offers a view of the importance of accounting information for financial prediction and decision-making. Hukai will discuss the results of financial statement ratio computations from the two companies and how the statements relate to the actual change in stock prices over time.

There are currently 141 active student organizations on campus and nearly all of them have specific service missions that vary from philanthropy, clothing or food drives, cleanups, bake sales, bloodmobiles and dance marathons. Most organizations donate money to children's hospitals, food banks and shelters.

One visible example is the annual sleep-out organized by an organization called Campus and Community Fighting Hunger and Homelessness. This is the fifth year students have slept outside of the Hagestad Student Center in November with hopes of raising some $2,000. All proceeds go to charity organizations geared towards hunger and homelessness. In addition to the annual sleep-out, this organization works year round to raise money, clean up the community, and collect food for food drives.

"I think it's important to volunteer simply because I feel every person, especially when they reach an adult age, has a responsibility as a citizen to help out people in need," said Stephanie McLaughlin, campus chair of Campus and Community Fighting Hunger and Homelessness.

Other students are spending their free time this holiday season wrapping shoe boxes filled with new toys and hygiene and school supplies. This group, Operation Christmas Child, sends the boxes to children all over the world who wouldn't otherwise receive a gift this holiday season.

Last year the Multicultural Student Organization and student Micaela Rodriguez initiated Operation Christmas Child on the campus of UW-RF. They collaborated with other organizations on campus and the local community and sent out more than 400 boxes to children all over the world.

"Operation Christmas Child is important," said Linda Alverez, campus advisor for Operation Christmas Child. "One of our Hmong students, a recent UW-RF graduate, spend part of his childhood in a resettlement camp in Thailand and received one of these boxes. All he remembers is that some people on the other side of the world cared enough to give him a present. It was the first present he ever received."

This year Dance Marathon will be coordinated by a new campus organization called Smiles 4 Kids. The organization has more than 240 members and is currently the largest student organization on campus. Its goal is to raise $15,000.

Recreation Center, dance teams stay on their feet for eight hours to show their support for the cause. In addition, families from Gillette Childrens Hospital give personal testimonials throughout the event, and people involved see the results of their hard work first-hand, said Kalal.

Students and UW-RF campus organizations will continue to work on volunteer programs all year. Many are asking for more community help and campus participation. For example, the American Red Cross Bloodmobile is a frequent campus visitor and every Thursday the campus chapter of Habitat for Humanity meets in the International Room of the Hagestad Student Center to plan future projects.

Ballou. "A better service is the result of service minded and socially minded people. Colleges and universities worth their salt need to motivate students to become active in their campus and community life. It is critical to a better tomorrow."

Some $3,382,027 for almost 50 grants were received for projects from tutoring and service-learning activities to faculty research grants. Sixty-five proposals were submitted by faculty and staff to fund new and existing programs.

UW-RF's goal was to match its most recent three-year average for number of proposals submitted and grant dollars received, according to Bill Campbell, director of grants and research. Although not as many proposals were submitted this year, the amount of grants funded exceeded goals by 37.2%.

"We've had very good success here," said Campbell. "Our success rate has been more than 50% the last 15 years, and that is really a big accomplishment. Grants allow us to do things we couldn't do otherwise."

University administrators are pleased with the sum. "Outside sources of funds are becoming critical to universities as states have steadily reduced their support of higher education," says Interim Chancellor Virgil Nylander. "Grants from both governmental and private sources are used to support faculty and student research, instructional equipment, and numerous activities that enrich the educational experiences of our students. The quality of the education we provide at this university would suffer without the availability of outside funds."

Plate: Creating a Model for Value-Added Agriculture Education." This program empowers students to do value-added agriculture, the processing of raw materials to add further value to a product, which is important in this region, says Campbell.

The United States Health and Human Services renewed a grant of $347,678 for a social work program called Western Wisconsin Partnership, in its sixth year. The purpose of this partnership is to contribute to the quality of services being provided to children and families served by child welfare.

WWP Project Director Jennifer Borup said students benefit from this program because it opens the door to internships and jobs in the counties. "This really fits in with the University's commitment to community partnership," said Borup. "Students benefit from the good will built up with in the counties."

Currently, the University offers several study abroad programs. The Wisconsin in Scotland (WIS) program appeals to students who like a high degree of structure and want to take regular courses based in one location, mainly in the United Kingdom.

On the other hand, students who prefer to work independently can participate in the Semester Abroad Europe (SAE) program that offers opportunities to complete independent research projects. However, students are on their own for much of the semester interviewing people, collecting data and literature, and completing other aspects of significant research. In addition, students are responsible for their own study, lodging and other arrangements.

Brent Greene, director of international programs at UW-RF, says he's especially intrigued with the ITC concept that provides support and assistance, yet will allow students a great deal of flexibility. Greene believes that the ITC will work well and hopes to replicate the program in other parts of the globe.

Chapin says feedback from the 35 students enrolled for spring 2005 has been extremely positive, and 28 students showed up for a recent informational meeting for the spring 2006 group. "It's truly amazing and fantastic that students are willing to plan so far ahead," said Chapin.

Chapin believes that with a little bit of planning all students at UW-RF can find a study abroad experience that will meet their interests and needs. Moreover, it's a program that can be worked into student's schedules so they can graduate on time, a goal shared by all students and staff, he said.

Wisconsin Special Olympics (WSO) is composed of seven areas that manage sports training and competition, volunteers and fundraising at the local level. AmeriCorps assists the Special Olympics program by providing trained individuals, such as Cutsforth, to help nonprofits accomplish more and make more effective use of volunteersWSO is also supported by a Wisconsin Department of Public Instruction grant.

UW-River Falls students will fill office positions of the organization and form committees in order to divide the work among as many people as possible. The committees include outreach, family services, volunteer/recognition, communications, fundraising, record-keeping and athletics.

After the establishment of the SSO is complete and the athletes recruited, training will take place for the required eight to 10 weeks prior to the first River Falls area event. Cutsforth says that the first event could be a track-and-field or swimming event and it will will teach athletes how the program works and will prepare them for the regional event in Eau Claire.

The SSO will recruit athletes ages 8 to 21, says Cutsforth. While the focus will be on school and college-age students, athletes younger than age 8 won't be left out through the establishment of a Kinder-Athletes program.

"We hope that the Kinder-Athletes program will introduce the children to the school system and at the same time help them interact with children of their own age without cognitive disorders," says Cutsforth. A one-day training event in the spring, Kinder-Athletes will resemble the one planned for the older youth, but instead will only introduce simple activities.

River Falls High School students in order to create Special Olympics awareness in the school. SSO members will work closely with River Falls High School students who are required to help out with the program as part of a community service class required for graduation.

"The University is developing a very strong program of undergraduate research, and it has been very exciting to see the wide variety of projects and activities students are engaged in to extend their educational experiences at UW-RF," says Gorden Hedahl, dean of the College of Arts and Sciences.

The funds have contributed to projects from nearly every program and segment of the College of Arts and Sciences and have supported activities ranging from science experiments to arts performances to social science projects and presentations.

Individual grants cover supplies, project expenses, research, travel and conference attendance. The fund also promotes educational opportunities that exist beyond the classroom, which result in empowering experiences for participating students.

According to Hedahl, several students have indicated that they might not have been able to complete their projects without this assistance, and some students have already reported that their research had an impact on their applications for graduate schools and job opportunities.

Music and non-music majors will perform in a percussion ensemble concert directed by UW-RF music faculty member Patti Cudd on Dec. 2 at 8 p.m. in the Abbott Concert Hall. The ensemble will perform many styles of music including compositions written especially for percussion and arrangements, from ragtime to jazz. The concert is free and open to the public; call 715/425-3183 for more information.

The sessions will offer specialized assistance to small business managers as well as to those interested in starting new businesses. Individual appointments, approximately 75 minutes in length, will be scheduled between 8 a.m. and 4 p.m.

Joining Phillips Plastics in 1999, Entezarian was senior ceramic engineer before entering into his current position. Entezarian has achieved several patents and is published in scientific journals. He is also a student in the master of management program at UW-RF and is planning to graduate in December.

The research presentation looks at approximately 350 students enrolled at the University in the fall of 2000 and the possible effect of participation in the seminar course on the student's final grade point average at the time of graduation.

"There are an increased number of school staff members going back to school to get their master's degrees, and this course is a great way to acquire graduate credits and develop valuable skills," said Tom Russo, UW-RF professor of education and clinical psychologist.

Solution-focused counseling is a unique course that pertains to all counseling positions within the school system. It maximizes student strengths and problem-solving strategies and effectively helps individual students conduct small-group and classroom interventions.

Faculty suggest that the rise in crude oil and gasoline prices may lead to a slight rise in the consumer price of all commodities this holiday season as producers try to compensate for higher production costs.

However, according to Schraufnagel, as the holidays approach grocers will continue to reduce the price of turkey as "loss-leader" sales to attract shoppers, since the product serves as a traditional main course for many holiday meals.

The actual price of a poinsettia plant is based on many factors including the size of the plants, the number of plants within a pot, and the type of pot used, Ferris said. The quality of added services and decorations including pot coverings, ribbons, and delivery options affect the cost of poinsettias, as well.

Ferriss. The varieties of color include many shades of red, pink, and white. Modeled, variegated or multicolored varieties have become popular in the past couple years. Variation has also grown in size, as larger specimens are now being sold in the tree form and in hanging baskets.

As the December grows near, there is also the price of the Christmas tree to consider. Professor Mike Kaltenberg, professor in the UW-RF plant and earth science department, believes that the price of Christmas trees this year will be similar to slightly higher than last year.

According to the National Christmas Tree Association, the average price of real trees has increased by nearly a dollar for each of the last three years, says Kaltenberg. This trend, along with the price of gas, may cause a slight increase in Christmas tree prices.

Peppermint Stick, and After-Dinner Mint flavors of ice cream. According to Ranee May, dairy plant manager and faculty associate in the department of animal and food sciences at UW-RF, the prices for the ice cream will remain the same as last year. Falcon Foods sells ice cream for $2.25 per quart and $4 per half-gallon.

More than 40 courses are being offered that meet the general education requirements. Business, art, psychology, marketing communications and physical education courses also are being offered. Offered over four weeks, sessions are held on weekdays from early morning to mid-afternoon.

There also are several study abroad opportunities over January term. Travel destinations this year include Egypt, Ireland, Puerto Rico, Costa Rica, Nicaragua and two locations in Mexico. Most trips are two weeks in duration.

Named as recipients of the Outstanding Service Award are Steve Healy, president and chief executive officer of Pierce Pepin Cooperatives Services, Inc., and James Tiedke, director of retail services strategic marketing for Agriliance Cooperative in St. Paul.

"Both Steve and Jim have been solid supporters of the University in their advice and counsel on our academic programs by serving on advisory boards, and by providing scholarships, internships and employment to our students. They actively seek out ways to bring their expertise and those of others to campus to form partnerships and collaborations that ensure the University remains vibrant and connected to business, industry, agriculture and the larger region so that we can assist it effectively in economic development.

Mann Valley Farm for the senior leadership of the cooperative. He also assisted in organizing a career fair at the farm. Ridley explained that with the wealth of job opportunities in agronomy and the scarcity of prospective students to pursue those occupations, the fair was highly useful in exposing high school and college students to agronomy career choices.

Hatty Rossow, a student from Jackson County Central, placed as the 2004 top individual in the dairy foods judging contest. Jackson County Central then went on to win first place in the team competition for the dairy foods contest area.

Crystal Heath, a senior agricultural education major from Whitehall, Wis., served as the student coordinator. Judges for the contest consisted of a faculty member from each respective department with the exception of Amanda Huppert, a UW-RF student and food science technology major, who served as the dairy foods evaluation judge.

Carlson, the national adviser for students of agronomy, supervised tours while at the meeting. He presided over tours of a local organic operation, the biosolids production facility at the Tacoma wastewater treatment plant, and the Washington State University Puyallup Research and Extension Center.

He has served as admissions director at UW-River Falls since 1986. His responsibilities include supervising student enrollment-related functions and serving on the University Enrollment Management Committee, coordinating both institutional and UW System enrollment objectives. He is also responsible for international student admissions, multicultural outreach and long-range enrollment forecasting.

He is a frequent presenter at professional educational organizations for enrollment planners and high school counselors such as the National Association of College Admissions Counselors and the American Marketing Association.

Helmbach, a junior from Brule, Wis., with a double major in English and speech education, walked away with his second first-place win this year by receiving top honors in drama interpretation. Schott, a senior from Greenleaf, Wis., majoring in pre-vet animal science, took fifth place in informative speaking.

Kathleen Olsen, director of forensics and lecturer in the speech communication and theater arts department, says the most enjoyable aspect of being a part of the UW-RF forensics team is working with the students one-on-one.

Both Olsen and Pratt are no strangers to forensics. They've been coaching and judging tournaments for more than 40 years. Both Olsen and Pratt started competing in high school and continued through college. Pratt was the executive secretary for the Twin Cities Forensics League for 36 years and has been involved with debate and forensics at UW-RF since 1977. Olsen has been coaching the UW-RF team for 8 years.

Ambassadors provide input, assistance, and feedback on projects and special events, such as the University of Wisconsin Day at the State Fair. Because they are informed about system-wide issues that affect their home campuses, they are an important resource for their peers on university campuses.

UW System Vice President for Public Relations Linda Weimer, says student ambassadors serve their peers, "Ultimately, the UW System exists to serve students," Weimer said. "As the university continues to manage budget cuts, improve quality in our classrooms, increase its visibility to the public, and contribute toward growing Wisconsin's economy, the perspectives of our student ambassadors become even more valuable."

Student ambassadors have hosted UW System events since 2000. They also assist the Board of Regents in sharing the importance of higher education with state and elected leaders, provide counsel to the president and system officers, and work with the student member of the Board of Regents and the United Council of UW Students.

St. Croix County. A random sample of 900 of the 2,100 self-employed small businesses in the county have been selected for the study. This includes sole proprietors, incorporated businesses, partnerships, and independent contractors.

Following completion of the study, results will be available to the public in an effort to inform decision-makers seeking to improve economic opportunities in west-central Wisconsin. The results will also contribute to Synergy 2005, an annual conference which brings together businesses, local governments, and universities in western Wisconsin to promote economic growth. Walker's study is also inspired in part by the "Wisconsin Idea" in which Wisconsin universities share their resources to promote community development.

The conference, titled "Confluence: Celebrating Women with Vision," brought more than 125 women from 31 educational institutions to sessions on such topics as media stereotypes, misogynist language, perceptions of women, and gender interactions.

Through affiliation with ACE, WWHEL seeks to increase the number and power of women in Wisconsin higher education by providing professional development opportunities to support women administrators and by eliminating barriers to women's achievement in higher education leadership.

Since 1997, WWHEL's mission has been to identify future women leaders, to provide contacts and support for women moving into leadership positions, to eliminate barriers to womens advancement, and to increase visibility of women leaders. WWHEL welcomes women in any leadership position at public and private colleges and universities as well as those who aspire to leadership positions at any level. It also encourages networking and mentoring. WWHEL is sponsored by various public and private college and universities in Wisconsin.

Hansen, who is the Universitys Distinguished Alumnus, said in his recent appearance, "Ironically we lack the will to do so. We seem to put our faith in weapons to solve problems  that is a tragic characteristic of our global world."

Hanson, an Onalaska, Wis., native, compared the expenditures of a "culture of death" with expenditures needed to eliminate poverty and provide food, education, clean water and health care for all. "Countries spend $1.6 trillion a year on arms, illegal drugs and advertisements," said Hanson. "It would cost just $45 billion a year to bring a lot of life to many."

"It requires an agreement on valuescommon core values," he said. "To fight for security, prosperity and justice is predicated on an acknowledgement of interdependence. It requires political narrative, serious dialog. It requires courage and leadership, not bullying. An understanding of security means offering hope and opportunity to the destitute of this world. The lesson for the 21st century is that the fight for security, prosperity and justice can no longer be won on any one nation's ground."

He outlined other factors driving today's world. People have changed, and they understand more about why their world is as it is. They are also less passive yet they feel they have little effect on economic, political and social factors that affect daily life.

Globalization of economies, technology and communications is a factor, and anti-globalization is growing, especially in Europe and the developing world, he said. Knowledge economies are emerging, and education, technology and communication are the determinants of who participates and who does not.

Hanson also said that there is a resurgence of interest in spiritual things while the belief in inevitable human progress is waning. There is an increase in the power and hostility of fundamentalist religions from Christianity to Islam, and while globalization draws people together, ethnic and religious identity root people locally, he said.

"My God is a God of the living," said Hanson in a special commemorative book on his career published by UW-RF when he received the 2003 Distinguished Alumnus Award. "I know my God and my God knows me. I believe that to be the best gift. It is a realizationfor me as a Christianthat I can have and reflect in my personal life."

Several trends facing contemporary humanity include the gap between the rich and poor, increasing conflicts and internal violence, displaced people, economic power centers, and shifting patterns of governance, continued Hanson.

Environmental limitations persist, and in many cases are getting worse, said Hanson. The food supply is produced through an unsustainable use of water, and falling water tables, shrinking cropland per person and collapsing fisheries threaten the world's need for food. Moreover, the world's most populous countries, China and India, are facing the largest future water deficits.

"It is clear to me that since my time at River Falls this world is ripe with social injustice and needs each and every one of us to participate," said Hanson. "It is worth spending time trying to improve the human condition. There is some contribution that each and every one of us can make. Every human has the gift to care, to be compassionate, and to listen."

His organization had to vacate Iraq in October, and Hanson noted that securityrather than the relief missionis now a main management concerns in all of his years of humanitarian relief. "The struggle is, I think, of what is the role of these coalitions of military institutions as they get into humanitarian roles," said Hanson. "That can be a healthy challenge."

Hanson said he can no longer safety travel in Afghanistan either. He has worked with Afghan refugees in Pakistan since 1998, moving between the two countries during the period of Taliban rule, the Afghan War and the post-war period. World Vision worked with Afghan agencies and Taliban authorities to feed more than 1 million starving people during that period.

"Where you have extremism you have information that gets distorted," he said. "You didn't hear things like more girls were educated [than before] during the Taliban rule. Also during the Taliban the [illegal] drug scene was not operating; now it's going strong. You have two worlds, what you think is going on and then a mafia-like underworld that fuels conflict with drugs, arms and pornography."

Hanson notes that humanitarian agencies challenge the status quo. "Agencies like ours intervene and do something with the positive in the culture and try to get rid of the negative culture. We know what works to empower the peopleto teach a person to fish."

U.S. Agency for International Development and part of World Vision International, a Christian relief and development organization working to promote the well being of all people - especially children. Established in 1950 to care for orphans in Asia, World Vision offered material, emotional, social and spiritual support to 100 million people in 99 countries in 2003. World Vision has grown to embrace the larger issues of community development and advocacy for the poor in its mission to help children and their families build sustainable futures.

I feel powerless most of the time. But it does not stop me.  You just keep hammering away, fighting for what is right, doing good, and through one activity at a time you break down the resistance," he said to May 2004 graduating class at UW-River Falls. "There is no point to pessimism. I really believe that you have to fight the good fight."

George Aiken's play explores the concept of difference. Aiken says, "If one morning everyone woke up, and there was only one race, one creed, one color ... someone would find a reason to discriminate by noon."

Alzheimer's disease affects 12 million people worldwide and four million in the United States. Biology Professor E. Katherine Miller will discuss the biology and pathology of the disease in accessible terms and provide current information about the disease and treatment options. Information on support groups and caregivers also will be provided. Miller has been researching neurodegenerative diseases since 1984.

Associated Professor David Milne, native of Rochester, NY, directs students enrolled in the woodwind ensemble course. Students perform on a variety of instruments including clarinet, oboe, flute, bassoon and saxophone.

Milne earned a bachelor's in music and communications at Indiana University in woodwind performance and jazz studies and a master's at the Eastman School of Music in performance, literature and saxophone.

Through an art exhibition, performances, and discussionsthe forum will address questions such as what creates community, does where we live matter, how to foster the spirit of connection among neighbors, and how lifestyle choices fit within the region's rural roots and urban future.

Council, with funds from the National Endowment for the Humanities. Any views, findings, conclusions or recommendations expressed in this project do not necessarily represent those of the NEH. Assistance for the exhibition was provided by the Wisconsin Arts Board.

Majoring in fine arts, Starrett incorporates photography, clay, painting, mixed media installation and living sculpture to create a diverse mix of artwork to reflect art's role in everyday, public life.

Based on Starrett's semester abroad experience in Europe, current events and the Art in Public Places Program initiated by the National Endowment for the Arts, his work presents art as a public form of expression. Starrett also draws from artists he credits as visual and philosophical influences, such as Robert Irwin, Robert Frank, Doze Green and Barry McGee.

SURSCA was founded by a group of students who attended the National Conference on Undergraduate Research held in Whitewater, Wis., in spring 2002. Students found that presenting their research and scholarly and creative activities at a large prestigious national conference was exhilarating and wanted to offer similar opportunities to current and future UW-RF students.

Students involved in SURSCA activities work together to raise awareness on the critical aspect of applying new knowledge in the pursuit of scholarship and allowing the creative process to help students reach their dreams.

Food and Environmental Sciences and the UW-RF dairy plant manager, explained the living arrangements. "Their house is a two-story house and they live on the top floor," she said. "The bottom floor is the stable or barn where they keep all their animals."

The Tibetans' animals, especially the domestic yak--a cross between the native cow "peinu" and the wild yak--is of great importance to the lifestyle and culture of this region. The yak provides the Tibetans with transportation, hair for weaving, power for fieldwork, yogurt, and milk.

May and the students hoped to teach the Tibetans to extract yet another use from the domestic yak. The production of cheese from yak milk would provide the Tibetans not only with another food source, but it could also fill a niche market and be sold to five-star hotels and restaurants throughout China. The added source of income would be useful to the primitive Tibetans who attempt to survive merely off of the food they produce themselves.

During his visit, he had the opportunity to taste the cheese produced at the campus dairy plant and was very impressed. According to May, about six months later he wrote and asked if she would be interested in developing a training program in China.

Center near Shangri-La where the dairy plant was to be set up. The hope is for the dairy plant to operate as a cooperative where all local residents are invited to bring their yak milk for further processing.

Bollman explained that the goal was for the equipment within the dairy plant to be items "that were cost effective for the nomads" so that they could be easily replicated or replaced. Therefore, no special equipment was ordered, instead the group scattered throughout the town purchasing everyday household supplies.

May. "We drew a picture of it, and they made it. We didnt even give them dimensions other than a basic shape with our hands. And they were great. Within couple of hours they had made exactly what we had asked of them."

A double broiler was set up, where the milk would be placed into a small pot that is placed inside of a larger pot already filled with water. A propane burner was then used as a heat source for the cheese vat. With the dairy plant completed, May and the three UW-RF students began making changes to the recipe they had brought with them.

He explained that the yaks had very long hair and that the milking techniques used by the Tibetans were less than desirable. Contaminants had influenced the flavor and other characteristics of the cheese. So for the rest of the batches the cheesemakers strained the milk to remove the hairs and miscellaneous particles.

Storing the cheese was also a problem. Beeswax was purchased from a local beekeeper. It was melted down, and the blocks of cheese were hand-dipped into it. This procedure is working temporarily, although new means of packaging are sought because dried beeswax becomes too hard.

While the Americans worked to perfect production of what Henn called "a type of frying cheese," five Tibetans watched the process. In the end two Tibetan women were selected to head the cheese-making process and the Americans watched on as the Tibetans successfully made their very own batch of cheese from yak milk.

"This is only the first step to many hurdles they have to cross," explained How Man, referring to the lack of hygiene techniques used during the milking process. A higher quality milk needs to come from the farms before health regulations can be met, and the product can be marketed.

The trip across the world was a success in all aspects, says May. Within three weeks the UW-RF group had completely transformed an empty building into a dairy plant, taught Tibetans to produce cheese, learned some Chinese language, and gained a mutual cultural respect for a people they otherwise may never have had the opportunity to meet.

"Politicians finally started paying attention to the 18- to 24-year-old age group that usually doesnt have a lot of influence and usually isnt mobilized to have any kind of impact on elections," said NVP committee member Miriam Huffman, who is the UW-RF student involvement coordinator.

The purpose of the non-partisan NVP project was to encourage college students to register and to vote. With a committee of a dozen students who were deputized in River Falls to register voters, the NVP committee employed a variety of tactics to register students. Registration tables were set up in residence halls, the Hagestad Student Center, and Rodli Commons for several weeks. NVP members also visited classes to speak about voting and registration.

A "Voter Palooza" celebration also was held with live bands and entertainment. Pre-election rallies also took place to get students excited about the election. New Voter Project committee members spent many hours calling the voters they registered to remind them to cast their vote.

Discussions also were held on the electoral process, including a faculty panel discussion on Wisconsin as a target state and a lecture by Thomas Patterson, author of the critically acclaimed book, "The Vanishing Voter."

Lydecker placed the NVP very high on her priority list, signing up the campus last February in the nonpartisan national project that targeted young people in six swing states. She was especially interested in getting students actively involved in the election process.

Kinders is interested to see if students will become engaged in the legislative and congressional sessions coming up in January. "The election turnout was marvelous and the New Voters Project did a remarkable job. Now its going to be up to the students to continue to be participants in the public policy dialogue," said Kinders.

Three teams consisting of four members each competed in the adult division of the beef cattle judging contest. Members judged six classes of beef cattle including breeding heifers, market steers, and prospect calves.

"I was honored to be selected and to be involved in this advanced course," said Rogers. "I had the wonderful opportunity of being a student with 45 other students from 41 nations in Western and Eastern Europe and North America. I came away from the experience with a renewed appreciation for the Geneva Conventions."

Red Cross," he says. As a child he was a blood services volunteer and eventually became a first-aid instructor, a lifeguard and a blood donor. His early experiences helped establish his worldview to help individuals and larger concerns, serving the Pierce County Chapter of the American Red Cross at the local level in international services.

Conventions was initially influenced by his students. "Some years ago I took some of my college students to the Twin Cities to take a weekend course on the Geneva Conventionsand then held a focus group afterward," recalls Rogers. "I was amazed at how angry they were.

"At first, I thought Id made a terrible blunder and wasted a precious weekend for them. Exploring the anger, I was surprised to find its source in, well, as one student put it: I cant believe I got all the way to my sophomore year in college and Im just hearing about this very important law. This is about justice, fairness, simple humanity, the students said. They were angry they had not covered this material in high school. They were not alone, many Americans are largely ignorant of the basic rules of the Geneva Conventions."

It is important to understand the Geneva Conventions, Rogers says. "In a world where armed conflict doesn't appear to be going away, we need to find ways of trying to protect the most vulnerable in any way we can and people need to have an understanding and appreciation for the Geneva Conventions."

Rogers notes that today's younger generations may not understand the conventions because they have lived in a period of relative peace. "I think that previous generations of Americans, specifically the generation that lived through World War II and Korea, actually had a greater understanding of the Geneva Conventions, because they have lived through major armed conflict and have seen some of the results of the conventions."

The SOS class has wisdom to share, says Rogers, and are different from the traditional classroom of younger students. "The students in that program are some of the brightest and most challenging minds one ever meets."

In today's conditions, most notably the war in Iraq, the reality of armed conflict becomes highly apparent and the need to understand the Geneva Conventions is very important. It is in these situations that the Geneva Conventions can be applied and show that "even in the face of war, even in the chaos of war, humans are capable of acting with basic humanity."

A 22-hour Exploring Humanitarian Law (EHL) curriculum introduces students of all ages to the rationales and reasoning for providing basic human rights to combatants, civilians and prisoners of war. Under development for the last 10 years in Geneva, EHL has been a worldwide effort to disseminate information about the Geneva Conventions and humanitarian law.

Rogers has assisted with the adoption and coordination of the curriculum to meet the educational standards in American school systems. EHL's application in the United States is currently in its second trial year and has been a success. Between 10,000-15,000 students in the United States are participating in the program.

Wis., high school teacher Mark Stoesz says, "The issues involved in the international humanitarian law are often overlooked by American educational institutions. I was excited about the opportunity to contribute to finding ways by which the Geneva Conventions can be introduced to American teachers and students."

Through the introduction of the Exploring Humanitarian Law curriculum in the United States and his work as senior volunteer advisor, Rogers hopes "to reach out in those places where individuals and society have needs of each other."

Rogers reaches out by sharing his experience an expertise with others, from area high schools and area seniors to across the globe. As the class adjourns for the day, Rogers asks his audience to "leave those chestnuts to rattle around in your brains." When that happens, then he has accomplished his goal.

Coordinated by the University of Wisconsin-Stevens Point Extension Office, the courses are sponsored by EconomicsWisconsin and offered for graduate credit through all University of Wisconsin institutions.

Offered online, these classes are developed and taught by UW faculty involved in EconomicsWisconsin, who are associated with the Centers for Economic Education at the University of Wisconsin campuses.

Teachers can qualify for partial tuition reimbursement if employed by a Wisconsin school. Upon successful completion of the course, teachers can receive a reimbursement of $100 per credit toward a maximum of $300.

Company, make tuition reimbursement possible. Since 1963, EconomicsWisconsin has been helping elementary and secondary education teachers to gain competence and confidence teaching about the free-market economy.

He noted that Dahlka came to the campus as the first in his family to attend a four-year college, like 60 percent of the Universitys current students. While pursuing his academic career, UW-RFs benefactor also joined the campus choir and toured Europe to perform, where he also enjoyed discovering and experiencing theatre and art.

"The garden is a living memorial to Dennis, conceptualized by Dennis sister, Diane Hoag," Nylander said. "Dennis loved growing things; the gardens are a wonderful reflection of his love of nature, beauty and art. The garden is already a place where students, faculty, staff and visitors sit, relax, reflect and soak up the colors, scents and sounds of this special place. And I know this will be true for future generations of the campus community."

Dozens of family members and friends of Dahlka attended the dedication ceremony. Some 12 former UW-RF friends he made during his college days while residing in McMillan Hall also were on hand to lay red roses, one of Dahlkas favorite flowers, at the gardens cornerstone.

Bill Rost, assistant chancellor for University advancement and UW-RF Foundation president, spoke on behalf of the family. Denniss parents, Gilbert and Joan Dahlka of Bloomer were among family members, friends, faculty and students at the ceremony.

She noted that Denniss family was struck by the Universitys long-standing wish to build a reflection garden on the campus. "Our family felt it was important to share Dennis love of nature by establishing a memorial garden on campus. It is our familys desire that the Dahlka garden become a quiet place for others to relax, tread, contemplate, to appreciate the gifts that nature bestows on us."

Hoag, of Osceola, added that the garden, as did her brothers bequest for the endowed scholarships, made sense because he found his years at UW-RF so meaningful. She pointed out that he was the first in his family to graduate from college.

She described her brother as possessing "a kind and gentle heart" who explored much more than his academic pursuits. Hoag shared with pride some of the remembrances his friends wrote in a memorial book to her brother that demonstrated "he had an obviously profound effect on his friends."

The garden, which adjoins the south side of Kleinpell, features walking paths, numerous limestone slabs that each weigh more than two tons, and six benches in small patios shaded by Imperial Honey Locust trees.

"The Dahlka Gardens are a tribute to his passion. This garden will change. It will mature. It will blossom. It will be cultivated and develop into something more than what it started as. This process also reflects the relationship Dennis had with his University. A student, like the garden, has the opportunity to develop here, just as Dennis did. His garden does not represent the limitations placed by its boundaries--instead it represents the diversity of growth, the blossoming of intellect and the cultivation of opportunity."

But such writings are the product of extensive research conducted on the human heart by computer science Assistant Professor Anthony Varghese in the College of Business and Economics at UW-River Falls.

For a decade Varghese has been on the cutting edge of human physiology research that has resulted in a dozen scholarly treatises published in some of the leading human physiology journals in the world. They are the outcome of research conducted with colleagues while Varghese was at such institutions as Oxford University, The Johns Hopkins University, and the University of Minnesota. He has worked with U.S. Army super-computers and in the research laboratories of the Veterans Administration.

He has applied his bench research directly while consulting with such companies as Medtronics to improve its defibrilators; with Physiome Science (now Predix Pharmaceuticals), which used computer models to support clinical trials of a proposed drug on humans and subsequently convinced the FDA to approve a new drug; and for Endocardial Solutions, Inc., where he improved the design of software used in an operating room computer that enables cardiologists to effectively map the inside of a beating human heart.

These experiences have been brought back into the classroom at UW-River Falls where Varghese shares his particular expertise with his students: setting up programs on computers to enable them to resolve complex problems, regardless of the problem's content.

In Varghese's case, the subject has been human physiology. The programs he's designed have allowed him to assist medical scientists in two distinct areas: understanding the fundamentals of how human heartbeat is regulated; and modeling the interaction of drug therapies before they are launched in laboratories and then introduced to humans in clinical field trials.

His interest was first piqued as an undergraduate student at UW-Platteville, where he explored basic circuit theory on an IBM mainframe computer. "I really liked it. It solidified all that I knew about electrical circuits."

He went to the University of Minnesota where he was given access to U.S. Army super computers. His task was to assist in coming up with the methodology of program design techniques that would enable a super computer to work on large tasks that could not be stored on a desktop computer.

Collaborating with a faculty member, he used the super computer to simulate a human's most critical electrical circuit: the heart. His specific research studied the flow of ions through the heart's pacemaker cells that regulate its beat. Although few in numberall of them combined in a typical heart would be the size of a fingernailthey are crucial to humans.

If scientists, pharmaceutical companies and physicians understand how those cells work, then they can comprehend irregularities in heart beat that lead to sudden death, Varghese explains. "If you could understand some of the basic mechanisms then you could try to figure out the therapies. So I was interested in how drugs affect the proteins of the heart," Varghese said.

Varghese says his doctoral research contributed to the existing knowledge, but that much research needs to be continued. His expertise in designing computer programs to model human physiology led him into a new area of research he's pursued since leaving Minnesota: Human Ether-a-go-go, or HERG.

While the name may sound whimsical, the application is anything but. Varghese explains that HERG was isolated at UW-Madison and the University of Utah almost simultaneously. The research discovered that introducing mutant fruit flies to ether would affect a specific protein ion and make them shaky.

In recent years Varghese has collaborated with colleagues throughout the world to study HERG and admits that the research has become very esoteric. In addition to his computer modeling, he also has spent time directly studying human cells under a microscope while subjecting them to electrical pulses at the VA Research Hospital in Minneapolis. He continues his HERG research in the summer.

Currently he spends most of his time working on bioinformatics computer programs to design scientific experiment protocols that are used by researchers as a model to guide their actual laboratory experiments.

He notes the use of computers are essential since the laboratory experiments typically involve a tiny strand of DNA. Varghese employs computers to search the entire human genome of millions of DNA sequences to ensure the experiment won't have unintended consequences on some other part of human physiology.

Varghese says, and it is becoming more prevalent throughout industry. He notes that by networking their computers, companies will often borrow computing time at night from stations across all sectors of their business and devote them to solving complex problems.

Varghese hopes that as the University gains back some of its faculty and laboratory support money cut during recent years that he will be able to pursue more cluster activities. He says the exercise will prove beneficial to students in their value as employees to business and industry, as well as providing computing capacity to other faculty across the University who might want to model the problems they are researching.

Media, History and Confusion," examined how history and legend paradoxically enrich life and society in Ireland while thwarting potential for progress. "Crazily tangled" is a phrase Hewitt used to describe Ireland's artistic and mythological legacy.

Olson attended a two-day poetry workshop conducted by Anne-Marie Fyfe, a poet from Northern Ireland presently living in England, who recently was awarded an important poetry prize along with 10,000 pounds. Additionally, Olson also spent three days researching "The Troubles" in Northern Ireland.

"This was a wonderful opportunity for me to learn more about the culture, history, politics, and literature of Northern Ireland, to spend time with friends in Northern Ireland and the chance to make some new friends," said Olson.

They watched intently as bulls and broncs tried to buck off riders, steers were wrestled to the ground, and riders urged their horses through the barrel-racing pattern at the 40th Annual Falcon Frontier Days Rodeo.

Whyte, the club vice president and rodeo coordinator said the rodeo went really well due to the hard work of the rodeo club members. The 40 club members pulled together to organize the event resulting in one of the best rodeos yet.

Students and faculty will create outdoor works designed to highlight a specific site on campus. Large and small, whimsical and serious, each artwork is designed to be temporary and removed without a trace after public viewing. The displayed art may be a path of brightly colored flags, a patchwork area of natural materials or a political statement.

College of Art and Design, is an internationally recognized sculptor who has focused his work on art in public spaces. He is concerned with the social relevance of contemporary art and its function in public spaces. Akagawa will present a lecture on 10 a.m. Oct. 8 in Abbott Concert Hall, Kleinpell Fine Arts Building, and host a walkabout with students and guests on at 1 p.m. The public is welcome at both events.

Students will be constructing installations on Oct. 4 -5. The finished works can be viewed from Oct. 6-8. All who view the works are asked to act with respect toward the artist and not to damage or alter his or her installations.

His book analyzes why Americans are voting at historically low rates and why audiences for televised presidential debates have declined by half. Patterson will discuss how the declining participation in elections is related to the lack of leadership. For more information on Patterson's book visit www.vanishingvoter.org.

A Little League coach had him "pinch" run every game, and his mother, who asked him to load the dishwasher, didn't complain when he broke half of the dishes in his first attempt. His high school music teacher worked with the shop teacher to build a special chair so he could play trombone with his feet.

He is also a senior science advisor of IFT's FDA contract on food safety, food processing and human health and is a member of the science council of the International Union of Food Science & Technology and the Food and Drug Administration's Food Advisory Council. He is chair of the contaminants and natural toxicants subcommittee of the FDA's Food Advisory Committee.

The Center for Food Protection and Defense is university-based research center supported by the U.S. Department of Homeland Securitybringing together national academic, industry, and public sector partners to develop ways of enhancing our nation's capability to protect the food supply from intentional contamination.

For additional information on the symposium, email to foodmicro@uwrf.edu or visit the Web site at http://www.uwrf.edu/food-science, click on the links to workshops and then Food Microbiology Symposium, or contact Cegielski.

In celebration of Homecoming week at UW-RF, CBE will host alumni from each of the college's eight undergraduate majors who hail from companies and organizations in the Twin Cities and western Wisconsin. Alumni guests will visit classes and college events to discuss careers and career opportunities with students.

The remains of decomposing structures along remote Wisconsin byways are brought back to life in an altered photo exhibition at the UW-River Falls. "Eulogy for the Barn" by UW-Eau Claire emeriti Professor Karen Grow Horan is Oct.

Claire, will exhibit a series of color photographs of farmsteads in various stages of decay. The photographs are enhanced with colored pencils, focusing on texture and pattern with an emphasis on shape--a focus that may have carried over from the 12 years she spent as a potter.

Throughout her teaching career, Horan made conscious efforts to incorporate barns within her curriculum at UW-Eau Claire. In a class for future elementary education teachers, Horan initiated a unit about the historic preservation of Wisconsin architecture. Horan asked students to bring a personal barn or farm story to class. These stories were then shared with classmates and included in a barn journal created by each student. In addition, the students learned about the unique features of barn architecture and integrated the barn as a viable topic within other elementary school curricular areas.

"Through my photography and teaching, I aspire to bring attention to the anonymous architecture of the barns that fill the Wisconsin landscape," says Horan. "All of my barns are in the process of decay and ruin. Inherent within the structures are not only family history but farming history as well."

County. Although she lived in town, Horan spent most of her childhood on the farms of her grandparents and friends. Horan believes those informative years made an important imprint on her, both personally and professionally. Horan says this was the beginning of her life-long passion for Wisconsin barns.

Along with Horan's photographs about the unique contribution of Wisconsin barns as a historical icon and a subject of importance for the school curriculum, small selections of student journals and stories will be on display at the exhibit.

Board, Horan will be on the UW-RF campus Oct. 19, 26, 28 and Nov. 4 to work with elementary education and art education majors who are developing curriculum on barns as part of rural visual culture. Horan will share her interest and passion as an artist and involve students in a model lesson they can use in their own classrooms.

"I think architecture for a topic of study in the school curriculum is very important, particularly the architecture of the barn because it's a part of our visual culture," she says. "Barns tell stories that are worth saving."

Roger Ballou. The book follows a man in search of the truth who answers an ad in a local newspaper from a teacher looking for serious students. He ultimately ends up alone in an abandoned office with a gorilla named Ishmael.

The day begins at 10 a.m. with a coffee hour in Rodli Commons, giving students and their invited guests the opportunity to meet campus administrators. A deli-style lunch will follow at noon at the east end mall of Rodli Commons. Roger Ballou, dean for student development and campus diversity, will present an academic showcase beginning at 1 p.m.

This event features Werner Kiene, a noted expert on international food policy and activities. The Austrian native, who is the World Food Programs representative to the World Bank and International Monetary Fund, contends that the "politics of hunger" could be called the "politics of neglect." Ray Suarez, a senior correspondent for PBS's "The NewsHour with Jim Lehrer," is scheduled to host the program.

The 2004 teleconference, which will reach 1,000 sites worldwide, will be aired internationally with simultaneous translations in Spanish and French. The teleconference originates from the television studios of the U.S. Department of Agriculture.

Derfler, an instructor in art history, will journey through maps, plans and imagery of several excavations in the ancient land of Israel. Derfler has researched ancient civilizations for more than 25 years. He also teaches at the University of St. Thomas and leads study tours to several countries, including Israel and Egypt.

University Theatre is taking a rollicking, open-hearted approach to this piece by Shakespeare. The classic is reworked to be decidedly "unstuffy," says Swanson, in order to make it accessible to young audience members and enjoyable to all.

Viola disguises herself as a boy, becomes a page of Duke Orsinio and falls in love with him. The Duke is hopelessly in love with Olivia, but she is in the process of mourning her brother's death and becomes infatuated with Viola as she/he delivers messages for the Duke. When Sebastian shows up, Olivia confuses him with the Duke's page (Viola) and marries the astonished young man. In the midst of all of this romantic confusion, servants and family members provide comic relief with their pompous, pretentious and sometimes intoxicated behavior.

"The University Theatre staff believes it is important to do the works of Shakespeare on a regular basis, both to give the actors a chance to chew on the meaty material and to give the River Falls audience a chance to see a Shakespeare performance they will enjoy," said Swanson.

The opening University Theatre production will host the eighth annual alumni event for theatre and speech majors. On Oct. 22, alums will return to campus to watch the play, enjoy some food and share in various activities that will generate money for student scholarships.

Iris O'Brien, UW-RF theatre major, vice chair of the University Theatre board and stage manager for "Twelfth Night," says she is the "wheels" behind the show. As stage manager, O'Brien becomes the tie between director, actor and designer and makes sure the whole machine works.

Swanson says the play is a comedy that covers the territory between love and lust and back again. Moreover, she says, it demonstrates that people haven't changed much in 400 years. What was funny thenmistaken identity, human arrogance and unrequited loveis still funny today.

While the focus of the Center for Economic Research is on encouraging faculty to engage in scholarly research, it also encourages the presentation of interdisciplinary research to enrich the knowledge of the greater community.

Since its inception, the Center has actively engaged and participated in economic development issues in the St. Croix Valley, says director Hamid Tabesh. Acting as a liaison for the college to the region, the center helps to identify the expertise faculty can offer to the business community.

According to Admissions Director Alan Tuchenhagen, new freshmen hail from more than 400 high schools. Although this is a large number, the age statistics of freshmen shows 44 percent of new students are older than age 18.

Oct. 30 at the 77th National FFA Convention in Louisville, Ky., to receive its highest degree. About one half of one percent of the total national membership of the organization attain this high honor.

The American FFA Degree can only be earned by FFA members who have demonstrated outstanding leadership skills, participated in community service programs, and have in place a supervised agricultural experience which includes ownership of or work experience in an agricultural business. They also must have formerly received their chapter degrees and state degrees.

Jeffrey McNeely, a sophomore majoring in dairy science from Brooklyn, Wis., credits the degree to his high school FFA advisor, Mike Wagner. "My advisor kind of pushed me along toward it because he regrets that he did not receive it," said McNeely.

Serving as the Wisconsin FFA president is a dream job for Schmidt, and working directly with FFA members at various leadership workshops is her favorite part of the job. "The members are enthusiastic," says Schmidt. "They want to be there and they want to participate."

Agriculture is nothing new to Schmidt, as the dairy farm that she and her family live on has been in the family since 1879. Yet it wasn't until her first foray into FFA and then her junior year in high school when a few encouraging words from a visiting farm representative changed her perspective.

At UW-River Falls, Schmidt is majoring in agricultural business with a minor in animal science. She is balancing her busy life of college freshman and state FFA president by taking credits this year through online courses, honors programs, and internships. She hopes to one day hold a managerial position in an agribusiness and to possibly own a small calf-raising operation.

Schmidt's pride and excitement in agriculture and the national FFA organization is evident in her travels representing the organization. And true to her family's FFA legacy, she has shared this excitement with many individuals while serving in leadership positions in FFA, including her younger siblings. Her younger sister serves as a Gresham Chapter FFA Chapter vice president and just recently her younger brother, a 5th grader at Gresham Community School, told her that he would like to someday become a state FFA officer, too.

UW-RF Student Health Services distributed the survey to all UW-RF faculty and staff in fall 2003. It covered perceptions of drug and alcohol problems on campus, knowledge of the universitys drug and alcohol policy, and the facultys perceived ability to refer students who need help with a drug and alcohol problem.

The focus groups suggested that the university should strive to communicate alcohol and other drug policies more clearly and frequently. They also discussed the importance of making the referral process known to the faculty, Syverson said. The UW-RF Alcohol and Other Drug policy is available at http://www.uwrf.edu/policies.

Three UW-RF professional counselors are available for students and faculty at no cost. Students also can get free alcohol and other drug assessments in the community through Kinnic Falls Alcohol-Drug Abuse Services.

Sarah Powers, UW-RF senior and co-founder of Books for Kids, says, " I think the campaign will be beneficial, and I'm really looking forward to seeing the results. Im excited to participate in the experience and help out the children."

Molly Exner, UW-RF senior and co-founder of Books for Kids, says, "Without reading and education in my life, I wouldve never been motivated to go to college. I believe giving children the gift to read and to image the impossible is the key to accomplishing their dreams."

There are plenty of outlets willing to accept the childrens books and plenty of children ready to explore the magical world of reading. Donate a book at one of the local drop boxes and help spread the gift of reading to children during this holiday season.

Society is affected by instant communication, urbanization, ease of mobility, and rapid technological change. While these changes can connector disconnectus, people yearn for a sense of belonging and interdependence.

This issue is especially relevant for the bi-state region of the St. Croix Valley, as identified in past community forums sponsored by the University of Wisconsin-River Falls, as the area transforms from a once primarily rural area to a suburban area.

The book profiles groups from an evangelical church in southern California with more than 45,000 members to a middle school in Wisconsin where students carry out local improvement projects. Common to all these situations, Feldstein says, is that they all involve making connections among people and establishing bonds of trust and understanding. The intrinsic benefit is that people in these networks can reach goals that would have been far beyond their grasp as individuals.

At the same time, these people enjoy the satisfaction and sense of being part of a community. Social capital can range from a coffee klatch, bridge club, softball team or a support group to a civic group, professional association, trade union or a political organization and beyond. Social capital is a powerful tool, says Feldstein, but whether or not it is put to good use or ill will is another issue.

Graduate School. He is a graduate of Brown University and holds a masters degree in law and diplomacy from Tufts University. Among his singular achievements were a seven-year tenure as the MC of the International Zucchini Festival and a stint as a wine steward/personal assistant to John Wayne on his yacht in the Mediterranean.

The forum is preceded by the exhibit opening, reception and open microphone event featuring St. Croix Valley artists and performers from 5 to 7 p.m. The exhibition of visual artists' interpretations of place runs through Dec. 12 in the Phipps' galleries.

It is funded by in part by a grant from the Wisconsin Humanities Council, with funds from the National Endowment for the Humanities. Any views, findings, conclusions or recommendations expressed in this project do not necessarily represent those of the NEH. Assistance for the exhibition was provided by the Wisconsin Arts Board.

The Hunt Arena and Knowles Center offers a variety of activities and opportunities for students, faculty, staff and community members. The Hunt Arena is home to UW-RF Falcon hockey and the Knowles Center is the summer home to the Kansas City Chiefs.

Halada said, "The Chiefs had very specific needs that they were requesting for contract renewal. At that time, a dozen other institutions courted them very seriously. We were able to move the project along because of the economic impact their presence makes on this area."

Building when it was initially constructed in 1987, but were never funded. The current improvements were included as part of a major health and human performance facilities construction and renovation proposal that were likely not to have been completed until 2010 if Gov. Jim Doyle and the State Legislature had not expedited the renovations funding.

The expansion also includes installing air conditioning for the Knowles building as well as for the new addition. This is a long-needed improvement for large events such as graduation ceremonies, said Halada.

According to Halada, air conditioning was a requirement of the Chiefs training camp, due to recent emphasis that the NFL has placed on player safety following the death of Vikings offensive lineman Corey Stringer from heat exhaustion.

St. Croix County small businesses who are selected to be part of a study of self-employment by University of Wisconsin-River Falls economics Professor John Walker have a chance to win tickets to the Minnesota Vikings-Green Bay Packer football game in Minneapolis on Christmas Eve.

County. A random sample of 900 of the 2,100 self-employed small businesses in the county have been selected for the study. This includes sole proprietors, incorporated businesses, partnerships, and independent contractors.

Questionnaires, which will take about 15 minutes to complete, will be sent to the selected businesses within the next few weeks. All information submitted to the study is completely confidential. A self-addressed, stamped envelope will be provided.

Gov. Jim Doyle formally proclaimed Campus Safety Awareness Week for the first time in 1994. Since then, the United Council of UW Students has advised leaders on ideas and events for the week and is sponsoring this initiative.

"It is important for both new and returning students to become aware of all aspects of campus safety issues," said Rachel Pilliod, United Council Womens Issues Director. "With the excitement of the beginning of school, often students are not aware or thinking of the dangers on campus, whether it is theft, date rape, assault or student privacy."

The software will be used in such classes as geophysics, structural geology, senior research experience and sedimentation and stratigraphy, according to Ian Williams, professor of plant and earth science at UW-RF.

"This software is a three-dimensional imaging package that is used in the oil industry," says Williams. "Our geology students will learn sophisticated analysis techniques and get experience using an industry standard, that helps us find subsurface resources such as oil traps. We plan to get our students involved using the software as part of research projects and upper division classes. We also hope to illustrate seismic surveying using the software in our introductory classes too."

Robert Baker, chair of the UW-RF plant and earth science department, says, "It is critical that students gain exposure to such cutting-edge technology whether they look for jobs after graduation or go on to graduate school. Last April we had a visiting petroleum geologist in our classes and she recommended that we apply to the grant program because she was so impressed with our students and the quality of instruction as compared to the students and schools she normally visits.

Beginning in 2001, the company has donated almost 6,000 software licenses for university teaching/research labs and professor/instructor use in classes along with three-year grants that include maintenance support and updates. The estimated value of gifts through SMT's program since its inception totals $80 million.

Public Schools, the workshop was geared to "train the trainers." The workshop used strategies from Heacox's book, which explains practical ways to help students learn in diverse environments. Teachers learned new ways to handle diversity in the classroom and new ideas to take back to their school districts, where they will share with other teachers, said Sambs. School principals attended an earlier conference on the same subject, said Sambs.

Organized by the University of Wisconsin-River Falls, the conference brought together approximately 160 attendees from various organizations throughout the western Wisconsin to the Phipps Center for the Arts in Hudson.

Nylander introduced Steve Gunderson, the conference moderator and keynote speaker on workforce issues. Lorna Michael Butler, a professor in the departments of anthropology and sociology at Iowa State University, was the keynote speaker addressing the issue of quality of life and rural-urban transitions.

To culminate the first days activities, participants were treated to the "Tastes of the Valleys" event, where participants sampled regional refreshments provided by 17 area agriculture producers, restaurants, and hospitality providers from the Chippewa and St. Croix valleys.

On the second day of the conference, work group sessions identified action plans in each of the four areas that the conference addressed. The health care workgroup identified several initiatives including establishing a dialogue between businesses, health plan administrators and health care providers; creating a survey to learn more about consumer behavior, and providing assistance, including awareness campaigns, for current public health initiatives in the region.

Action plans for quality of life issues identified included identifying model communities that are proactively addressing such issues and challenges as well as those communities who are struggling with concerns about quality issues.

In addition, the group plans a session on comprehensive and smart-growth planning for next year's Synergy conference. A long-term goal includes identifying resources and best practices for communities to address specific quality of life needs.

Finally, the workgroup session for workforce issues identified potential solutions for long-term labor shortages, marketing of services to diverse populations, and fragmentation of services and partners. Cooperative partnerships such as a Center for Workforce Diversity and creation of a regional identity to attract job seekers were outlined.

The artwork is a painted wall relief that was created collaboratively by students in child art methods classes taught during the spring semester of 2004 by Lynn Jermal, professor and director of art education.

At the time of the chancellors tragic death in March 2004, Jermal and her students were shocked and consequently compelled to express what her loss had meant to them and what it meant to the University. As a response, Jermals class created artwork that expressed their grief and individually helped them learn about color theory and painting. The students who created the artwork are primarily art education or elementary education students.

"Most of the students who created the art pieces do not have extensive art background. Yet collaboratively, theyve created a dynamic work of art to contribute to the aesthetic environment in South Hall, as well as the memory of the chancellor," said Jermal.

After discussing the chancellors contributions to campus community and her ability to nurture numerous university life endeavors, a garden theme was chosen as an appropriate metaphor for the growth Jermal and her students experienced during the chancellors tenure at UW-RF.

Each student designed a painted "stick" which used different color tints and shades as a backdrop to natural plant forms painted in a pattern or motif. As testament to the chancellors positive and encouraging spirit, the artwork is colorful, eye-catching and lively.

So far Smiles 4 Kids has 243 members who are dedicated to volunteering and raising money for childrens hospitals. There is a lot of enthusiasm and an overwhelming amount of participation, Kalal said.

Members of Smiles 4 Kids are working hard to ensure this year's dance marathon is a success, says Kalal. In addition to raising money and awareness, they hope to increase the amount of community participation for this annual event.

Dance Marathon is open to anyone who wishes to participate. Prior to the event, participants must form groups of 10 and together raise a minimum of $150. They can either donate this money out of their own pockets or find a sponsor for the event. The registration deadline is Nov. 1, and cost is $10 per person.

Participants will have the opportunities to make several emotional connections during Dance Marathon as six families from Gillette Childrens Hospital will be there to give personal testimonials. Singer and songwriter David Allen will also perform throughout the day.

Dance Marathon will be open to the public from 4 to 6 p.m. Community members and sponsors can come and see first hand what is being done by this organization to help childrens health issues. During the last half hour of the event there will be a presentation of the proceeds check in addition to a surprise ending.

The session will offer specialized assistance to small business managers as well as to those interested in starting new businesses. Individual appointments, approximately 75 minutes in length, will be scheduled between 8 a.m. and 4 p.m.

The visit also includes in-depth tours of several ancient islands. Travelers will visit the archaeological sites of Knossos on Crete, an active dig of Akrotori on Santorini, and the birthplace of gods Apollo and Artemis in Delos. Mykonos, located in the mid-Aegean Sea, is a great stop for viewing whitewashed houses and windmills along winding streets and breath-taking beaches.

Global food science industry leaders with expertise in food microbiology safety and food quality gathered at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls this past week for the 24th Annual Food Microbiology Symposium.

Protection and Defense at the University of Minnesota, was the keynote speaker for the conference along with Ann Marie McNamara, vice president of food safety and scientific affairs at Silliker, Inc., a global leader in food microbiology testing.

Busta, in his speech, "A New Paradigm for Threat Management," explained the new national security center's mission. "Our role is to protect the safety of all the nation's food supply through research and education," he said, referring to both intentional and unintentional threats.

The new university-based research center in Minneapolis is one of four such partnerships that bring together industry representatives and academic staff in order to develop new techniques to protect food supply.

Consumer, and Customer Demands for More Robust Testing." According to McNamara, since the early 1990s, regulatory programs, consumer groups, the retail and food service industries and the legal community have called for more and better food testing.

Recent demands have lead to a higher frequency of microbiological, chemical and nutritional tests on food products for Listeria, E. Coli, BSE, food allergens, and trans-fatty acids on nutritional labeling just to name a few.

Schott and Helbach took first place in duo interpretation. Schott also took second place in informative speaking with a speech on the impact of polio in 2004. Schott has been involved with forensics since her freshman year at UW-RF, and Helbach competed in 2002-03 and again this year.

Kathy Olsen, director of forensics and lecturer in speech communications and theatre arts, at UW-River Falls, believes the quality and commitment of individual team members is a driving force behind the team's success.

Cadre, a group of students trained to integrate technology into the classroom, teachers gave demonstrations to their colleagues. They then engaged in hands-on learning of software including InDesign, I-movie, Inspiration, Photoshop and Powerpoint. Particiapants also developed classroom Web pages.

Celeste Nelson, training support specialist, who presented on integrating technology for elementary students, Jeff Norby, psychology teacher, who presented incorporating technology in Understanding by Design units, and Susan Randall, mathematics teacher, who presented the use of the electronic whiteboard in the classroom.

The purpose of the TLC is to provide hands-on learning by integrating technology into area schools as well as technology support for UW-RF students and instructional staff. For example, the students participated in a workshop for area teachers held on campus Oct. 16. Members also attend weekly workshops designed to assist students in creating multimedia portfolios that will aid in school placement upon graduation.

Internet searching methods, HTML and web site software, online learning software, spreadsheet, desktop publishing, and imaging software and hardware such as scanners, CD writers, and digital still and video cameras. The cadre also creates handouts for available campus software that are distributed and made available on its web site.

The James Madison Memorial Fellowship Foundation, an endowed and privately funded program designed to strengthen instruction about the constitution in nation's schools, will award fellowships for master's degree level graduates, who are studying the framing and history of the U.S. Constitution.

The stipend will last for two years of full-time study and will cover the cost of tuition, books, fees, and room and board College seniors and graduates who intend to teach American history, government, or social studies are eligible for the fellowships. One fellowship will be awarded to a resident of each state or territory.

Fellows are required to enroll in graduate programs leading to master's degrees in American history and to teach grades 7-12 in American history, government, or social studies for a minimum of one year for each academic year of graduate assistance received.

Conference participants listened to distinguished speakers in a range of business fields including Tim Sear, the current chairman and chief executive officer of Alcon Labs to Holly Gathright, senior director of recruitment and employment at RadioShack, Inc.

The purpose of SBD is to encourage and recognize scholarship and accomplishment among students of business management and administration, encourage and promote aspirations toward personal and professional improvement, and recognize honorable service to society.

Megan Sun, a professor of business administration, will be presenting the "Bubbles in Industry Returns." Sun examines whether "bubbles" or the ups and downs found in markets, exist in traditional industries from1926 to 2003.

Rick Gaynor, Andrew Parks, and Charles Wazanowski. River Falls Brass has a varied and impressive background performing in symphony orchestras, jazz ensembles, Broadway musicals, film and television scores, and a variety of brass chamber ensembles.

The presentation, "From a Physics Classroom to Haiti: New Fish to Fry," will discuss Larson's role as a volunteer in building a "village" in Haiti and address the progress made and future plans for such humanitarian efforts in a country devastated by poverty.

"We should all have concern for those less fortunate than us, even though our busy daily schedules often keep our action on the back burner," says Larson. "Retirement can provide opportunities for new and very meaningful adventures, not seemingly very closely related to our professional careers."

This presentation is part of the Sunday Emeriti Lecture Series, sponsored by the UW-RF College of Arts and Sciences and the Office of Outreach and Graduate Studies. The lecture is free and open to the public and refreshments will be served following the presentation.

The discussion will be led by Suzanne Hagen, special assistant to the chancellor for equity and compliance. The book follows Pi Patel, son of a zookeeper, who has an encyclopedic knowledge of animal behavior and a fervent love of stories.

Receiving the award is a great honor for UW-RF, said Nylander. "I know many other colleges and universities work daily to expand opportunities for students and staff," said Nylander. "But I confess that I'm extremely pleased to have our work at River Falls noted, and I commend the faculty, staff, and students on our campus, whose dedication and hard work are the reason for the award."

Nylander continued, "We've all heard the phrase, 'It takes a village'that's true of UW-River Falls. It takes people and departments across campus to begin creating a culture of respect and active appreciation for differences among individuals. And it takes people and organizationsorganizations like NACASacross our country to create and support such a national culture."

The purpose of the award is to recognize outstanding campus leadership, activities and/or programs promoting cultural awareness and inclusion. Any current individual member, institution or business partner in good standing is eligible to receive the award.

The award recognizes exemplary and outstanding service to cultural awareness in the profession of college auxiliary management and the promotion of inclusion in an on-going fashion, through leadership in the areas of cultural diversity and equality.

"Chancellor Lydecker was committed to institutionalizing our diversity efforts," said Coombs. "She worked tirelessly with every constituent on the campus, in the local community, the region and the state to insure that we were living this mission.

We are honored that the state of Wisconsin has named the education award in honor of Chancellor Lydecker. It is a particular pleasure to present this award to UW-Green Bay. Chancellor Bruce Shepard was a good friend and long-time colleague of Chancellor Lydecker."

The Educational Diversity Award was introduced in 2003 to recognize the efforts and achievements of state institutions of higher learning in preparing minorities, women, and persons with disabilities for employment in the state of Wisconsin.

"The project actually came in about $5.6 million over our budget, but the architects working with the campus did some value engineering [substitution of products] to bring down the cost," said Halada.

The UW-RF representatives also requested that the State Division of Facilities waive the 4 percent management fee on the $4.5 million. The building commission agreed to reduce the fee to 2 percent instead.

The new four-story building will feature all campus food service operations, a student life involvement center, entertainment complex, bookstore, bank, coffee shop, convenience store, banquet hall, theater-style large meeting room and conference rooms.

Food service venues will feature demonstration cooking. The convenience store will have a quick-meal option for "grab-n-go" customers at noon, plus a grill/short order prep area to serve the entertainment complex and provide a late-evening meal option for students.

The building will be composed of a concrete structural frame, heavy timber, steel roof framing, masonry and a curtain wall exterior. Expansive floor-to-ceiling windows on the south facade will offer great views of the south campus, including the South Fork of the Kinnickinnic River, while providing daylight for many occupied areas. The building will mimic the river's natural ecosystem with a curved "organic" design on the south side, while the north side will emulate the traditional modernist style of existing academic buildings.

"I think it's important to help students realize how beneficial it is to quit smoking, and non-smokers need to know ways to protect themselves from secondhand smoke," said Jennifer Elsesser, the tobacco education coordinator at UW-RF.

As a result of national tobacco lawsuits settlements, programs have been specifically geared toward preventing and reducing the use of tobacco by youth. Last year UW-River Falls received a grant of $42,000 from the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services in order to launch its tobacco prevention program.

Extensive marketing campaigns attempting to convince students to quit using tobacco have been posted around campus. "You Know You Want To" is a popular slogan that has been catching students' eyes this academic year.

Last year, 200 quit kits were distributed to smokers on campus. The quit kits include information about services provided by the University, hotline numbers, and snacks including sunflower seeds and candy.

Results of a recent survey done by Student Health Services showed a small percentage of the student body are regular smokers. The number of smokers has gone down since last year when the tobacco education program began.

"It's nice to see they're trying to help smokers instead of attacking the smokers," says student and former smoker Georgia Wagner "There's a lot of good information around campus but there needs to be even more."

The focus of the IceCube group at UW-RF is on the IceTop Cosmic Ray Detector, which is installed on the ice surface above the telescope. UW-RF also takes part in the process of designing and fabricating light shades and permanent light tight covers for the detectors being deployed this December at the South Pole.

For the past five years, Madsen has been active in the education and outreach efforts for the AMANDA and IceCube projects. Madsen has traveled to the South Pole numerous times and says the trip gives UW-RF students valuable experience outside of the classroom.

Eisch is just one of Madsen's students whose childhood interest in cosmology has taken him on a journey across the globe. Madsen has traveled with two other UW-RF students to the coldest, driest, highest and windiest place on earth.

Eisch read about the AMANDA project in junior high and continued to track its progress throughout the years. Eisch says he chose to attend UW-RF, not only for the location and atmosphere, but also because of the University's participation in the international collaboration.

Research Institute at the University of Delaware, which is one of his first choices for a doctoral program in physics. Eisch says he wants to put his experience to work right away and start out "ahead of the crowd."

Through this research project, students and faculty are discovering new techniques in searching for evidence of dark matter and studying neutrinos, which are some of the most energetic phenomena in the universe.

"Working on research with the IceCube project has given me lots of real world experience with electronics, data analysis, programming and hardware design, all of which will be useful throughout my career," says Eisch. "At collaboration meetings I've attended in Mons, Belgium; Newark, Delaware and Uppsala, Sweden, I've able to talk face-to-face with physicists from around the world and get feedback about what I'm working on."

According to Eisch, science is often taught as a static discipline with laws and equations developed by "old geniuses long ago." Eisch thought it would be years before he did anything but work out problems in a textbook.

Directed by UW-RF music Professor Kristin Tjornehoj, the audition-only ensemble features the finest performers on campus. The ensemble is unique in that only one or two players are needed for each part, emphasizing the importance of the individual to the piece.

The UW-River Falls Center for Economic Research is holding a seminar examining the effect of the freshman seminar course on Nov. 19 at 3:15 p.m. in Room 321 of South Hall. The course introduces students to the majors and minors in the College of Business and Economics and explores careers in business and related fields.

Academic Effect of the Freshman Seminar after Eight Semesters." The research presentation looks at approximately 350 students enrolled at the university in the fall of 2000 and the possible effect of participation in the seminar course on the student's final grade point average at the time of graduation.

Foundering a bit after the death of his aged (and domineering) mother, Manley is taken aback when Annie first arrives wearing sneakers and carrying her belongings in a grocery cart. She seems so eager to please that he relents, after which their relationship progresses rapidly from reserve to hatred. Annie insults her employer, denigrates his writing, admits she forged her references, accuses Manley of lusting after her and, in general, makes his life a living hell.

Professor Meg Swanson and retired journalism Professor Mike Norman decided to do a special recognition of Davis with a production of Love Letters in the Fall of 2002. They started a fund in which proceeds from various productions go toward an awarded scholarship to at least one outstanding theatre student each year.

Blanche Davis was a professor of theatre and department chair at UW-River Falls for 24 years. She is credited with establishing the theatre and speech programs at the University, where the main stage theatre is named in her honor.

On Wednesday, Sept. 8, the book "The Professor and the Madman" by Simon Winchester will be discussed. The book club will be led by retired UW-RF math Professor Ed Rang from 3-4 p.m. in the Chalmer Davee Library Breezeway. The book is part homage to the greatest reference work of all time, the Oxford English Dictionary, part mystery, and part intellectual history of Victorian England. "The Professor and the Madman" tells the parallel stories of the dictionary's genius editor and one of his most prolific contributors, an insane American doctor committed to an asylum for murder.

The Phipps Center for the Arts is seeking artists interested in expressing a "sense of community" with visual or performance art for the Experience of Place exhibition at the Phipps Center Nov. 12 - Dec. 12.

The exhibit is part of a collaborative, multifaceted event in conjunction with the third annual community forum "Experience of Place" planned by the Phipps Center, the University of Wisconsin-River Falls and the St. Croix Valley Community Foundation.

In preparation for the exhibition, three artists' conversations are planned to create community among those interested in participating and to develop ideas that lead to the creation of artwork for exhibition.

This historic nonpartisan effort will use state-of the art campaign efforts such as email, door-to-door, event and peer-to-peer canvassing, phone banking, precinct mobilization as well as on-campus and public venue voter registration.

"We are combining the leading research in grassroots mobilization with the best practices of the campaign world to bring a critical group of new voters to the polls," said Christopher Arterton, dean of the George Washington University Graduate School of Political Management, one of the co-organizers.

Targeting the student population is coordinated locally through the University's involvement in Campus Compact, a national association of college and university presidents who work to support community service and active citizenship, according to Mark Kinders, director of Public Affairs at UW-RF and coordinator of the New Voters Project on campus.

"For the first time in 30 years, college students can be one of the most important constituent group in determining the outcome of the presidential and national elections," said Kinders. "Candidates want their vote. We hope that the New Voters Project will help our students to become engaged, informed and then to participate in the election."

The theme is "Red, White and You: the New Voters Project.: As a result, there will be information available to new students during student orientation week as well as displays and extensive registration opportunities in the Student Center during the semester.

The College of Arts and Sciences is holding a panel discussion by political science faculty about the importance of voting in the swing states of Wisconsin and Minnesota. It is set for 7-8:30 p.m. River Falls Public Library.

"The Vanishing Voter: Public Involvement in an Age of Uncertainty." Patterson wrote a penetrating analysis of why Americans are voting at historically low rates and why audiences for televised presidential debates have declined by half.

Also, a "Voter Palooza" between Oct. 4-16 also will be held with bands, spekaers, entertainment and voter registration activities on campus. Students can also find information on a new Web site (www.uwrf.edu//newvoter).

Minnesota, how to determine state and federal office candidates for students' home address, and public policy issues and political party website links. With almost 24 million 18-to-24-year-old voters in the United States, young people make up a significant voting bloc.

"Since the strength of a democracy is measured by the participation of its citizens, the New Voters Project will work toward a bright future for America, activating young adults to drive the very engine of our democracy and cast their votes," says Jessy Tolkan, state-wide campus director of the project.

The project's overall goal is to increase youth voter turnout in the six states by five percentage points. Research shows that only 34 percent of age 18-to-24-year-olds voted in the 2000 presidential election, compared with 70 percent of citizens aged 25 and up.

The University of Wisconsin-River Falls offers a variety of cultural and academic events and programs throughout the 2004-05 academic year. All events are open to the public; some are free. Visit www.uwrf.edu for more information. Call the numbers listed for date confirmation and ticket prices.

A high-energy performance company that combines dance, performance poetry, storytelling and rap to create inspirational pieces that are technically powerful, soulfully expressive and profoundly meaningful. 7:30 p.m. UW-RF, North Hall Auditorium.

Aug. 28 and honored three outstanding faculty members. The college presented assistant Professor Claire Kilian with the Outstanding Teacher Award; assistant Professor Anthony Varghese with the Outstanding Research Award; and Ellen Schultz with the Outstanding Advising Award.

Management, Organizational Behavior, and Leadership and Ethics. Kilian has contributed numerous articles and reviews to several publications and presented allied research material at annual meetings held throughout the Midwest for the Society for Case Research.

Kilian has also provided her research for books, manuals and case studies concerning business-related ideas and practices. Among her mounting intellectual contributions, Kilian is also member of several University committees, including Graduate Programs, Assessment and International Studies. In addition, Kilian is founder and advisor of the student organization for the UW-RF Chapter of the Society of Human Resources Management.

Varghese also does consulting for Medtronic, Inc. and Physiome Science. Throughout his career, Varghese has contributed various articles to several publications and given numerous presentations across the nation.

Varghese is a committee member for the Faculty Development, Technology Planning and Policy, and the advisor for the Association for Computer Machinery, which allows students interested in increasing their computer field knowledge to do so with hands-on experience. Varghese current research is concentrated in ion channels and mathematical modeling of heart cells.

Recognized were Terrence Mannetter, associate professor of Modern Languages, in the division of Arts & Humanities; Clarke Garry, professor of biology, in the division of sciences and mathematics, and Edward Peterson, professor of history, in the social sciences division.

The awards were and recipients were selected from ballots sent to College of Arts and Sciences graduates of 2001 and 2003. "It is important to recognize and celebrate outstanding teaching, as that is the heart of our mission and one of the primary motivations for the faculty who have chosen to make their careers at UW-River Falls," says CAS Dean Gorden Hedahl. "These awards are especially significant, as they are chosen by students who have graduated and have entered the work force. They are able to reflect on their entire University experience and recognize those who have made lasting impacts on their lives and careers."

CAS established the awards in 1985 to honor those individuals who had demonstrated teaching excellence based on the nominations and recognition from their former students. It gives three awards annually, one in each division of the college: arts & humanities; sciences and mathematics, and social sciences. Recipients of the award received a $250 check from the UW-RF Foundation and a certificate of appreciation. Faculty are eligible to receive the award once in a 10-year period.

Department. He teaches courses in undergraduate Spanish language, literature, and phonetics, and serves as coordinator of a new first-year Spanish language program that utilizes the Natural Approach to second language learning. He also serves as director of the Winter Interim in Mexico program.

Edward Peterson was also recognized in the past year by the university as the distinguished teacher. Peterson, who served as chairman of the social science and history departments from 1963 to 1991, teaches a range of undergraduate and graduate courses with a particular emphasis on 20th Century European history.

A committed researcher of German archives, Peterson wrote the first of his seven histories on the limitations of Hitler's totalitarian powers. His additional histories have explored such topics as Germany under American occupation, East Germany and German resistance under Soviet occupation, and an analytical history of World War II. During his distinguished career, Peterson has received grants from the National Endowment for the Humanities and the Social Science Research Council and presented at many conferences.

He is a three-time recipient of the Alexander von Humboldt Award presented by a German foundation for furthering scholarship in the culture. With more than 50 years teaching and the senior faculty member, the honor falls to Peterson to carry the University's ceremonial mace at formal events, such as commencement.

"It is interesting to note that the three individuals arrived at very different points in the history of UW-RF, but all are like-minded in their dedication to the education of our students," said Hedahl. "It must also be noted that these individuals serve as models, but they are also representatives for the large number of positive and committed faculty members in the College of Arts and Sciences who work so well as effective educators and mentors for our students."

The synergy conference is hosted this year by UW-River Falls in collaboration with UW-Stout and UW-Eau Claire, and will occur at the Phipps Center for the Arts in Hudson. It will address such topics as rural to urban transitions, health care costs, the rural digital divide, and workforce development.

Moderator for the event will be Steve Gunderson, former Wisconsin state legislator and congressman who is a senior consultant and managing director for the Greystone Group Inc., a strategic management and communications consulting firm.

In addition to conference discussions and working groups, participants will have access to exhibits from regional vendors and organizations. A "Tastes of the Valleys" reception will be held, featuring local businesses and producers from the St. Croix and Chippewa valleys.

The family of late Chancellor Ann Lydecker is scheduled to present a gift of a sculpture in memory of Ann. The $1.1 million C.H.I.L.D. Center is funded entirely by student fees and grants without any tax dollars. At 7,800 square feet it contains six classrooms, a kitchen, a motor-skills activity area and work and storage areas.

UW-RF students use the center as a fieldwork site for programs such as early childhood education, elementary education, communicative disorders, social work, counseling and school psychology. Activities offered for youngsters in the Center include movement, music, art, story-time and outdoor-time. Nutritious snacks and meals are also provided.

The C.H.I.L.D. Center provides services for up to 90 children, ages 6 weeks to 10 years. Student and community weekly rates are and part-time rates are also offered for two, three, and five days a week as well as two, three and five half-days. A school-age program is also offered for $7 per hour with a two-hour minimum.

Education through Art and Movement. A high-energy performance company that combines dance, performance poetry, storytelling and rap to create inspirational pieces that are technically powerful, soulfully expressive and profoundly meaningful.

Prior to working with the Federal Reserve Bank in Minneapolis, Madden spent five years at TCF Financial Corp. in investments and management reporting. He also worked for five years at Ernst and Young as a senior consultant in the financial services industry group. In 1995, Madden joined the Federal Reserve Bank in the automated clearing area as a management analyst.

A certified public accountant and a certified management accountant, Madden also serves as president of the Minnesota Economic Association and is on the Board of the Institute for Financial Economics.

Hero specializes in U.S. democracy and politics, especially as viewed through the analytical perspective of Latino and ethnic/minority politics, state/urban politics, and federalism. He has published a number of research articles on these topics.

Farmer Labor Party for statewide office since Elmer Childress won the party's backing for secretary of state in 1970. Having served in both private industry and government, Gray brings a broad understanding of both.

St. Arnold lectures and writes educational materials about Chippewa treaty rights and resource management issues. He also held positions with the Keweenaw Bay Indian Community and the Michigan Inter-Tribal Council.

The COEPS personnel committee selected from those nominated for the outstanding faculty member award based on their contributions in teaching, service to the college, community service, and professional and scholarly contributions. Students nominated an adviser for the Outstanding Advisor Award. The Dean's Special Recognition Award was for outstanding work performance in 2003-04.

Monsour is a professor and co-chair of the Teacher Education Department. She is a coordinator in the Principal Licensure Program, which is designed to develop the skills necessary to become a principal. Monsour has also served as co-director of the Wisconsin Partners in Service Learning and the director of Wisconsin Principals' Assessment Center.

Monsour continued her education and received a M.A. in special education from the University of St. Thomas, a M.S. in school psychology from the UW -River Falls, and an Ed.D. in educational administration from the University of Minnesota.

She also worked as a tutor, work coordinator, remedial teacher, extended-care liaison, special education teacher, and elementary counselor with public and private schools. In addition to serving on several University committees, Monsour is an author and co-author of several books and journal articles. She has written many successful grant requests; the largest grant was for National Youth Service Learning totaling more than $700,000.

An individual who nominated Monsour wrote, "What stands out most about Florence is her ability to encourage exceptional teaching and scholarship in a caring and professional manner. She is supportive and kind, yet upholds the standards needed by educators at all levels."

He has co-authored two journal articles, directed theses, and worked on thesis committees. He is the recipient of both UW-RF Foundation and professional development grants. The outstanding adviser award is a student-nominated award.

Martin, the recipient of the Dean's Special Recognition Award, has been an academic advisor, data manager and certification officer at UW-River Falls since 1997. He is also an adviser to the Theta Chi Fraternity and has received awards that recognize his professional work in Greek affairs.

Martin continued his education at UW-Whitewater and received a M.S.E. in guidance and counseling with a higher education emphasis. Martin is involved with several professional organizations such as the Wisconsin Academic Advising Association and the National Academic Advising Association.

Foster said she wanted to recognize his years of service and dedication to the students in the college." I really wanted to recognize Mike's wonderful advising because students always speak so highly of him," said Foster. "Whenever we get nominations for adviser of the year at a university level or college level, his name is always there."

Gardens, established by the late Dennis Dahlka, a 1977 alumnus of the University of Wisconsin-River Falls. Behind the Kleinpell Fine Arts Building, the gardens include benches and a walking path intertwined among beautifully landscaped plants and limestone boulders.

Falls was very important to Dahlka. The garden represents diversity, an important campus concept, with ornamental prairie grasses, perennials and pines, said Rost. "What he wanted to do was to have an impact as much as the University had on him," Rost said.

Hoag, who visited the Dahlka Gardens earlier this summer, said she knew a living sculpture like the garden would best remember Dennis. "When I saw the garden I immediately felt Dennis' presence," Hoag said.

Society, Wong's journey from a UW-River Falls student in the 1970s to "China's most accomplished living explorer" named by Time Magazine has spread his extraordinary artistry and research across the globe.

A UW-RF alumni who received the 2002 Distinguished Alumnus Award, Wong's boundless curiosity leads him to the most remote regions of China to document and conserve the rich heritage of volatile societies. He founded the China Exploration and Research Society in 1986, and through CERS continues he to conduct multidisciplinary research, implement nature and culture conservation projects, and disseminate results through education and popular channels.

Wong's presentation will offer insight on CERS achievements and current and future projects. A reception and exhibition in Gallery 101 of the Kleinpell Fine Arts Building will follow the presentation.

Wong is credited with finding the true source of the Yangtze River along with other discoveries that have earned him nearly 20 international awards. His exploration activities have been publicized internationally through ABC, CBS, the BBC, Discovery Channel and the National Geographic Channel. He lectures widely throughout the Pacific Rim and is an adjunct faculty member to universities and an adviser to government agencies in the People's Republic of China.

Although exploration satisfied Wong's thirst for knowledge and adventure, he soon found himself charting a more challenging path toward conservation. When not in the field, Wong spends much of his time spreading the word about China's vast natural and cultural treasures. Wong also has authored numerous books on China exploration and provided advice to numerous international agencies, including the United Nations.

The Food Microbiology Symposium covers current topics in foodborne pathogens and rapid and automated methods in food microbiology. Speakers from academia, business and industry, and government regulatory agencies will provide an overview and update on pathogens, toxins, safety, quality and shelf-life issues.

In addition, presentations will also be given by representatives of companies involved in developing and marketing rapid and automated methods for microbiological analysis of food, water and the environment. The presentations offer opportunities to discuss applications and suitability of methods for microbiological analysis and pathogen detection. A few participating companies are Microbiology International, BioSys Inc., Strategic Diagnostics Inc., and BD Diagnostic Systems.

The symposium attracts a diverse community of attendees. The program is appropriate for food scientists, quality assurance supervisors, managers and technicians, microbiologists involved in food safety, regulatory agency personnel and advisors, and graduate students interested in food microbiology.

Thursday sessions, "From Icebergs to Meteorites," will feature discussions by UW-RF faculty who will share their knowledge of and personal experience with earthly and celestial topics. These sessions will cover the following issues: o Oct. 14 "Enetrobacter Sakazakii- Danger Lurking in Infant Formulae" by Purnendu Vasavada, professor; animal and food science department. o Oct. 21 "Looking Up From the Bottom of the World: Viewing the Universe from the South Pole" by Jim Madsen, professor and chair; physics department.

Establishment of an international studies major by next fall and development of a campus-wide international center are primary goals of the UWRF Association for International Development (RF-AID), which held its second annual Workshop on International Development Sept. 10-11. Workshop participants emphasized the need for action concerning international development at the college level.

Falls faculty, staff, and administrators from four colleges. Currently the University has an international studies minor, and the expansion to an interdisciplinary major and the creation of an international development center would enhance communication between the four colleges at UWRF and strengthen the objectives of the association, say RF-AID members.

The association's mission is to enhance curriculum offerings, to develop and support research and other projects, to acquire grant money, to serve students, and to participate in consulting opportunities. Additionally, it hopes to better serve and improve the circumstances of students and people in less developed countries such as Africa, Asia, Latin America and Eastern Europe.

UW-River Falls continues to expand its international opportunities, from three-week study tours to semester abroad programs as well as international faculty and student exchanges. These international experiences in college offer students exposure to the world at an affordable price, said Brent Greene, director of international programs.

By having faculty with international experience, students at UW-River Falls benefit inside and outside the classroom, says Ginny Coombs, vice chancellor and provost. The benefit students see is the increased enthusiasm an instructor brings to class after studying or working abroad.

Additionally, instructors serve as role models and informants, broadening the horizons of their students by encouraging study abroad opportunities. Through international experiences, instructors also continue to improve and develop curriculum and engage in grant writing to obtain better course materials, says Coombs.

Students wait patiently for class to start in Professor Bonnie Walter's food science lab at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls. In addition to the college students in the room, a 6-year-old sits on her desk and his younger sister sits in the front row.

Walters enters, with lesson plans in one hand and a food-processing video in the other. Bonnie ushers the boy--her son Jim--off the desk and tells him to go sit with his sister. Visiting class because school's out, they sit quietly in the front row, next to the college students, and watch Bonnie lecture and then the tomato-processing video. At the end of class, Bonnie asks a question about a step in tomato processing, and son Jim answers the question.

Walters has a way of teaching that makes the material easy and fun to learn, so it's not unusual that even her young son absorbs the important points. Because of her teaching style, she is the recipient of the 2004 Northern American Colleges and Teachers of Agriculture (NACTA) Fellow Award. In June, Walters attended the 50th annual NACTA conference at the University of Florida at Gainesville to accept her award. The purpose of the national award is to recognize agriculture teachers who excel in higher education.

To qualify for the award, the teacher must be a member of NACTA. Walters has been a member for six years and has pledged a lifetime membership. Teachers nominated must be full-time with at least 25% teaching appointment for a minimum of five to seven years. Perry Clark, a UW-River Falls professor of dairy and animal sciences, nominated Walters for the award.

Nomination criteria evaluated includes an instructor's teaching philosophy; a letter of nomination; student, peer, and alumni evaluations; a self-evaluation; teaching innovations, and a list of professional activities. A committee of NACTA members award the nominee a final score out of 900 points. In order to receive the award, the nominee must receive a minimum score of 720 points.

Sigurd Hanson, an internationally respected relief worker, has more than 25 years of experience in managing emergency, rehabilitation and development-related actives, primarily in Africa and most recently in the Pakistan/Afghanistan and Central Asia regions. His leadership has guided the provision of life-sustaining assistance in food, medical services and security to residents of Third World nations.

Hanson's presentation, "Our World: Global Trends and Challenges," will focus on social change, competing visions for the future and emerging global trends, specially the growing gap between the rich and poor, the shifting patterns of governance, increasing conflict, environmental limitations and the HIV/AIDS pandemic.

An Onalaska native, Hanson has called Pakistan and Afghanistan home for the past five years, where he served with the International Medical Corps and is currently the country director for the International Rescue Committee.

Falls, where he graduated in 1975 with a degree in journalism and agriculture business. He also pursued his master's in education at UW-RF and in international administration from the School for International Training in Brattleboro, Vt.

Hanson was confronted by one of the worst humanitarian crises in the world, with an estimated 7 million Afghans in need of food assistance. He directed IRC efforts to provide food, tents, blankets, clothing, potable water and health care to displaced families around the northern Afghanistan city of Mazir-e Sharif as well as near Kabul, Herat and Nangarhar provinces.

The fair helps students develop their networking skills, speak with employers, and evaluate their marketability in their field of interest. Students at any level of study are encouraged to attend the career fair. First- and second-year students will learn about possible career paths from the many businesses attending.

On Saturday, alumni and friends are encouraged to join their classmates and others for a continental breakfast and refreshments in the deli area of Hagestad Student Center from 10 to 11 a.m. The Student Advancement Association will provide a 45-minute guided campus tour, departing from the deli area at 10:30 a.m.

From 11 a.m. through halftime of the football game, friends, parents, and alumni are invited to attend Freddys Tailgate Party, under the pavilion at Ramer Field. A brat and beer feed will take place near the concession stand. The homecoming game between the Falcons and UW-Stout will kick off at 1 p.m. at Ramer Field.

For Nan Jordahl, several life trials resulted in a newfound appreciation for the both the mundane and not-so-ordinary in life. In a new memoir, Chasing Sophie's Ashes (Authorhouse, 2004), Jordahl relives the death of her husband who succumbed to leukemia, her own struggle to overcome leukemia, and several losses in her family.

Jordahl married a U.S. Navy sailor at age 20 and refers to her late husband as "the love of my life." Together they had overcome many health complications with their children and family members. Her husband, Bob, was diagnosed with leukemia in 1985 and struggled with the disease for several years, after being the first person in medical history to receive a highly experimental autologous bone marrow transplant.

Nine years later, Jordahl began the same battle that her husband went through when she, too, was diagnosed with leukemia. Luckily her younger sister was an exact match for a bone marrow transplant, which resulted in Jordahl's remission.

Jordahl's youngest son, Travis, inspired her to write Chasing Sophie's Ashes, which is titled after a pet that died. "It was Travis, in protest of his mother's leukemia, who gave me the will and determination to survive," she writes in the dedication, which is also dedicated to her deceased husband, her father, the staff at the University of Minnesota Bone Marrow Transplant Center, and her animals.

Joining UW-River Falls in 1976, Jordahl is a professor of communicative disorders, assistant to the dean and provost, and director of the honors program and faculty development, as well as an academic advisor. She particularly values her opportunities to work with students--one of her many passions.

Jordahl completed both her bachelor's and master's degree in communicative disorders form the University of Rhode Island. She has also completed all of her coursework for a Ph.D. in educational administration at the University of Minnesota.

Chasing Sophie's Ashes is her first book, although she is planning to continue her career as an author. Jordahl's next book will be about the life lesson's she has learned from animals. She hopes to finish it next year.

Jordahl hopes that her readers will leave this book with a larger appreciation for life's blessings. She lives her own life in the moment and encourages others to do the same. Her advice is "Stop complaining; life is good."

More than 126 UW-River Falls education students are practicing their teaching skills this fall in 31 cooperating school districts and preschools in Wisconsin and Minnesota as student teachers and interns.

The cost of the trip is $3,595 for double occupancy and includes roundtrip airfare, all tips/fees and internal transportation, room and board, a special educational guide, and an Egyptologist guide during a private coach tour. Students will pay an additional $500 tuition, and those desiring a single room can pay additional $565.

The trip is directed by art history Professor Steven Derfler of the UW-RF art department, UW-RF and Educational Resources, Inc. A historian and archaeologist, Derfler has researched ancient civilizations and participated in excavations for more than two decades. He has also been involved with educational institutions in Israel and the Midwest, and his articles and reviews have been published in magazines and newspapers such as the Israel Exploration Journal and the Middle East Review.

Egypt," says Derfler. "No other civilization has captured as many hearts and minds of the world as ancient Egypt. As humankind emerged from its early adolescence on the road to adulthood, ancient Egyptian culture was there to lead the way. This ancient land became the world's leader in art and architecture, science and industry, and religion and philosophy."

Admissions Director Alan Tuchtenhagen said the University will be enrolling a larger freshman class this year, and increasing access to local area students remains a high priority. The University is particularly interested in processing applications from returning, older students as well as recent high school graduates from western Wisconsin.

"There are some individuals who are deciding to start back to college after working for a few years," said Tuchtenhagen "Some have attended college in the past. Others are interested in attending for the first time. The University has a strong commitment to assist in the higher education of families of west-central Wisconsin. Although we have a limited amount of room for additional new students for fall term, we want to be sure that individuals from this region have an opportunity here."

Residence hall space is still available for students, and financial aid applications can still be processed. New students must meet admission standards by demonstrating academic preparedness. Students with questions about their previous academic work and admission standards should contact the UW-RF Admissions Office at 715/425-3500.

UW River Falls has some unique programs that are not available at many other universities, such as biotechnology, geographic information systems, environmental science, Teaching English to Speakers of Other Languages, horticulture, as well as food science and technology. The University's most popular programs with largest enrollments are business, computer science, education, marketing communications, animal and food science as well as fine arts.

The grant will fund a three-year project for history teachers to learn local and regional history in order to explore connections to historical events on a national level. Ultimately, teachers will adopt this content knowledge of local and regional history into their classrooms to further engage their students when studying U.S. history.

Transitions." She is a professor in the departments of sociology and anthropology at Iowa State University, endowed chair for sustainable agriculture, and co-author of Sustainability: Links Between Agriculture, Community and the Ecosystem.

David P. McClure, president and CEO of the U.S. Internet Industry Association, which is the primary trade association for Internet commerce, content and connectivity, will present the keynote for the session on the Regional Digital Divide. McClure has written and lectured extensively on management and technology issues and is considered an authority on strategic business planning and technology integration for businesses.

Issues and Our Region session. McLaughlin is the associate director of the Center for Health and Medical Affairs and was the executive director of the National Institute of Health Policy at the University of St. Thomas.

In addition to these noted speakers, professionals and experts in all three areas will participate in panel discussions at the breakout sessions of the conference. Moderator for the regional event will be Steve Gunderson, a former Wisconsin state legislator and congressman and currently a senior consultant and managing director of the Greystone Group, Inc., a strategic management and communications consulting firm.

The conference will be held at The Phipps Center for the Arts in Hudson and is sponsored by Xcel Energy. In addition to the conference discussions and working groups, participants will have access to exhibits from regional vendors and organizations and a reception, "Tastes of the Valleys," where local restaurants, agricultural producers and hospitality providers from the St. Croix and Chippewa Valleys will share their regional cuisine favorites.

Workshop leader Steve Watters said, "Now is a great time to learn or brush up on your dressing, caping, boning, and cutting techniques. Participants will be able to put these skills to good use almost immediately. If you pay a commercial locker to process your deer, it'll cost anywhere between $60 and $100 per deer."

Department of Natural Resources and demonstrations of correct techniques and equipment for field gutting, skinning and caping, boning, cutting, and getting a deer freezer-ready. It also will cover the basics of home-made sausage-making.A limited number of hands-on cutting practice spaces are available for participants aged 16 years and older.

University of Wisconsin-River Falls. The plant processes beef, pork, lamb, chicken, an occasional red deer, and a few ostrich. Watters also teaches classes and laboratories in quality assurance, meat cutting, meat processing and food processing.

Interim Chancellor Virgil Nylander welcomed the evaluation as an important endorsement of the quality of UW-RF. "There are numerous surveys and rankings of higher education institutions in the United States. Of these, U.S. News and World Report generates the greatest attention. Their appraisal of the quality and value of UW-River Falls is on target.

It's also of tremendous consequence regionally to showcase UW-RF for the quality of its students as future employees and our faculty as consulting experts as we work with local government and economic development organizations to recruit and expand high-paying industries to the St. Croix Valley and western Wisconsin.

These include peer assessment of academic reputation through the voting of university presidents and admissions officers, retention of students, graduation rates, faculty resources, class sizes, student selectivity, academic resources, and alumni giving.

Interim Chancellor Virgil Nylander delivered that message during an all faculty and staff meeting on Monday, Aug. 23, which signals the start of the school year. More than 500 persons attended the address. Classes begin on Sept. 2, with an expected student body of 5,900 graduate and undergraduate students, including more than 1,200 freshmen.

Nylander told the assembly that a national search is on schedule for a new chief executive officer. This summer a Regent's search committee and a campus search and screen committee was appointed and have begun work. Nylander said he expects a new chancellor to be named in the spring.

In addition to leadership changes at UW-RF, there also are significant changes in the leadership of the University of Wisconsin System, Nylander said. "We are at a transition stage for the UW System, and transitions provide opportunities.

As you know, Katharine Lyall retired as president of the UW System after 13 wonderful years of service. We now have a new president, Kevin Reilly. He has served four years as Provost and four years as Chancellor of UW Extension. He is very familiar with this system and given his former position in Extension he has a broad perspective of the state, its educational needs and the political issues that must be addressed if we are to continue as one of the premier higher educational institutions in the country.

The campus will pursue four major focus areas that were reached through consensus discussions by Lydecker, Reilly and the other campus chancellors last spring: improving financial aid for students who are economically stressed; providing better access for working adults; enhancing academic quality; and ensuring that UW campuses play a leading role in shoring up Wisconsin's economic development.

As the campus prepares for the next legislative session and the debate over the budget the Regents have requested of Gov. James Doyle, Nylander said it is crucial to restore funding after several years of cuts that have taken more than $3.2 million in tax dollars from UW-RF. During the last budget session, when the UW System was cut $250 million, UW-RF lost 18 positions and money for academic support.

Nylander said the time is ripe for a public discussion of the importance of public higher education in Wisconsin, with distinct funding criteria such as that accorded to K-12 education, local government and corrections.

"Recent surveys in the state tell us that the UW System is highly valued by the people in the state. They are proud of us, and I have heard the Governor say on several occasions that higher education is essential to improving the economy of the state.

Nylander also is concerned about a Taxpayer Bill of Rights constitutional amendment that would peg spending to per capita income. Legislation passed in Colorado a decade ago is now devastating higher education in that state, as well as other state programs and economic growth. Colorado leaders are trying to reverse the damage. "Hopefully, we can learn from the mistakes of others," Nylander said.

Nylander noted a series of forums last spring took steps to identify issues and build coalitions around such challenges as the impact of change on community/rural relationships; education partnerships; and arts and cultural initiatives.

Nylander said that leaders throughout the region have expressed concern to him that UW-RF continues Lydecker's commitment. " I have assured them that we are committed to working with them on the issues that are important to this region."

He noted that the University is working at creating a single point of contact in the Regional Development Institute for all requests from communities, business and industry, education and non-profit organizations.

Virgil Nylander. "We're looking forward to another positive year, and the new additions to our faculty will only add to the college's success." New hires and promotions are listed by colleges and/or departments. Some individuals were hired spring semester but will begin their first full academic year fall semester.

A session designed to address workforce development challenges and opportunities facing employers in west central Wisconsin has been added to the West Central Wisconsin Synergy 2004 Conference on Sept. 15-16 at the Phipps Center for the Arts in Hudson.

The new session will invite business and community leaders to participate in an interactive discussion that examines the relationship between population and workforce development patterns, community assets, job creation and business development. These factors affect the future of key sectors of the west central Wisconsin economy. The additional session is sponsored by the West Central Wisconsin Workforce Development Board and Workforce Resource, Inc.

Organizations are encouraged to send teams of individuals to cover all areas and pay a discounted rate. Cost is $95 for registration, refreshments, lunch and materials. Registration is discounted to $75 for individuals if registration is made online and before September 10.

Editor's note: The Greater Chippewa and St. Croix Valley Regional PK-16 Consortium is designed to leverage the strengths of the region's educational institutions and business partnerships to deliver fast, competent and seamless access to education, training and research for youth, teachers and employees of businesses and industries in west central Wisconsin. The consortium blends the resources of the full spectrum of educational service providers and aligns existing planning groups into a Regional PK-16 Council, creating a structure for ongoing economic development and workforce planning initiatives that respects individual entity autonomy and leads to long-term rewards for participating entities. For more information, contact Tara Bergeson at 715/232-5270 or email: tara@wcw-pk16.org.

Concern about the declining rates of voter participation over the past 40 years has become an issue on the public agenda. A perception that individual votes don't matter has permeated the public consciousness, and skepticism about special interests may add to the declining rate of participation.

Louise Seger. This real-life story, which has been an enormous hit wherever it has played, gives audiences an intimate look at the woman behind the legend--an insider's story as only a true friend could tell it.

Business advisors will offer specialized assistance to small business managers as well as to individuals interested in starting new businesses. The session is suitable for anyone who would like to discuss plans for starting or expanding a business or who has problems in any area of business management.

With a goal of sharing a multicultural story with the world and with influences ranging from Fela Anikulapo Kuti and Youssou N'dour to Miles Davis and Sting, Yawo is world music with an Afro-Brazilian attitude. Yawo can often be seen at the Blue Nile restaurant in Minneapolis as well as around the Upper Midwest.

This famous story follows Eliza Doolittle, a Cockney flower girl, who agrees to take speech lessons from phonetician Henry Higgins in order to fulfill her dream of working in a flower shop. Eliza succeeds so well, however, that she outgrows her social situation and even manages to get Henry to fall in love with her.

This June, almost 100 youth trying to better their odds at pursuing a college education had that chance through the University of Wisconsin-River Falls Explore Program. The precollege camp brought students grades 6-12 who are potentially first-generation college students to the University to experience dorm life, academic courses, recreation and social experiences.

Funded by the Wisconsin Department of Public Instruction, Explore is an academic enrichment program intended to get young people excited about college. The program provides hands-on learning experiences from UW-RF instructors and student counselors and helps prepare students for ACT and SAT college entrance exams.

As a teenager, Galbreath was involved in a similar camp, the Upward Bound program at Texas A&M University. He said a director from that program inspired him to take responsibility and overcome the negativity in his life.

In order to achieve the same motivation for college that Galbreath received, the University tries hard to recruit motivated staff who are interested in working with youth and provide courses that meet their interests, says Galbreath. The camp is planned each year by reviewing surveys of past students, who offer ideas and perspectives on their needs and expectations.

Galbreath said the top two things mentioned in past surveys were more free time and more outdoor activities. A popular game among students was called Winds of Change. In circle formation, students were asked to pay close attention to the people around them. They had to fill in the blanks that identify their peers to enhance name-building and observation skills. The students also enjoyed climbing-rope courses at the YMCA and outdoor events in nearby Prescott, Wis.

Each year, the courses offered depend on the staff and the interest level in the course. In addition, this year student counselors were given more freedom to plan activities for the Explore students. For example, counselors had one or two diversity-building activities planned and ready to carry out. Galbreath said having counselors who are college students helps the Explore participants connect better with their instructors.

Prior to his first year as director, Galbreath spent two years as an Explore student counselor, and says he believes in UW-RF's message of higher education and the opportunities provided by the camps. He graduated from UW-RF in May 2003 with a major in broad field social studies and an emphasis in history and will attend graduate school at Bethel College in the fall.

Galbreath gives credit to the people in his life who pushed him and instilled hope in him. He says the transformation from when the students arrive on campus to when they leave is "a beautiful process." "Some students can go either way.

They can choose college or block out the messages we're trying to send and go back to the negativity that might surround them in their environment. I feel like I have to do whatever I can to try and help people make it in life," said Galbreath.

The 17-member search-and-screen committee will discuss selection of an executive search firm, review human resources policies and discuss the process and review questions for future listening sessions. The meeting may go into closed session upon vote of eligible members, per Wisconsin Statutes 19.85(l)(f).

UW-River Falls students returning to campus this fall will find some visible and not-so-visible changes at the University. Several projects totaling an estimated $50 million are in various stages of planning and construction, including a new student union, window replacement for North Hall and Prucha Hall and other projects.

"Students will notice changes in residence halls and lobbies, and some sidewalks," said Greg Koehler, building maintenance supervisor at UW-RF. "We've been doing a lot of painting in the residence halls as well as other updates. We've continued to upgrade traditional classrooms across campus to technology-enhanced classrooms."

This summer demolition will begin of the Ames Education Building in the center of campus, which will be the site of the new student union. Construction of the student union is set to begin next spring.

"Summer is often the only time when a building can be taken off-line to perform maintenance, since that is a time which will have the least impact on classes," said Hagen. "Also some types of work are not feasible during the winter due to the weather. This summer is fairly typical in terms of the amount of construction on campus although we have been busier than normal with projects in the development and design stages for which construction will not occur for two to four years."

On the south end of campus, projects in the works include a locker room addition and expansion to the Hunt Arena/Knowles Recreation Center complex. Other projects include security cameras at Ramer Field parking lot, a new roof on the bookstore facility in the Hagestad Student Center, a new tennis court complex near Ramer Field, seal-coating of numerous parking lots, updates to computer labs, and conversions to technology-enhanced classrooms. In addition, card readers will be added to entrances of all residence halls. Off campus, construction for a new Dairy Learning Center at Farm II could begin as soon as fall 2004.

Recently completed work includes repair to the foundation of South Hall, the oldest building on campus, resurfacing of Spruce Street and pathway and other repairs to sidewalks and roads. Less visible projects on campus include HVAC updates or repairs to the Ag Science Building, South Hall and the library as well as the Heating Plant complex.

Interim Chancellor Virgil Nylander. "They understand that for us to provide a quality education we need facilities that support the needs of both students and faculty. Well-maintained and new facilities will enhance our ability to serve our students and others throughout the region."

St. Paul, Minn., participated in Upward Bound, a federally funded TRIO program designed to enhance the learning of students from limited income families and/or where neither parent has completed a four-year college degree.

TRIO is funded by the U.S. Department of Education, providing all activities, travel, lodging and food. Students are also eligible for monthly stipends based on their academic performance and attendance, helping them learn to spend their money wisely.

High School, and according to recent statistics almost half of the students may not complete high school. Upward Bound helps prepare students for college through tutoring, academic-skill building, social and cultural activities, college career awareness and personal and academic counseling, according to Bretta Chaplinski, the program's assistant director.

The success rate of the program is impressive. Of those who remain in the program, nearly 94 percent will graduate from high school. This year, not only are all seniors in Upward Bound getting their high school diplomas, but all are attending college in the fall.

High School, says Moe. "It's neat to see the kids take advantage of something they don't receive on a daily basis," she says. "Exposing them to new experiences makes their world become larger and larger. It helps them capture their dreams."

Davis, George Jenkins, and Rameck Hunt who grew up in impoverished, broken families in Newark, NJ. The story narrates the men's challenges until Jenkins dreamt of becoming a dentist and learns about a program for minority students interested in careers in medicine. He convinces his two friends to apply to the program, and together they vowed to help each other through. Despite the tremendous distractions and difficulties they faced, today two are doctors and one is a dentist.

Moe says the book truly illustrates the core of Upward Bound's mission. Teamwork is a concept pushed in the University's program, which complements the message of power in people when they unite as told in "The Pact," says Moe. "It's so important for these kids to know that they have each other," said Moe. "We let them know they have the power to control their own destiny, but we also teach them to stand behind one another, put a hand a shoulder and say, I got your back."

Several students said "free time" and socializing with their peers is a favorite activity. Another fun, classic game called Trust tests faith in fellow students to see if the other would catch them by falling blindly into their arms. The students said it worked.

Conference 2004 on Sept. 15-16 to bring together business professionals, government officials, development organizations and others to discuss critical issues facing communities in west-central Wisconsin.

A combination of keynote lectures and workshops will be held on Wednesday with follow-up and hands-on activities provided on Thursday morning. A reception on Wednesday afternoon will give participants a "Taste of the Region" as local restaurants and hospitality providers share their regional cuisine favorites.

The conference is structured for team participation, and registration discounts are provided to organizations that send three individuals. Individuals will pay $95 for admission, refreshments, lunch and conference materials. Teams of three individuals will pay for two participants. There is also an early-bird discount for all registrations received before Sept. 10.

Teen University offers young students who show strong academic drive a glimpse into their future as potential college students. Now in its 13th summer, Teen University gave approximately130 students, who had finished grades six to eight, the experience to take a number of morning and afternoon enrichment classes during the week-long program.

"We try to encourage them to take different classes," according to program manager Carmen Boortz. "We try to make it a growing experience." In addition to enjoying the 226-acre campus, Teen University aims to keep kids at the top of their class and encourage college attendance by providing an early campus experience with several academic and creative courses.

Subjects this year included 20th century literature, scuba diving, natural resources, biotechnology, fly fishing and fly tying, mystery writing and other topics. This year, a favorite course among students was a look into the fascinating world of cartooning and comics. Instructor Jim KcKahan guided 18 students through the process of creating and producing a finished cartoon.Culmination of the course is a limited-edition comic book of each student's work. In September, the comic book will be available on Teen University Web site at www.uwrf.edu/ogs/teenu.

Boortz says a popular feature of Teen University that attracts more students each year is an overnight option in which students stay in campus residence halls. This gives students the chance to live like "real" college students and eat "real" college food. All meals for residents are included in the fees and provided by the University Food Service.

Now in its 22nd summer, the College for Kids program encourages young students who show high academic potential, motivation and talent to attend the college in the future. This year 250 students who had finished grades three to five took various academic enrichment classes each morning during the two-week program.

"We try to accommodate the students and their parents as much as we can to try and get them in the classes of their choice, but we also try to encourage them to take different classes," says program manager Carmen Boortz, "We try to make it a growing experience."

In addition to offering creative and outdoor classes, College for Kids aims to keep promising youth at the top of their class and encourage eventual college enrollment by providing a campus experience along with several academic courses.

"More than 50 percent of the faculty members in the CAFES have had professional international experiences while at the university," says Ridley. "Many of these experiences have also involved participation by undergraduate students."

At the symposium Vasavada spoke about several international education endeavors by the College, including a meat industry study tour to Korea, training for farmers and processors in China, Hungary, Singapore, Malaysia, Nicaragua and Mexico and other outreach efforts. CAFES food science faculty have also participated in the several U.S. Agency for International Development-funded projects at home and abroad and conducted training programs for visiting professionals from East-central Europe and Southeast Asia through the U.S Agency for International Development and the U.S. Department of Agriculture's Cochran Fellowship Program.

The IFT symposium was co-sponsored by its Extension and Outreach, International and Food Microbiology divisions. Founded in 1939, IFT is an international nonprofit scientific society with 28,000 members working in food science, food technology, and related professions in industry, academia and government. IFT is a leading advocate for science on food-related issues, and it advances the science and technology of food through the exchange of knowledge and is a worldwide resource of scientific and professional-based food science and technology information.

Nominated by the American Red Cross national headquarters, Rogers will be joined by the other American representative to the school, Rebecca Hamilton, who is an international law student at Harvard University.

The two-week long course is taught by a respected faculty including a judge from the International Criminal Tribunal for Rwanda, delegates from the International Committee of the Red Cross, and diplomatic, military, and legal scholars from across the world.

A small group of students from English-speaking countries attending the course will explore complexities and realities of implementing the Geneva Conventions in the modern world. The group will visit Auschwitz and The Hague.

Services Division. He has helped the ARC in planning for refugee assistance in the United States, and has been working with an ARC's ISD task force to find ways of introducing content on the Geneva Conventions in American social studies curriculums.

Humanitarian Law," in western Wisconsin schools, and across the nation. Other current Conventions signatory nations are adopting it. The 22-hour curriculum introduces students to the rationales and reasoning for providing basic human rights to combatants, civilians and prisoners of war.

"Our partnership with UW-River Falls to provide the entrepreneurship conference and business plan competition is just one example of how businesses can work with the University to provide opportunities for students that will hopefully translate into real-world experience," says Trudy Popenhagen, community service manager for Xcel. "Ultimately, we hope that the conference will help students consider starting a new business in Wisconsin."

The goal of the conference is to bring together UW System students, faculty, entrepreneurs and business people through the creation of an educational forum aimed at facilitating regional economic development, according to Barbara Nemecek, dean of the College of Business and Economics.

"The conference will stimulate small business development in the state by providing entrepreneurial training to young people, who are our next generation of business leaders," said Nemecek. "Because St. Croix and Pierce counties are among the fastest-growing counties in Wisconsin, and next to a major metropolitan area, UW-River Falls is a prime location for such an endeavor."

Establishing an annual entrepreneurship conference fits well with the College's mission, says Nemecek. "As a state-owned comprehensive regional institution, UW-River Falls is committed to servicing the region and contributing to the cultivation of its economic growth. And entrepreneurial small business is the predominant type of growth occurring in the St. Croix Valley region. Training business students to excel as entrepreneurs in the small business environment is in line with the College's mission."

The conference will include presentations and panels by leading entrepreneurs, breakout sessions led by business executives or faculty on current topics of interest to young entrepreneurs, and networking opportunities for students, faculty and business people. Business people who participate in the conference will benefit by having the opportunity to network with students, as well as mentor and possibly hire future graduates for their organizations, says Nemecek.

The two-day conference will culminate with a business plan competition and other awards. Local economic development organizations are currently considering sponsoring or establishing awards and participating in the conference. The Pierce County Economic Development Corporation has agreed to establish an award for a young entrepreneur in the memory of the late Chancellor Ann Lydecker.

UW-River Falls and other UW schools in the training of future entrepreneurs," says Nemecek. "In a state that is becoming increasingly dependent upon the successful development of new small businesses for its economic growth, this program will provide an additional step in the training of these future entrepreneurs, hopefully encouraging more students to take this career path and be prepared to do it successfully."

Plans for other entrepreneurship endeavors in the College include introducing entrepreneurial components to existing courses, adding new courses, and creating additional knowledge-sharing opportunities like the conference among entrepreneurs, business executives, faculty and students, says Nemecek. In addition, the College hopes to establish an entrepreneurship center, with a mission of research and knowledge-sharing, education, and services for entrepreneurs and other business people.

Popenhagen says Xcel's help in establishing the conference benefits the region as well. "We know the success of our company is directly related to the health of the communities we serve. Our goal is to use our collective knowledge, resources, and skills to meet the needs of our communities and ensure that Xcel Energy's service area is a highly desirable place for all people to live, work, or own a business. Xcel Energy Foundation grants makes possible these partnerships with education, community and arts organizations."

Student Center. From 3 to 4:30 p.m. participants can choose to take a bus tour of campus or view videos spotlighting distinguished alumni, including NASA Astronaut Dan Brandenstein, international explorer Wong How Man or motivational speaker Roxanne Emmerich.

At 11 a.m. Leon Zaborowski, dean of the College of Outreach and Graduate Studies, will give a special presentation on the University's outreach activities as a resource and change agent. Zaborowski is the author of three books, most recently a co-author of "Reaching Learners through Telecommunications."

In addition, the center serves as a field work site for University programs including early childhood education, elementary education, communicative disorders, social work, counseling, school psychology and others.

The center is licensed by the state of Wisconsin and serves children ages six weeks to 10 years regardless of race, color, creed, sex, disability or national origin. It is open year-round from Monday through Friday from 7 a.m. to 6 p.m.

"We teach comprehensive musicianship," says Tjornehoj. "Educators learn how to teach using performance ensembles as a tool rather than a concert as the end result. The goal is to create very solid lesson plans that can be used in the classroom and shared among the participants in their bands, choirs and orchestras."

The workshop adopts a multi-arts approach and utilizes literature and art for inspiration. Says Tjornehoj, "In a more comprehensive approach, you look at each ensemble piece in-depth, analyzing the theory and history, providing a greater understanding that will lead to an enhanced performance."

The training camp will be very similar to those in the past, offering opportunities for fans to get an up-close look into an NFL training camp, says camp coordinator Mary Halada, who noted that after 13 summers, a routine is an asset.

"We were in competition with many Missouri schools [to be the site for this year's training camp]," Halada said. But UW-RF benefited from the Chiefs' and UW-RF's familiarity with each other, as well as exceptional facilities with more improvements on the way. Halada noted the team will be able to use a new residence hall that is set to open in 2005. Also, Gov. Jim Doyle and the Wisconsin Legislature overwhelmingly supported improvements to the Knowles Center, which serves as the team's locker rooms. That improvement also will be completed in 2005.

Wisconsin native Mike Maslowski, a graduate of UW-La Crosse, anchors the Chiefs' defense from his linebacker position where he recorded 79 total tackles a season ago. Head Coach Dick Vermeil enters his fourth season with the Chiefs.

Gates open at 4 p.m. with food, music, games and other activities. An autograph session featuring players and coaches will be from 6:30 to 7 p.m. Practice under the lights will follow the autograph session, and a fireworks display will culminate the festivities.

Competition will begin at 1 p.m. with registration starting at 12:30 at the field, or register online at www.uwrf.edu/chiefs/ppk.form.2004.html. Girls and boys will be divided into six groups (ages 8-13), and everyone will receive a ribbon. Trophies will be given to the top three finishers in each division.

"These are important times in campus protection services," says Stevens. "The federal government has recognized that university campuses are soft targets for terrorism, so it is important for campus security officers to be trained in awareness as they are the first responders in any emergency."

Preparedness for Weapons of Mass Destruction Awareness Training. The organization has just finished the "train-the -trainers" phase of the program with the Academy of Counter-Terrorist Education as Louisiana State University.

IACLEA advances public safety for educational institutions by providing educational resources, advocacy and professional development for its members. Founded in 1958, the organization now has more than 1,600 member institutions in 20 countries.

"On campus, our goal is to make the campus community as safe as possible for study, work and play," Stevens says. "If there is a sense of security then students can study the best they can and make the most of their college experience."

Participants will immerse themselves in a fun-filled, intensive and practical workshop designed to broaden teaching effectiveness and conducting skills with a focus on new techniques and podium poise.

Participants can enroll for two graduate credits or as a non-credit professional development opportunity. Credit tuition rates are approximately $650 for Wisconsin/Minnesota residents plus a $75 course fee. The non-credit option is $495, and a 10% discount is offered to non-credit participants who register and pay with two or more friends.

Says Vice Chancellor and Provost for Academic Affairs Ginny Coombs, "Malzacher has led the library this past year admirably, assisted in the introduction of new technologies, increased services for patrons and worked collaboratively with the other UW-System libraries."

While at UW-River Falls, she assisted with all aspects of a major library remodeling in the mid-1990s. As associate and assistant director, she supervised service areas of the library including circulation, reference, interlibrary loan, reserve and other areas. She also assisted with administrative activities such as budget preparation, public relations, and fundraising.

"Over the years, the library staff has developed a strong program of collections and services for the campus and community," says Malzacher. "We've remodeled our library and strengthened our collections of print and electronic resources.

Prior to joining UW-River Falls, from 1980 to 1992 she was at the University of Nebraska at Kearney as head of reference as well as director of its interloan center, a reference librarian and coordinator of computer search services. She was also an instructor for the university's educational media program as well as the Nebraska Library Commission.

The University of Wisconsin-River Falls is offering a workshop for software engineers who want to learn how to use electronic network technology to increase efficiency and connectivity within their companies.

The workshop will cover the .NET framework and use of modern software development tools and concepts including object-oriented programming, managed execution, Console, graphic-user interface, and Web and database applications. Those attending the class will leave with the skills needed to develop multi-tier applications with Windows and Wed-based front ends.

"Developers who receive this training will be able to greatly expand their knowledge and skills for effectively creating powerful applications that span many platforms," said Professor Hossein Najafi, instructor for the class and a faculty member in the Computer Science and Information Systems Department of the College of Business and Economics.

This technology is being applied among a growing number of businesses to facilitate e-commerce, business intelligence operations, customer relationship management, and enterprise resource planning, he added. Workshop participants will receive personalized training in small groups, hands-on practice in a fully equipped computer lab, and 2.8 continuing education units (CEUs) to be applied toward professional certification requirements.

The workshop fee includes comprehensive training manual, lunch, and an opportunity to network with the college faculty and administrators on the last day. Participants who register by June 16 or with a colleague will save $200 or $300 off the registration fee.

The committee will be chaired by Terry Brown, UW-RF Professor of English. She will be joined by eight other faculty members, two academic staff members, two students, two university administrators and two community members.

"None of us at UW-River Falls thought that we would be preparing for a search for a chancellor at this time," Brown said. "But we will proceed with all due care, with the determination to find the best candidate who is available."

"UW-River Falls will seek a chancellor who has a solid academic background, a willingness to seek understanding from a variety of viewpoints, and a vision to carry forward the important work happening on our campus and through our outreach to the St. Croix Valley," Brown continued. "Our committee is diverse and up to this important charge."

The committee will begin its work this summer and continue through the start of the academic year. It will recommend at least five candidates who could replace Lydecker, who died in a car accident in March. The UW System president and a special committee of the UW System Board of Regents will then conduct final interviews and make a recommendation to the full board.

"This search is especially important to the UW System," Lyall said. "With its location in the Twin Cities metropolitan area, the campus is situated in the fastest growing area of Wisconsin. As the home to one of the System's three schools of agriculture, and its thriving programs in the sciences, arts, humanities, education and business, it will play a critical role in the growth and development of western Wisconsin and meeting the educational needs of its residents."

Lydecker, a dear friend and colleague. When an upsetting racial incident during her tenure presented significant challenges to all UW-RF students, faculty and staff, Coombs brought the community together for important conversations that strengthened relationships across campus.

"Coombs worked to support the continued success of students, faculty and staff and made special efforts to celebrate their achievement. In accepting the position of Interim Chancellor, Coombs has helped UW-RF prepare for a continued tradition of excellence in the future."

Coombs, who has returned to her previous position as Provost and Vice Chancellor for Academic Affairs, was appointed as Interim Chancellor by UW System Katharine Lyall in the hours following Lydecker's death in a traffic accident in rural Pierce County on March 25.

Boneless, a ghostly wraith of the boglands; and Mergatroyd the Merrow, a slippery sea sprite. Rafferty must use his wits as well as his heart to rescue the Moon from the bottom of the Slaney River and return her to her home in the sky.

"St. Croix Valley Summer Theatre has been a part of my life since I was in diapers," says Testa. "My mom's [Emily Lyon-Hansen] involvement in the company allowed me to learn about all aspects of theatre early on. The opportunity to direct 'Rafferty Rescues the Moon' for SCVST is a way to stay involved in a company I believe in. This is the perfect play; it has great characters, witty language, adventure, magic, and live music that children will love and adults will enjoy."

Thayer, who are returning to their summer home on Golden Pond for their 48th year. Norman is an elderly retired professor with heart palpitations and a failing memory--but still tart-tongued, observant and eager for life as ever. Wife Ethel is 10 years younger and the perfect foil for Norman. She delights in all the small things that have enriched and continue to enrich their long life together.

"'On Golden Pond' is a humorous and touching story of love that is both endearing and enduring," says Hill. "It gives us hope that it is never too late to connect with our family, to renew our love, and to grow. Written in the late 1970s, 'On Golden Pond' has become one of the favorites of world theatre and film audiences.

UW-River Falls biology professors Brad and Kim Mogen met and married while undergraduates at the University of Minnesota, and their lifelong connection to the U of M has garnered recent recognition by its Department of Plant Pathology.

Friend of the Department, the first time the annual award has been given to a married couple since its creation in 1987. The award is for "friendship, research collaboration and support, and for promoting intellectual and educational exchange" between the University of Minnesota and the University of Wisconsin-River Falls.

UW-RF students in the Mogens' classes are no strangers to the U of M St. Paul campus and its new Cargill Biotechnology Building and laboratories. Through formal and informal collaborations with the plant pathology department, students have heard from guest speakers, toured the lab facilities, and have seen the workings of the Biodale Imaging Lab's scanning electron microscope, a piece of equipment too costly for UW-RF's primarily teaching laboratories.

The Mogens maintain professional ties to their alma mater, serving as faculty mentors to post-doctoral students at the U, collaborating on research projects, and even obtaining various cultures for use in classroom instruction.

Professor Richard Zeyen, studying the molecular biology of disease-resistant barley. Brad's replacement to teach his courses at UW-RF while on the sabbatical was a Ph.D. student in the plant pathology department at the U of M.

The exchange goes beyond the academic school year as well. Several UW-RF biology and plant science alumni are employees in the department's laboratories, and several graduates have also gone on to graduate studies in the department.

"The competition provides students with an experience which simulates real-world engineering," says Nechville. "This experience is a nine-month project including activities in planning, financing, designing, and fabrication of a product.

They must maximizes torque and horsepower for the 16-horsepower stock engine, which is donated for each team by Briggs and Stratton. A set of tires is donated to each team by Firestone. Teams are then responsible to design their own drive train, frame, steering components and controls.

Teams are judged on the overall power and performance of their pulling tractor as well as on a written design report, an oral presentation, and overall design characteristics of manufacturability, serviceability and safety.

The competition is designed to give students hands-on experience in both the design and manufacturing processes as well as time management and team-building skills. They learn how to manage, finance and document a design program from start to finish as well as to communicate effectively with peers and industry/professional engineers.

"We are quite pleased to learn that the UW-River Falls team placed highest among all others in Wisconsin and Minnesota," said Steve Ridley, Dean of the College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences. "Some of the others are pretty well-known engineering schools."

"UW-RF allows for great exchange programs where I have been fortunate enough to have the opportunity to go on exchange three times," said Clinton, "I have been able to open my education up to influences from a greater range of life expanding experiences."

Clinton enjoys the collaboration of all the traditional arts in theater. "What draws me to theatre is that it combines all the arts, painting, sculpture, textiles, architecture, performance, music, literature and so on. When all of these elements are combined in the right harmony and balance, theatre becomes what I believe can touch each of us on a most personal level. Through my passion as a designer I get to help tell stories about the human condition."

"This award is a wonderful indication of the quality of the education and the quality of students that we have at UW-RF and in the College of Arts and Sciences," said Hedahl. "Moria is an exceptionally talented individual with a very creative vision and an ability to accomplish and execute her artistic ideas."

"Moria is a joy to work with, not just because she is talented, but more importantly because she is passionately committed to excellent theatre, is tenacious and understands the importance of collaboration in the theatrical world," said Murray.

"This is very prestigious award and her win last year attracted some new people to our theatre program. This will give us the opportunity to build on her success, attracting more students into the theatrical design field."

Clinton obtained her skills over several years by working hard and taking advantage of every possible theatre opportunity. She took all costume courses UW-RF had to offer and worked in the costume shop. Then she spent two different semesters on a national student exchange at Humbolt University. There she took courses in millnary and mask-making. She interned at the Utah Shakespeare Festival and the Santa Fe Opera.

Clinton will return this summer to the Santa Fe Opera for a third year. After that she'll go to New York to visit Mehron's Make-up studios, followed by a trip to Los Angeles to attend the Make-up Designory, a school for advance training in make-up design. She plans on attending graduate school in costume design in fall 2005.

Students presented posters or oral presentations on subjects ranging from political science and education to mathematics and molecular biology. UW-RF students' projects represented more than 10 fields or specialties.

SURSCA faculty adviser and biology Professor Timothy Lyden said researching and presenting their findings gives students the chance to apply the knowledge they have learned in the classroom in a hands-on and "minds-on" experience.

The national conference is held at a different location each year and draws approximately 2,500 students, faculty and administrators from across the nation to discuss and participate in a celebration of undergraduate research and scholarly and creative activity.

Taught by UW-RF agronomy Professor Bill Anderson, the courses offer opportunities for participants to hear diverse perspectives and to engage in activities to help them understand and appreciate the issues associated with sustainability.

Participants will examine sustainable agricultural practices such as integrated pest management and discuss current, emerging, and controversial issues such as genetically engineered plants and animals.

The courses will also offer evaluations of different crop nutrient sources and systems. The courses are designed to meet the needs of farmers and practitioners interested in using sustainable agricultural practices, consultants, Extension staff, community members, and agriculture or science teachers.

James Pratt, a speech professor at UW-River Falls, will present a lecture on rhetorical criticism as a tool for good citizenship at 7 p.m. on Thursday, May 6 in the lower level of the River Falls Public Library. The lecture is free and open to the public.

Rhetorical criticism is a practical and useful art that helps in making intelligent decisions, according to Pratt. In classical Greece, rhetoric was universally recognized as the one great art. Moreover, it was an expectation and responsibility of citizenship that people be able to represent themselves in a court of law or to serve as legislators.

"In order to be informed voters and participants in the political process, we must listen to the speeches made of our leaders, evaluate their persuasive appeals and their evidence to determine whether they are credible sources making reasonable claims we should accept," said Pratt.

School children flock around tables overflowing with pencils, backpacks, crayons, books and notebooks. Their eyes shine as they select carefully from the piles of treasure . A group of 26 UW-River Falls students traveled to Belize for 12 days during spring break, led by anthropology Professor Ed Robins. They brought school supplies with them to give to local school children in the village of Cristo Rey in the Cayo District of western Belize.

Students spent about $10 each and selected which school supplies to bring with them, Robins said. The principal set up tables and arranged the school supplies, and students lined up, said a prayer of thanks for the gifts, then performed a skit for the UW-RF entourage.

Amanda Hirsch, a senior psychology major from Menomonie, said even though she didn't get to see the children react to the gifts (only a limited number of students went to the school), she feels good about the donation.

Robins said the trip gives students an international experience where they can see how people live in another country, learn more about conservation and the environment, become global citizens and learn by doing.

While in Belize, they visited Mayan temples, hiked in the jungle, explored caves where they saw the remains of Mayan rituals and human sacrifices, canoed, biked, snorkeled and took a manatee tour, among other activities.

To get into the cave, students had to swim across a deep pool while wearing hard hats with lights. Grosek said they were walking or swimming in an underground river the whole way. They also saw skeletons, which are believed to be the remnants of human sacrifices or accidents.

Brianna Larson, a junior biomedical major from St. Anthony, Minn., said her two favorites parts of the trip were visiting Actun Tunichil Miknal and Tikal, an ancient Mayan civilization over the border in Guatemala.

"We celebrate our retirees as they look forward to new opportunities, varied and exciting experiences, and time," said Coombs in recognizing their more than 325 years of combined service. "However, we will miss seeing these people on a regular basis and will miss their contributions, but we trust that you will continue to remain connected to the campus and will return often to see colleagues, friends and students."

Benedict was hired by the University in 1977, but her connections go back to attending kindergarten at the University Lab School in 1952. She was formerly assistant director of Housing and Food Services, and for the past 17 years she has served as the director of University Food Service Operations/Campus Card Office. She was instrumental in converting the University to an electronic I.D. system. Most recently she served as the contract manager for the University Follett Bookstore, the Westconsin Credit Union on campus, and Food and Beverage Vending. In 1989 she received the Chancellor's Award for Excellence for Academic Staff. She has shared her expertise on such diverse topics as Women in Leadership and Card Access Systems at national conferences as well as to the University of Wisconsin System Board of Regents.

Brohaugh has deep roots at UW-RF; he earned his bachelor's degree on the campus in 1961. He joined the English department as a faculty member in 1976. For nine years Brouhaugh coordinated the Freshman English program. Over the last 20 years, he has influenced virtually all English majors through the required Shakespeare course plus the courses in Shakespeare and film, British literature and modern drama. His talents as an actor and vocal interpreter of literature brought Shakespeare to life to enthralled students. He continues to appear on the UW-RF stage, in such recent productions as "Romeo and Juliet" and "The 1940s Radio Hour."

Emmett arrived on campus in 1991 to assume coordination of field experiences for the College of Education and Professional Studies. She coordinated and supervised the school counseling practicum and internship students at the end of their academic preparation.

Foust came to UW-RF in 1985 to teach in the business administration department in the College of Arts and Sciences and retires as marketing professor in the College of Business and Economics. Foust was instrumental in helping to grow the business administration major from a department into its own college. During those years he was the department chair and the associate director of the School of Business and helped establish the Master's of Management Program. He also served as vice-chair of Faculty Senate. Foust has also been involved in the Pierce County Economic Development Corp., the Small Business Development Center, the Pierce County Revolving Load Fund Board and the River Falls Area Hospital Board of Trustees.

As a professor in the mathematics department specializing in mathematics education and statistics, Mealy taught undergraduate and graduate courses since 1970, although his first experience on campus was teaching during the 1966-67 academic year. He also served three years as the director of the Academic Computer Center.

He also shared expertise off-campus through continuing education classes in computer science for teachers across northwestern Wisconsin. He coordinated department presentations and was a frequent lecturer on mathematics to visiting high school students for Science Day activities and was a statistical consultant for the faculty and community. He and his wife, Julie, live in River Falls, and their two children are UW-RF alumni.

Morrow has been a member of UW-RF's family since 1980. Since 1989 she has been a program assistant in the Internship Office of the College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences. Jean says her career highlight has been working with students and helping them find meaningful internships and acting as a liaison between students and faculty to help ensure students are working with the correct faculty member.

Peterson has worked for housekeeping services in residence life since 1976 and retires from his position as Lead Worker. He has had thousands of conversations and interactions with students over the years, and says he has enjoyed those years of working with a very professional and fun staff. People have noted that Peterson would always go the extra mile to help staff and students.

He also helped develop the biotechnology major, and was recognized for his efforts by the UW System for being part of the outstanding program. While at UW-RF, he took a year sabbatical to Kenya, East Africa, publishing two papers about the experience in the journal "Horticulture." Neel was a founding member of the Pi Alpha Xi national honorary horticulture society on campus and a founding member of the UW-RF Chapter of the National Honor Society of Phi Kappa Phi.

Communication and Theater Arts Department and was named Outstanding Teacher in the Humanities in the College of Arts and Sciences in 1989. He also participated in the Wisconsin in Scotland teaching program in 1993. Over the years he was actively involved in faculty governance and University committees as well as accreditation reviews from NCATE and DPI. He has also hosted speech communication workshops for various high schools and judged forensic and debate tournaments.

Courses are available for college students, education and business professionals and community members. Advantages to taking summer courses include accelerating the completion of a degree program; completing a summer internship for credit; and unique learning from special courses and study abroad trips.

Leslie was chosen for the award based on his quality academic work and his sensitive, responsive teaching during his field experience placements. As part of his academic requirements, he was assigned to more than 300 hours of field experience placements in elementary and middle school classrooms prior to student teaching.

His professors describe him as a conscientious and hardworking person who is continually analyzing and reflecting on his authentic teaching practices. His professors also cited his dedication and caring ways, recalling how he wrote letters to his students after he was unexpectedly called away from a field placement for an overseas military assignment last spring.

"We have a challenge, I think, in this state, and that is to match the evolution that we are making from a low-tuition, low-aid state to an average-tuition, low-aid state by evolving a new financial aid policy for Wisconsin," Lyall said.

"It is time for us to work with our legislators and our governor to ensure that our students will have the kind of financial access to our system that they need to have if we are going to continue to serve low- and moderate-income students."

"UW-River Falls and the state of Wisconsin are both better places today because of President Lyall's leadership," Coombs said. "She will be greatly missed; but she leaves a tremendous legacy behind her."

Although he will miss the changing seasons of Wisconsin's climate, he certainly won't be longing for frigid temperatures and patches of ice. Neel broke his ankle a few years ago in three places after slipping on ice between the library and his office. "A man walking 20 or so feet behind me heard my ankle crack," said Neel who needed three screws in his ankle to hold the bones together.

Neel's accomplishments at UW-RF include developing the plant tissue culture course and getting its laboratory funded and functioning as well as helping to develop the biotechnology major. Neel was also a founding member of the UW-RF chapter of Pi Alpha Xi national honorary horticulture society and a founding member of the UW-RF chapter of the National Honor Society of Phi Kappa Phi.

Neel said his most memorable experience as a faculty member was his yearlong sabbatical in Kenya, East Africa. He went there as part of a exchange program for American and Kenyan teachers. He stayed in the small town of Njoro, which was near a national game park and wildlife preserve.

American Society of Horticulture Science, about his African adventure, in collaboration with the Kenyan teacher who was his counterpart in the exchange. He has enjoyed his time at UW-RF, but what stands out most in his mind is "being able to help influence the lives and careers of so many students for all these years and seeing their success in the region."

Neel also appreciates his time spent with UW-RF faculty and staff. "It was fun being an integral part of a team-oriented, cohesive yet diverse department and college," he said. Neel earned a bachelor's degree from Fresno State College and a master's degree and doctorate from the University of California-Davis.

Since 1985 the college has annually recognized three outstanding teachers, one from each of its three divisions: Arts and Humanities, Sciences and Mathematics and the Social Sciences. In 2002, the CAS Student Advisory Committee decided to create an award to recognize outstanding advisors in the college in a similar manner. Comprised of one student representative from each major in the college, the committee meets with the dean to share news and concerns affecting students and the college. Many of these students have had very positive experiences with faculty, and they wanted a way to recognize those who had provided significant help. During registration this spring, students were asked to nominate candidates.

Akron, an M.M. from Northwestern University and a D.M.A. from the University of Georgia. A student wrote: "Dr. Barnett will always be willing to take time out of his long busy days to sit down with his student to make sure all is going well at UW-RF. Being a freshmen can get very frustrating while trying to figure out what classes to take for my returning year, but with Dr. Barnett's great assistance in figuring out what classes to not only take next semester but for the rest of my time at River Falls has made everything a lot easier. He's also the kind of adviser that checks in on you throughout the semester, not just when it's time to sign up for classes. He has made my freshmen year a success and makes every day brighter."

One physics student said: "Dr. Blodgett goes above and beyond the call of duty in being my adviser. He has also become a mentor to me and has led me in the right direction during the entire time since I have declared my physics major.

He always has an ear to listen, and since my mother passed away in January 2004, he has been there for me. Dr. Blodgett sincerely listens to what I have to say and offers his advice in a non-threatening way. He always has wonderful ideas about how I can make myself feel better and therefore, live better. No matter what kind of day I am having or how busy Dr. Blodgett is, he always makes time for me to talk about life, homework, daily physics 'stuff' or whatever. He has made such an impact not only in my physics major, but also in my life. His outlook on diversity has made me respect him all the more. Dr. Blodgett has also helped me make huge decisions in my life, and without him, I would've had anyone else to talk to about it."

Karolides, English department; Mark Berglund, biology department; and Ed Peterson, history department. The service awards are presented for university, community and professional service. Recipients include: Wes Chapin, political science department, Brad Caskey, psychology department, and James Pratt, speech communication and theater arts department.

"Clearly, there are many individuals who contribute in countless ways to the work of this College," said Dean Gorden Hedahl at the awards ceremony and wall dedication. "This wall only marks the beginning of our attempts to celebrate the work of the many people who help to make this campus an outstanding place for our students, colleagues and visitors."

Since 1985, the College has given awards for excellence in teaching, selected by recent graduates and announced in the fall. Since 2002, the College has also given awards for excellence in advising, selected by current students and awarded each spring.

Bergland has more than 30 professional publications, including articles, monographs and published computer software. He has also obtained grants, including four consecutive grants from the National Science Foundation for 15 years of support, totaling $828,000. His nomination letter notes: His consecutive grants "speak to the innovative nature of his project-- he has numerous publications in high-quality science education and educational research journals. Through dozens of presentations and workshops, biology educators around the world have been exposed to the Case-It software. The impact of this project on science education worldwide has been well documented."

Brad Caskey has coordinated annual food and clothing drives for Psi Chi (psychology honorary organization) and the Psychology Society. He has also coordinated an annual Adopt a Family program for the department to donate items for needy local families. Caskey has an impressive list of presentations for local high schools, youth groups, professional associations, nursing homes, churches and parenting programs. He has served as a science fair judge and worked with youth groups and as a volunteer tutor. He is the board president for the River Falls United Way. For all of his contributions, he was nominated as a Community Champion by the River Falls Chamber of Commerce last year. He serves as a great example of the ways in which the faculty at the University extend their expertise and talents into the community and region . Chapin began working for the University when he was an undergraduate, serving in numerous capacities including student government chair and campus representative at several statewide meetings. As a faculty member, he has been active in a number of faculty committees and organizations, including Faculty Senate and other campus committees. His most significant contributions have come in the area of international education. According to one letter of nomination: "When he began his duties [as coordinator of the international studies minor] the program had a nearly unworkable curriculum, no budget and only six students.

Chapin has organized several successful conferences on globalization and serves as the advisor to the International Strategy Organization and the International Relations Club. That group has won several top awards at the Model United Nations competitions in the Midwest over the past four years.

James Pratt has made vital contributions to two national associations in his discipline as well as several regional and state associations. One nominator wrote: "The American Forensics Association, the International Listening Association and the Wisconsin Communication Association would be very different organizations were it not for Jim's contributions." In these organizations, Pratt has held positions such president, secretary, executive secretary, executive director and conference organizer for international events for this organizations. Colleagues and fellow officers from around the country have honored his work over the past 30 years.

Maria Francesca McGinnis, a marketing communications major with an agricultural emphasis from St. Paul, Minn., delivered the 9:30 a.m. commencement address to graduates of the College of Food and Environmental Sciences, College of Business and Economics and Graduate Studies. Kelly Hendrickson, a biology major with a pre-medicine focus from Cloquet, Minn., gave the 2 p.m. commencement address to the graduates of the College of Arts and Science and the College of Education and Professional Studies.

McGinnis' speech, "Life's Road Map," reflected on the positive effects of college in shaping a person's life. "The unique aspect of college that cannot be found in any other area of life is that we have had the freedom to make mistakes and find the courage, support and resources to fix them. These mistakes, as well as triumphs, have taught us how to be mature, informed and contributing members of society. We are not only graduating today with a degree, but with a road map for life."

McGinnis concluded, "The faculty, staff, administration and students have been the focus of our lives for so long, that it is hard to imagine life without them. After spending the last four years of my life here, I have grown into a person that I am proud to be today, and I know that River Falls has played a huge role in that."

Hendrickson's speech, "Lessons Learned," highlighted the values of a university education including the learning that is accomplished outside of the formal classroom. She compared the university experience with travel and exploration.

"It's hard to describe the journey of college," Hendrickson said. "Only after the journey do we see the effect." She cited a list of lessons outside of the classroom, including the benefits of residence hall life, the embracement of diversity, the importance of agreeing to disagree and the futility of anger as a response.

"Congratulations! Today is your day, you're off to great places, you're off and away. You have brains in your head, you have feet in your shoes, you can steer yourself in any direction you choose. You're on your own and you know what you know, and you are the guy who'll decide where to go. So be sure where you step, step with care and great tact, and remember that life's a great balancing act. Just never forget to be dexterous and deft, and never mix up your right foot with your left."

The UW-River Falls 2004 Summer Concert Series features music for all ages and tastes, from rousing rockabilly and progressive bluegrass to world music with attitude and big band with class. Free and open to the public, all concerts are at 7 p.m. the day of the performance in the open-air Melvin Wall Amphitheater on campus or in the North Hall Auditorium in case of rain.

Tangled Roots is described as traditional yet original and progressive. The members of Tangled Roots consist of some of the best-known Bluegrass performers in the upper Midwest and together they bring to the stage over a century of musical experience.

Scott (Blues). Keith Scott is one of Chicago's most vibrant musicians. For the past 20 years he has built his reputation as a sizzling blues guitarist, dynamic performer, noteworthy songwriter, and bandleader. Scott has toured throughout the United States and Europe both with his band and with blues great Jimmy Dawkins.

The Kids from Wisconsin perform about 70 shows a year each summer at fairs, festivals and conventions throughout North America, and as a nonprofit organization have raised thousands of dollars for charitable organizations in the state.

There are several sports camps being held at UW-River Falls this summer for students interested in improving their individual and team skills. Camps will be held in football, girls volleyball, and boys and girls basketball. There are three football camps - Kickers, Wishbone and Big O & Big D. The Kickers Camp is June 19-21 and will feature Baltimore Ravens special teams coach Gary Zauner. The goal of the camp is to improve every punter and kicker by maximizing repetition and perfecting each individual style.

Concepts implemented will include 3-4 person serve reception, transition and free ball plays, hitter coverage, and rotational defense. Camp will be limited to 16 teams. Each team must have a minimum of six players and a maximum of eight players. All team camp registrations must be sent together in a single envelope as a team. It is for girls in grades 9-12.

From conception, Molly was known as "the miracle baby." The Hansons had tried to have a child before Pat's bout with breast cancer forced them to forgo attempts to create a family in the usual way. They had adopted two daughters, Tina and Maya, from Honduras, who were preschoolers when Molly was born.

The pregnancy came as a surprise to the Hansons. Although doctors offer amniocentesis to all mothers over age 35 to detect birth defects, Pat didn't want to risk her pregnancy knowing there was a chance of spontaneous abortion with amniocentesis, the most accurate test for genetic abnormalities. Moreover, Pat, who was raised in the Catholic faith and had no intention of aborting her baby.

In addition to Down's syndrome, Molly had numerous health complications at birth: a hole in her heart, a collapsed lung, and jaundice. Initially, the Hansons decided to leave the hospital without Molly. Two days later, they went back to get her. To complicate matters, Molly was later diagnosed with Autism and Attention Deficit Hyperactivity Disorder.

In a serious yet lighthearted manner, Hanson's book chronicles the strains on friends and family such as those who stuck with the Hansons and those who didn't; struggles to obtaining adequate and safe respite care and personal care assistance; and obstacles to obtain out-of-home placement, as well as the bureaucracy associated with getting care for the disabled. It also highlights the joys and happiness of a family working together.

"This is a triumphant story of survival," says Hanson. Today, Molly, who at age 13 lives with her family weekends and in a private foster home weekdays, is thriving. She attends junior high school and likes to read, play adaptive soccer and softball, and sing in her school choir.

Noted author Carol Bly says of the book, "Pat's strengths are pacey story-telling, vivid scenes full of absolutely gripping dialogue, a fine authorial voice full of rightful anger at bad practices or lack of desperately needed services--and equally ready to give praise to devoted professionals and others deserving of it."

The alliance is seeking input from city, village and township governments, chambers of commerce, arts associations, tourism associations, and individuals and businesses in Polk, St. Croix and Pierce counties of Wisconsin.

The alliance has received a federal Community Development Block Grant administered by the Wisconsin Department of Commerce for economic development planning related to tourism diversification. The City of St. Croix Falls will serve as the fiscal agent for the grant.

Hoffelt submitted an application and written essay on how FFA makes a positive difference in the lives of students by developing leadership, personal growth and career success through agricultural education. The CAFES scholarship committee evaluated the essays. Hoffelt's contest area was livestock evaluation, where he received the highest individual score and a superior rating. He has been accepted for fall 2004 admission to UW-RF, majoring in animal science.

"Through our community forums held this winter we found remarkable excitement and enthusiasm from St. Croix Valley residents to identify and address as a region the challenges and opportunities that growth is bringing.

The topics were selected from more than a dozen problems identified in regional studies of the St. Croix Valley conducted by Twin Cities foundations. The three selected topics were recommended by a community forums advisory group of regional leaders.

Coombs particularly encourages community leaders to attend representing such areas as non-profit organizations, government, education, the business community, civic organizations, as well as individual members of the general public.

UW-River Falls will hold a health fair on April 14, from 10 a.m. to 2 p.m. in the Karges Gymnasium. The event is free and open to the public. It will feature health related testing, demonstrations, live music and door prizes. The goal of the health fair is to encourage a commitment to healthy lifestyles on the UW-RF campus and the River Falls community.

The event includes cholesterol screening, hearing screening, blood pressure testing, blood sugar testing, massage, fitness assessments including body composition, tobacco quit kits, pet therapy, aromatherapy and other health related education.

Visitors to the health fair will gain insights on becoming aware of their own personal health status while obtaining knowledge on a variety of health-related topics. People can also learn about health-related resources and initiatives available on the UW-RF campus and in the River Falls community.

One of the most successful composers of his generation, Torke has been hailed by the New York Times as "a master orchestrator whose shimmering timbral palette makes him the Maurice Ravel of his generation."

Music faculty Patti Cudd, who coordinates the selection of each year's commissioned composer, said that when she was a student at UW-RF she didn't realize the renowned reputations of the visiting composers.

Roy says that the program is especially beneficial to students. "Students must be involved for the continuation of the program. It would be a shame if it ever came to an end after 30 some years," Roy said.

Strossen has written, lectured and practiced extensively in the areas of constitutional law, civil liberties and international human rights. Named president in 1991, she is the first woman to head the ACLU, the nation's largest and oldest civil liberties organization.

Strossen is also an accomplished author and has earned several prestigious awards, including being the first American woman to win the Jaycees International's Outstanding Young Persons of the World award.

When most people think of geology, the subjects of ethics, professional development or service-learning probably don't come to mind. But those subjects are very much on the minds of UW-River Falls geology faculty, who are making them an integral part of the geology program.

Professor Ian Williams says that while the topics of ethics, professional development and service-learning may emerge in other classes, those subjects have not been an integral part of any specific course. "We all thought someone else was dealing with it in their courses," Williams said.

To meet the new professional development requirement, students must attend one professional geology-related conference, such as the Institute for Lake Superior Geology or the Minnesota Ground Water Association . Students must also attend a day-long conference or field trip. Also required is attending a minimum of three visiting-scientist or faculty professional talks held at UW-RF or a comparable institution.

Both Williams and Baker note frustration with student attendance at such events in the past. "Only a third of the people you expect to go show up," Williams said. "It's good role-modeling for our students to see professionals giving good talks."

The geology faculty believes attending these events is important because it will be a part of students' future careers and is an excellent way to network with professionals and possibly find internships.

Students must complete eight hours of volunteer activities for the service-learning requirement. Opportunities to fulfill this need range from sandbagging flooded areas and making displays at rock and mineral shows to mentoring other students or helping with Earth Week activities.

Along with the service-learning portion of the curricula, students must complete and document two job explorations, such as spending a day with a geoscience professional or a geoscience-related organization. For example, a student could spend a day at the Geology Natural History Survey or at a gold mine in Nevada.

Professors will cover research, field and professional ethics, such as accurate data reporting, asking permission before exploring land, or knowing when to release earthquake warnings so as not to unnecessarily alarm the public.

Students will compile a portfolio from the experiences in the new program requirements. Faculty members said the portfolio will give students an edge in the job market. "We want to promote student responsibility," said Middleton.

"There has been a misconception by the public of science. No one knows what academics do," Middleton said. "Some people believe that science is done by bespectacled people in white coats. We're not just academics in the ivory tower."

The award is presented annually to a non-instructional staff member who successfully fulfills the responsibilities of his or her position, participates in university service projects and has an excellent attitude. Nominations come from faculty, students and staff.

This award is given annually to a non-instructional staff member who has successfully fulfilled his or her job responsibilities, participated in university service projects and had an exceptional attitude. Students, staff and faculty nominate the recipients.

Voiles has worked in the admissions office since August, 1995. She is involved in all facets of the admissions process, such as speaking with prospective students, assembling recruitment materials and registering students.

"Knowledge is important, and when combined with a positive attitude and a welcoming demeanor, one's effective working knowledge seems to be multiplied into another dimension. It is this dimension in which Monica operates," Ridley said.

"We have suffered an enormous shock 10 days ago," said Coombs of the death of Chancellor Ann Lydecker March 25. "The grieving process will continue, and it will be both personal and collective. There is no timeline for such a process, nevertheless, there were many projects and scheduled events in the works at the time of Ann's death. Some of these need to be attended to now, and others will wait a bit."

"Whereas Ann M. Lydecker was a highly respected and graceful leader, a talented and dedicated educator, and a woman of extraordinary compassion, radiant warmth and genuine spirit; and Whereas Lydecker served admirably for three years as the 14th chancellor of the University of Wisconsin-River Falls and was the first woman to serve in that role in the campus' 130-year history; and Whereas the genuine enthusiasm and unwaivering commitment to improving lives in education Ann elevated the stature and scope of UW-River Falls where she inspired faculty, staff and countless students to continually pursue their passions and reach their fullest potential; and Whereas Lydecker contributed significantly to the university's role in regional economic and cultural development through the work with organizations including the Governor's Council on Workforce Investment and the River Falls Economic Development Corporation; and Whereas in addition to her service as chancellor, Lydecker's lifelong commitment to education included roles as a sixth-grade teacher, an assistant and associate professor of education at Gustavus Adolphus College, professor and chair of the curriculum and instruction department at Minnesota State University-Mankato, founding dean of the School of Education and Professional Studies and provost and vice president for academic affairs at Bridgewater State College; and Whereas Lydecker was active in local, state and national education organizations helping to chart the future of the UW System, enhance educational excellence, ensure a more seamless educational system; and Whereas Ann's contributions to higher education, UW-River Falls, the University of Wisconsin System, the St. Croix Valley region, the state and the nation are immeasurable; and Whereas we lost a valued colleague, an inspiring role model, a vibrant leader, and beloved friend when Ann Lydecker died in an auto accident on March 25, 2004.

On April 2, Coombs and UW System President Katherine Lyall met to discuss transition issues for the campus, including the search process for the vice chancellor for administration, a position vacated by Virgil Nylander, who recently retired.

Coombs will continue as interim chancellor through at least the end of spring semester. She will also continue her duties as provost as well, with additional support from deans and other administrators. Other searches for faculty-staff positions will proceed as planned.

Governor James Doyle will visit campus at the end of April to sign S. 474, which was approved the day of Lydecker's death. The bill authorizes the Hunt-Knowles renovation/expansion as part of the Kansas City Chiefs' summer camp negotiations.

Finally, Coombs lauded staff and student efforts and thanked the campus community in the face of recent graffiti threats of violence. On March 20, graffiti threatening a "Columbine-style" action for March 31 against a campus group was found in a local restaurant. Then on March 29, a nonspecific threat was found on a whiteboard in Johnson Hall. Local law enforcement are investigating the incidents, and increased campus security measures were set in place.

"In the midst of our sorrow over Chancellor Lydecker's death we had to deal with this very real threat," said Coombs. "The student development staff met with students the week of March 22. Chancellor Lydecker was aware of the [March 20] graffiti incident and she and [River Falls] Chief [Roger] Leque issued a joint statement deploring this kind of development."

"Police officers from the Madison campus complimented our students on the turnout," said Coombs. "Students, faculty, staff, citizens of the local community and all the speakers at the rally were clearly outraged at the appearance of the graffiti."

Classes were held without incident on March 31. "I want to thank the faculty who were flexible about class on Wednesday," said Coombs. "Many students whom I spoke with on Tuesday night said they would go to class because to stay away was to admit defeat."

Virgil Nylander, recently retired vice chancellor for administration and finance, will return to the University to serve as interim chancellor effective June 1, and Mary Halada, interim vice chancellor for administration and finance, has been appointed vice chancellor for administration and finance effective immediately.

"After careful consideration and discussion with President Lyall, I have decided that I will not seek candidacy for the chancellor's position at UW-RF," says Coombs, who was named interim chancellor after the death of Chancellor Ann Lydecker March 25. "I will return to my position as provost and vice chancellor on June1 and continue in that position through the 2004-05 academic year."

Halada have agreed to form the senior management team to lead UW-RF during the coming transition," said Lyall. "UW-RF offers excellent educational opportunities to students who want to prepare for 21st century jobs and lives. This UW institution will continue to be a special part of the UW System, fulfilling a critical role for students and families in western Wisconsin and Minnesota. The senior management team has my full support as we work together to move UW-RF forward."

Coombs is pleased to work closely again with Nylander and continue working with Halada. "Virgil, Mary and I have worked well together these past three years, and we are committed to provide a smooth transition for the new chancellor," said Coombs.

Nylander, who retired in January, joined UW-RF in 1969 as a faculty member in the psychology department. He served as department chair and later as associate dean of the College of Education before joining the administration in 1987 as assistant chancellor for administration. Nylander earned his doctorate in experimental physiological psychology from Iowa State University and bachelor's and master's degrees in psychology from Colorado State University.

Prior to her interim appointment to replace the position created by Nylander's retirement as vice chancellor for business and finance, Halada was the assistant to the vice chancellor and budget officer at UW-RF. She had also worked as director of auxiliary reporting and food service and assistant to the director of auxiliary services at UW-RF. Additionally, Halada has been the camp coordinator for the Kansas City Chiefs Summer Training Camp at UW-RF since it began in 1991. Halada has a master's degree in management and administration from the Metropolitan State University in St. Paul and a B.A. in business administration from Grove City College in Pennsylvania.

Tuchtenhagen said he was surprised about receiving the award. "I had no idea that I had been nominated," said Tuchtenhagen. "It was very gratifying to me that the nomination came from a group of senior faculty members. I am very appreciative of their kind thoughts."

Terry Ferriss, professor of plant and earth science, said Tuchtenhagen's office is one of the "most professional and user-friendly" offices on campus. "Students love to work for the admissions office," she said.

Others cited his professionalism as well. "Having worked with Alan during all summer registrations for many years, I have personally witnessed his enthusiasm, professionalism and regard for colleagues, students and their parents," said Nan Jordahl, associate professor of communicative disorders and director of faculty and student academic support programs.

Douglas Johnson, biology professor and assistant dean of the College of Arts and Sciences, notes Tuchtenhagen's service to the campus as a member of Faculty Senate and the Academic Staff Council. "Alan has been a significant contributor to many areas of university life, always willing to serve effectively on various committees and task forces," he said. "And in the face of changing enrollment demands and requirements, he has been creative, innovative and remarkably effective."

His responsibilities include supervising student enrollment-related functions and serving on the University Enrollment Management Committee, coordinating both institutional and UW System enrollment objectives. He is also responsible for international student admissions, multicultural outreach and long-range enrollment forecasting.

Coombs cites Tuchtenhagen's "can-do" attitude. "Alan is not afraid to take on a challenge," she said. "In the spring of 2001 he responded to a request to recruit and admit more students who would pursue high-tech majors such as computer science and information systems and biotechnology, and he was successful.

He's a can-do professional. And with good humor, he manages situations such as when prospective students and their families get parking tickets when they don't park in designated spots, or when a heavy snowfall covers the grounds on the day of a scheduled campus visit."

He is a past committee chair for the Boy Scout Troop 54 and is the citizenship merit badge counselor for four area troops. He also serves on the First Congregational United Church of Christ Senior Pastor Call Committee.

Before coming to UW-RF in 1986, Tuchtenhagen held numerous academic and support positions that include the coordinator of pre-enrollment service at Iowa State University; assistant director of admissions at the University of Montana; associate, assistant and acting dean of students at Westmar College; and admissions counselor at Midland Lutheran College. He also was a field representative for U.S. Sen.

Typically, recipients are juniors and seniors and nominated by a faculty or academic staff member or their student peers through the Student Senate. Each nominee is considered by a committee that reports directly to the chancellor.

JoAnna Arguello is a senior majoring in psychology. Arguello was nominated by Academic Success Center Director Phil George. Arguello served as president of Alpha Sigma Alpha, and on the leadership team of InterVarsity Christian Fellowship.

A McNair Scholar, Arguello's academic research included acculturation strategies and retention factors among freshman college students, which led to opportunities helping facilitate two freshman seminars with the University. Arguello has been active in the Big Brothers and Big Sisters program and volunteered with Relay for Life for the past two years.

Bryan Sanders in the University Advancement Office. She is currently in the second term as president for the sorority Sigma Sigma Sigma and serves as the president of the Student Advancement Association.

She initiated the Falcon for a Day program at local elementary schools, serves as a campus tour guide and has participated in Dance Theater for the last two years. Bryan also served as the Relay for Life committee team recruitment chair and volunteers for the campus blood drive each year.

Ashley Ryan Hawke is a senior majoring in art education. Hawke was nominated for the Chancellor's Award by Robert Baker, chairperson of the plant and earth science department. Hawke has been involved in many University activities and programs. Currently, he is a resident assistant in Crabtree Hall.

He initiated and was president of the Ultimate Frisbee Club. Hawke is currently organizing a group that will help beautify UW-RF, through a series of murals and mosaics, and he is working on getting a campus Disc Golf course installed along the paths of the South Fork.

Mike Stifter. Roggenbuck has been active in many areas of the University, especially in Residence Life. Currently she is the hall manager in Johnson Hall and served as a resident assistant for two years in Hathorn and Grimm halls. In addition she has been active in the National Residence Hall Honorary, Wisconsin University Residence Hall Association, Relay for Life and the Dance Marathon.

The class will highlight the differences between film and digital photography, explore pixels and resolution, provide tips on improved picture taking as well as how to store, retrieve, modify and print images.

Participants will have an opportunity to practice image manipulation using a common software that works on both Windows and Macintosh computers. Participants should bring their digital cameras and the instruction manuals.

"On Golden Pond," by Ernest Thompson, is about a retired English professor and his wife who return to visit their summer cottage. Upon arriving they are met with unexpected surprises, including their estranged daughter, who hopes to forge a meaningful relationship with her father before it's too late. The play was made into an Oscar-winning film starring Henry Fonda, Katharine Hepburn and Jane Fonda.

The play follows the adventures of Rafferty, a young Irish boy who sets out to rescue the moon after it has been swallowed by the terrible Great Fish. While on his journey, he meets many interesting creatures from Irish folklore.

Caskey will be recognized as the fifth recipient of the award at the University's annual awards ceremony April 13. The award was established in 2000 to an outstanding faculty adviser with nominations by graduating seniors and alumni. These nominations are then considered by the Faculty Senate Advising Committee, which makes the final selection.

"In truth, however, this individual distinction is only possible because I am in a department that views advising as a critical element of its mission and am surrounded by superb colleagues who strive to effectively advise every psychology major and minor on the campus."

"Dr. Caskey has consistently demonstrated his concern for and commitment to our students, and was among the first faculty recognized for outstanding advising by the College of Arts and Sciences," said Gorden Hedahl, dean of the college.

"There has been universal praise for his caring and personal interactions for both current and past students. It is appropriate that he has been honored for both teaching and advising excellence by the university, and he continues to provide a model for excellence as a faculty member in every area of his work."

He has taught 12 courses, both undergraduate and graduate, for UW-RF. As an adviser, he assists 50-100 students each semester and serves as an independent study research adviser for all psychology majors and minors. He also serves on graduate students' committees. He has mentored two McNair scholars and has been involved in the all-campus minority student mentoring program. He has authored several successful grants for laboratory improvement and developed and administered surveys regarding collaboration efforts across the campus.

Contending Ideas and Opinions in Life Span Developmental Psychology." He is currently co-authoring a text on child and adolescent development. His articles have appeared in Applied Psycholinguistics and Child Development, and he has presented professionally at conferences in the United States and Canada.

He has been a reviewer for the Journal of Educational Psychology and is currently a reviewer for the Chi Journal of Undergraduate Research as well as several major psychology textbook publishers including Prentice Hall, Brooks Cole, Allyn & Bacon, and Wadsworth Publishing.

Frankenfield is the chief executive officer of Magenic Technologies, Inc., a premier software development company that provides business and technical advice to a variety of clients. Magenic has offices located all over the United States, including Atlanta, Minneapolis, Boston and San Francisco.

Davis of Minneapolis, Minn., had a highly-publicized transition from being a man to a woman. She retired after 32 years of teaching and now serves as the executive director for the Gender Education Center, which is a small non-profit organization of differently gendered people dedicated to support, advocacy, and education.

April 27, 8 p.m. The presentation is titled "Ethnic Man." The one-person show will address the enigma of cultural, racial and ethnic identity. Using verse, slides, humor and character studies based on his own life experiences, the presenter will challenge the questions of what it means to be American.

Moss is the End of Racism Comedy Tour." The presenter, Preacher Moss, has played to the hearts and minds of college students and administrators all over the country. His insight on "racial understanding vs. racial interaction" has made him popular on the college scene today.

Reader's Choice award of Best Musician in the Twin Cities from Lavender Magazine, will perform her playful and humorous songs. Known for her vibrant and open-hearted nature, she is an engaging and dynamic singer, songwriter and guitarist.

"More than half a million Wisconsin citizens are proud members of our UW community," said UW System President Katharine C. Lyall. "They are literally in every community and every public and private enterprise in Wisconsin. We know that the UW System has a $10 billion annual impact on Wisconsin's economy, but that seems an abstraction to most people. However, when you actually see who our alumni are, the university's impact becomes much more apparent.

"I am very appreciative that our alumni associations came up with this idea to show the reach of our UW alumni, faculty, staff, students and parents and to celebrate our campuses and their achievements."

The publicity campaign was in conjunction for the Alliance's "Celebrate Winter on the Sparkling St. Croix," which received grant funding from the Wisconsin Department of Tourism and the Minnesota Office of Tourism.

"This project drew on the talents of many people in the St. Croix Valley who told a compelling story of what the region has to offer in winter tourism. Winter time is historically a 'shoulder season' when businesses are economically stressed.

The kit included news releases on such activities as state parks recreational activities, down hill skiing, community events and festivals, arts and cultural activities, hot air ballooning and a lodging directory. The CD provided the releases in electronic format, along with photographs and a 90-second movie featuring Valley attractions.

Kinders, who coordinated the campaign, noted the "Celebrate Winter" campaign was launched three years ago in response to the economic stress on the regional industry as a result of the September 11th attacks, a deteriorating economy, war jitters, and several continuing winters of little snowfall.

Topics involving research, scholarly or creative activities will range from replicating chicken breast contamination in a commercial product to a content analysis of the New York Times and Washington Post Coverage of the 2000 Presidential Debates.

An internationally respected humanitarian whose leadership has guided the provision of life-sustaining assistance in food, medical services and security to residents of Third World nations is the recipient of the 2004 UW-River Falls Distinguished Alumnus award.

Sigurd Hanson, with more than 25 years with humanitarian relief agencies, currently serves as the Country Director for World Vision-Pakistan. Stationed in Islamabad, the Onalaska, Wis., native oversees a consortium that is carrying out a $15 million USAID democracy program. He oversees policy implementation, budget and fiscal control, security and personnel management, and represents the agency to government agencies, partners and the media.

Pakistan and Afghanistan have been home to Hanson for the past five years, which included serving with the International Medical Corps and as the Country Director for the International Rescue Committee.

Interim Chancellor Ginny Coombs reiterated Hanson's recognition, citing his remarkable dedication and impact in sustaining and improving the quality of life for the victims of warfare and terrorism, despite the great risk of personal danger to himself.

International Rescue Committee, directed over 1,600 aid workers in providing basic necessities and security to tens of thousands of refugees disrupted by the Afghanistan war. In 2002, millions of readers across the world caught a slight glimpse of the daunting task Hanson faced in a series of installments of his "Peshawar Diary," which ran in October and November on Time.com The UW-RF journalism major poignantly shared the human side of the war, which, with prolonged drought and civil war, had produced 1.6 million refugees. As he summed up in a dispatch: "Terror is ugly. So is war."

The Polk County UW-Extension Office is arranging the conferences with the business specialist representing the Small Business Development Center Office at UW-River Falls. Anyone who would like to discuss plans for starting or expanding a business or who has problems in any area of business management will be able to take advantage of the Center's professional counsel.

Since the start of this business advising service, over 300 managers of prospective and existing small business firms have been served in Pierce, Polk and St. Croix counties. These represent a wide variety of manufacturing, retailing and service companies, as well as many people wishing to start new businesses.

This marks the first time the two state's secretaries have participated jointly in a golf tournament. The event coincides with National Tourism Week activities and presents an opportunity for the two tourism leaders to promote the industry together during that national celebratory week, said Mark Kinders, president of the Alliance.

SCVRTA includes chambers of commerce, business associations and hospitality and tourism businesses in 19 communities along the Lower St.Croix National Scenic Riverway. Funds raised through the tournament and banquet will be used to help market the Valley as a tourism destination, Kinders said.

Students had to judge 31 different classes of floriculture plant material for quality characteristics. Plants ranged from common roses, geraniums and chrysanthemums to unusual plants from Australia, Hawaii and South Africa.

Individual members of the UW-RF team excelled in single events as well. For the first time in over 20 years of competition three UW-RF team members placed in the top 10 high individual overall category.

Senior Lacy OConnell, a horticulture major from Wisconsin took first place in the Professional Category with her hand-tied European design, which included Twisted Bells of Ireland, gerbera, Eustoma, roses and florets of wax hot glued to arching strands of bear grass wrapped at the base in galax leaves.

Senior Amber Bauer, a horticulture major from Hastings, Minn., earned fourth place in the highly competitive Decorative Wreath Design in the professional category. She wired a grapevine wreath to a foam block and filled it with a variety of spring flowers, using lilies as the focal point.

Plant and earth science Professor and Coach Terry Ferriss attributes the students' success to hard work and the strong support of the two student assistant coaches, Lisa Haukom, a senior theatre and horticulture major from Rochester, Minn., and Kelsey Sparks, a senior business administration and horticulture major from Isanti, Minn.

During the students' time at Colorado State University, they toured an herbaceous perennials grower, a retail florist, two garden centers, the University horticulture research greenhouses, Denver Botanic Gardens and the production facility of Celestial Seasonings Tea Company.

What do an analysis of the coverage of the 2000 presidential debates, capsaicin, studying abroad and cellular architecture have in common? They are all subjects of research by UW-River Falls students.

Salmela is also a featured speaker at the event. He will talk about how undergraduate research is important to him and how it is valuable to students. The students, with the exception of Salmela, will also present their research findings April 28 at the fifth annual UW System Symposium on Undergraduate Research at UW-Oshkosh.

The transition from River Falls, Wis., to Washington D.C., for Burau was an exiting one. "Everyone always seems in a hurry." She found a place to live through the Washington Intern Student Housing, a program that owns historic Washington properties on Capitol Hill where interns from all over the world are housed.

Congressional District, and he is passionate about his commitment to serving them," said Burau. At first, he says, she was intimidated by working for the Congressman, but after a few days she felt more comfortable after seeing how considerate and easygoing he was in the office.

As an intern, Burau performed a variety of tasks. Her main focus was working with constituent mail. She entered the information in a database to ensure it was answered. She then researched constituent concerns and assisted the staff's legislative correspondents in preparing responses.

"Marnie has been an important addition to our office this spring. Whether her task was answering phones, writing press releases, or conducting Capitol tours, Marnie approached each task with professionalism and enthusiasm. One of her more significant accomplishments was crafting a Floor statement for Women's History Month that recognized the proud tradition of leadership Wisconsin women had in attaining the right to vote."

Office supervisor Betsy Dunford said that most interns are assigned specific responsibilities, but in Burau's case she was given wide-ranging responsibilities because of her excellent performance in the office.

"Marnie is amazing, she is one of the most enthusiastic interns we've had in the Congressman's office," said Dunford. "She has written press releases and even speeches that the Congressman has given on the House floor."

She hopes to find a job close to home working in the government or for an elected official. She is thankful for her UW-RF adviser, Gladstone-Sovell, for introducing the opportunity with the congressman, and her family for providing her the means to accomplish one of her dreams.

Maria McGinnis, a senior from St. Paul, Minn., majoring in marketing communications with an agriculture emphasis, has been selected to deliver the 9 a.m. commencement address. Kelly Hendrickson, a senior from Cloquet, Minn., majoring in biology with a pre-medicine focus, will speak at the 2 p.m. ceremony.

McGinnis's speech, titled "Life's Road Map," will focus on the positive effects of college in shaping a person's life. Hendrickson's speech is titled "Lessons Learned," and highlights the values of a university education including the learning that occurs outside the formal classroom.

This is the 9th year of having graduating seniors deliver the commencement addresses. Maria McGinnis, a senior from St. Paul, Minn. who is majoring in marketing communications with an agriculture emphasis, has been selected to deliver the 9 a.m. commencement address. Kelly Hendrickson a senior from Cloquet, Minn., majoring in biology with a pre-medicine emphasis, will speak at the 2 p.m. ceremony.

McGinnis' speech is titled "Life's Road Map." She will focus on the positive effects of college in shaping a person's life. McGinnis has been involved with Agricultural Communicators of Tomorrow and has hosted a weekly agriculture radio show, "ACT on Ag." She has also written for the "Fencepost," a CAFES alumni publication.

She has been active as a member of Sigma Sigma Sigma sorority, the agricultural honor society Alpha Zeta, and the honor society Order of Omega. She was also a freshman orientation leader for two years. After graduation, McGinnis will attend UW-Madison to pursue a master's degree in life science communication.

Hendrickson has participated in the Honors Program and Honor's Club and was inducted into the Phi Kappa Phi honor society. She also taught an honor's seminar, "Disability Awareness," under the mentorship of the Honor's Program Director Nan Jordahl. Jordahl describes Hendrickson as "the absolute model student representing UW-RF and its honor's program. She's an incredible 'down-to-earth' human being with empathy, enthusiasm, and approachability."

UW-River Falls Outreach and Graduate Studies will offer a summer environmental education workshop for teachers. The course, Interdisciplinary Workshop in Environmental Education, is designed for K-12 teachers who want to improve their environmental education skills and knowledge.

Among the specific applications used and taught in the course are computer-based simulation activities for environmental assessment and interpretation; Project WILD, Project WET, and Project Learning Tree; and GIS applications for land use decision-making process.

Swanson is a professor in the department of plant and earth science. He has both teaching and extension appointments covering soil science, resource management, land and water conservation, nutrient management, and watershed management.

Individuals who have English as a second language face many communication barriers from language, culture and differing expectations that may hamper success in school, on the job and in the community. Learn and practice strategies for bridging these communication gaps through a summer course at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls.

The course, "ESL in the Workplace," provides an insightful introduction to multicultural communication. Participants will gain practical tools and resources to use while working with non-English speaking adults and have the option of gaining ESL-tutor field experience for a local business.

Nelson, a performance development consultant, will share an in-depth look at motivation and reducing employee turnover. Retaining employees is a continuous challenge, and Nelson will share innovative ideas and solutions to assist companies in breaking through the cycle of hiring, training, and terminating.

"The seminar will provide ideas on how to create an environment that makes employees want to stay," says Nelson. "It's not always about money. Recognition programs, feeling valued and the employees' senses of worth to their employers are all factors in motivation."

Nelson will highlight methods for transitioning and recognizing employees as stakeholders, designing powerful orientation, training and follow-up programs, writing excellent job descriptions, defining the generational values of employees, giving dynamic employee reviews, and designing company motivational plans.

Nelson, who provides human resources counseling to small businesses, brings a wealth of knowledge in motivating employees. As a manager of various departments in large firms, Nelson decreased the high turnover rate with solid techniques in motivation, team-building and hiring tactics.

During his career he has been responsible for shaping the curriculum in his department, developing courses such as Industrial Safety, Project Management, and Landscape Construction. He was also instrumental in curriculum revision through a USDA Challenge Grant and has helped develop courses for students in the departments of plant and earth science and animal and food science as well as the College of Business and Economics. He is the faculty advisor for the Agricultural Mechanization Club and has been advisor to the quarter-scale tractor team.

Consciousness Organization. For ECO, she has helped organize beautification projects on campus and worked on recycling, brush clearing and trail projects around the area. During 2002-03, she served as a resident assistant for Grimm Hall, providing support and leadership to 30 students and served as an activity director for hall events.

Johnson has been on the CAFES Dean's List and was a recipient of academic honors throughout her career at UW-RF. She has also been on the National Dean's List for the past three years. In 2003, she earned academic accolades for her work on a river and groundwater chemistry research project and was an exchange student at the University of Auckland in New Zealand where she studied indigenous culture. She was active in the Auckland University Rock and Alpine Club and received academic honors from that institution.

There will be an opening reception on Friday, March 5, at 4 p.m. Albertson is a senior art student from River Falls who enjoys working in series with found objects such as scrap metal and semi-precious stones. Schaffert is a senior art student from Eagan, Minn., who recently has been incorporating enamels with metalwork. The show can be viewed 9 a.m. to 5 p.m. and 7-9 p.m. Monday through Friday.

A former vice presidential candidate and distinguished Native American and environmental activist, a nationally renowned author, contemporary musicians, poets and a landscape architect. What do all of these names have in common?

Porter grew up in Chicago, where he excelled at music. After high school, he joined the Air Force Band. He then toured with Stan Kenton, Harry James, Buddy Rich and Woody Herman. He soon became the No. 1 trombonist in the country. He taught in Chicago area colleges, was featured at jazz festivals, played on hundreds of albums and commercials and toured as a jazz clinician. He soon organized his own orchestra and became one of Chicago's top bandleaders.

"A college degree can still provide students with the ability to be financially independent," Prochnow said. "However, as the cost of college continues to rise, it will take longer to see the return on a college investment." He also notes the competition for good jobs is keen, and the choice of going to college and choosing a career can no longer be a random process.

This event is one of the Sunday Lecture Series sponsored by the UW-RF College of Arts and Sciences and the Office of Outreach and Graduate Studies. The lecture is free and open to the public and refreshments will be served following the presentation.

Agronomy Professor Dennis Cosgrove and dairy science Professor Dennis Cooper, along with Jim Harsdorf, who operates a dairy farm from Beldenville, spent eight days in Serbia, giving workshops and interacting with local dairy producers.

The group from River Falls was the first representative from the United States to meet personally with the Serbian producers. Cooper said there was an incredible amount of interest and good will toward the River Falls delegation.

Harsdorf said the Serbians, which included 60-70 dairy producers, expressed interest in coming to the United States to tour dairy farms and learn more about production. UW-RF hopes to bring a group of Serbian agriculturalists to Wisconsin this summer.

Serbia was the only Eastern bloc country under former communist rule that was able to feed itself because of its agricultural wealth, Harsdorf said. The United States had sanctions against communist Serbia for eight years, which the River Falls participants said they were pleased to see lifted as that nation turned toward democracy.

A new graduate-level certificate for community education directors and after-school coordinators may make the difference on whether a popular program wins financial support. The competition for federal funds among after-school programs is fierce, according to Stanley Potts, past president and treasurer of the Wisconsin Community Education Association.

Education Association, the premier professional organization for community education staff. Students earn the graduate certificate by completing four, three-credit courses and one independent project.

"All course work is provided via the Internet and other distance-learning tools, making it accessible to students everywhere," said Dean Leon Zaborowski of the UW-RF Outreach and Graduate Studies Office. "The compressed course schedule is also a popular feature. Students take two courses each term, but only work on one course at a time. In addition, colleagues from around the country will follow the same schedule and complete the program together, usually within one year."

Tuition for the 15-credit program is half the cost of a master's degree and the online format means that students pay the tuition of a Wisconsin resident, which is often considerably less than comparable institutions around the country, said Zaborowski.

If men are from Mars and women are from Venus, what planet is your toddler from? Parents can improve their understanding of a young child by attending a child development workshop at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls campus on Saturday, March 27, from 9 a.m. to 3 p.m.

Child-care trainers and early childhood development professors will provide insights to and facilitate discussion among parents of young children, early-grade teachers, child-care providers, and college students at this special opportunity.

The workshop, "It's All About Development," will cover a wide range of early development issues for all children including those with special needs. The College of Education and Professional Studies is offering the workshop with the support of the River Falls and Hudson School Districts.

The Pierce County UW-Extension Office is arranging the conferences with the business specialist representing the Small Business Development Center Office at UW-River Falls. Anyone who would like to discuss plans for starting or expanding a business or who has problems in any area of business management will be able to take advantage of the Center's professional counsel.

The individual appointments, approximately 75 minutes in length, will be scheduled from 9:30 a.m. through 4 p.m. at the Pierce Extension Office in Ellsworth. To register for a business advising session, please contact the Small Business Development Center at 715/425-0620 by Wednesday, March 24. Since the start of this business advising service, over 300 managers of prospective and existing small business firms have been served in Pierce County. These represent a wide variety of manufacturing, retailing and service companies, as well as many people wishing to start new businesses.

The lecture is in conjunction with the Laramie Project play being presented at UW-RF this spring. It has been described as a breathtaking theatrical collage that explores the depths to which humanity can sink, and the heights of compassion it is also capable of expressing.

The lecture will explore the historic events, the issues raised by the play, the techniques of docu-drama used to structure and dramatize the material, and the choices UW-RF made in preparing the piece for presentation in River Falls.

UW-RF speech, theatre and communication arts professors Robin Murray, costume designer, and Kenneth Stofferahn, set and lightening designer, and guest director Suzy Messerole will present the lecture. Messerole is a co-artistic director for the Outward Spiral Theatre Company in Minneapolis.

The bill, authored by State Rep. Robin Kreibich (R-Eau Claire) will help reduce the number of college-aged smokers, reduce fire hazards in the residence halls and reduce the cleaning and maintenance costs for the UW System. In addition, the bill would create a potential penalty for violators.

Students have been the driving force behind these changes. As one UW-RF student put it, "I don't like smoke coming through my first floor window. I have asthma and I don't like smoke invading my home."

UW-RF health education coordinator Keven Syverson added, "Secondhand smoke is the third leading cause of preventable death in the U.S., killing approximately 65,000 Americans each year. I would like to thank the Wisconsin Legislators who voted for the bill and are working to improve the health of our state's campuses."

She will discuss various ongoing subjects before the Wisconsin Legislature in Madison, including the status of the Robert P. Knowles Physical Education & Recreation Center renovation project and a proposed Constitutional Amendment to create a Taxpayers' Bill of Rights. Harsdorf will take questions and comments.

Those not interested in earning college credit will pay $1,400. Transportation, lodging and entrance fees are included, but food is not. Because of a limited number of seats, a $250 non-refundable deposit is due by the registration deadline on May 1. Remaining tour fees are due no later than June 1.

Soaring high above river bluffs, a bald eagle is oblivious to the binoculars trained on her from visitors below. The nearby community, which provides lodging, transportation and other services to bird-watchers who flock to the area each spring, however, is very much aware of the economic benefit brought by these tourists.

Watching wildlife is a thrill shared by growing numbers of people, according to the U.S. Department of Interior. In 2001, 82 million Americans participated in wildlife-recreation activities and spent more than $38 billion in the process.

In fact, wildlife-viewing activities are recognized as one of the fastest growing segments of wildlife-based recreation. And the potential these activities hold for stimulating the local economy in suburban, rural and exurban areas is also sky-high.

"Any community with protected natural resources can tap into this economic benefit while protecting and enhancing their local wildlife," said Kelly Cain, a professor at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls. To teach people how to establish wildlife-watching opportunities, the University and Watchable Wildlife, Inc., an international wildlife-viewing organization, have developed an online graduate-level certificate.

"The Wildlife Recreation and Nature Tourism Certificate will help conservationists, community leaders, tourism directors, and recreation and hospitality providers build the skills necessary to effectively conserve their natural resources while generating jobs and revenue for their communities," Cain said. "Students will learn how to be better economists as well as better environmentalists."

Looking for a fun way to celebrate the return of spring after a long, dreary winter? Then go to the UW-River Falls Dance Theatre's Annual Spring Concert and become mesmerized by the grace and movement of the dancers.

Dance Theatre alumna Mari Kline, a dance performance major from the University of Minnesota; Taean Richmond, a tai-kwon do instructor and UW-RF student; and Starla Dixen, a choreographer of dances for the theatre in the past, are returning to add their inventive and technically demanding pieces to the program.

Highlights of the concert include a piece choreographed by senior Amanda Lorenz, a broadcast journalism major from West St. Paul, Minn., plus a Korean sword dance and a structured improvisation The concert will conclude with a large group piece danced by 35 members of the Dance Theatre, choreographed by Zhe.

Brooke Jee In Newmaster, an instructor for the Chang Mi Korean Dancers, is in charge of the Korean sword dance. She has studied traditional Korean dance in Korea and has received two Minnesota arts board folk art grants.

Colin Rusch, a guest choreographer from the Walker Art Center. He is a dance artist, presenter and art activist who co-founded and co-directs Mulch, a dance and music improvisation series at Intermedia Arts in Minneapolis.

Dancers who are residents of St. Paul include senior Ger Vue, a health and human performance and business administration major; freshman Bekah Sullivan, a psychology major; sophomore Shakeila Scott, a business management major; freshman Rachelle Goulet, a theatre major; and senior Julie Rowan, a speech communications major.

The Spring 2004 edition of Wisconsin Ideas, a news publication for faculty, staff and stakeholders of the UW System, includes articles and photos that detail the effects of budget cuts at several UW System campuses. Due to budget cuts, the publication has been adapted to an online-only format, available at http://www.wisconsin.edu/wisconsinideas.

The issue details the lamented departure of a talented faculty member and the dilapidated condition of several buildings at UW-River Falls; the effects of reduced services at UW-Green Bay; dramatic increases in faculty workloads at UW-Whitewater; the lack of economic development resources at UW-Eau Claire; and examples of the effects of cuts across the system as a whole.

"University officials feel a sense of pride as they look around the campus and see how the faculty, staff and students are handling the budget cuts. But they are concerned about how the cuts will affect the university's long-term future," Kathy Pletcher, associate provost for information services at UW-Green Bay, told Wisconsin Ideas. "It's one of those things where the changes are incremental.

Said Chancellor Ann Lydecker in announcing the award, "Professor Peterson has touched literally thousands of lives during his five decades of teaching. I've heard our currently enrolled students, as well as undergraduate and graduate program alumni who span the generations, speak of how Dr. Peterson was their inspiration.

"He inspired them to learn history, to develop the study skills that led to their successful completion of their degrees, to think more critically, to become better teachers, and to have a new appreciation of the United States within the world context.

Wrote one: "Not having Dr. Peterson as one of the "distinguished teachers" is like not listing Abe Lincoln as one of the greatest presidents. There is no more decent man or teacher at this university."

The development of his international reputation as an historian can be traced to his service in the U.S. Army at the end of World War II in Germany and his assignment for two years to Occupation Forces.

A committed researcher of German archives, including secret police records, and a prolific writer, Peterson wrote the first of his seven histories on the limitations of Hitler's totalitarian powers. His additional histories have explored such topics as Germany under American Occupation, East Germany and German resistance under Soviet Occupation, and an analytical history of World War II.

Endowment for the Humanities and the Social Science Research Council. He has presented papers and lectures at conferences from Bemidji, Minn., to London, England, for such groups as the German Studies Association and the Society for the History of American Foreign Relations. He also is a three-time recipient of the Alexander von Humboldt Award presented by a German foundation for furthering scholarship in the culture.

"His dedication is legendary, and he is also a very accomplished scholar with a prodigious list of publications, made all the more impressive by the heavy student load that he continues to carry. It is hard to imagine anyone who has worked on such an exemplary level for such a long time. He is also an extremely humble man who isn't one for self-promotion or fuss, but it is important that his work be recognized and be celebrated. His contributions are unique and lasting and are fully deserving of recognition."

In addition to his teaching and research, for the past 20 years Peterson has edited the history department alumni newsletter. As the senior faculty member, the honor also falls to Peterson to carry the University's ceremonial mace at formal events, such as commencement.

In announcing the decision, NCATE President Arthur Wise noted, "Let me congratulate you and your professional education unit for displaying the high quality necessary to be granted national accreditation and to express appreciation for the cooperation received from the faculty, staff and administration."

"This reinforces the importance of holding ourselves up to national standards that are very respected, that are difficult to achieve, and which shows that we are recognized by our peers in the profession for the quality of our education program."

NCATE measures six standards of professional excellence: the knowledge, skill and disposition of education students; the breadth of how the College assesses student teacher progress; student field experiences and clinical practice in partnership with local school districts; commitment to helping teaching candidates appreciate diversity so all of their future students will learn; faculty qualifications, performance and development; and the College's governance structure and resources.

Those standards were applied to the full range of COEPS students: future teachers, principals, school psychologists, and speech and language therapists. Also reviewed was the College's rigor at ensuring students were prepared for their initial certification as teachers, the breadth of advanced degree programs, and the quality of its continuing professional development programs for practicing teachers.

Associate Dean Mary Manke, who led the College's preparation for the accreditation review. She noted the emphasis was re-directed from reviewing the curricular offerings in the teacher education preparation program to rigorously assessing what teacher education candidates know and are capable of doing in the classroom as prospective certified teachers.

The site evaluation team that visited UW-RF praised the College's faculty as "excellent teachers and scholars who contribute to their profession" and who are highly respected in school districts regionally as a result of the very close relationships they have developed throughout the St. Croix Valley. The evaluation team noted that faculty demonstrated a commitment to professional growth both for students and themselves.

In assessing the teacher education students, the review team found that both undergraduate and graduate teacher candidates clearly and pervasively demonstrated that they are able to assess whether their students are learning.

The team also noted that practicing teachers in surrounding school districts who supervise UW-RF student teachers praised the quality of candidates placed with them for their enthusiasm, their knowledge of the latest teaching techniques, and their ability to manage classrooms.

Relating to diversity, the report noted that student teachers showed "remarkable" sensitivity to diversity issues. The evaluators found that UW-RF and the College are "committed to creating an education community which enhances student awareness and appreciation of diverse ethnicities and cultures and which actively supports tolerance, civility and respect for the rights and sensibilities for each person."

NCATE reviewers also cited the College's commitment to technology as a teaching and learning tool. COEPS previously was recognized by the National Education Association as one of the 11 best teacher preparation programs in the nation in part because of its exceptional use of technology. NCATE reviewers were impressed that technology is customized for use in graduate programs, elementary education, and secondary education programs.It also noted that all teacher education students are required to develop a multimedia assessment portfolio that tracks their progress as future teachers.

Also praised was the pervasive use of technology throughout the College's home in the Wyman Education Building. The site evaluation team remarked on its observations of the widespread use of technology by faculty and students and their apparent comfort with it.

"We are very pleased that our partner in Central High School's Teaching Academy program, was recognized for its excellence by NCATE. As a partner, the College of Education staff were instrumental in developing the concept and assisting with the planning process for the Teaching Academy at Central High School. The program is designed to encourage students to consider careers in urban education by providing a rigorous curriculum focusing on teaching, learning and children; opportunities for field experiences and service learning; and links to post-secondary training.

UW-RF recently held a one-day, one-stop disorientation program with offerings that ranged from attending mock job interviews to picking up tips on effectively marketing themselves to handling their finances effectively when they graduate.

The session, "Disorientation: Managing the Transition from College to Career," was intended to help students appreciate the adjustments they will have to make as they move from academia to the business world.

Dan Conray of Nixen Group, Inc, spoke at a panel featuring human resources professionals to offer advice on obtaining a job in the tight market. His daughter is also a UW-RF alumna; she is completing her masters at the University of Minnesota.

Other presentations featured such topics as understanding employment benefits and balancing work and life issues. Many graduating seniors practiced their job interviewing skills in mock interviews with business people and during a networking lunch.

She said, "The students who participated were enthusiastic and interested in succeeding in life." She also noted that it was impressive that the students took the time out of their day to participate in the interviews. She realizes the pressures of having class and jobs and trying to prepare for graduation and a career.

Disorientation was sponsored by a number of UW-RF offices. The bookstore was on hand to sell caps and gowns and other graduation materials. The University Foundation, the four academic colleges, and the registrars office were present to answer questions and distribute information.

The band's hosts in Reykjavik and Paris both expressed interest in making the cultural exchange complete by performing at UW-RF in the future. Ten adult members of the community traveled with the band, including Dr. and Mrs. Mel Olson of Hudson. Their son, Erik, played French horn while his father played trumpet on the tour.

The mother of senior Heather Strutt was on hand to hear her daughter solo on the oboe. Heather played Nikolai Rimsky-Korsakov's "Variations on Theme of Glinka" brilliantly to an appreciative audience in the beautiful church of the Madeleine in the heart of Paris.

Strutt, who graduates this year. When she's not studying or preparing for her senior recital, Strutt teaches oboe and piano to 70 private students at the Ashland Academy of Music in Mahtomedi, Minn., where she serves as director.

Arts and Education Center in Shell Lake, Wis., for several years. The band played and the men sang part of "Ave Maria" by Franz Biebl at their concerts in Paris and Reykjavik. n Reykjavik, the group performed in a church called Langholtskirkja during the Sunday morning service and later that night at a separate concert.

Tjornehoj and the band have made previous international tours of China, Scotland and England. In the U.S., they have performed in New York, Wisconsin, Minnesota and Iowa. They have plans to tour Chicago in the Fall and Toronto in the future.

In addition to teaching and conducting the Symphony Band. Tjornehoj conducts the St. Croix Valley Symphony Orchestra. She is the staff conductor for the Indianhead Arts Center Concert Band Camp, which takes place in June. Tjornehoj has performed at Carnegie Hall in New York. She is a frequent performer on the saxophone and piano, and music director at Shepherd of the Valley Lutheran Church in Lakeland, Minn. A member of the College Band Directors Conference, Tjornehoj will give a music conducting workshop at UW-RF this summer.

"I am deeply grateful that Ann Lydecker had put in place a very strong management team, and I have asked Ginny Coombs to serve as the interim chancellor for UW-River Falls," said Lyall. "I appreciate her willingness to help the campus through this difficult period. At the appropriate time, we will have more to say about the next steps in leadership transition, but at this time, we want to respect Ann's family and do what we can to remember and celebrate her life and achievements."

Economics; Outreach and Graduate Studies; and Education and Professional Studies, as well as the departments of admissions, library and textbook services, registrar, grants and research and student life.

Coombs, who lives in Hudson, Wis., has been instrumental in coordinating the development of a new general education program and assisting the faculty in the design of new student outcomes assessment programs. She has also developed retention strategies for full-time, first-year students. In addition, Coombs has helped establish support for undergraduate student research, funded by the UW-River Falls Foundation, and she has designed a summer stipend program for student researchers.

Coombs has spoken at many national conferences on such topics as encouraging faculty-student research, leadership and curriculum in liberal arts, women in higher education leadership, and leadership in the academy.

Wisconsin Women Equals Prosperity program. She was a "fiercely determined leader, who insisted on the power of education and understood her role, especially in opening doors for women through education," Lawton said. "I knew her as a generous woman of extraordinary grace and dignity? We had more to learn from her."

Education was her life; her mother and grandparents were teachers, and for eight years she attended a one-room school in Adrian, Mich., where she often helped younger students. Later she was a high school teacher, working her way through graduate school as a single mother of two sons. In addition, several siblings, her husband Bill and son Martin are educators.

Retired UWRF Vice Chancellor for Administration Virgil Nylander expressed the authenticity with which Ann's character and caring resonated throughout campus. "She was a warm and loving individual," said Nylander. "That smile of hers was absolutely contagious. She absolutely loved people. She loved to hug.

I can't recall meeting anyone who was as positive and as giving as Ann. She involved herself and others in both campus and community activities. She felt that this institution should play a more active role in the lives of those in this region, and she was very successful in moving the campus in that direction.

Nylander also recalled the joy when her grandchildren visited her office and her zest for celebrating each moment of life. "She was one of the first to arrive and the last to leave the campus each day. I told her several times that she would make herself ill if she kept working that hard. She would just look at me, smile, and say, 'This isn't work. This is fun.' This was her dream job.

She was named the 14th chancellor of UW-River Falls in August 2000. She was involved with educational reform initiatives at local, state, and national levels and gave many papers and presentations around the country on teacher testing, leadership, university-community partnerships, technology in teacher education, multicultural education, economic development, and community programming. She had also traveled to Taiwan, Hong Kong, China, and Japan to build education and service initiatives.

She earned a B.S. and M.A.T. from Oberlin College in Ohio and a Ph.D. from the University of Michigan. She was an elementary teacher in Oberlin, a professor at Gustavus Adolphus College and Mankato State University, and founding dean of the School of Education and Professional Studies and later provost and vice president for academic affairs at Bridgewater State College in Massachusetts.

Two forums held earlier in River Falls and Osceola found the two-hour facilitated forums helped to identify current challenges and successes in each of the areas; shared information on how communities, groups and individuals are addressing them; and identified future challenges that will arise over the next five years; and to provide networking opportunities within the topical areas.

Since the start of this business counseling service, over 300 managers of prospective and existing small business firms have been served in Pierce County. These represent a wide variety of manufacturing, retailing and service companies, as well as many people wishing to start new businesses.

UW-RF students met with the Hudson Middle School student council to collect ideas and sketches that would reflect the life of a middle school student. The middle school features a special exhibit, "Caf? Gallery", that displays artwork of the Hudson students. The mural was painted on six wood panels on site with the middle school students and was appropriately titled "Life of a Middle-Schooler."

Knowing developmental milestones and assessing a child's progress toward them are critical to evaluating and meeting his or her needs. To educate teachers, child-care providers, college students and parents of young children about early development of typically developing children as well as children with special needs, the University of Wisconsin-River Falls is offering a one-day workshop, "It's All About Development," on Saturday, March 27, from 9 a.m. to 3 p.m.

"This workshop will bring together college students, parents of young children and professionals to discuss parenting and teaching," said Gay Ward, director of the UW-RF early childhood program and assistant professor of early childhood and literacy. The College of Education and Professional Studies will offer the workshop with the support of the River Falls and Hudson school districts. There are two tracks: one geared for teachers and child-care workers; and one designed for parents. Workshop topics include language, cognitive development, physical environment, social skills, movement, and discipline. The keynote speaker is Marie Stadler, assistant professor in the department of communicative disorders at the University of Wisconsin-Stevens Point.

The Small Business Development Center offers free counseling services to small business owners in the three western Wisconsin counties. These services are for persons thinking of starting a business, for those who have just started a business, or individuals who have been in business for a while.

Bye has a master's degree from UW-Madison in marketing and performed doctoral work in entrepreneurship and strategy. At UW-Madison he taught small business management classes. He also taught small business management and entrepreneurship classes at the University of St. Thomas. He has also served as a consultant to several businesses throughout Minnesota and Wisconsin.

The course will last eight weeks, one night a week from 6 to 9 p.m. It will be held at UW-RF. The course will focus on starting a business and creating a business plan. It will deal with issues such as managing employees, human resources and all the paperwork and odds and ends that go with any business.

This spring, the Center plans to offer courses in Quick Books, which is a computer accounting program, and Understanding Financials, a class that will take away the intimidation of finances and help people look differently at money.

Bye also plans to offer free counseling sessions one day a month at a location in each county: Hudson in St. Croix County; Balsam Lake in Polk County; and Ellsworth in Pierce County. Each counseling day will consist of five available sessions lasting one hour, 15 minutes each.

Heisenberg, one of the most gifted modern physicists, was neither a Nazi nor a Nazi sympathizer. The play looks at why he stayed in socialist Germany for 12 years, sought a prominent academic position in Berlin that included the scientific directorship of nuclear fission research for the German army and the purpose behind his visit to his former colleague, Bohr.

"In a way it is a mystery as they seek to solve what actually took place, but beyond that it is an examination of perceptions, subjectivity in our interpretations, history, scientific advancements and self-examination, all wrapped up in a true story that took place during World War II," Zimmerman said.

Speakers include history Professor Ed Peterson, physics Professor Eileen Korenic and Zimmerman. The symposium is free and open to the public. Anyone attending it will receive $1 off the ticket price to "Copenhagen." It will be held at 4 p.m. in the Blanche Davis Theatre.

From using humor in the classroom, to determining how geography plays a role in the selection of Wisconsin high school mascot names, to measuring the universe through research in Antartica, to mothering a child with Down's Syndrome.

For UW-RF and other college students, the four, three-week sessions offer an opportunity to complete their program requirements in less time than during the regular academic year. Classes that were in high demand at UW-RF this spring may be more accessible during the summer session.

Other educational opportunities, such as international study opportunities to China, France, Greece, Puerto Rico, Scotland, and Uganda, are also offered during the summer session. These travel programs are hosted by knowledgeable faculty members and are open to the public while space is available. A schedule of all classes offered during the summer is available on the Web at www.uwrf.edu/summer.

Tivey travels the world studying active seafloor vents using human occupied submersibles, such as the Alvin, the Nautile and the Turtle, and remotely operated vehicles, such as Jason, ROPOS and Tiburon.

In places where the plates are separating, columns of molten rock rise toward the Earth's surface. Lava then erupts and forms new oceanic crust, which in turn creates volcanic mountain ranges called mid-ocean ranges.

Seafloor hydrothermal vents are located along the Earth's mid-ocean ridges at depths of one to two miles. The fluids that flow from the vents are acidic and rich in metal and sulfide. The mixing of these fluids and seawater results in the formation of metal deposits on the seafloor.

Tivey majored in geology at Stanford University. She was introduced to seafloor hydrothermal systems at the University of Washington, where she received her doctorate in 1988 and then went to work at Woods Hole.

Tivey is visiting UW-RF as part of a distinguished lecturer series sponsored by Ridge 2000, a consortium of universities studying the Earth's mid-ocean ridge system. The lecture is sponsored by the UW-RF department of plant and earth science and the National Science Foundation. UW-RF was selected as one of a handful of institutions in the country to host a speaker from the series.

English Professor Nicholas Karolides, a nationally recognized writer and editor on censorship, will speak on the topic on Thursday, March 11, at 7 p.m. in the lower level of the River Falls Public Library. The lecture is free and open to the public.

Karolides, who is the associate dean of the College of Arts and Sciences, is noted for his long-standing research and dedication to dissecting the implications of censorship. He is the author of three books exploring censorship, including "Banned Books: Literature Suppressed on Political Grounds."

Karolides' presentation will summarize the principals and philosophies of freedom of expression and provide updates on recent developments and potential trends in censorship. He is completing his research and revising the "Encyclopedia of Censorship."

He noted that censorship remains rampant in the world. "The world stage provides an array of freedom and expression issues inclusive to hate speeches or hate crimes, holocaust revisionism, political book banning, and libel laws."

Contemporary events that have ushered in new waves of censorship into America also will be discussed, such as Internet legislation and the Patriot Act. Karolides will identify aspects of the Patriot Act that have the potential to deny certain civil rights, including those of prison inmates.

Admissions Director Alan Tuchtenhagen said the admissions office is seeing an increase in applications for both spring and fall semesters. Due to its prime location and affordability, area students remain highly interested in attending UW-RF. Other key factors are the strong, quality programs that UW-RF provides in business, education and the sciences.

Many students who begin attending college mid-year are older students, who either decide it is time to start their college career or realize that the college career they interrupted years earlier is now within their grasp.

"The evidence is very clear that higher education will substantially increase earning power and that is not lost on our returning students. The investment in time and money that it takes to get a college degree will have a payback throughout the rest of their life. It is never too late to go to college," Tuchtenhagen said.

"Some of the students who start mid-year are from this immediate area, went away to another university, but have now decided that they would rather attend college closer to home. UW-RF has the academic reputation, programs and other opportunities that interest them. They are, in a sense, coming home to college,"

While the class covers all aspects of starting a business or being involved with a small company, the course will emphasize good business planning. Case studies and guest speakers from the business community will demonstrate practical application of theories.

Courses offered include personal investing and financial markets, the global economy, transition to market economies, great economists of the past and present and the Roaring 20s through the Great Depression.

Each course includes teaching and learning resources appropriate for middle school and high school students. Course material and activities are related to Wisconsin Academic Standards in economics for grades 8 and 12.

Teachers can register for all five courses or choose the ones that best meet their needs. Each course is worth one graduate credit. For directions on how to register, go to http://www.uwrf.edu/ogs/1registration1/php.

The Center also furnishes workshops, in-service training, graduate courses, access to a well-stocked library of resources, access to UW-RF economics professors as classroom speakers and information specialists and many other activities.

The purpose of the Center is to provide teachers with new and fresh teaching ideas, to give students a working practical knowledge of economics and to allow teachers to incorporate economics in other subjects.

The Center has a well-stocked library on the UW-RF campus, in South Hall. Teachers have access to a variety of economic teaching materials, such as lesson plans, AP books, videos and children's literature that uses stories and mysteries to teach children economics lessons.

This game is available to all schools in Wisconsin. To be eligible, teachers must attend a free training workshop, where they learn how to play the game, use the curriculum materials and understand the economics of the securities markets. Advance registration for the workshops is necessary. Teachers unable to attend a workshop may take the Online Teacher Workshop. For more information, go to www.economicswisconsin.org or contact Schultz.

The Center for Economic Education began at UW-RF in the fall of 1997. It is affiliated with EconomicsWisconsin, a private non-profit, non-partisan organization funded by individual, corporate and foundation donations. EconomicsWisconsin provides financial and administrative support for programs offered by the nine centers within the state. It is affiliated with the National Council on Economic Education and its nationwide network of councils and centers.

For more information about the services at the Center for Economic Education at UW-RF, contact Schultz. For more information concerning other Centers for Economic Education in Wisconsin, go to www.economicswisconsin.org.

The impact of regional development on the arts, education and community/rural relations and their implications for the quality of life in the St. Croix Valley will be the topic of three open forums hosted by UW-River Falls.

"We hope to draw representatives from all sectors of the Valley's interest areas and communities," Lydecker said. "All of our communities are confronted with the same issues, and some of them are successfully addressing them through collaborations.

"Everyone brings something to the table in resolving these issues. We hope these forums will help the Valley's residents to expand their conversations, to get a sense of what solutions are working, and to create the potential for partnerships to address the challenges and opportunities that can influence our quality of life."

Lydecker particularly encourages community leaders to attend representing such areas as non-profit organizations, government, education, the business community, civic organizations, as well as individual members of the general public.

Biology teachers can register for Evolution for Teachers (BIOL 789) and expand their knowledge, skills and resources for teaching this complex and socially controversial subject. The online format of the course makes it available to anyone with a computer and access to the Internet.

Two courses offered this spring will improve educators' and parents' understanding about children with learning disabilities. In Understanding Autism Spectrum Disorders (COMD 389/589), participants will learn effective strategies to enhance communication, socialization and learning among children with this disability.

Another course, Introduction to Learning Disabilities (PSYC 620), will review the criteria for assessing students and the attributes of students struggling with learning in academic, social and behavioral areas. Both courses are offered on the UW-RF campus and at area high schools via interactive television.

"Most of these teams have very established programs where they recruit students out of junior colleges or from 4-H teams to come to that university for the purpose of being on the judging team. We practiced for three months and finished in the top with the students who have been judging for years. To me, that is a huge accomplishment," Hiney said.

At a competition, students observe 12 classes of four horses each. They have to rank the horses according to their performances, or what the horses did, and conformation, or how the horses look. They then turn in cards with their placings after each class. How the students rank the horses is compared with the ranking of a panel of expert judges. The students are expected to place the horses similarly to the judges.

After the placing part of the competition, students prepare a set of oral reasons for selected classes. The students individually present their reasoning of why they placed each horse the way they did in a two-minute presentation. The students are judged on their use of correct terminology and overall oral performance, including voice tone and inflection. The oral reasons judge then gives the students a score for the set of reasons they just performed.

Wisconsin fiscal predictions indicate the state is on track for making its revenue projections. That likely will save UW-RF further give-backs this fiscal year and a reduction for the 2004 fiscal year that begins on July 1.

"To many outsiders, I expect it appears that we haven't missed a beat; that we maintained our stability throughout, and we kept on rolling. But you and I know that we did lose our footing, and we had to re-gain our balance to arrive at this tenuous point of equilibrium."

She noted that the entire University of Wisconsin System is undertaking a massive study to define its future. The massive "charting a new course" study is reviewing revenue authority, operating efficiencies, education quality, mission, and state partnerships.

Locally, Lydecker said, it will be important for the campus to continue to expand its presence in the St. Croix Valley. A recent public service inventory of faculty and staff that listed over a hundred contributions of expertise and time to community, regional, state and national public service and professional activities drew Lydecker's appreciation.

"Last fall I challenged each of you to explore ways that you could help us put the 'public' back in 'public education' by finding ways that you and your students could contribute to the growth and well-being of the local region, the state and the nation."

She said the listing demonstrates "we are responding to identified concerns and issues such as developing an efficient and effective workforce, recruiting higher paying jobs into the region, maintaining and enhancing the quality of life, protecting the environment, providing access to high quality education throughout one's life, encouraging and supporting cooperation between rural and urban entities in resolving growth issues, and finding means of providing adequate and affordable health care and human service."

Bye received his master's from UW-Madison in marketing and performed doctoral work in entrepreneurship and strategy. While at UW-Madison, he taught small business management classes. He also taught small business management and entrepreneurship at the University of St. Thomas. Bye has worked as a consultant with many small businesses throughout Minnesota and Wisconsin. These businesses vary from a furniture store to a biotechnology company.

The classes will help entrepreneurs determine if there is a need and the size of the potential market for their businesses. Offerings will also focus on marketing, finances and small business strategy.

Bye said the class called "Understanding Financials" is unique because it is unlike any class offered at other small business development centers in the UW System. It is designed to take away the intimidation of finances and will help people look at money differently than they are used to.

The program was made possible with the support of the Cultural Services of the French Embassy and the French Ministry of Culture. Listed below are the films, which are free and open to the public. Screenings begin at 6:30 p.m. in Room 271 of the Centennial Science Hall Building.

A Parisian couple on their way to a dinner party encounter a woman running frantically toward their car. A group of men proceed to beat the woman unconscious and leave her for dead. As this victim lies in a coma in the hospital the Parisian wife takes up residence by her beside.

Algeria, 2001. Set in the 1970s, this film depicts an example of a family impacted by France's "family reunion" law that allowed Algerian wives to rejoin their husbands who were working in France. The film follows an Algerian woman leaving her native country to face unfamiliar customs. She then finds her husband to be a stranger. This film is also the first ever Algerian featured film directed by a woman.

March 9. "On Guard," directed by Philippe de Broca, France, 1998. The film features the story of an evil and impoverished man who learns his rich cousin plans to marry the mother of his illegitimate child. He plots to eliminate the unwanted heirs to his cousin's fortune. In the countryside, the story continues with a swashbuckling tale of royal treachery, romance, and humor.

France, 2001. An aging actor in the prime of his career is delieverd terrible news during an important performance: his wife and children have been killed in a tradgic car accident. Saddened but not defeated, he is brought joy by his grandson and his favorite Parisian monuments. The film shows the zest for life that gives the human spirit resilience in the face of hardship.

A PK-16 council is a voluntary body composed of educational leaders and teachers from pre-kindergarten through college level that meet to create a seamless education system. Their goal is to promote access to education, student achievement, excellent teaching standards and lifelong learning.

Members of a PK-16 council believe that the quality of higher education is directly affected by the quality of PK-12 education, and the quality of a student's learning is directly affected by the quality of teaching.

The main goals for the PK-16 Council include building a statewide network for increased collaboration, information sharing and cooperation; increasing student readiness to succeed in postsecondary education by improving the quality of PK-12 teacher preparation and professional development; and aligning high academic standards for PK-12 students with postsecondary education.

Through PK-16, the art instructor can attend a class or a workshop with other art instructors from other school districts and gain the opportunity of exchanging ideas and resources that he or she otherwise would not have had.

PI-34 is a relatively new rule in Wisconsin that governs the qualifications for the licensure of teachers. Currently, teachers are required to take six credits of classes every five years. Under the new requirements for the PI-34 rule, teachers must outline how they are going to improve their teaching and develop professionally in five-year increments. For new teachers, a University faculty member must mentor them for one year. Manke said it should be for longer, but someone has to train the mentors.

If school districts cannot show that their students are making sufficient progress, there can be severe penalties. The PK-16 Council will assist teachers to know how to ensure that kids are making adequate progress.

For those interested in pursuing a master's degree, UW-RF offers a master of science in agricultural education and a master of science in education-elementary education, fine arts, literature, communication and language arts, math, reading or sciences. Classes can be taken in the summer.

Various workshops are also scheduled periodically. One held this semester, titled "Surviving the High School Musical," provided teachers with information on choosing the right play, coaching vocalists and choreographing scenes.

Self-paced and distance learning courses allow teachers to take courses at their own pace, whenever it is convenient for them. Some can be taken online, while others require access to a television and VCR.

One example is a course titled "Increasing Student Self-Esteem," where teachers learn to recognize the causes of low self-esteem, build students' self-esteem and motivate students to reach their potential.

The University has also been host to a PK-16 Model Academy, in which teams of university faculty and PK-12 teachers plan how to work together on improving certain content areas. The first academy held at UW-RF was in 2001. Manke said it was a huge success and it helped teachers and University faculty forge enduring partnerships to ensure that students receive quality education at all levels.

Lakes Center for the Arts in Amery; the bi-state St. Croix Scenic Coalition; and a regional educational collaboration. That will be followed by breakouts where forum participants will discuss opportunities, challenges and actions to take in the immediate future in each of the three topic areas.

Kelsey Mayer of White Bear Lake, Minn., will participate in the project as student research assistants. According to Peterson, the students will gain first-hand experience in the process of conducting scientific research.

Science Foundation to foster new scientific interactions between faculty at the U of M and those at undergraduate institutions in the region. The program will provide financial support, technology initiatives and assistance for obtaining additional funding. The grant also offers a series of seminars that features nationally and internationally renowned scientists over the internet.

The project, "Synthesis of Incarvillateine and Analogs," began with interest from UW-RF alumnus Aaron May of Minneapolis and an article found by Peterson in the Journal of Natural Products. The article described the strong pain relieving effects of incarvillateine.

"Incarvillateine is a biologically active compound that was isolated from the plant incarvillea sinenis," explained Peterson. "This wild plant is distributed in northern China and has been used in traditional Chinese medicine to treat Rheumatism and relieve pain." The project will attempt to synthesize the natural compound and structural analogs to understand which features of the natural structure are important for its biological activity.

Peterson plans to bring the research into the classroom to benefit the science students of UW-River Falls. He noted, "The topics that we discuss as part of the introductory organic chemistry courses are imminently important to addressing problems at the frontiers of science and medicine."

"This disease accounts for the majority of senile dementias after the age of 60 and it is the largest unmet medical need in the field of neurology today," said Professor E. Katherine Miller from the UW-RF biology department. "Simply put, Alzheimer's disease is epidemic in the older population."

As the featured speaker, Miller will address the biology and pathology of the disease in non-scientific terms, and provide current and accurate information about the disease and the different treatment options that are offered. Information on support groups for caregivers will also be provided.

Artists Dan Anderson, a retired professor from Southern Illinois University at Edwardsville, and Chuck Hindes, professor of art at the University of Iowa, are both graduates of the River Falls ceramic program studying under the guidance of Kurt Wild.

After earning their undergraduate degrees in the late 1960s, they went on to graduate programs. Anderson went to the Cranbrook Academy of Art in Michigan studying with Richard DeVore and Hindes went to the Rhode Island School of Design to study with Norm Schulman. Both artists enjoy international reputations as ceramic artists and have been very influential teachers.

Shepard was a 21-year-old student at the University of Wyoming who was kidnapped, beaten and tied to a fence to die because he was gay. Members of the Tectonic Theatre Project made several trips to Laramie, Wyo., over the course of a year and a half after Shepard's death and during the trial of the two men accused of his murder.

They conducted over 200 interviews with the people of Laramie and constructed a touching portrait that explores the depths to which humanity can sink and the heights of compassion that human beings are capable of.

Computing Center for three years and served as a statistical consultant in several of his colleagues' dissertations. His own research interests included studying junior high students' attitudes toward mathematics.

Snell was named Outstanding Teacher in the Humanities in the College of Arts and Sciences in 1989. He also participated in the Wisconsin in Scotland teaching program in 1993. He feels his best accomplishments were being a good teacher and eventually becoming department chair.

"More students are recognizing the importance of speech communication in their lives and in their careers. When I came here, it was thought of as only giving speeches; but today, people realize that communication is a basic survival skill,"

He has been very active outside of the University as well. He has hosted speech communication workshops for various high schools and judged forensic and debate tournaments. He has also been a reviewer for the "North Dakota Journal of Speech and Theatre."

This award is given to a member with outstanding achievement in a supervised agricultural experience placement program and who has actively participated in FFA and the community. Only a handful are honored each year.

Blaser has logged more than 10,000 hours of career placement work since he began keeping FFA records four years ago. As an assistant herdsman, he is responsible for feeding, fieldwork, dairy herd health and record keeping.

Sophomore Hope Yeager, a theatre major from River Falls, is in charge of promotions and publicity for the play. Junior Wayne Yeager, a theatre major from River Falls, is the shop foreman. Recent graduate John Stevens, a speech communications major from Columbia Heights, Minn., sophomore Peter Potyondy, a social studies major from Woodbury, Minn., and senior Jeremy L. Maybrey, a speech communications major from Blaine, Minn., are working in the scene shop.

Receiving the University's Outstanding Service Award will be Jeff McCardle, a 1978 alumnus who is the senior business loan manager at WESTconsin Credit Union in River Falls. McCardle was nominated for his extensive contributions in time and resources as a mentor to interns, and frequent lecturer in classes.

The award was established to recognize those individuals outside of the University community that have made exemplary contributions to the University of Wisconsin - River Falls through their support of the institution's goals and their volunteer efforts.

"Jeff McCardle is one of our stellar alumni and community members who engages fully, not partially, in giving back to his University and finding ways to ensure that the University and community are partners to the benefit of both," Lydecker said.

"Jeff always expresses his appreciation for the University and credits it for his success in life. He has always spoken of how he is seeking opportunities to ensure that our current and future students have the same opportunities as he did."

This has included serving as a "mock" interviewer to help students improve their job presentation skills. He also has lectured to students on how to make the financial transition from student to professional life.

Agricultural education Instructor Tamia Trulson noted that McCardle for years has lectured to her class on professional careers in agriculture and regularly invites students to observe him as he works. She said that McCardle has devoted countless hours to critiquing students' resumes to sharpen their appeal to employers.

Nylander will retire on Jan. 2. He joined UW-RF in 1969 as a member of the psychology department. He served and the department chair, as associate dean of the College of Education, and as a chair of the Faculty Senate before joining the administration in 1987 as assistant chancellor for administration.

A key area of responsibility for him are capital improvements. He was responsible for overseeing the Wyman Educaiton Building construction, and Davee Library, South Hall and Hathorn Hall remodelings. He is overseeing the construction or planning for the South Fork Suites, new student union, and the Dairy Learning Center. He also coordinated UW-RF land swaps for the current sites of the River Falls High School and the River Falls Youth Hockey Association Arena.

Senior Christine Honadel, a broadcast journalism and marketing communications major from Augusta; senior Brandon Bankston, a broadcast journalism major from Prescott; and senior Ember Kauth, a psychology major from Nekoosa, will attend the conference in January.

The conference, titled "From the Horse's Mouth," will give Wisconsin students who are disillusioned and frustrated with politics the opportunity to voice their opinions to members of Congress. Congress members will attend and speak about why they believe politics is an important part of public service and why they have dedicated their lives to it.

"There is overwhelming evidence that while young people are very good at volunteering, they are not very interested, and often turned off by, politics. The U.S. representatives who are coming are young, idealistic, smart and they believe that politics is public service, and that it is an important part of being a good citizen. I thought both groups should hear directly from each other about what the other thinks."

"The most important opportunity I will gain is the chance to participate in this discussion for students, like myself, who are frustrated by politics and would like to learn more in order to change their attitudes. I, personally, take a great interest in non-profit organizations and community service, which is an area that often times takes hard hits from funding cuts."

"Many politicians talk the talk to get elected, but few stand up to corporate pressures or are willing to go against the status quo, even if that means enacting legislation that many see as unconstitutional and oppressive. I'm looking forward to attending this conference because I hope by meeting the representatives face to face, by sharing my concerns and by hearing their opinions, I will regain some faith that this country is not a democracy in name only," Kauth said.

Students had to be nominated by a staff or faculty member from their college or university and then submit a one-page essay explaining why they want to attend the conference. Colleges and universities from throughout the state were asked to nominate up to three students per campus to attend the conference. All three nominated UW-RF students were chosen out of a total of 35 students who will be attending.

The Johnson Foundation is a nonprofit organization that sponsors small meetings of thoughtful inquiry in an atmosphere of candor and purpose. Their conferences are held at the Wingspread Conference Center in Racine, Wis.

Wisconsin Campus Compact is an association of college and university chancellors and presidents who strive to promote service that develops students' citizenship skills and values, encourage campus-community partnerships, and help faculty to integrate public and community involvement into their teaching and research.

Falls will help conservationists, community leaders, and recreation and hospitality providers build the skills necessary to effectively preserve area natural resources and generate jobs and revenue for their communities.

Special emphasis in the course will be placed on sustainable community planning and cost-benefit analysis, he added. Students will also get a sense of the professional skills needed to navigate the complex political dynamics that are essential to the success of a project.

The Wildlife Recreation and Nature Tourism Certificate is the first of its kind offered in the United States according to Cain. The program was developed in partnership with Watchable Wildlife, Inc., an international organization committed to helping local communities realize the economic potential of nature-related recreation while conserving native plants and animals in their natural habitats.

David Woodward, and assistant directors Beth Boisen and Margaret Thorne. Presenters will provide information on the 2004-05 Free Application for Federal Student Aid, state and federal financial aid programs, sensible borrowing, the electronic application process and college costs.

The program is of interest to all persons and their families with members who intend to continue their education after high school. A scholarship raffle for high school seniors will be held. Students must be present to win.

Embrace the process of personal growth and enhance your fun, play and joy in the New Year through a University of Wisconsin-River Falls course designed especially for women. Through readings, small group discussions, and individual reflection, participants will explore models on positive psychology and better understand how their life experiences may lead to personal and professional growth.

The course, "Finding Your Fun: Positive Psychology Trends," is offered through the College of Education and Professional Studies and the College of Arts and Sciences. The course would benefit current or future teachers; health professionals; all women at turning points in their lives; or anyone interested in growing stronger and having fun in life.

Berna has a doctorate in adult and continuing education with an emphasis on life transitions and an interest in successfully maneuvering turning points in our lifespan. She also holds a master's degree in health education with an emphasis in stress management. She has conducted many seminars and adult continuing education classes focusing on health-promoting ways of living, particularly for women.

UW-RF offers a variety of advantages for the public and student population during its January term. For UW-RF students, as well as other college students, the four-week session offers an opportunity to complete their program requirements in less time than during the regular academic year. Classes that are in high demand this past fall semester may be more accessible during J-term. Also students have a chance to experience other educational opportunities only offered during J-term. International study opportunities are scheduled for Egypt, Ireland, and Mexico. These travel programs are hosted by knowledgeable faculty members.

A host of courses are offered during J-term and may be reviewed on the web at http://www.uwrf.edu/jterm. The length of the classes depends upon the number of credits and the availability of the instructor during the winter session. The standard hours for any course vary depending on course intensity, level, and requirements. A credit hour is a unit of work equivalent to one class hour per week throughout the semester. Courses during J-term meet these standards in an accelerated format. Therefore, a larger credit course would require a greater number of hours met per week.

Tuition costs depend on the number of credits being taken. The cost for J-term may be found at the following website: http://www.uwrf.edu/accounts-receive/current-undergrad-pt-jterm.php for undergraduates and at http://www.uwrf.edu/accounts-receive/current-graduate-pt-jterm-php for graduate students.

The University of Wisconsin-River Falls approved five Sabbatical Programs for the 2004-2005 academic year. From research entrepreneurial small business owners in St. Croix County to studying health and human performance theories, the breadth and depth of study soon to be conducted by UW-River Falls faculty members is extensive.

"They can focus all of their attention on areas of professional interest and get re-energized. This is not possible when teaching full time," says Professor Nanette Jordahl, director of UW-RF faculty and student academic support programs.

"They bring new energy and ideas to the classroom, and students profit from more comprehensive and insightful classes" Coombs said. She noted the University may also receive recognition if a faculty members' research becomes publictized or well-known.

One professor whose sabbatical will specifically focus on creating fresh and innovative courses and advancing existing courses is Professor Margaret Swanson from the department of speech, communication, and theatre arts.

Swanson will focus on acquiring and practicing the philosophy, techniques and strategies employed by The Theatre of the Oppressed Practitioners, specifically Midwestern practitioners. Her leave will take place in the spring semester as she works at the Center for Applied Theatre in Milwaukee.

Collaborating with two universities in Mexico is Professor Anthony Jilek from the animal and food science department. Jilek will assist in the development of curricular reform in the animal science programs at the University of Guadalajara and the Autonomous University of Guadalajara. His leave will take place both semesters and will include work with a rural development institute in the state of Jalisco. He and the Cattlemen's Association will assist faculty and staff to work with producers for the genetic and environmental improvement of livestock.

John Walker will leave during the fall semester to study employment survey data in analyzing self-employed women and men in St. Croix County, Wis. His focus will be on the factors that influence the earnings and occupational differences between self-employed women and men. His research is essential to the welfare of the community. It will serve policy makers in promoting economic development in this region by identifying barriers women and men face in St. Croix County in operating their businesses.

Associate Professor Pascal Ngoboka will leave in the spring semester on a sabbatical with Dr. Alex Ijjo, Dean of the School of Business Administration and Management, at Uganda Martyrs University, in Kampala. His project is a comprehensive study of the taxation, tax structure changes, and policy implications for economic development in Uganda. Ngoboka's research is significant because the issue of taxation is crucial for development of the African economy, and little comparable research has been done in recent years. His work will also contribute to courses taught at UW-RF.

Professor Karla Zhe from the health and human performance department will focus her sabbatical project on strengthening her understanding of the theory and practice of the Authentic Pilates method of conditioning. Her study will enhance the curriculum of movement courses offered by her department. Physical education, dance, and general education classes will gain from her advanced training in the Authentic Pilates teaching certification program. Zhe will complete this program during the spring semester at The Pilates and Physical Therapy Center, in Seattle, Wash.

Candidates are evaluated on the quality of their proposal and on their academic contributions to the University. This includes activities recognized in decisions of promotion and tenure, quality of teaching, scholarly activity, and service to the University and the wider community. Proposals are then evaluated on merit of the specifics of the sabbatical and meeting of the proposal requirements.

Fitzgerald serves on the board as the technology committee chair. Last year, he redesigned and expanded the organization's web page. He has been instrumental in increasing member use of the web page, which provides organization and conference information, membership lists, registration materials, state career fair dates, information about Wisconsin college and university career services offices and other survey information.

"Usually the person who receives this award has been in the organization for a very long time and has served on the organization's board for many terms, so I am humbled to have received the award after being here for such a short time," he said.

He also has worked with conference presenters, converting conference and meeting presentations to power point visuals. At conferences, he supervises the necessary technology so presentations and meetings run smoothly. Fitzgerald graduated from UW-RF in 1996. He resides in New Richmond.

A non-traditional student whose teenage son was murdered by another family member, who then killed himself. "This mother, my student, walks through her life and her daily grief with a grace I find wondrous, admirable." She noted that the mother brought treats for her entire class at its final exam.

A student who decided to be an English major struggled so greatly with the mechanics that Brantley wondered if he should switch majors. His persistence over the years at polishing his skills has produced an accomplished writer whose works earn the lavish praise of faculty.

She overcame her fear of ridicule and brought in a photo of two mothers. "Another dimension to that story it that her classmates, whom I feared might react poorly, wrote in their journals about their own admiration for her courage.

She noted how he was always encouraging to others in class, and spoke about his missionary work with children in Central America. A week before his death he contacted Brantley to thank her for her support.

A current student who at the age of 13 held a pencil in his hand for the first time. He was an immigrant from Somalia who fled the horrors of war in his own nation. Brantley encountered him when he was a freshman, separated from his family but eager to learn. He will graduate next year.

She concluded, "Now demand the best of yourselves every day. Remember to give back to your community, to your family, to make decisions, not based on market value, but based instead on your heart, your moral compass, your education."

Also at the ceremony, the University's Outstanding Service Award was presented to Jeff McCardle, a 1978 alumnus who is the senior business loan manager at WESTconsin Credit Union in River Falls. McCardle was nominated for his extensive contributions in time and resources as a mentor to interns, and as a frequent lecturer in classes. He has served for 10 years on the UW-RF Foundation Board of Directors and is the current chair of the board. The award is the highest the University can bestow on a friend of the institution.

Members of the UW-River Falls faculty and staff traveled to China recently to strengthen ties with Chinese educational institutions and foster international opportunities for the campus and community.

"We already have a student very interested in going to Zhejiang as early as this spring semester. Not only will this be an excellent study abroad experience for this student, but she will also serve as a channel for increased exchange activity and a broader understanding of the two cultures."

How Man is an explorer, conservationist and photojournalist who is credited with discovering the true source of the Yangtze River. He received the prestigious honor of being named UW-RF's 2002 Distinguished Alumnus. He continues to launch new projects through the China Exploration and Research Society.

CERS projects range from the protection of rare black-neck cranes, antelope, wild yak and wild ass of the Tibetan plateau in the 45,000 square kilometer Altun Mountain Reservation in northwestern China, to conserving Palpung and Baiya monasteries and preserving a Moso village at Luguhu. The village is one of China's few remaining matrilineal communities. One of his projects recently aired on the Discovery Channel, titled "The Hanging Coffins of China."

UW-RF alumnus. He profoundly appreciates the high quality education he received from UW-RF and feels a strong desire to stay connected and to give back to his alma mater. We have developed a deep and productive relationship with How Man.

Lydecker, Greene, May and Wong met with a Tibetan nomadic tribe to learn about the process of making yak butter and other dairy products using yak milk. Wong plans to build a small experimental yak cheese production laboratory. May will travel to China in late May with three UW-RF students to begin work on this project. The students were chosen due to their technical training at the UW-RF dairy plant. They will work as a team with representatives from two or three Tibetan nomadic tribes.

"If we can produce a quality marketable cheese we will have helped improve the lives of a group of people whose lifestyle is rapidly dissipating. At present, the cheese they produce is very low quality. It is literally a waste product of their butter making process."

"Not only will this project help the Tibetans improve and partially preserve a dying lifestyle, it will also provide a very intense and fulfilling study abroad experience for some of our students. I think this is only the beginning of other joint projects between UW-RF and CERS," said Greene.

"Both universities are especially interested in working out an agreement of cooperation similar to the one with ZEI where we can exchange students, faculty and work collaboratively on other academic endeavors."

Greene also visited the Shih Hsin University in Taipei, Taiwan, where he met with Tzung-Tsann Mu, the president of the University, and the director of international programs and other faculty and staff.While there, he discussed the possibility of further exchange opportunities with Shih Hsin.

"I think the eventual outcomes of this trip will be even more powerful and productive for the many, as yet, unimagined connections, visits back and forth between faculty, staff and students from many academic disciplines and for the many joint projects that will evolve through the coming years."

"The entire trip was extremely productive. China is an historical, culturally and ethnically rich country of vast human and natural resources. It is poised to be a world leader in the next half century. It will behoove the U.S. and universities such as UW-RF to establish close relations with partner institutions in China."

After 24 years of military service in Israel, Lt. Gen. Orit Adato continues to make significant gains in furthering the role of women in military forces, as well as within Israeli society. Her new role as commissioner of the Israel Prison Service has gained new frontier in the advancement of women in society.

Lt. Gen. Orit Adato presented a seminar titled, "Women in Israeli Society," on Monday, Nov. 3, at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls. She spoke about her role as commissioner of the Israel Prison Service and the relative importance of advancing women to leadership positions in the military and within Israeli society.

As a result of the changing attitudes and legislation promoting women to officer and general positions, more women are applying for and being elected in municipal elections. There are more women in the Israeli government today. The attorney general, several judges in the supreme court, the commissioner of income tax, and several ambassadors are all women.

Outlining her experiences, Adato said she faced extreme trends of terrorism at the start of her position as Commissioner of Israel Prison Service, Adato immediately enacted her visions of the organization and its long-term goals.

Adato was forced to impose tough security measures in Israeli prisons in response to the Palestinian uprising against Israeli occupation. For instance, inmates were allowed to hug and hold family members during the last 10 minutes of visits; however, when inmates began to smuggle items in the diapers of their children, these rights were taken away.

Adato said her appointment to commissioner shocked the prison service. Previous commissioners of the prison service were generals pulled from the police force, but Adato was an outsider. She was a full ranking army brigadier general in command of the women's corps at the time of her new assignment. Her position was an unlikely transition. However, the most shocking factor of Adato's appointment was her being a woman in a male-oriented society. It was a great challenge to uphold the expectations of her position and be a role model for women, but Adato succeeded in paving the way for the future of women in the military.

Adato appeared before the United Nations in March 1999 to speak for women's rights. Her perception of women's progress in the military became a motivating force in the legislation that opened new positions and combat roles for women in the military.

Women are a quality resource that should be utilized, Adato said. There is a need for equality simply to avoid discrimination; however, there is also an added value of having women in higher ranking positions and integrating women into combat. When a woman is appointed to a position for the first time, she strives to succeed. Women will do their best, not only to fulfill the position, but also to increase the likelihood of more women being appointed to headquarter positions, Adato said.

The quartet is dedicated to the exploration and performance of jazz and improvised music for saxophone quartet. The group performs original music composed by its members, arrangements of jazz classics and newly composed works commissioned by the JSQ.

The sale contains artwork by current students, faculty, alumni, emeriti faculty and a variety of local artisans who all generously donate their time and talent to make this event successful each year.

The UW-River Falls physics department offers an in-depth pre-engineering and dual degree program, which is a valuable asset to the western Wisconsin region, where new industries are establishing companies.

Skills learned in this class allow engineers to specify the appropriate sizes of components for buildings, bridges and machinery. This is especially important in construction, which is occurring every day in western Wisconsin.

UW-RF also offers courses with a strong emphasis on electronics, such as Circuits and Devices, Analog Electronics and Digital Electronics. These classes are vital to anyone interested in a technical career. Most physics programs would offer just one course in electronics. Students may also take a computer programming course and two math for physics and engineering courses.

The dual degree program allows students to attend UW-RF for three years, then transfer to an engineering school and finish in two more years. After a student is done, he or she holds an undergraduate degree from UW-RF in physics and an engineering degree from the school of engineering. UW-RF students usually attend the University of Minnesota or the University of Wisconsin-Madison to finish their engineering degree.

UW-RF physics students participate in an internship program that teaches them the realities of the workplace, such as writing resumes, cover letters and conducting research. Many students are placed at companies in western Wisconsin, such as Niro in Hudson, which makes equipment used in freeze drying, or Phillips Plastics in Hudson. Some are placed in the Twin Cities, at places such as 3M or Banner Engineering.

Plastics manufacturing and industry is growing in western Wisconsin because developers see a market with potential, which allows UW-RF students many job and internship opportunities. For example, two UW-RF alumni that completed the dual degree program are working in Clear Lake at a company that develops conformal coatings. These are used in archival preservation of old documents and as insulation in the electronics industry, since they are fire retardant.

Madsen said that the program at UW-RF is heavily weighted toward experimental and hands-on physics and students receive a broad background which allows them to step into industry with valuable problem-solving, lab, and research skills.

The purpose of the program is aimed at continuing the education of professionals in the fields of food science and microbiology, according to the symposium's coordinator, food science Professor P.C. Vasavada.

The conference was launched with a speech about emerging food safety and regulatory issues in Wisconsin by keynote speaker Secretary Rod Nilsestuen. An alumnus of UW-RF, Nilsestuen is secretary of the Wisconsin Department of Agriculture, Trade and Consumer Protection.

Also speaking was Will Hueston, the director of the Center for Animal Health and Food Safety at the University of Minnesota in St. Paul. Hueston spoke about Wisconsin's chronic wasting disease problem in it's deer herd, and the future potential for mad cow disease. He emphasized the need for more scientific research and public communication on this topic.

Technical representatives of 18 different companies involved in developing and marketing instruments and assays for microbiological analysis of food participated in these sessions. The companies displayed and demonstrated current tests and new instruments for the rapid detection of food pathogens. Many of the companies involved have participated in the symposium for several years. New this year was Vermicon AG's from Germany, which demonstrated a new instrument for the sensitive and specific detection of pathogens such as listeria, salmonella, and spoilage organisms in food.

The speakers, participants, and attendees of the conference made it one of the most successful symposiums in recent years. Said Vasavada, "It was the most successful in terms of attendance, in terms of participants, and in terms of the diversity of the audience."

The University of Wisconsin-River Falls offers a variety of classes for the public and student population during its January Term, Dec. 29 to Jan. 23. Both college students and community members can take advantage of this accelerated session.

For UW-RF and other college students, the four-week session offers an opportunity to complete their program requirements in less time than during the regular academic year. Classes that were in high demand at UW-RF this fall may be more accessible during the January Term.

Other educational opportunities, such as international study opportunities to Egypt, Ireland and Mexico, are only offered during the January Term. These travel programs are hosted by knowledgeable faculty members and are open to the public while space is available.

Educators seeking a K-12 principal license now have the ability to take credits toward their certification, while continuing to work, through a state partnership of the University of St. Thomas, in Minneapolis, Minn. and the University of Wisconsin-River Falls.

The program was designed by the Wisconsin Department of Public Instruction a a way to help ease the severe shortage of principals in the region, correlating with the nationwide shortage, as well. Because the UW-RF offered neither the master's degree in education administration nor independently has the faculty to support it, the partnership of St. Thomas and UW-RF was created as an option for Wisconsin residents for certification as a K-12 principal.

Targeted mainly for students who have a master's degree, as the state of Wisconsin requires principals to have master's degrees, students with out their master's can also earn it through the University of St. Thomas with an additional 3-credit research course.

Individuals enrolled in the program work as a group and support one another for the two-year period. The program begins in the summer with the first of two intensive seminar and workshops. Most of the courses taken over the academic school semesters are held over a Friday evening and full day Saturday. Some courses are shortened in weeks by lengthening the class periods. The cohort and instructors decide where they will meet, negotiating a location central to all. Examples of some meeting sites are Menomonie, Baldwin, or New Richmond.

The two summer sessions consist of the leadership development seminars. The three-credit seminars are full days and last for three weeks. In addition, a one-credit, one-week laboratory is also required. These laboratories are very hands-on. They involve in-baskets, leaderless groups, simulations, and role-playing.

Students must meet seven Wisconsin Administrator standards and 21 national policy standards by building portfolios. Meeting these requirements though assignments, classes, or internships results in completion of the program.

Emphasis is on areas such as: critical competencies of leadership, decision-making, oral and written communication, interpersonal skills, problem analysis, curriculum planning, judgement, human relations, dealing with the media, budgeting, supervision of personnel, and laws. Theoretical and practical experiences are based on a reflective practice model.

Hakim is also author of "Freedom: A History of US", an elegant single volume survey of American history rich in biographical detail and primary documents that served as the inspiration for a television series by the same title. Sixteen episodes hosted by Katie Couric aired on PBS last year. With Christopher Reeve as creative consultant, the voices of Julia Roberts, Morgan Freeman, Tom Hanks and over a dozen other celebrities contributed to the groundbreaking enterprise.

In addition to presentations and readings by Hakim, numerous experts will engage teachers in intellectual dialogue about the American character as well as hands-on experiences with effective teaching strategies.

"Kids shouldn't have to read anything that adults wouldn't want to read." She has worked extensively with teachers and parents and has taught elementary school, high school, and special education. She has shared her contagious enthusiasm for history with a variety of people, from 15-year-olds in inner-city schools to adults discovering the pleasures of America's collective past. Believing that history should be fun for people of all ages, Hakim takes readers from 9 to 90 on breathtaking journeys and continues to promote the idea that "to find the story in a subject is to discover its essence." A reviewer for the Philadelphia Inquirer wrote, "[Her] books are written in the warm and chatty voice of a grandmother telling stories and leaving in all the good stuff."

One of Hakim's unique contributions to the fields of history, writing and teaching is what she describes as the concept of "exact imaging." Since history is first and foremost an adventure, it should be told with as much imagination about the dreams, thoughts and feelings of historical figures as possible. This process is committed to the process of historical accuracy without over-emphasizing trivial facts.

Hakim's efforts to balance vivid and accessible story telling with credible scholarship apparently works. Historians, from James McPherson to David McCullough, routinely lavish praise upon her work. David Herbert Donald of Harvard University said: "I think this is the best American History written for young people that I have ever seen. It combines a thorough mastery of the facts with an engaging, accessible style, and Ms. Hakim's numerous biographical sketches will be sure to hold the attention of her readers. What I find most refreshing about Ms.

With such honest reporting, she has been criticized by some as too easy and by others as too difficult, by some as too controversial and by others as too much fun. Such diverse critiques are often the hallmark of a superb, if enigmatic, writer. When she first went public with her momentous achievement, numerous major textbook publishers in America initially rejected Hakim's books. The prestigious Oxford Press finally made a deal but proceeded to give Hakim directives for changes: "only say "African-American" and never "black"; use only "enslaved person" and never "slave." Hakim refused and Oxford finally published the series on its own in 1993, almost a decade after she had started writing it.

National Endowment for the Humanities. "Still Searching for America: Conversations on National Identity" has provided opportunities for teachers to engage in rigorous conversations about the meaning of the evolving American identity, including experimentation with new ways to teach about America. In particular, teachers are introduced to standards for evaluating their own instruction and methods of assessment as well as final student performances. These standards stress the importance of constructing meaningful knowledge through disciplined inquiry in ways that connect subject matter to students' lives outside the classroom.

American History," an engaging curriculum that involves mainstream students in the authentic activity of a real historian; David Milne, associate professor of music who will provide a live musical session on the importance of jazz to the development of American identity; Kurt Leichtle, author of a new 4th grade text on the history of Wisconsin and expert in web-based resources for K-12 teachers; So-young Tikoo, associate professor from DePaul University who will lead a discussion on acculturation strategies of new immigrants and an exercise to help students understand prejudice; Mike Yell, Hudson Middle School teacher and national middle school teacher of the year who will demonstrate strategies for enhancing the substantive conversation of students using primary documents and artifacts.

Jon Peterson, alternative school teacher from Roseville who will share a project for reaching at-risk kids titled "The Broken Truth: Examining Identity Through Allegory"; and Geoff Scheurman, professor of teacher education and project director who will engage teachers in a powerful discussion strategy for getting students to develop critical thinking skills while interacting over controversial issues.

The international community of scientists and engineers that build, study and evaluate the nuclear and particle astrophysics and cosmology of the IceCube observatory enable others to experience the excitement of learning and discovery.

The UW-RF physics faculty was very enthusiastic about helping Eisch get started on research. His experience with similar functioning tanks in the UW-RF physics lab will enable him to perform his duty at the South Pole observatory. He will be monitoring the freeze of water in two prototype detectors on the surface of the South Pole station. Also, last month he underwent training with these instruments at the Bartol Research Institute in Delaware. There he met and worked with the people he will be joining.

Eisch's addition to the team is significant. He must make sure the detector equipment runs correctly. "This has never been done before at the pole, so I will have to be ready for anything that could go wrong."

Eisch is the only undergraduate going to the pole this season; however, this significance doesn't affect his motivation or performance. A month ago, he gave a talk in Mons, Belgium, on his research thus far. He was the only undergraduate out of 120 research physicists at the meeting.

The history of astronomy shows that work in new energy has invariably resulted in the discovery of totally unexpected phenomena. Eisch is excited to be one of the first people to peer through this "new window" into the universe that is sure to open new frontiers of understanding. "I'm excited to be working with such great people on a project that will give us new eyes to discover more about this amazing universe we live in."

Through the use of about 750 optical sensors, the AMANDA can detect faint flashes of light from subatomic particles, neutrinos, through the transparent ice. The unique interactions of neutrinos with matter make them valuable as astronomical messengers. AMANDA has demonstrated the viability of a neutrino telescope in ice by detecting neutrinos produced in the earth's atmosphere as far away as the North Pole.

When cows graze, their manure and the nutrients going into the ground are more difficult to account for than for cows in confinement. Much less information exists concerning grazing systems than confinement systems.

One focus of the conference was point-source pollution versus non-point source pollution. Point-source pollution is when the specific source and location of the pollutant is known, such as a pipe pouring oil into a river.

Non-point source pollution occurs when the pollutant comes from an area too broad to determine the source. For example, when all the farmers in an area spread manure, herbicide or fertilizer on their fields, it is impossible to pinpoint the exact source of pollution.

Phosphorous and nitrogen are both present in manure. Too much phosphorous will pollute surface runoff water that goes into lakes and rivers, causing algae to bloom. If too much nitrogen is present, it can leak into the ground water and pollute it.

Persons attending this conference hope to develop nutrient management plans for grazing farms that will account for all of the nutrients present in feed and manure. If they can determine how much manure is actually produced on dairy grazing farms, a nutrient management plan would help farmers avoid overapplication and prevent water pollution.

Cosgrove and UW-RF dairy science Professor Dennis Cooper received a grant last summer from the Sustainable Agriculture Research and Education program in the United States Department of Agriculture to conduct a three-year study and demonstration project on feed and nutrient intake on eight grazing dairy farms in Wisconsin.

Experience the glory that was ancient Greece and a glorious modern Greece as well. Plan now to participate this summer in the Experience Greece Tour lead by Pat Hanson. Hanson, who teaches at UW-River Falls, previously served as a diplomat at the U.S. Embassy in Athens.

"I'm delighted to have the opportunity to return to the cradle of civilization," said Hanson. "And to introduce students, faculty, alumni and members of the community to the Greece I have come to know and love."

In Olympia, participants have the opportunity to run (or walk) in their own mini-Olympics; Karolides has always conducted a race at this ancient site for interested participants. Hanson promises to continue the tradition, particularly this coming year when Greece will play host to the 2004 Olympic games in August.

The tour takes in many islands, too. Participants will sail to Crete, where they will visit the archeological site of Knossos. An added bonus on Crete is the optional hike down the awe-inspiring Samarian Gorge. On Santorini, the tour will take in the active dig of Akrotiri. The entire island of Delos, the birthplace of Apollo and Artemis, is one large archeological site. Mykonos is better known for its windmills and excellent beaches. In addition to stops at these five scheduled islands, additional trips to Hydra or Aegina are optional.

The 7,800-square-feet facility will have six classrooms for children ages six weeks to 12 years, and be able to provide services for up to 96 children. The classrooms will surround a central play area with office and support space.

Foster of the College of Education and Professional Studies. Area legislators and students who send their children to the center also will participate. After the program, the ceremony will move to the building site, across the road from Crabtree. Children and staff from the childcare center will sing and help with the shovel turning in a special sandpile that will be set up for them. A reception will follow at the site.

Mary Halada, assistant to the vice chancellor for administration and finance, thinks this project is wonderful thing for the community and students. "Students get first priority since they already pay a fee for childcare along with their tuition. You don't find flexible childcare as far as scheduling goes anywhere except in a University setting," Halada said.

The design for the building was created by Workshop Architects in association with Moody/Nolan Architects from Milwaukee. Construction is scheduled to begin the week of Oct. 6 and should be completed in July.

Originality is the theme as guest artists and local artists display their creations. Each artist strives to explore new ways of expression, using unique tools, as well as working with others to leave a memorable impression on viewers.

This year's guest artist is John Garrett. Garrett holds a master's degree in design from the University of California-Los Angeles and has taught for Scripps College and UCLA. Using his expertise in the application of textile technologies and imagery to various materials, in which he has been working with for the past 25 years, Garrett will work with students on a project of his design as an installation.

Students will be constructing installations on Oct. 13 -14. The finished works can be viewed from Oct. 15-17. All who view the works are asked to act with respect toward the artist and not to damage or alter his or her installations.

He is a former New York City police officer, and has served as a fire marshal, an arson investigator, a lieutenant and a captain prior to becoming Chief in 1992. For the past nine years he has presided over the department's Battalion 11, covering Manhattan's Upper West Side.

She learned not to ask about the mother who had given her away while living with her American family. When moving to a big city after receiving a music scholarship, one of her fellow university students began to follow her. His obsessions ultimately escalated into a plot for her murder.

Trenka's memoir recounts repeated close encounters with her stalker and the years of repressed questions that were awakened by her experience. Trenka became determined not to be defined by her stalker's twisted assessment of her worth and embarked upon a search for her own identity. She was forced to confront her American family and fight the bureaucracy at the agency that arranged her adoption. She wished for freedom from western stereotypes of geishas and good girls.

The recipient of the award is selected by a committee of faculty members in the College and approved by the Dean. One of the committee members is the recipient from the previous year. This is the second year the award has been given.

He earned his bachelor's degree in history from Purdue University. He received two master's degrees from Indiana University and a doctorate in marketing and international business from Kent State University.

This year he has been researching the difference of how men are portrayed in television commercials in the United States and England. The research findings will be submitted to an advertising or marketing journal for publication. He is also researching service logos with UW-RF marketing Professor Jacque Foust.

Miller's research findings have appeared in many prestigious publications such as "Journal of Advertising, Psychology & Marketing" "Journal of Marketing Communications," "International Journal of Aging and Human Development" and "Journal of Advertising History."

He is involved in various aspects of campus and community service. He is a member of the UW-RF curriculum committee and search committee. He also is a marketing consultant to a performing arts center and a reviewer and discussant for various marketing conferences.

"The Creative Movement Class is child-centered and uses colorful props, imagery and music to encourage children to express themselves through movement and physical play," said instructor Susan Sell. "The Intro to Dance class is designed for the child who is interested in building a foundation in dance vocabulary and refine and enhance specific movement skills, personal expression and creativity."

One four-week session of the 45-minute classes is offered for each age group at a cost of $30 per student. All classes will be held on the UW-River Falls campus in the Karges Center Dance Studio. Class size is limited so parents should contact the Outreach Graduate Studies soon to register.

Teachers who are interested in pursuing certification from the National Board for Professional Teaching Standards can learn about the standards and requirements in an introductory graduate course offered by UW-River Falls this October.

Participants in the support program can earn up to five additional graduate credits or enroll on a non-credit basis for a reduced fee. Cost for the introductory course is $269 for Wisconsin residents and Minnesota residents with reciprocity.

Freddy's Tailgate Party, under the pavilion at Ramer Field. A brat and beer feed will take place near the concession stand. The homecoming game between the Falcons and UW-Eau Claire will kick off at 1 p.m. at Ramer Field.

Want To," are displayed on large posters around campus. However, the posters aren't about what they appear to be. To understand the message from the nearly-kissing couple, students must read the very small, fine print: 90 percent of UW-River Falls students would rather kiss a non-smoker.

The University received a grant of $42,000 from the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services to implement a program aimed at preventing and reducing the use of tobacco by students. The Tobacco Prevention Program is based on a model developed at the University of Wisconsin-Oshkosh. In hopes of similar success, such as the 29 percent decrease in smoking after only one year at UW-Oshkosh, UW-RF launched its program in January. The extensive "You Know You Want To" marketing campaign attempts to convince students to quit using tobacco while reducing exposure to secondhand smoke.

A recent survey showed that 16 percent of UW-RF students consider themselves smokers. Significantly, 74 percent of them said they want to quit before they graduate; this figure is also seen up-close on the posters. With the help of Jennifer Elsesser, UW-RF tobacco education coordinator, hopefully this year's graduating class will be smoke-free.

The campaign also incorporates the word, "free," which is an eye-catching word for any college student. Such free give-aways also are part of the campaign, including "Love your Lungs" pens are used in class, and "Nice Lungs" tee shirts that students can wear around campus.

Student interns offer to share presentations in classrooms, resident halls, or to student organizations regarding the project, campus attitudes about smoking, and the risks of secondhand smoke. A web site also offers a variety of information.

American Cancer Society, a community cessation resource guide, as well as a two week plan to quit smoking or chewing. A cost of smoking calculator measures money spent on tobacco according to individual counts of packs per day and smoking frequency. Completing the kit are gum, mints, and sunflower seeds. Each individual who picks up a kit receives a follow-up after a couple of weeks to find out how he or she is doing and how the quit kit could be improved.

The campaign has also caught on in downtown River Falls, where the City Council recently passed an ordinance that bans smoking in all restaurants. UW-RF, which bans smoking in all buildings, will soon decide whether to require smokers to stay at least 25 feet around all buildings.

Adato also is the commissioner of the Israel Prison Service and serves actively with the International Prisons and Corrections Association. She is the first woman to hold the top prisons service position.

As commissioner, she has placed an emphasis on integrating security and treatment of prisoners, reinforcing ties with the community and handling the treatment of special prisoner populations, such as women, juveniles and sex offenders.

Adato earned a bachelor's degree from the University of Haifa, Israel, in education and administration and Israel studies. She received a master's degree in political science, also from the University of Haifa.

The three-star general also is a member of the Israeli Prime Minister's committee for the advancement of women in society. She traveled to the United Nations in March, 1999 as a member of the Israeli delegation speaking for women's rights.

The conference took place Oct. 3-6. It brought together over 1,200 international attendees to participate in research and information exchanges, networking, career development activities and social events.

Native Planting," showed how they used a landscape plan to add native vegetation to property to meet storm water runoff rules. The property, in Polk County, belongs to UW-RF mathematics lecturer Jim Davis.

Konlock, who also has a degree from the UW-Madison in civil engineering, said that this project shows students how concepts learned in class can be applied in the world. He is proud of the acknowledgement of their hard work.

Matt Kinnard, a senior from Horicon and a horticulture major, is the president of the Horticulture Society. He said that they have approximately 35 active members who participate in many events all through the year. These include plants sales, making floral arrangements for University events, sponsoring speakers, attending conventions and participating in field trips.

Healy is currently touring the U.S. as a vocal coach and accompanist to the renowned Irish tenor Anthony Kearns. His charm and wit are evident in his light-hearted, hilarious performances. The UW-RF College of Arts and Sciences and the Croix Chordsmen Barbershop Chorus sponsor this event.

Iowa, and northern Illinois. Topics include pre-contact cultures and migrations, the fur trade, the treaty period, and the contemporary era. Students will learn major cultures, key events, and the organization and structure of Native American groups.

"Native Americans and the Upper Midwest" is an online course with no face-to-face meetings. Students are required to participate each week in the online discussion board. Upon completion of the course, students will receive two undergraduate or graduate credits and will have met the Native American course requirements for Wisconsin Department of Public Instruction teacher licensure.

Leichtle has sought out numerous teaching venues beyond the traditional classroom to bring history education to young people and to those who cannot easily access a university campus because of their location.

In a presentation titled "Teaching and Learning with Two Bills, a Swift and a Smith," Beckham will offer a reflective and thought-provoking discussion around two historical writers, William Wordsworth and William Faulkner, and two contemporary writers, Graham Swift and Zadie Smith. All four writers have had a profound effect on his life and he believes they continue to enrich the lives of those who read their works.

According to workshop leader Steve Watters, "Now is a great time to learn or brush up on your dressing, caping, and cutting techniques. Hunting season is just around the corner and you'll be able to put these skills to good use almost immediately. If you pay a commercial locker to process your deer, it'll cost you anywhere between $60 and $100 per deer."

The workshop will include an update on Chronic Wasting Disease, and demonstrations of basic kill zones on deer, correct techniques and equipment for field evisceration, skinning and caping, cutting, and getting a deer freezer-ready. "We'll even cover the basics of home-made sausage-making" says Watters. A limited number of participants, age 16 years and older, will be able to register for hands-on cutting practice as part of the workshop.

Institute, in Albuquerque, N.M.. She will discuss the Connections Project that brought together six artists from the former Yugoslavia for a one-month printmaking residency. The goal is to encourage meaningful dialogue that promotes understanding and cooperation between artists from countries divided by politics and ethnic ideology. The project also prompted cultural exchanges between Botswana and New Mexico pueblo artists and collaborations and workshops in India, Chile, Mexico, and the Soviet Union.

When Clarissa Schwartz's first words were "horse" and "neigh," her parents knew she would be a horse lover. They signed her up for riding lessons when she was just six years old and Schwartz has been riding ever since.

Sept. 14-20. Clarissa Schwartz and her horse, Angel, surpassed 15 other competitors to win the class. In this competition, three judges look at overall presentation and poise by the rider, as well as performance of a specific pattern of movements.

Impromptu questions about the horse's anatomy or tack (the horse's gear) are also asked of the rider. The movement patterns are posted a few hours before the show in order for the riders to review and study them. The only other preparation involved is the consistent years of training, experience, and trust between the rider and the horse.

Last year, after her second championship, Schwartz retired her horse, Rico, and purchased Angel, who Schwartz describes as a "hotter" horse. The more experienced show horse helped advance her at the show this year.

Schwartz and Angel have a trusting relationship of cooperation and teamwork that led to this year's victory. All competitors in her class had performed the movements well, but it came down to a particular maneuver, called side passing, that only Schwartz and Angel were able to execute. It was a lateral movement that many horses get confused about when given directions from their riders.

Schwartz began riding Paso Fino horses about five years ago when her parents bought two at the Parade of Breeds horse show, at the state fair. She was there competing on the Junior Equistriam Team, when her present-day trainer fancied her performance and recruited her to ride in national championships.

Paso Finos are a gaited-breed. They bounce from side to side instead of up and down like Quarterhorses or Thoroughbreds. The different gait and frame of a Paso Fino doesn't allow them to be combined with other horses in horse shows.

Along with winning the Grand National Championship in September, Schwartz was also named Youth of the Year. This award is given to a youngster between the ages of 13 and 17 that have displayed the most dedication, volunteerism, and have radiated the most spirit. In her last year of eligibility, Schwartz said she was honored to receive this award. She will move on to the amateur class in Feb. 2004, with her first competition in Ocala, Fla.

Pilgreen's job duties include budget management, supervising accounting, recruiting new employees, and managing issues concerning local labor law, payroll, taxes and social security issues for embassy employees.

Employees volunteer their time on scheduled trips back to the town of their choice to talk to local organizations, elementary or high schools, college alma maters, meet with state and local officials and participate in media interviews.

"Our purpose is to show citizens the importance of foreign and civil services in local communities, showcase careers and internships available through the State Department and recruit new employees," Pilgreen said.

He spoke to two political science classes at UW-RF about U.S. foreign relations in Serbia-Montenegro and careers in the Foreign Service. He also staffed booths at two campus student functions: the Semester Abroad Fair for students contemplating studying abroad , and the Career Fair on campus, where students and the public could learn about career options with the Foreign Service and the State Department.

Paid for entirely through student fees and grants, the 7,800-square-feet facility will boast an open central play space surrounded by six classrooms for children ages six weeks to 12 years, and be able to provide services for up to 96 children.

Foster noted that the program uses elementary education majors and early childhood education minors to supplement the center's staff. Other majors who will work with the children include those in early childhood education, communicative disorders, social work, counseling and school psychology.

"There is great potential to impact our education programs" through placing student teachers in a field-based experience, an ability to observe them as they are learning, and also providing jobs for students, Foster said.

Bylander, who now is a computer program specialist managing the child care subsidy program in Dakota County, as a student was instrumental in convincing student leadership to fund the new C.H.I.L.D. Center. As a non-traditional parent with a child at the daycare, she noted "knowing my son was close by and well-cared for eased my mind and allowed me to concentrate on my studies. I knew he was in a stimulating environment."

Harsdorf, who accepted the building on behalf of the state, said she was pleased that the University is ensuring "exciting things are happening on campus; that people not only think about new ideas, but make them happen."

The new childcare center is funded with student fees and grants without any state tax dollars. Students voted to use these fees to provide funding for the building. The University received a $100,000 federal grant called Childcare Access Means Parents in School. It will help with the continuing operation of the facility, especially paying for student help.

As an average American, he finds an apartment where he tries to undertake the writing of a novel. The tale turns scandalous when he meets Sally Bowles, played by senior Meghan Olson, a speech communication major from Bloomer. Sally is an irrepressible young woman looking for a few laughs and a good time. Sally is a flirtatious performer who is self-involved and sexy. Cliff falls in love with her and they spend many nights together at the local cabaret. The cabaret is brimming with mystery and seduction. Their amusement comes to a screeching halt when Germany is taken over by Nazis. The young couple soon realizes that life is more than fun and games as Europe prepares itself for World War II.

Swanson. UW-RF student actors and actresses were auditioned in the first two weeks of the fall semester. Rehearsals have lasted for two months. Also helping in preparation for the upcoming event is the stage manager, senior June Berg, a theatre arts major from Sauk Rapids, Minn. Overseeing the design and creation of the set and costumes is Professor Robin Murray who is responsible for costuming, and Professor Kenneth Stofferahn, who is responsible for scenic design. The musical director is music department chair Professor Mike Roy, and choreographing the dances is Denise Baker, a theatre arts secondary education major from Hudson.

The visit also includes tours of several islands. Travelers will visit the archaeological sites of Knossos on Crete, the active dig of Akrotori on Santorini, and Delos, the birthplace of gods Apollo and Artemis. The island of Mykonos is known for its windmills and beautiful beaches.

Attending the two-day conference from UW-River Falls were Linda Alvarez, multicultural services adviser; Carolyn Brady, multicultural outreach specialist; Ginny Coombs, provost and vice chancellor for academic affairs; Mary Halada, assistant to the vice chancellor of administration and finance; Lisa Kroutil, associate professor of chemistry; Kelly Manthei, student support services adviser; and Barbara Werner, coordinator of women's studies and chair of the speech communications and theater arts department.

Lt. Gov. Barbara Lawton shared her vision of moving Wisconsin forward with women as leaders. Her state-wide effort, titled "Wisconsin Women=Prosperity," depends on dedicated participation of higher education leaders so that all Wisconsin women can achieve economic sufficiency, political participation, high educational goals, health and well-being.

Opening keynote speaker Pat Alea, an expert on career planning, suggested techniques for making important changes by focusing on goals, clear communication, a starting point, steady aim and the courage to move forward with power and support.

The conference also included seminars on topics such as making a difference in legislative policies, mentoring, career development, steps toward academic leadership and changes, conflicts and challenges for women at work.

A panel of female leaders in education shared their experiences in advancing to positions of authority. Participants met women from distant areas working on similar projects and to set up statewide networks.

Since 1997, Wisconsin Women in Higher Education Learning has had a mission to identify future women leaders, provide contacts and support for women moving into leadership positions, eliminate barriers to women's advancement and to increase the visibility of women leaders.

In accepting the award, Chancellor Lydecker told the assembly, "I firmly believe that our higher education institutions can and must play a significant role in preparing people of color, women, and persons with disabilities for career and life success in our 21st century world. And, very importantly, through these diversity efforts we also prepare all students for that diverse and global new century."

In a written statement, Gov. Jim Doyle conveyed his congratulations to UW-RF and other state agencies that received recognition, observing that "our employees are the state government's greatest asset, and by expanding the diversity of our workforce we gain new strength and a broader vision that enables state government to better serve the people of Wisconsin."

TRIO Upward Bound program. A federally funded program with numerous local partners, it assists students in building their academic skills, identifying their career interests, and preparing for college. Some 95 students from Arlington High School in St. Paul have participated in the program since 1999. Students are selected in their freshmen year and participate through high school graduation while working with faculty in the College of Education and Professional Studies.

Library since 1999 has expanded its holdings to support multicultural education for teachers and parents, presents multicultural displays, and fosters community dialogue. The initiative also supports UW-RF students' work in completing a three-credit diversity course. With the College of Education and Professional Studies it has built a 9,700 item Curriculum Materials Center to support K-12 education majors and teachers.

A community based scholarship and employment program has provided a scholarship and mentored work experience at First National Band of River Falls, in conjunction with the UW-RF Academic Success Center and College of Business and Economics.

McNair Scholars Program since 1999, funded with federal money, develops students research and teaching skills while encouraging them to enroll in graduate school. Some 31 students are currently participating. Another 27 have graduated, with 90 percent enrolling in graduate school. Collaborating on the program are the Academic Success Center, Office of Grants and Contracts, and the U.S. Dept. of Education.

Faculty and Academic Staff Development Board programs focus on diversity issues through workshops for faculty and staff as well as orienting new faculty to techniques of introducing diversity topics into their classroom instruction.

Also recognized at the diversity awards ceremony were the Wisconsin Department of Transportation, the Wisconsin Office of the State Public Defender, the University of Wisconsin-Parkside and the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin.

Lydecker noted, "I know that this honor bestowed upon UW-River Falls today could well be shared among many other Wisconsin colleges and universities who work daily to expand opportunities for students. But I must also confess that I'm extremely pleased to have our work at River Falls noted and I commend the faculty, staff and students on our campus whose dedication and hard work are the reason for the award."

The spirit is upon the University of Wisconsin-River Falls as it embarks upon the holidays with events and entertainment. The festivities begin in early December with events sponsored by the music and theatre departments, along with Wyman Series performances.

Company, a merry troupe of over-the-hill and upstart actors. The company's diva feigns illness, certain the production would be canceled, but to her surprise the show does go on! To find out what happens when her understudy suddenly finds herself on stage only knowing one line, go see this delightful play.

DeMeo is the son of Mafia hitman and Gambino family capo, Roy DeMeo. His father was one of the most feared gangsters of all time and the mastermind of New York City's largest auto-theft ring in history.

DeMeo recounts his painful childhood growing up with a feared and hated man who was also a loving father and faithful provider. He also tells how his father eventually made him his confidante and accomplice.

UW-RF dairy science professor and extension dairy specialist Dennis Cooper, along with agronomy professor and extension forage specialist Dennis Cosgrove, conducted educational dairy seminars in Romania last year.

They addressed the topics of forage production for dairy cattle and the feeding of dairy cattle at the seminar. They also discussed methods to improve productivity, including management-intensive rotational grazing and dairy genetics.

"You wonder how much impact you have. Presenting information one time doesn't necessarily change anything. You plant a seed and hope it grows. This visit is a chance for us to continue to plant that seed," Cooper said.

They also visited dairy farms throughout Wisconsin and attended seminars presented by UW-RF professors on such topics as artificial insemination, breeding, forage quality and production, cooperatives and distance education.

He and his colleagues emphasize improving forage quality, since Romanians have good pastureland. One example of maximizing the use of existing resources are teaching the scientists how to renovate old barns to make the stalls bigger and the ventilation systems more efficient.

"It's helping to internationalize the University and bring opportunities for students to maybe someday work overseas. It's giving the faculty and staff a chance to bring the world into their classrooms. They can see how concepts that they might not think about here are relevant somewhere else."

Cooper said the program benefits the USDA in various ways also. Improving the economy of eastern European nations helps stabilize their governments, allowing the United States to form alliances. It also allows the United States to develop trading partners and markets for American agricultural products and services.

Three state agencies and two University of Wisconsin system campuses were singled out for praise at a State Capitol ceremony today for their innovative efforts to promote workplace diversity. Lieutenant Governor Barbara Lawton used the occasion to underscore the value of a diverse workplace and to congratulate the recipients.

"Creating a diverse workforce pays dividends to both the individual workplaces involved and to the state as a whole. I encourage other employers, in both the private and public sectors, to learn from their experience," Lieutenant Governor Lawton said as she presented the 2003 Annual Diversity Awards.

In a written statement, Governor Jim Doyle conveyed his congratulations to the campuses and agencies that received recognition, observing that "our employees are state government's greatest asset, and by expanding the diversity of our workforce we gain new strength and a broader vision that enables state government to better serve the people of Wisconsin."

Wisconsin Department of Transportation: WisDOT was selected for its innovative scholarship and loan repayment incentive grant program that targets improving the representation of minorities and women in underutilized job groups.

Wisconsin State Public Defender's Office: The SPD has developed an outstanding record of attracting and retaining racial/ethnic minorities and women. The council applauded SPD's conscientious outreach efforts, which were particularly arduous due to the widespread geographical area of its branch offices and recruitment challenges posed by professions such as attorney and management positions. Its achievement exemplifies the fulfillment of the spirit and intent of the diversity award criteria.

Facility in Racine. The council commended the diversity practices because of the outreach to minorities and women, and the opportunity for student participants to obtain a realistic reference to real world issues while also developing their ability to appreciate diversity.

Mention Award. The agency was recognized for implementing a variety of effective, yet low-cost diversity events. Events such as a "Diversity Week" celebration, a speaker series on diversity topics, and cultural and ethnic displays helped build an inclusive environment at the workplace.

The State Council on Affirmative Action's prestigious Diversity Award recognizes achievement in all phases of equal employment opportunity/affirmative action programs, disability services, retention and upward mobility. The Educational Diversity Award is a new category to recognize the efforts and achievements of state institutions of higher learning in preparing minorities, women, and persons with disabilities for employment in the Wisconsin state. The Program Merit Award recognizes special efforts to improve the work environment and promote employment opportunities for minorities, women and persons with disabilities.

The State Council on Affirmative Action has an overall purpose of fostering measurable progress toward an equitable and diverse state workforce and advising the Director of the Office of State Employment Relations.

The council consists of twelve public members, the majority of whom are minorities, women and persons with disabilities. They are appointed for three-year terms by the senate president and minority leader, the assembly speaker and assembly minority leader, and the governor.

The selection was made by fall and spring UW-RF graduates from 1999 and 2001, who were asked to nominate professors who had the most positive impact on their education, career and lives. They rated them on excellence in teaching, understanding and helpfulness as an adviser and ability to motivate by example.

Said another, "Suzy was a superb business law teacher. I learned and retained so much. Many of us who graduated from UW-RF and had Suzy as a law teacher have passed the law section of the CPA exam with flying colors. She is very deserving of the award!"

Students and colleagues praise his performance in teaching, scholarship and service. Agricultural economics Professor Lewis May said, "He works hard at learning new material for his courses. He puts significantly more time into preparing for classes than anyone I have ever met."

Schraufnagel was very pleased to receive this award and credited his colleagues for helping him in his career. "It's a really special honor. I've learned a lot about teaching from my colleagues. I must have been a good student, because I have adopted a lot of their ideas and have become reasonably good at it."

Until recently, Schraufnagel also held a part-time Coop Extension appointment as a farm management specialist. He served as a state leader and advocate for the FINPACK program for farm financial management. He was also recognized as a leader on matters concerning crop insurance information and education.

Dean Leon M. Zaborowski of Outreach and Graduate Studies at UW-River Falls, has been elected treasurer of the Learning Resources Network, an international association in continuing education and outreach.

"We're pleased and fortunate to have Lee Zaborowski's great talents and experience in the senior leadership of our organization," said Kim Roberts of the University of Western Australia, and chair of the LERN board of directors. "His forward looking leadership and expertise in running an outstanding continuing education unit is important as we position our association for success in the 21st century," he added.

Through the Outreach and Graduate Studies Office, UW-River Falls provides a variety of professional development opportunities and graduate degree and certificate programs for educators, business professionals, lifelong learners and youths in West Central Wisconsin and the eastern suburbs of the Twin Cities.

Room from 8 a.m. to 7 p.m. for those campus and community members seeking a quiet place to reflect on the events of Sept. 11. A Remembrance Board will be available there for people wishing to post their thoughts.

The Library Breezeway has been holding readings since 1996. Two to three visiting authors and about three students read each year. Visiting authors sell and sign his or her publications after the event. Student readings are open to anyone at the University and are encouraged to sign up in the English Department, which sponsors these events.

It wasn't too many years ago that the St. Croix Valley watershed was primarily picturesque dairy farms surrounded by green fields dotting the countryside with quaint, small towns interspersed. However, the growing urbanization of the region means these farms are quickly disappearing and the demographics, commuting patterns, communities and natural resources of this area are changing dramatically.

Life" will begin at 6 p.m. The exhibit depicts the 21st century rural landscape in flux using a variety of media (painting, printmaking, photography, and pottery) as seen through the eyes of eight artists from the St. Croix Valley.

Environmental writer Laurie Allmann will present One Road, a short performance of documentary theater that explores the natural and cultural communities that have gathered along a four-mile stretch of rural road in the St. Croix Valley.

From dragonflies to prize dairy cows, to gardens reflecting distant Laotian traditions, One Road traces the lines that run between land and life. Allmann has been a regularly featured essayist and commentator for Minnesota Public Radio, contributed to the scriptwriting for a forthcoming Twin Cities Public Television documentary film series, and was recently a writer in residence at the St. Croix Watershed Research Station.

Al Batt, a writer, storyteller, and humorist who was born and raised on a farm in southeastern Minnesota, will share his Views from the Barn Door, in a manner that is sure to create laughter, reflection and insight. Batt has been featured in the Smithsonian Magazine, and he is a regular contributor to several nature and birding magazines, newspapers, and farm periodicals. He writes several nationally syndicated cartoon strips ("The Buckets," "The Laugh Parade," "The Lockhorns" and many others). He has written jokes for a former U.S. President.

Closing the event will be a community dialogue with featured artists, performers and the audience. Collectively, the group will explore and discuss what these depictions of a rural landscape in flux mean those of us who live, work and play in the St. Croix Valley. How do we continue to retain and at the same time, redefine our sense of community to incorporate these changes? How do we find a balance between preserving our environmental resources while managing inevitable changes? While we may mourn what we have lost as a result of these changes, what benefits have we gained that we celebrate? What must be done to preserve a "quality of life" we all value?

This award recognizes outstanding career achievements by individuals and an exceptional commitment to teaching. Nominees undergo a rigorous campus selection process, which includes support from students. Regents award winners are selected from among the more than 12,000 faculty in the University of Wisconsin System.

Cowen, a UW-RF faculty member since 1979, said she was encouraged by the award as a recognition that her commitment to teaching and advising students remains strong, and that it is appreciated by the students and alumni who nominated her.

Students and alumni particularly cited Cowen's teaching acumen and her obvious concern for students. They noted the clarity of her presentation of complex economic matters, her open-door policy of advising and mentoring students, her penchant for quickly learning the names of her students, and her familiarity with their collegiate experiences when she would meet with them many years after they graduated.

She noted, "Professor Cowen showed concern for the students who were having trouble understanding economics. I feel the students knew that she was interested in their welfare and that she would help them whenever she was needed."

"It was not the only time I was challenged by an instructor, but I can honestly say that it was the longest and most sustained challenge I had in my college experience." He added that Cowen still ranks as the best professor he ever had.

"I meet students and they want to sign up for her classes because they know they will accomplish much; students complete her classes and talk about how they were able to reach academically much higher than they had ever expected; and each alumni asks how Dr. Cowen is, and then relay some story of her outstanding skills as a teacher, and how she made a positive difference in their life."

With 24 years in the classroom, Cowen says she is still happy with her choice to be a teaching economist at an institution like UW-RF that emphasizes classroom instruction rather than being a research economist who teaches at a research university.

Cowen teaches a wide range of courses, from freshmen general economics and senior capstone courses to teaching courses within the discipline for economics majors, such as quantitative analysis, labor economics, intermediate microeconomic theory, and public regulation of business.

For non-majors, Cowen says her goal is to have them think logically about economics issues as they relate to society, drawing on such current topics as the Microsoft antitrust legal case, minimum wages, unemployment rates or worker health care. Her students are expected to grasp the theories of limited resources and opportunity costs, as well as the laws of supply and demand.

Cowen says students are often startled by the data. But she explains that she does not espouse a philosophy or viewpoint of how to interpret it. Instead, she expects her students to engage in fact-based discussions in which they are encouraged to respect varying interpretations. She said her goal is to have students avoid the current "dreadful tendency" in society, particularly in talk-radio and shock television, to be opinionated without facts. "I think that's simply disastrous to a democracy," she says.

When teaching economics majors, Cowen says she emphasizes their need to analyze complicated problems. The science, she says, requires clear and logical thinkers who can look at the assumptions that underlie various economic theories and then draw conclusions that are consistent with the theories.

The Regents award winner said her most consistent strength in the classroom over the years has been her ability to be clear on complicated issues by dissecting them and then reassembling them in a clear manner.

Lacek began his career in strategic planning at Republic Airlines. After a merger with Northwest Airlines, he became director of marketing for Northwest and was chosen by "Advertising Age" magazine as "One of America's Best and Brightest in Advertising and Marketing." He was responsible for WorldPerks, Northwest's frequent flyer program and strategic and business partnerships.

Ever since Dziga Vertov's 1929 masterpiece "Man With A Movie Camera," films have been made reflecting and commenting on the medium of the cinema. This semester's festival offers a selection of lesser-known films made about movie making.

This is Makhmalbaf's first comedy and is set during the Qajar dynasty. It tells the story of the cinematographer who introduces the magic of movies into the Persian court. The Shah, who has 84 wives and 200 children, is opposed to the new medium, but after a screening falls in love with the movie's heroine. Moderated by College of Arts and Sciences Dean Gorden Hedahl.

Fellini is a masterpiece of storytelling and cinema. This surreal film tells the story of 43-year-old film director Guido Anselmi, who is having a midlife crisis. He also struggles with Freudian complexes concerning his wife, his lover, his ideal woman and his parents. Moderated by French Professor Kristine Butler Karlson.

Before the dissolution of the Soviet Union, the government sent out cinema units to the far reaches of the USSR to expose its citizens to propaganda films. When Kyrgyzstan seceded from the Republic, its cinema program funding was cut and the citizens were deprived of their beloved movies. This documentary follows the lone projectionist who has made it his mission to bring cinema back to the people of this volatile country. Moderated by Hedahl.

"There are increasing numbers of children with autism spectrum disorders in today's classrooms," said Mary Manke, associate dean of the college. "As a result, there is an urgent need for school professionals to better understand autism and its implications in schools and society as a whole."

Participants in the class will learn about autism spectrum disorders and their implications. They will be prepared to be active and informed team members and advocates for these students. And, they will learn effective strategies to enhance communication, socialization, and learning when teaching these children.

The instructor, Tara Tuchel, is a communicative interaction disorders teacher and speech/language pathologist at Willow River Elementary in Hudson. She recently presented a seminar titled "Autism: Peer Relations and Play" at the Autism Society of America National Convention.

He pioneered a foreign film festival in collaboration with the Falls Theatre that lasted 14 years. Fluent in French and German, he led art and history tours through Europe and North Africa. He also initiated the Medieval Magical Banquets with dinners based on medieval recipes from the fifteenth century.

Weiss has been employed at UW-RF for 19 years as director of purchasing services and risk manager. As director, Weiss supervises the purchasing of supplies for the entire campus, manages the campus credit card system, the central stores, and the mailroom. As risk manager, Weiss ensures the University is properly protected with the correct insurance and is properly reimbursed in case of an accident. He has also implemented training classes for employees. One such training class taught employees proper lifting techniques, which proved to be successful when the percentage of back-related injures showed a substantial reduction.

Beyond Weiss's duties at North Hall, his main interest on campus is working with college students through the Newman Center and local community outreach programs as Director of Newman Ministries for the St. Thomas More Newman Center.

The Newman Center hosts club meetings and social events such as cookouts. There are scriptural communion services held every Tuesday, Wednesday, and Thursday afternoons and Bible studies are held Wednesday nights. Weiss prepares for these by focusing on common Sunday mass readings. The readings are similar among many religions, extending to anyone who may be interested in attending.

These schools enabled Weiss to serve in the United States Army Reserve for 31 years. Weiss's service in the army ranged from being colonel in the Corps of Engineers, specializing in combat mobility, to a unit commander of a 15,000-person brigade. Weiss's experience in the military have helped him manage his time, organize his priorities, and bring balance between his important roles at UW-RF.

Having a family and a career, Weiss says that this was the most appropriate way to fulfil his desire to provide service to the church. A deacon has the authority to do ritual baptisms, weddings, and funerals. He soon will be to preach in services when he completes a Homiletics course he is now enrolled in.

"Parallel Lines and the Hockey Universe" is a collection of short stories about hockey, but also the lives of the Traicheff family as its members learn and grow. The stories detail the family's loves and losses, and tell tales of sex and loyalties. It is the sometimes violent sport of hockey that acts as the thread between all of the stories in the collection.

Tracey is an associate professor of English at the University of Northern Iowa and head editor of "North American Review," the oldest and one of the most highly regarded literary magazines in the country. As a long-time hockey enthusiast, Tracey grew up in Toronto, Canada. He traveled with the Waterloo Black Hawks as research for his stories. He interviewed the players and the coaches, enabling him to present what actually occurs in their minds both on and off the ice.

The microbiology symposium approaches current concepts in foodborne pathogens and rapid and automated methods in food microbiology, drawing as many as 125 participants nationally and internationally. Speakers from academia, business and industry, and government regulatory agencies will provide an overview and update on the pathogens, toxins, and contaminants that may occur in food, water, and the environment.

A variety of other speakers are scheduled to present, as well. In addition, technical representatives of select companies involved in developing and marketing instruments and assays for microbiological analysis of food will give brief presentations demonstrating their technology. These demonstrations offer opportunities to discuss applications and suitability of methods for routine microbiological analysis or detection of specific pathogens. A few participating companies are 3M, Alaska Food Diagnostics, BioSys, Inc., and Remel Inc.

The microbiology symposium attracts a diverse community of attendees. The program is appropriate for food scientists, quality assurance supervisors, managers, and technicians, microbiologists involved in food safety, regulatory agency personnel, consultants, and graduate students in food microbiology. Registrations for the symposium are accepted on a first-come, first-served basis. The $600 fee includes a conference manual, abstracts of various presentations at the symposium, breaks, a banquet on Oct. 21, and participation in the Rapid and Automated Methods in Food Microbiology Workshop.

Garret has worked with the application of textile technologies and imagery to various materials for the past 25 years. The basket forms in the show are made from a variety of materials ranging from engraved sheet copper to parachute cord. These art forms explore ideas as diverse as homeland security and family relationships.

Another set of work is based on patterns derived from quilts, but are executed from diverse kinds of paper. The largest group of artwork is a net structure composed of thousands of aluminum loops connected by hand. Some pieces are densely colored and relate strongly to pattern painting, while others are monochromatic and refer to drawing.

The cost of the trip is $3,129 for double occupancy and includes all entry fees and land transportation, a five-star room and full board, a special study guide and additional educational materials, an Egyptologist as a private tour guide and additional lectures.

Mark Lacek, a global leader in the development of airlines travel perks packages and business customer loyalty programs, offered advice on how to be a successful entrepreneur during a presentation at UW-River Falls on Sept. 25.

Lacek's presentation was titled "Never Give Up, and Other Lessons Learned from a Serial Entrepreneur." He spoke of his own experiences in business and life and gave insights on how to be successful in any business endeavor.

He offered such advice as seeking the support of mentors, never letting people say an idea won't work, having fun with a career, surrounding yourself with trusted people and most importantly, never giving up.

His lecture, delivered on Sept. 22, addressed his research and findings concerning oxygen and the enzyme reductase. This enzyme is involved in the production of DNA. Kahlow said his research has led to a greater understanding of how the enzyme works.

The seminars are free and equipment required to watch them is minimal. The seminars, which began Sept. 22, are available for viewing for three weeks after their broadcast. There are eight lectures total.

Nature Tourism, and Sustainability-Based Systems" will be held on Wednesday evenings on the UW-River Falls campus. Participants will earn two graduate credits, which may be applied toward completion of the 15-credit certificate.

"The first course introduces students to the "big picture" model of wildlife recreation and nature tourism, but through the lens of sustainability-based systems," said Dr. Kelly Cain, program coordinator and course instructor. Special emphasis will be placed on sustainable community planning, and cost-benefit analysis, as well as professional skills necessary to navigate complex political dynamics essential to the success of a project, he added.

According to Cain, the Wildlife Recreation and Nature Tourism Certificate is the first of its kind offered in the United States. The program was developed with support from Watchable Wildlife, Inc., an international organization created to enhance, elevate and promote wildlife viewing and nature appreciation. Courses will be offered throughout the year and in both on site and online formats.

The source of his nomination is typical for Cordua, who has been particularly collaborative in his work off campus. This year he also wrote the CD script for a geological tour of Pierce County, which the tourism council Pierce County Partners in Tourism is releasing this month.

At the convention, which is open to the public, Cordua will have a booth set up for free rock and mineral identification. He will also give a talk about the beautiful and rare minerals found in the Flambeau copper mine in Rusk County, Wis.

Cordua often is contacted often for his expertise in minerals. Besides working on the CD script, he was recently interviewed for an article about gold prospecting by a reporter from a Milwaukee newspaper.

The CD is an audio tour designed for people to listen to during self-guided auto tours. The tour starts in Prescott, makes a circle around the county, and ends in Prescott. Included with the CD is a geological and relief map of the county, a synopsis of the geological and cultural history of the county, biographies of the contributors, photos, and a listing of each track on the CD.

"The tour is directly related to what Pierce County is all about: nature, recreation and relaxation. Our tag line is 'Explore our Backroads' and this tour does exactly that. Visitors explore the roads that are not only significant to our past, but are what Pierce County is today."

This startling fact is one of many uncovered in the course "America at War" offered at UW-River Falls and three off-site locations in Barron, Grantsburg and Somerset, on Thursday evenings beginning Sept. 4.

In addition to a River Falls campus location, the course will be broadcast via interactive television to Barron High School, Grantsburg High School and Somerset High School. Registration for the course is open now.

"Programming I" is the introductory course for a five-class, 15-credit undergraduate certificate in programming and web development.The class introduces students to fundamental computer concepts and object-oriented programming. The programming language, Java, will be used to teach the basic concepts of program analysis, design and implementation.

"This course and certificate is ideal for those who wants to enter the information systems industry or seek to expand their skills as a network administrator or computer specialist," said Katrina Larsen, program manager for the College of Business and Economics.

Increasing numbers of students with learning disabilities are entering the nation's schools. To help classroom educators, school administrators, guidance personnel, and school psychologists address these students' needs, the UW-River Falls is offering an introductory course in learning disabilities this fall.

The three-credit, graduate-level course will highlight educational characteristics of students with learning disabilities, and provide techniques and strategies that are appropriate for use in the classroom.

"Students will gain an understanding of the learning disabilities criteria for eligibility and educational interventions," said Professor Barbara Rebhuhn, the course instructor. "Knowledge of this criteria will greatly assist educators with initiating appropriate referrals for students suspected of having a learning disability. Attributes of students struggling with learning in academic, social and behavioral areas will also be emphasized."

The course would also benefit anyone who simply wants to become more knowledgeable about learning disabilities, as well as those who are interested in pursuing the new Learning Disabilities Teacher Certification Program offered by UW-River Falls in the summer of 2004. The course is a prerequisite for the certificate program.

Alice in Dairyland is a public relations specialist with the Division of Marketing at the Wisconsin Department of Agriculture, Trade and Consumer Protection. She works with the media, speaks with rural and urban audiences, conducts food demonstrations, and teaches students about Wisconsin agriculture.

"We need key players in all aspects of education in order to keep agricultural education growing for the future. We need to show the value of careers in agriculture, and keep enrollment strong. Many students feel that the only career in agriculture is farming, and this is not true. Wisconsin agriculture revenues total about $40 billion a year."

Parmentier, the fourth UW-RF alumna to be selected to the prestigious marketing position, feels that keeping agricultural education alive in the schools is important, since 20 percent of Wisconsin careers are in agriculture.

She also wants to promote the idea of buying Wisconsin products, especially value-added products where there is an effort to increase the economic value and consumer appeal of an agricultural product. She would also like to spread the word that innovation is the key for agriculture to grow in the future, especially with new technologies such as alternative fuels and organically grown products.

Parmentier first became interested in agriculture when she took an exploratory course in eighth grade. She had always loved plants and animals, even while growing up in urban Green Bay. Her involvement in FFA helped her enthusiasm for agriculture grow.

She also served as director of an FFA leadership camp and as a youth ambassador for the National Council of Farmer Cooperatives in Washington, D.C. She traveled nationwide to promote the importance of cooperatives in our economy.

College. She felt she could have a positive influence on students and help them to see the benefits of agriculture, especially career options, even better as a counselor. She worked as a counselor at Preble High School in Green Bay until her selection as Alice in Dairyland.

Alice travels through Wisconsin enough times to circle the earth. Parmentier will also visit the Twin Cities and Chicago to promote Wisconsin agriculture and its products. She will spend eight weeks travelling and speaking to fourth graders, helping them to understand the nutritional value of milk and dairy products.

After her tenure as Alice ends, Parmentier plans on continuing to impact agricultural education through her work as a counselor. She loves travelling, riding motorcycles, and spending time with her friends and family. Her next goal is to be a contestant on "Survivor."

Views of the changing landscape in the St. Croix River Valley will be presented and performed at "Views from the Barn Door." The free public event is sponsored by The University of Wisconsin-River Falls and will be held at the Phipps Center for the Arts in Hudson on Thursday evening, Sept. 18.

For centuries, visual artists have been compelled to depict the rural landscape in which they live or from which they came. Our Heartland: Contemporary Images of Rural Life includes eight such artists living in or near the St. Croix River Valley whose subject matter consistently centers on rural people and places.

Environmental writer Laurie Allmann will present "One Road," a short performance of documentary theater that explores the natural and cultural communities that have gathered along a four-mile stretch of rural road in the St. Croix Valley.

This quartet specializes in performing music featuring improvisation, creating spontaneous and engaging live performances. They feature original material by their members and classic jazz repertoire arranged for four saxophones.

Leonid Shukaev, graduates of the Leningrad Conservatory. This season the quartet is commemorating the 300th anniversary of its namesake city and will feature music honoring the arts of St. Petersburg.

"Today's teachers need carefully selected strategies and techniques to teach and motivate reluctant students," Cooper said. "If teachers don't possess strong skills to reach, teach, and motivate this learner, the classroom will be characterized by discipline problems, lack of learning and on-going struggles to get students to pay attention and do their work."

In this course, participants will learn effective motivational techniques to create excitement for learning among students of any age. The online format enables participants to take the course in any location or time that is convenient to them. Participants will need access to a computer that connects to the Internet (at least via a 56K modem) and have basic computer proficiency.

As UW-River Falls opens the upcoming academic year by absorbing one of the largest budget reductions in its history, it also will be challenged to envision what its educational and service role should be through the next two decades.

Chancellor Ann Lydecker on Monday outlined her expectations for UW-RF during her opening address to about 400 faculty and staff in a speech that signals the start of the school year. Classes start next Wednesday.

He also predicted that with veto actions by Gov. James Doyle on the current budget, and the state's continuing fiscal crisis with a projected deficit of $711 million for the next biennium, the University will see continued reductions for the next several years. "It is a decreasing linear trend and we will need to find creative ways to offset the lack of public funds."

Gottschalk noted that Wisconsin is moving slowly in coming out of its fiscal hard times. "To tell you the truth, the Regents don't have the answer on how to deal with this" as continued reductions affects public higher education.

The Regent explained that as a result, the Board has launched an intensive study of what the UW System should look like in the year 2020. He indicated that change may be transformational rather than incremental. Even so, he said, the final product must continue to emphasize teaching, research and public service to all state residents. He said it must be one that both university staff and state decision-makers are happy with.

Lydecker devoted her speech to outlining what the campus must look to as core values as it sets a course for 2020. She noted that for the past two years the campus has extensively reviewed on campus and with its external partners the UW-RF mission, vision and strategic objectives for the next several years.

Lydecker said that with the current reduction in resources "to be frank, we have to set aside our years of thinking as academics and put on our entrepreneurial hats, even though entrepreneurship may initially seem antithetical to access and to quality higher education at UW-River Falls."

It is place-related. "Although we must be aware of national and global issues, the majority of the people we serve live right here in our local communities? in the St. Croix River Valley and its extensions south and east. We must adopt a world-view and expand our world-experiences, but in a manner that what we learn can be applied within our own communities," Lydecker explained.

It is integrated. "It permeates the campus... the policies, incentive structures and priorities. It provides a focus for our teaching, our scholarship, and our service within the campus and the region," Lydecker said.

Ruth Wood, promoted to full professor. Geography: Charles Rader, promoted to full professor. Mathematics: Laurel Langford, promoted to associate professor and granted tenure. Modern Language: Cecilia Bustamante, promoted to associate professor and granted tenure; Terrence Mannetter, promoted to associate professor and granted tenure. Sociology, Anthropology and Criminal Justice: Rich Wallace, promoted to associate professor and granted tenure.

College of Business and Economics: Business Administration: Jacques Foust, promoted to full professor; Darryl Miller, promoted to associate professor and granted tenure; Mary Tichich, promoted to associate professor and granted tenure.

For this year's nominations, 1,984 ballots were sent to May and December graduates from the years 1999 and 2001. Graduates were asked to nominate two faculty members in each division, focusing on excellence in teaching; understanding and helpfulness as advisers; and ability to motivate students. Comments were also invited.

One student stated, "Mark Bergland has such an enthusiasm for biology that it's hard not to be enthusiastic as a student. As my freshman biology professor, his teaching and his class solidified my decision to major in biology." Another student remarked, "He pushed me to be a better teacher. Not just good, but great."

"chose stimulating readings resulting in excellent discussions." Another student said, "Dr. Copp brought humor and grace to his teaching opportunities. He engaged his students and at the same time managed to instill knowledge."

Said Dean of the College of Arts and Science Gorden Hedahl, "It is important to recognize and celebrate outstanding teaching, as that is the heart of our mission and one on the primary motivations for the faculty who have chosen to make their careers at UW-RF.

"This award is especially significant, as it is chosen by students who have graduated and have entered the work force, so they are able to reflect on their entire University experience and recognize those who have made lasting impacts on their lives and careers.

Outstanding Faculty Awards have been given annually since 1985, one in each division of the College of Arts and Sciences: arts and humanities; sciences and mathematics; and the social sciences. Recipients are eligible to receive the award only once in 10 years.

Allyn is an Associate Professor in the department of health and human performance, with research interests in biomechanics, which is the study of the mechanics of the body, and the use of technology in teaching.

Allyn said that she was pleased to be recognized. "It is a great honor to be recognized by my colleagues for my teaching, advising, and my contributions to the department, college and university," she said.

He explained that with the current state of the economy, many area students are continuing to make last-minute decisions whether to attend college. He said UW-RF is attempting to accommodate the needs of those who decide to attend the University.

The University of Wisconsin-River Falls is sponsoring a spirited program of song, verse and prose that explores our changing culture and landscape. "Views from the Barn Door: Our Changing Culture and Landscape" will take place Sept.

The event will present a thought-provoking look at the changes taking place in the St. Croix River Valley as symbolizedby the loss of the barn. This free program is offered in conjunction with "Our Heartland: Contemporary Images of Rural Life," an exhibition at The Phipps Center.

The Chiefs will arrive on July 19 and practice for nearly a month, departing on Aug. 15. During the camp, there will be two practices per day that are free and open to the public. The morning session will typically run from 8-10 a.m.

In addition to the practices, there will be other special events throughout both days. A shuttle service also will be available for transportation. Complete details are on the Chiefs training camp web site at www.uwrf.edu/chiefs.

Another special event at Chiefs camp this summer will be Family Fun Night, set for Friday, July 25. Gates will open at 3:30 p.m. and the autograph session featuring all of the players and coaches will be held from 6:30-7 p.m. Practice under the lights at Ramer Field will follow and a fireworks display after practice will culminate the festivities. There will be food, music, games and other activities to keep the young and old alike entertained throughout the event. Admission is $5; children under 18 are admitted for free.

Punt, Pass & Kick competition that will be held July 26 at Ramer.Competition will begin at 2:30 p.m. with registration starting at 1:30 at the field. Girls and boys will compete together in six age groups of 8-13 years old. The event is free and all participants will receive a ribbon. Trophies will be given to the top three place finishers in each division. In each of the past two years, Coach Dick Vermeil has presented the trophies to the winners.

During practices there also will be the opportunity for fans to get a closer look of the Chiefs training facilities by taking a tour of the Robert P. Knowles Physical Education and Recreation Center and Hunt Arena.

"State Fair" is Rodgers and Hammerstein's only musical written directly for the screen, based on the book by Tom Briggs and Louis Mattioli. It follows the Frake family on a three-day trip to the Iowa State Fair, where the parents compete for blue ribbons and the kids find romance and heartbreak on the midway. It is set to the music of an Academy Award-winning score and contains other songs from Rodgers and Hammerstein. UW-RF alumnus Erik Quam will direct.

Miller and the Judge, and also doubles as the theatre's shop foreman. Recent graduate John Stevens, a speech communications major from Columbia Heights, Minn., plays the role of Charlie and also works in the scene shop. Junior Denise Baker, a speech communications major from Hudson, is the choreographer for the dance numbers. Junior Brad Jennings, an English major from Chetek, is a member of the singing quartet, the Fairtones. Junior Cordell Wesselink, a speech communications major from Beldenville, plays the role of Wayne Frake.

Buschen was hired in 1966 to develop art history and humanities courses. During his tenure he emerged as the epitome of the Renaissance Man, with expertise and interests that touched on virtually all aspects of world culture and civilization, which he shared with his students and alumni.

He did much for the University, such as pioneering a foreign film festival in collaboration with the Falls Theatre that lasted 14 years. Fluent in French and German, he lead art and history tours throughout Europe and North Africa.

Buschen recalls that when he was younger, he really liked science, but his interests turned to history and art after he traveled to Europe for the first time in 1958. "I rode my bike through Europe; that experience changed my life.

To help make his appreciation of art more accessible to his students, Buschen created between 4,000 to 5,000 Web pages addressing art history. He designed virtual museums showing the works of women, Hispanic-American, Asian-American and gay and lesbian artists. That compendium was recently featured in an art show in which Buschen was the only electronic exhibitor.

He received a bachelor's degree from De Paul University. He also was the recipient of a prestigious Fulbright Scholarship, studying for a year in Strasbourg. He received his master's and doctorate from the University of Indiana.

There will be a retirement party for Buschen in October. For more information, contact English Professor Marshall Toman at marshall.toman@uwrf.edu. Buschen also invites everyone, especially former students, to keep in touch. His email address will remain the same: john.j.buschen@uwrf.edu.

He finished his business administration degree in 1972. While he attended school at UW-RF, he worked as a resident assistant. After he received his degree, he began work on campus as the residence hall director for May Hall. In 1974, he became the director of student center facilities.

Over the years, his responsibilities have included facilities coordinating for the Hagestad Student Center, oversight of food services and intramurals and serving as interim associate dean of students. He now oversees the budgeting and operations of food services, the nine residence halls, the Robert P. Knowles Physical Education and Recreation Center, Hunt Arena and the Hagestad Student Center.

Sievert believes that the campus has seen much progress over the years. When he first came here, the Kleinpell Fine Arts Building, Centennial Science Hall and the Wyman Education Building did not exist. "I believe over the years we have been very progressive, cost-efficient, responsive to student needs, and managed growth well," he said.

Sievert is proud of his involvement in the planning for a new $28.4 million student center, the new suite-style South Fork Suites residence hall currently under construction, and the C.H.I.L.D. Center, a new daycare that will soon see groundbreaking. He said that students now are willing to make an investment in the future of the campus, are concerned about leaving the University a better place and are willing to pay for a quality education.

Sievert met his wife, Debbie, at UW-RF in 1970, while she was earning her degree in education and he was finishing his degree. They have five children and reside in New Richmond. After he retires, he will volunteer at his church and look forward to travelling and golfing.

"It was an extremely rigorous schedule, but very productive. We discussed many intriguing opportunities for student and faculty interaction and exchanges, including both Japanese students and faculty to UW-RF and our own students, faculty and staff to Japan."

Greene said, "We want to gain a better understanding of where a large portion of our international students come from. We want to strengthen recruiting efforts of Japanese students to UW-RF. We want to explore ways to send UW-RF students, faculty and staff to Japan. We were successful on all counts. Many interesting opportunities will come from this visit and our continued relationship with these Japanese colleges."

Greene said the university is moving quickly to meet the challenge. There are many ways for students to have an international experience, from full semester or year-long programs to shorter faculty-led trips between fall and spring semeters, during spring break or summer study tours.

Brady coordinates community outreach initiatives for prospective students and families of color to the UW-RF campus. She is also the adviser to the Asian American Student Association, helping students to cultivate leadership skills.

She said she is very proud to receive the award, because it demonstrates that the University is progressive in recognizing multiculturalism. She also said that she has been fortunate to work with very supportive and encouraging people.

Chancellor Ann Lydecker said, "Carolyn has been an active and committed adviser for the Asian American Student Association. She has developed effective, well-attended programs and events. Several nominators noted her work developing a collaborative program between UW- RF and Vincent High School in Milwaukee with financial support from the Private Industry Council of Wisconsin."

Brady worked with the College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences at UW-RF to develop a program between the University and Vincent High School in Milwaukee that supports students and encourages them to be interested in environmental and agricultural sciences.

"Under her guidance, UW-River Falls has distinguished itself as having one of the highest percentage of new students of color in the University of Wisconsin system," admissions director Alan Tuchtenhagen said. "At the same time, she has been able to ensure that the academic qualifications of those students has also been one of the best in the system."

Her contributions include active membership in Wisconsin professional organizations for admissions personnel, serving as president for two years for the Minnesota Association of Counselors of Color, presenting diversity programs at the National Conference on Race and Ethnicity, and membership in the Minnesota Literacy Council.

The Woman of Color award was initiated in 1994 to acknowledge the ties and shared concerns among administrators, faculty, staff, and students within women's and ethnic studies, and to uphold a continuing commitment to the pursuit of educational quality through racial and ethnic diversity. Each year, one woman of color is chosen from each UW campus to be honored for her contributions.

Concert attendees are encouraged to pack a picnic or bring a lawn chair or blanket. Grills and alcoholic beverages are not permitted. Brats and beverages will be sold at a concession stand. The rain site is the auditorium in North Hall. For additional information, call the Leadership Center at 715/425-4911.

UW-River Falls journalism major Roe Pressley is unfazed by his 20-plus mile commute along the St. Croix River from Stillwater, Minn., to campus. "Aside from liquor store hours and gas prices, this area has always seemed like the same state to me," says Pressley, who lives and works in Stillwater. "I was born in River Falls and grew up in Stillwater. But I've kept my roots as far as cheering for the Packers, eating cheese, and proclaiming that Wisconsin is generally better."

"The residents themselves don't see the borders," says Barb Nemecek, dean of the UW-RF College of Business and Economics, who spoke about invisible borders at the third annual Wisconsin Economic Summit last fall in Milwaukee. "We think of it as completely transparent. We live in one county, work in another, go to school in yet another."

UW-RF admissions director. "Our biggest feeder schools are Hudson, New Richmond and Prescott, and in Minnesota, Hastings, Woodbury, Stillwater, Oakdale and Cottage Grove. Because so many people are working and going to school between the borders it makes sense to make the border more invisible."

The area is distinct, Nemecek says, because the urban Twin Cities is paired with Wisconsin's primarily rural counties, rather than the typical urban-urban match of bi-state metropolitan areas. This brings both challenges and opportunities.

"We need to develop niche strategies that work in our specific border area, including strategies by industries that highlight our strengths, so that the Twin Cities has reasons to work with us," says Nemecek. "It's not a matter of competing but of working together."

"Businesses are looking for proximity to suppliers, their distribution market, a skilled workforce and the resources of technical colleges and universities," says Ken McAdams, director of development in western Wisconsin for Forward Wisconsin, a public-private marketing organization. "The schools, particularly the universities, play a very important role. UW-River Falls is known for biotechnology, chemistry and agriculture and because of the available talent pool of graduates and technical assistance the university can provide."

Emphasizing the idea of a distinct region, UW-RF has hosted four forums over the last three years on building a regional economic agenda, financing entrepreneurial enterprise, educating the workforce and labor market conditions.

"There are some really effective economic development organizations as well as the Metropolitan Council working on both sides of the river, but we've never struck up a really solid consortium," notes Nemecek. "We need to increase, coordinate and develop a more comprehensive plan for the region. One example is the I-94 technology zone. In doing so we need to develop collaborative arrangements with the Minnesota side as well. This will yield the greatest results."

Regional Planning Commission, the tech zone's strengths include the proximity to the Twin Cities and ample educational resources, including three UW campuses--River Falls, Stout and Eau Claire--and two technical colleges. "There is a lot of recent effort to look at the Interstate 94 corridor as a region, and designation of the tech zone reinforces that," says Chasteen.

Valley, says Mark Kinders, UW-RF public affairs director and past president of the St. Croix Valley Regional Tourism Alliance, a bi-state tourism marketing group. "As identified in the economic summits on campus and across the state, there are distinct regions throughout Wisconsin," he says. "The great advantage to the St. Croix Valley is that we are designated by Congress as a national scenic riverway. That regional identity--in essence a national park--gives the valley an advantage for tourism, economic development and other partnerships."

The area's regionalism was recognized in the late 1960s and early 1970s when citizens, led by then-senators Gaylord Nelson (D-Wis.) and Walter Mondale (D-Minn.), sought protection and distinction through the National Wild and Scenic Riverways Act. This foresight ensured that decades of citizens and visitors would enjoy a high quality of life provided by the economic, recreational, natural and cultural resources of the valley, says Kinders.

Like regionalism, globalization is on the minds of area leaders as well. While the proximity to the Twin Cities has caused growth concerns along the river, area leaders recognize that it's a microcosm of a global society. "We are a part of the Twin Cities regional economy when you look at things from a global perspective," says Clarence Malick, St. Croix County board chair and former executive director of the Minnesota-Wisconsin Boundary Area Commission, a group focusing on regional issues that existed from 1965 to 2001. " If we in western Wisconsin want to compete on a global basis, we are going to have to attract professionals who are not currently living here, including biotech and innovative entrepreneurial types."

UW-RF's regional presence offers opportunities for both formal and informal partnerships. "Universities serve the people of the region," says Chancellor Ann Lydecker. "Our role is bringing constituents together, helping in terms of research and knowledge transfer, and playing a facilitative educational role in being able to move forward."

The metro area proximity also brings diversity and opportunities for student internships, job fairs, faculty externships, knowledge exchange and cooperative programs. Increasingly, the university's "soft" skills, including facilitated decision-making and strategic planning with a neutral backdrop, are as in demand as its "hard" skills, which involve faculty expertise, technical assistance and identification of collaborative resources. Several ongoing endeavors highlight the University's 2003-05 strategic objective of expanding its role within the St. Croix Valley.

As the regional economy changes, so do University priorities. An economic downturn isn't entirely bleak, says Lydecker. "The changing economy has provided an opportunity for us to rethink what is most essential. A lot of good people are coming together and thinking creatively how we can find the synergy to carry us into the future," says Lydecker.

"When you sit near a state border you are dealing with two large units that may be going in different ways in terms of economic development and growth, and yet those of us who are living in these areas, we don't see the difference," says Lydecker. "You think in commonalties rather than differences. The fast growth of this area in the last 10 years has the potential for really impacting a broader region economically. And we intend to help lead the way."

Set in the heart of Wisconsin's fast-growing region, UW-River Falls has forged numerous relationships with business, industry, education and government. Those collaborations are helping rural western Wisconsin adjust to the pressures as the 2.5-million resident Twin Cities metropolitan area continues to grow eastward.

In 2002, CER's mission expanded to specifically support research pertaining to economic development in the region. Recent projects have included an Internet capabilities survey of communities for the St. Croix Economic Development Corporation; community assistance economic research for Amery, Wis.; a survey of business information technology needs to develop training offerings; and research white papers and presentation seminars, as well as other activities. oLeon Zaborowski is the dean of the newly reorganized division of Outreach and Graduate Studies. Based on input from regional constituents, OGS's mission is to meet workforce education needs. In addition to graduate degree programs, OGS offers several credit and noncredit professional certificates and distance learning courses. Through a recent Title III grant, OGS is expanding its workforce educational offerings. It has also sponsored a regional workshop on land use planning and property rights. oThe Regional Development Institute houses the Survey Research Center, the Agriculture Resource Center, UW Cooperative Extension, and the Pierce County Economic Development Corp. Many community and regional projects are underway through these entities, including a township survey on government consolidation efforts. UW Cooperative Extension recently hosted the nationally renowned "Your Town" workshops, cosponsored by the National Trust for Historic Preservation and the National Endowment for the Arts. oThe second largest seed-testing company in the world, Biodiagnostics, was helped in its early stages by the Agriculture Resource Center and other economic development collaborators. More than half of its employees are alumni, and 20 student interns are lab assistants. Moreover, biology Professor Brad Mogen is working with the company to develop a protocol for the properties of soybean lineage through DNA analysis, made possible by a grant from the Wisconsin Legislature, which noted the direct impact of the innovative project on the economy. oThe Small Business Development Center has served about 225 clients since its inception in 2000. Consulting services are free, and SBDC offers low-cost or free small business classes assisted by grants from the Department of Commerce.

The event is being held in conjunction with the UW-RF Alumni Weekend. The ceremony will begin with remarks by Chancellor Ann Lydecker and Jamie Wise, chair of the Student Residential Living Committee. Area legislators and University dignitaries also will participate. A reception will follow at the site.

"This groundbreaking ceremony is particularly significant because the UW-RF students are providing the funding necessary to construct the building," said Lydecker. "We are proud that our students recognize the need for suite-styled residential space on campus."

The new residence hall is funded entirely with student fees and without any state tax dollars. It is projected to generate nearly $6.7 million in spending on construction materials and equipment and provide 97 jobs in the construction and trades industries.

This type of arrangement is known as "transition living," because it is similar to apartment living but it is on campus. Campus Planner Dale Braun said there is a national trend for students to live on campus, probably because it is more economical and more convenient than living off campus. There are no concerns about parking, there are no utilities to pay, and online Internet access is provided. Campuses all across the country are building new residence halls.

It reflects the architecture of South Hall, the oldest building on campus, which dates back to 1898. The residence hall will have a hip roof and tall, narrow windows, and it will be built of red brick and buff-colored stone, similar to that of South Hall and some other campus buildings.

Following an afternoon of registration events on Friday, the weekend will kick off with cocktails and hors d'oeuvres at 5:30 p.m. in the Hagestad Student Center courtyard, followed by a barbecue dinner and entertainment by the Brian Fesler Bluegrass Band, sponsored by the Wyman Summer Concert Series. Saturday's events will begin with a continental breakfast in the President's Room of the Student Center.

Suites residence hall on the east side of campus near Crabtree Hall. A picnic lunch of brats and burgers will follow, at which Chancellor Ann Lydecker will provide an update on the University's activities and socialize with alumni.

After an ice cream social at 4 p.m., the evening activities will begin, including cocktails and hors d'oeuvres with entertainment provided by UW-RF publications Director Kevin Bertelsen on the piano, dinner and awards, and a presentation of ghost stories by UW-RF journalism professor emeritus Michael Norman.

In a construction season complicated by the state budget crisis, some projects have been delayed or postponed, according to Waldo Hagen, director of facilities management for UW-RF. Hagen said the residence hall and childcare facility are both funded through student fees rather than tax dollars.

The Wisconsin Department of Administration in January placed all previously-approved state construction projects on hold, and has since been reviewing each project to see if it should be continued, reduced in scope or canceled, Hagen said.

"Although most of our projects will be allowed to go forward, one of the consequences of this time-consuming review is that we have missed some of our windows of opportunity. Some high-priority projects that we planned to complete this summer will have to be put off until the summer of 2004. For other projects, the time available to complete the work will be reduced.

"On the bright side, however, there are still a number of projects that will move ahead this summer," he said. "Phase two of the tile replacement project in the Agriculture Science Building will be completed this summer." The asbestos tile throughout the building has been removed and replaced in a two-step process.

Last year, tiles were removed and replaced in the corridors on the second, third and fourth floors of the building, and in some of the labs on third floor. This year, the floors in the remaining labs and classrooms and all of the offices will be replaced.

The third floor of Kleinpell Fine Arts will also be a construction zone as the space that is currently occupied by the history and philosophy departments is remodeled to make a new home for the political science department. Other spaces will be remodeled for the history and philosophy departments. The sociology, geography, speech and theatre departments will also be disrupted throughout the construction process.

According to Maintenance Supervisor Greg Kohler, who is handling the project, the work will be completed by the end of the summer, when students return for fall semester. Kohler also is handling remodeling of the space occupied by the journalism department and the campus radio station on the third floor of North Hall, and creating some improved work space for the campus newspaper "The Student Voice." The work in North Hall will probably be completed by July. Both projects will involve the same type of improvements, to include new walls, tile, carpet, paint,doors, ceilings and lighting. Hagen said the cost for each project will be under $100,000.

A landscaping project at Hathorn Hall will involve grading the area to improve drainage, after which new sidewalks and a terrace will be installed. The plaza on the north side of Hathorn will be substantially renovated from the east entry to the west entry, and there will be reconstruction out to the mall sidewalk on the south side. Murphy, who is heading up the project, said the slope at the east entry will be improved for wheelchair access, and space has been allocated for bicycle racks. He said the project is scheduled to begin June 16 and should be completed by mid-August, at a cost of about $90,000.

"We will conduct an ongoing program during the academic year that includes weekly tutoring and weekend workshops, and a six-week residential program in the summer. We will provide instruction and support in core subjects and electives, to help participants succeed," she said.

"The program also includes several field trips to colleges. The six-week residential program in the summer includes a service learning component in addition to the academics. "This teaches kids that when you receive you need to give back.," she said.

Each student will have 100 to 130 hours in service learning or volunteer work every year they are in the program. Moe said they also spend time exploring career options, learning how to fill out college applications and writing college scholarship essays.

For about 75 percent of the students from Arlington High School, English is a second language, so the students are immersed in English while they are on campus. Students are selected for the program primarily through teacher recommendations.

"Education is an investment that benefits our children, our communities and our economy," she said. "Programs like Upward Bound break down the barriers that prevent students from entering or succeeding in college and give them a real chance for a better life."

Sciences have received a $135,000 grant from the Sustainable Agriculture Research and Education program in the United States Department of Agriculture, to conduct a three-year study and demonstration project on feed and nutrient intake on eight grazing dairy farms in Wisconsin.

Their goal for this project is to develop accurate nutrient management plans for grazing dairy farms because there is not much specific grazing data available, according to Cosgrove. Cosgrove and Cooper will study feed intake by grazing cattle and develop a nutrient management plan to manage manure as a nutrient.

Cooper said the project will help farmers with grazing cattle by giving them specific grazing data. Feed intake and milk production for dairy cows on a pasture is often lower that for cows in confinement. Therefore, the amount of manure production by grazing cows is likely lower. Having this information would enable more accurate nutrient management plans to be developed for grazing dairy farms.

They will determine the amount of manure produced and the nutrients present in it to make sure there is no more than the plants can use. If there is too much nitrogen present, it can leak into the ground water and pollute it. If there is too much phosphorous, it will pollute surface runoff water that goes into lakes and rivers. Rotational grazing is used because if offers a better pasture yield. Pastures used for grazing are rotated on a regular basis between being used and resting, he said. Phosphorous and nitrogen are also taken off of a farm as nutrients present in milk, sold livestock and agricultural products.

These are just two examples of dramatic changes that are taking place in some communities, and the challenges residents face when non-English speaking people relocate into their community. The issues surrounding immigrants and refugees that have occurred over the past years were the focus of a conference held June 4 at UW-River Falls, titled, "Changing Workplaces, Changing Communities: Easing the Transition to Culturally and Linguistically Diverse Workplaces and Communities."

The event was attended by employers, educators and other professionals from communities in Wisconsin and Minnesota. Chancellor Ann Lydecker in her opening remarks noted that it was the first time the University held a conference like this, but the University has a commitment to its undergraduates and its community, and an international component would be a welcome addition to undergraduate studies.

Break-out sessions throughout the day focused on legal issues confronting employers, law enforcement officials and health care workers when working with immigrant workers, and on working with interpreters. When immigrants come into a community, they are in need of health care, education, housing and good jobs. For health care, they need an interpreter who can be trusted with confidential information.

The pharmacy must be able to tell them how and when to take medication. For education, they need certified interpreters and they need to be taught to speak the English language. Housing can pose problems for people of some cultures, such as the Somalis, because boys and girls are supposed to be kept apart. The Hmong, on the other hand, want to be together with all of their family members.

Finding work can be a problem for Somali women, because they cover all but their face and hands when they dress, and some employers have dress codes to ensure safety. Both men and women must pray three times during the day when they are at work, and their prayer times do not coincide with traditional break times.

"They are sometimes victims of torture, and they are often ill. They suffer from anxiety, post-traumatic stress disorder and grief from the loss of family members. They have lived in refugee camps, sometimes for as long as 10 years, with little food, and they are malnourished. The children do not receive any education while they are in the refugee camps. An immigrant leaves his or her country by choice."

Graupman recommends using the term "new Americans" to refer to refugees and immigrants, and being sensitive to all the challenges they face in their new country. She offered a number of suggestions to employers for ways to work with new Americans that included the advice to keep orientation sessions short, not use jargon in the sessions or on signs, understand that it is very difficult to learn the language and don't expect them to know it too soon, and offer on-site English language training during work time, as people often have other jobs, only one car, or childcare concerns.

At a round-table panel discussion, participants discussed ways to prepare a community for a changing environment, and ways to integrate the new members as smoothly as possible. It was recommended that businesses bringing people in should let people in the community know about it ahead of time, so they can make preparations. The police, health and human services, and the job training office in particular should be notified.

Sometimes it is necessary for the police to go to the schools and let the students know they will not tolerate abuse of the refugees. It is important for refugees to understand that, if they are abused by other members of the community, they can report crimes against them to the police. Many refugees and immigrants are afraid of the military and the police, because in the countries they came from the military and the police may have been corrupt and violent.

Clergy can help to educate their community, and encourage members to treat newcomers with respect. It also helps to form a diversity council and get the elders from the new group to join, because they can make decisions and influence their people. Sports were suggested as a neutral arena in which to bring people together, as was food. A food fair with booths serving ethnic food could teach people to appreciate an aspect of a culture they find otherwise difficult to understand.

As in past years, several special events will be held throughout the camp to give fans an extra insight into the 2002 Chiefs. A highlight for the camp this summer will be a two-day practice with the Minnesota Vikings. Since the Chiefs made the trip out to Mankato in 2002, the Vikings are set to pay a visit to River Falls this summer. The Vikings and Chiefs have set practices times for Wednesday and Thursday July 30 and 31 at the Ramer Field Sports Complex.

Complex. Competition will begin at 2:30 p.m. with registration starting at 1:30 at the field. Girls and boys will compete together in six age groups of 8-13 years old. The event is free and all participants will receive a ribbon. Trophies will be given to the top three place finishers in each division. In each of the past two years, Coach Dick Vermeil has presented the trophies to the winners.

In his third season, Vermeil believes his team has built a solid offensive base with veterans like All-pro tight end Tony Gonzalez, quarterback Trent Green, wide receivers Johnnie Morton and Eddie Kennison, and 2001 NFL rushing champion Priest Holmes. Defensively, the Chiefs look strong with a good foundation returning including linebacker and Wisconsin native Mike Maslowski, last year's sack leader Eric Hicks, and a strong secondary with safety Greg Wesley and cornerback Eric Warfield.

Johnson will look to contribute by perhaps backing up superstar Holmes. Extensive coverage and daily updates of all the action will be available on UW-RF's award-winning web site www.uwrf.info/chiefs.

Along with telephone system coordinator Kara Albrecht and a media technician, he ensures that approximately 5,500 students and 585 faculty and staff members receive efficient, uninterrupted service on campus.

Murray was recently named a founding member of the USS Tidewater Association, an organization with the special mission of preserving the memories of years long past, but not forgotten. He maintains a tech plus class ham radio amateur license K9ZMA .

This two-credit course allows teachers to create an implementation plan for infusing international education into their own classrooms. Participants will immediately apply what they learn in the seminar by working with a UW-River Falls youth program Aug. 4-8.

"Offering the course in conjunction with the College for Kids Program offers a wonderful hands-on learning opportunity for teachers," said Judy Freund, instructor for the course. "We will talk about ideas for infusing international education into the curriculum, try them out with kids, and then revisit these ideas to see what worked and what we would change."

Themes of the seminar include population, environment, health, hunger and the economy. A mixture of group discussion, class observation, demonstration teaching, interactive links and the use of web resources will be combined to familiarize participants with frameworks for international education. Participants will infuse principles from the Wisconsin Program Standards for International Education and the International Education Curriculum Guide into the curriculum.

In addition to the well-known Kansas City Chiefs training camp, activities hosted on campus include youth sports camps, marching band rehearsals, church group meetings, a leadership program for kids called "Youth Leadership Congress,"

"Upward Bound," which is a program for students that come from a family where neither parent holds a college degree, the Horse Science Institute conference, a tennis camp for senior citizens called "Traveling Tennis," as well as many others.

Students that come to the campus for various activities develop leadership skills, self-esteem, and independence. They can explore educational opportunities and may even one day choose to attend college at UW-RF, if they have a positive experience on campus.

"We welcome summer campers, program participants and other visitors to our campus each summer. Many people gain their first introduction to our campus through one or more of our summer programs. They come for these unique summer offerings, work with our faculty and staff, feel comfortable in our beautiful surroundings and when it is time for them, or others in their families, to select a college, many of them return to UW-RF. The local economy is also supported as visitors to campus stop and shop in our stores, restaurants, gas stations and motels in the region."

Traveling Tennis is one of the programs that draw people to campus. This year they will have two camps, one for three days and one for four days. While seniors are here, they try to take part in as many local attractions as possible, including the St. Croix Valley Summer Theatre, the Wyman concert series, art and music shows, and the Kansas City Chiefs practices. Some 25 guests come each time and stay in the residence halls on campus.

Another event on campus is "The Teen University Program," which provides academic enrichment classes for students who show high academic potential, motivation, and talent. This is the camp's 11th summer and is taught by University faculty and other specialty selected instructors. Classes are specifically designed for students who have finished grade six, seven or eight by the time summer begins. Students can choose morning and afternoon classes during the one-week program and must be nominated through their school in order to participate.

Waller said visitors use the UW-RF campus because of its great location, small-town atmosphere, beautiful campus, proximity to the Twin Cities, and the outdoor facilities. It is a contained campus, and activity does not have to spill out into the residential neighborhoods and disturb residents. The dining facilities have always received good reviews (it's the same staff that cook for the Kansas City Cheifs), and there are residence halls for guests to stay in. The activities on campus in the summer provide ongoing employment for UW-RF employees and bring many visitors to River Falls.

The Wisconsin FFA Hall of Fame was started in 1995 to provide permanent and significant recognition to the special leaders who have had an impact on the state FFA Association and have set an example of service for all FFA members to follow. A maximum of three individuals can be inducted each year. The annual conference wrapped up as Ritscher was named state president.

Kringle, an agricultural education major from Barron; sophomore Kayla Woolever, an agricultural education major from Bloomer; freshman Steve Boe, an agricultural education major from Taylor; freshman Keith Christen, a dairy science major from Monticello; incoming freshman Jackie Mundt, an agricultural business major from Pittsville; and incoming freshman Nicole Schmidt, an agricultural business major from Gresham.

The South Fork Suites is scheduled to open in June 2005. The $11.5 million facility will have 240 student residents housed in 60 suites, each consisting of four private bedrooms, one bath, a living room and a kitchenette. This type of arrangement is known as "transition living," because it is similar to apartment living, but it is located on campus.

She also singled out students for praise, by noting that they have agreed to pay for the project in its entirety without a cost to taxpayers. According to Lydecker, the project will generate $6.7 million in regional purchases of construction materials supplies and materials, generate over 90 jobs in the construction and trades industries, and return over $353,000 in income taxes.

Architect Ed Wenzler, speaking at a brunch, noted that the enthusiasm for the project is overwhelming. Typically, he said, the first meeting on a project lasts about three hours and gets absorbed in project details and he often has to act as a cheerleader to generate enthusiasm. At UW-RF, the first meeting extended over two days, and he recalled that he found the level of energy so high that he remarked, "I'm really going to have to work hard to catch up" with students and staff.

Jamie Wise, a junior marketing communications major from Farmington, Minn., and who serves as the chair of the Residential Living Committee, offered a student perspective during her remarks at the ceremony.

"Residence hall life means a great deal to each student," she said. "For many, such as myself, it has been a place where they define or decide who they are and who they want to be. It is also a place where many students meet their best friends or their future spouse; and it is those people that the students hang onto and remember for the rest of their lives.

"It's a place that becomes home to the students, a place where they feel they belong or always have a constant connection. Through programming by the residence hall staff and other campus events, students within those halls grow and learn together the lessons of everyday life; the things that are really going to make a long-term impact on their lives."

Wise noted that she recently assisted in enrollment activities for incoming freshmen and took parents and students on campus tours. Throughout, she related, she heard stories from parents about their experiences living in UW-RF residence halls.

Rhoades, a UW-RF alumna and a member of the Foundation Board, drew chuckles from alumni in the audience, when she related that as she listened to Wise's remarks it led her to recollect her own residence living and student leadership experiences.

"I can't begin to tell you how impressive that is," Plouff said. "I know it wasn't an easy decision to commit fees toward a project that many of the current students will likely never use. But that action reveals the depth and breadth of the character and vision of UW-RF's student body."

Create a Life Beyond Your Wildest Expectations." With the particular needs of students who will soon be seeking careers in mind, Emmerich will discuss how to find fulfilling and financially-rewarding work when a recession makes it seem impossible, and how to find work that allows one to develop and grow.

Workplace," is based on the title of her most recent book. Citing the statistic that over 80 percent of American employees say they don't like their jobs, she will suggest ways to ignite passion for extraordinary results, to find stimulation and excitement at work, and to get more meaning out of life.

In 1988 she founded The Emmerich Group, Inc., working as a business strategist and consultant to present speeches and develop audio and video training systems for hundreds of clients. She has produced 24 video training programs.

She has also published more than 500 articles and four books on topics ranging from technology to financial services. Two more books will be published this spring. She has twice been voted Entrepreneur of the Year.

Today, Emmerich is one of the 12 most requested speakers in the country for national sales metings. Her topics motivate financial institutions toward growth, beginning with, "Acquisitions Are for Wimps: how to grow your institution with merging, acquiring or marrying into it."

Find out about trends that are taking the financial industry places for which it is not prepared." Yet another is, "Thank God It's Monday: How to Build a Motivating Workplace: Learn to create an atmosphere where people will think "out of the box" and perform at a higher level. This is the topic she plans to address at UW-RF.

Whether students need a few credits toward a degree, want to expand their professional skills or simply have a lifelong interest in learning, there are classes available at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls this summer.

The UW-RF offers a wide array of credit and non-credit classes for undergraduate and graduate students, teachers, business professionals and area residents beginning May 26 and continuing through Aug. 15.

Current UW-RF students and those enrolled at other institutions but residing in the area for the summer can take advantage of a compressed schedule of classes to complete requirements for their degree programs.

The University also offers several graduate programs for teachers in the summer months. Many working teachers find that summer is a great time to refine their skills or pick up practical knowledge which they can apply to their classrooms in the fall. Graduate programs in agricultural education, elementary and secondary education, reading and principal licensure are a few of the programs for teachers that begin in the summer.

The University of Wisconsin-River Falls is offering a conference on managing workplace or community change on June 4. The conference, "Changing Workplaces, Changing Communities," is designed for employers and community leaders who want to learn how to ease the transition to culturally and linguistically diverse workplaces and communities that are the result of new workers, and their families, who speak little or no English.

The one-day conference is designed primarily to address issues confronting employers, community leaders and the resource and service people who work with these groups. Among community leaders, town and city council members, health care administrators, and law enforcement officials will find the conference most helpful, according to Kristen Allen, conference coordinator.

Speakers will cover such topics as legal issues confronting employers, working with interpreters in culturally and linguistically diverse workplaces, personal reflections on being a new immigrant, and what to do when you and your clients don't speak the same language. The $50 conference fee covers participation in the sessions, a workbook, lunch and refreshments.

Language program, which trains tutors in teaching ESL, and then places them with participating businesses that employ non-English speaking workers. The tutor training courses and field experience are offered throughout the year.

"This practical, hands-on course is designed to train tutors who can help non-English speaking adults communicate more effectively in their workplaces and in their communities," said Kristen Allen, program coordinator.

The tutor-training classes will be held daily from 8:30 a.m. to 12:30 p.m. for two weeks. Participants who successfully complete the tutor-training course may register for field experience tutoring non-English speaking workers employed in local businesses. The UW-RF Workplace English as a Second Language program, which offers the class, is also hosting a conference for area employers and community leaders on managing diversity in their workplaces and communities on June 4 in River Falls.

Karlene Lindow, a senior animal science major from Chili, Wis., was awarded the FFA American Star Farmer Award. She is the first female to receive this award. The Star Farmer Award is based on leadership, student-created programs, grade point average and community involvement, and is the oldest and most prestigious award the FFA confers.

Sales Placement. She holds three different sales positions. Besides working at her family business, Specialty Ice Co. Inc. of Mayville, Wis, Backhaus also works at a local strawberry farm and has managed the local FFA greenhouse for two years.

Backhaus gained the bulk of her experience while working for the ice company her family owns, helping to purchase a computer and install a bookkeeping system to access account information. She also designed a new company logo that is displayed on the firm's letterheads, financial statements and fleet of delivery trucks.

Gurnani, who was born in West Africa and attended high school in India, has sought to educate international and American students on differences of culture as president of the UW-RF International Student Association and as leader of the Campus International Ambassadors. He has tutored economics and taught other subjects to middle and high school students at the UW-RF summer Pre-College Program.

Perkl has contributed more than 500 hours of volunteer service with Americorp and the Student Conservation Association. He also served as president of the Earth Consciousness Organization from 2001 to 2003. As a student senator from 2001 to 2003, he fought to increase student awareness of campus environmental issues and initiated efforts for the creation of a Student Senate Environmental Committee.

Student Association. He was co-president of African American Alliance, and is now a student advisor to the organization. He was a member of the University's football team for three years and was selected for the scholastic honor roll by the Wisconsin Intercollegiate Athletic Conference. He is a McNair Scholar.

Puro has been involved with activities that included planning two senior citizen proms and mentoring fellow students. A significant commitment during Puro's four years at UW-RF has been to the campus chapter of Habitat for Humanity, where she served on the executive team for three years and as president for the past year. Over winter school breaks, she has traveled to Santa Fe, N.M., and Jacksonville, Fla., to help build homes.

Schoenemann devoted herself to service while a student at UW-RF, through involvement with several organizations. For the past two years she has acted as chairperson for the Campus and Community Cleanup Coalition. She also helped establish National Hunger and Homelessness Awareness Week at the University by organizing a sleep out, food drive, and other events to raise awareness about hunger and homelessness.

Lydecker congratulated the students on their work, saying, "You certainly have distinguished yourself at UW-RF. Not only have you participated broadly in the life of this institution, but you have also exhibited leadership in University affairs while at the same time gaining great respect from faculty, staff and students. You are an example of our best and brightest undergraduates.

High school students from New Richmond, River Falls and Ellsworth became critical observers of the war as a result of their participation in adapting a new national curriculum that describes the humanitarian conduct toward enemy combatants, prisoners of war and to civilians that is required of combatant nations during war.

The U.S. Department of Defense must instruct the military in the rules of war, while schools are expected to help teach America's future leaders, diplomats and soldiers about the rules and humanitarian precepts.

Adaptation of the curriculum to meet the decentralized educational standards decision-making culture of American schools systems is being coordinated by social work Professor Ogden Rogers in conjunction with the American Red Cross.

Rogers is a senior volunteer consultant and teacher on humanitarian law with the International Services Division of the International Red Cross. He has lectured widely for the past six years on the law to community groups and Red Cross chapters throughout the Midwest for the IRC.

Among the concepts that middle and high school students will learn are how nations interact with each other, the humanitarian norms and the limits of combatants such as the use of child soldiers or landmines, understanding the perspectives of those in armed conflict while placing human life and dignity at the center of the analysis, developing an interest in humanitarian issues and overcoming hopelessness, ensuring justice, and seeking active involvement through community service to protect and promote humanitarian attitudes.

Work on the curriculum implementation began last summer and started as intellectual exercise for Ellsworth's Mark Stoesz on finding a practical way to incorporate a massive amount of material into existing classes. Stoesz brought technical experience to the task group through his service on two curriculum adaptation committees for the Wisconsin Department of Public Instruction.

"As we began to look at the material the group became absorbed in it. It has become a passion for us. This material is critical to what we're trying to accomplish with our students. We want them to have a global awareness and a sense of humanity."

Opportunities to introduce the rules have been abundant. As examples, he cites a lecture to eighth-graders in which the rules for the treatment of prisoners of war were related to the experiences of captured Union soldiers who died by the thousands at the notorious Andersonville prisoner camp in the Civil War.

In another class, he introduced what the rules say about the responsibilities of bystanders, and applied them to conduct toward Freedom Marchers in the Civil Rights movement as well as to the role played by a U.S. helicopter pilot whose threats to shoot his fellow soldiers halted the massacre of civilians in the Vietnam hamlet of My Lai III.

Over the past several months, Stoesz and New Richmond's Michelle Riba-Doerr have traveled either to San Francisco or to Connecticut to share the Wisconsin model at conferences of teachers and students. They've had a warm reception.

As Rogers coordinates with the ARC, Professor Krey is demonstrating how the curriculum aligns with national standards to the U.S. Department of Education and to the National Council on Social Studies. Partnerships also are being explored with other major national organizations and foundations.

Studies Association, and this summer UW-RF will host a national workshop to introduce up to 50 high school educators to the curriculum. Those teachers will continue to explore how best to implement the classroom material and provide feedback to Rogers.

Ultimately, Rogers says, he expects the work performed by the Wisconsin task group to convince the ARC to invest up to $4 million to share the curriculum with 54,000 high school social studies teachers in the United States. Within the next four years that means four million American high school student s will be exposed to humanitarian law.

University of Wisconsin-River Falls biotechnoloy student Jeremy King, a senior from Waukesha, was recently awarded the Minnesota Chromatography Forum Research Award for undergraduates. The annual award provides $4,000 for a student to conduct a one-year research project.

"The question to be addressed in this study is whether the levels of flavonoids in human umbilical cord blood can be correlated to the likelihood of children developing leukemia," said King. "Flavonoids are typically viewed as chemoprotective agents. In some cases, however, they may act as the catalyst in the development of childhood leukemia."

University of Minnesota researchers from mothers whose children suffer from leukemia. He will use high performance liquid chromatography (HPLC) and electrochemical detection (ECD) to analyze the cord blood.

Student members of the UW-River Falls Crops Team and Soils Team recently won trophies at a competition sponsored by the North American Colleges and Teachers of Agriculture and held in Murfreesburo, Tenn. Fourteen baccalaureate and 11 two-year institutions participated in a variety of contests at the event, on the subjects of crops, soils, dairy cattle, horses, horticulture, agricultural computing, agribusiness management and livestock.

"The students were asked to identify 100 samples of crops and weeds in all stages of growth, as well as 100 samples of insects, diseases and other practical items relevant to the successful management of crops. They were also asked to demonstrate their math skills, solving numerous problems, all of which related to agricultural applications."

Soils Professor Larry Meyers trained and coached the team. Meyers was especially proud of the team for winning, since it consisted of only three members while the other teams had four. He said what the students learned from the experience is more important than winning, but he was pleased that they did well.

"The students were well prepared," he said. "They took four courses in soils, and I spent a lot of hours with them. Students who finish this course of study on soils will be trained to map, describe and interpret soil properties. They will also have the background necessary to do environmental work."

The play is a modern adaptation of the play, "The Cheats (or Tricks) of Scapin," which is based on the traditions of commedia del'arte, an improvisational free-form theatrical tradition that introduced popular slapstick comedy.

She used style elements from the 1970s as a base for the commedia clown-like characters, combining character ideals and costume pieces with 1970-style prints and fabrics such as vinyl to create her award-winning costumes.

"Moria will have the opportunity to show her portfolio to a number of costume designers at graduate schools around the nation. She will be able to get interviews at more schools as she looks for the graduate program in costume design that is right for her."

"The theatre department was very proud of the fact that Moria won at the regional competition and was invited to the national festival, but this recognition is a major accomplishment," said Hedahl. "Clinton's award has pushed UW-RF into a national spotlight," said Murray. "It has brought the theatre program national recognition."

"Moria's win shows that UW-RF's smaller theatre program can offer our undergraduates opportunities that undergrads in larger programs usually do not have, because our smaller numbers translate into more personal interaction."

The UW-River Falls Academic Quadrathlon team earned second-place honors in regional competition held recently in Des Moines, Iowa. The UW-RF team was one of sixteen teams at the competition, representing all the major agricultural colleges in the Midwest.

Fond du Lac, majoring in dairy science; Ann Grey, a junior from Cedarburg, majoring in animal science with an equine emphasis; Carrie Kavanagh, a senior from Greenfield, Minn., majoring in animal science with an equine emphasis; and Abe Mach, a senior from Sturgeon Lake, Minn., majoring in animal science with a meat emphasis.

The competition consisted of a written exam, laboratory practicum, an oral presentation, and a quiz bowl. The content of the four segments of the competition dealt with all aspects of production animal agriculture, including questions and exercises concerning management of dairy cattle, beef cattle, swine, sheep, poultry and horses. Also included were the academic disciplines of animal science such as nutrition, physiology, breeding and genetics, and animal health.

"The team performed well in all phases of the competition with rankings of third in the written exam, third in lab practicum, second in the oral presentation and seventh in the quiz bowl," said Onan. "This resulted in a second place rating overall, tied with the University of Illinois and only one point behind the winning team from Iowa State University."

In his address, Morisaki will encourage his fellow graduates to take a chance, as he did when he made the decision to attend college in America. He did not want to go to a Japanese university, because students have to declare a major when they enter and they cannot change it. He wanted to explore the options before making up his mind. As Morisaki became involved in campus life, he developed confidence and skills that he never would have learned in Japan, he said. He believes it is important to take advantage of every opportunity that presents itself in life. The opportunity to come to America changed his life, and he wants his fellow students to grow through new experiences, as well.

Morisaki was selected for the honor of delivering the commencement address by Chancellor Ann Lydecker on the recommendation of the Faculty Senate External Relations Committee. Each spring semester all commencing undergraduates are invited to apply for the privilege. They must include a letter of support from two faculty members, a resume, and a draft of their proposed speech. The committee reviews the applications, invites students to deliver their speech in an audition, and then sends a recommendation to the chancellor, who approves the selection and extends the invitation to speak.

Health and Human Performance Professor Debra Allyn, in recommending Morisaki to deliver the address, said he is one of the best students she has worked with throughout her teaching career. "He is very organized and diligent in his work as a student," she said, "and he has developed an excellent relationship with his peers, within the department and across campus."

Performance Department said of Morisaki, "He has been a student in my class, a manager for our women's basketball program, and a student assistant coach and administrator for the team. He has been exceptional in all of those circumstances."

Committee chair and biology Professor Katherine Miller said she found Morisaki's message to be optimistic, positive and personally moving. "Our world is becoming increasingly globalized, and Takeo's speech is a marvelous example of how all nations are made up of individuals with hopes and dreams for their future, and we all truly belong to one world," she said.

UW-River Falls 2003 distinguished alumna Roxanne Emmerich shared these words of wisdom on how to build a successful career in a sluggish economy, in an auditorium overflowing with students during her visit to the campus May 13.

Your Wildest Dreams," Emmerich encouraged students to dance their dance, have a ball, make a difference, and think what they can give rather than what they can get. Later in the day Emmerich, a renowned entrepreneur, business consultant and motivational speaker, addressed professionals and other employed people with a presentation on how to re-energize their careers titled, "Thank God it's Monday: How to Build a Motivating Workplace," based on the title of her most recent book.

We need to ask ourselves how we can accomplish what needs to be done, rather than if we can accomplish it. "If you know how to work and see what needs to be done, and if you make that happen, you will be successful," she said.

Her dynamic presentations have earned her recognition in many arenas. Sales and Marketing Magazine listed her as one of the 12 most requested speakers in the country for national sales meetings in May 2000. More recently, Successful Meetings Magazine featured her as one of the top women speakers. She has been the subject of interviews with CNN, CBS and more than 100 other television and radio stations.

As a student at UW-RF , Emmerich majored in agricultural business and was voted outstanding senior by the faculty in the College of Agriculture. She graduated in 1981 with high honors and received the Chancellor's Award for leadership, service and significant contributions to the university community.

After graduation, she began her career in banking, building on what she learned to found her own banking company with two partners in 1997. Today, her company, North American Banking Company in St. Paul, is an $80 million bank holding company.

As founder and president of the Emmerich Group, Inc., Emmerich has worked as a business strategist and consultant, working with hundreds of clients, presenting more than 1,300 speeches, and producing two video training systems and multiple audio programs. She has twice been voted Entrepreneur of the Year. She has written four books, and is in the process of publishing two more. She has published more than 500 articles throughout the United States, providing insights and motivation to businesses for everything from technology to financial services.

The criteria include contributions to the field of education, willingness to share proficiency with fellow educators, setting a good example for others to follow, and providing leadership in local, state or national education organizations.

Her philosophy on education is that you learn by doing. Since students learn more as active participants, she focuses her classroom activities on role playing, cooperative groups, simulations and other activities that get students involved and participating. Monsour has been an active promoter of the Service Learning program. She worked in the past with others to obtain a Wisconsin Partnerships in Service Learning grant, which was funded at the federal level, and has recently applied for a grant to continue Service Learning efforts.

"Dr. Monsour is a dedicated professional willing to put in the time to work with others whether it is advising students, supervising student teachers or mentoring junior faculty members," said Connie Foster, dean of the College of Education and Professional Studies at UW-RF. "As co-chair of the teacher education department, she has done an outstanding job moving the department forward on a number of critical issues."

Monsour received her undergraduate degree in art education from Hamline University, a master's degree in school psychology from University of St. Thomas and a master's degree in special education from UW-RF. For 14 years she taught in Minnesota schools, both public and private, at every grade level. She received her doctorate from the U of M in 1992.

Monsour said she continues to learn from her students as she prepares them for their own classrooms. "Teaching is not a one-way street," she said. "I learn from students as much as they learn from me. I have high expectations for my students. They are hard workers and so am I."

UW-River Falls recipients of the fifth annual Service Learning Awards of Excellence were recognized at a ceremony in the River Room of Rodli Commons on May 5. Chancellor Ann Lydecker presented the awards to one agency, one student, one academic staff person and one faculty member, to honor them for their participation in projects that served the community.

Award of Excellence for an Agency, for its work with students majoring in land use planning. The students are required each semester, as a service learning project, to develop and publicly present a full set of maps and development documents for sites within the city that are slated for development.

"The project requires that the student apply course content to the real needs and benefits of the community, thus giving the student a genuine professional development opportunity and experience. The city is in turn provided with background research and design ideas that have often become the actual development details in the final adopted design," nominator and environmental science and management Professor Kelly Cain said.

Adam Wehling, a senior from Chippewa Falls majoring in agricultural education, received a Service Learning Award of Excellence for Students. Wehling served as the agricultural education department's parliamentary procedure activity coordinator for 2002, was an assistant instructor in the leadership and group dynamics class, and organized and conducted workshops for high school students.

Nominator Gerald Matteson, assistant dean of the College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences, said Wehling's teaching of students has been outstanding; his students have always earned high grades on the final oral exam.

Also receiving the Service Learning Award of Excellence for Students were social work majors Sharon Christiansen, a freshman from Prescott; Lindsey Colbeth, a freshman from Roseville, Minn.; Maggie Hoyer, a freshman from Benton; and Jone' Nelson, a sophomore from Stillwater, Minn., for removing unsafe playground equipment at Turningpont Domestic Abuse Shelter in River Falls. Social Work Professor Ruth Kalms, who nominated the group, said the students used their problem solving skills and critical thinking skills, and worked with a diverse population on a project that all thought was impossible at the beginning.

Geography Professor Don Petzold received the Service Learning Award of Excellence for Faculty, for his work on the UW-RF Service Learning Implementation Team for the past five years. Petzold has also instructed students in service learning projects, conducted primarily with elementary schools,that involved designing and painting maps on the school playgrounds.

Petzold was nominated by Monsour, who said, "Don has been a most faithful and responsible committee member. He has also been intricately involved in all phases of service learning: recipient of the training; teacher; presenter and active participant in the projects."

The course will describe specific strategies for assessing reading and writing, analyzing student work, and teaching reading and writing according to students' needs. Class participants will work with small groups of students in grades 1-6 to apply assessment and instruction strategies. The final project will be a literacy portfolio for each parent, outlining the child's strengths and weaknesses in writing and reading and strategies to help the child.

The instructor, Tracy Preece, has been a second grade teacher in New Richmond for nine years and has recently received certification by the National Board for Professional Teaching Standards. Participants will earn three undergraduate or graduate credits for completing the class.

Attendees will gain experience in applying concepts of algebra, percentages, geometry, graphing, numbers and operations, problem solving, and data analysis and probability in lessons that link mathematics and economics.

Participants will receive a textbook, "Mathematics and Economics: Connections for Life," courtesy of the workshop sponsors, State Farm Insurance and the AnnMarie Foundation (Phillips Plastics Corporation). Each text includes age-appropriate, complete and self-contained lessons that correspond with the National Standards for both mathematics and economics.

The UW-RF Workplace English as a Second Language program, which offers the class, is also hosting a conference for area employers and community leaders on managing diversity in their workplaces and communities on Wednesday, June 4.

Three faculty members in the UW-River Falls College of Arts and Sciences have been recognized for their dedication to student advising with the Outstanding Adviser Award. Recipients of the award are: Professor Sandra Ellis for arts and humanities; Professor Travis Tubre' for the social sciences; and Professor Karl Peterson for sciences and mathematics.

Dean Gordon Hedahl said the award recognizes the importance of advising to ensure that students make timely and reliable progress toward earning their degrees, obtaining internships and finding employment after they graduate. Said Hedahl, "The students on the dean's advisory committee created the award and made the selections. This year, approximately 50 students took time to nominate faculty members from the College. I certainly support their efforts, and I am happy to provide public recognition for the extremely important role our faculty play in guiding and mentoring our students through their academic careers."

Among the student comments were: "Sandy is willing to go the extra mile and really get to know the students she advises. She is available for career, life, family and school advice. That's what makes her such a wonderful person and fantastic adviser to students."

Another student wrote, "I experienced personal problems that interfered with my work at school. Instead of lecturing me, Dr. Ellis listened. She never pressured me to do what I didn't want to do, but did make suggestions for how to go about helping myself. I had no idea where to start, and without her I may not have started the process at all." Another said, "She is so committed to students that she has helped students who aren't even her advisees. You won't find a more deserving professor on this campus!"

A member of the faculty since 1997, Ellis teaches all of the broadcast journalism courses plus mass media writing, history of documentary, documentary production and computer assisted reporting. She also supervises the news department for campus radio station WRFW, and NewsCenterU, the weekly TV newscast that airs over the University's cable access channel.

Psychology Professor Travis Tubre' was recognized in the division for sciences and mathematics. Among the student comments were, "He encourages me, provides me with relevant advice, makes sure I am staying on the right track to graduation, and has many connections with people in my business field, so he is able to give me real-life opportunities. He has taken a lot of time out of his schedule to get me an internship and help me begin to network."

Another student wrote, "Dr. Tubre has become a huge part of who I have become at this university. There are usually several students in his office asking questions or just talking. I know students who go in once a semester to see their adviser. This is absolutely not the case with Dr. Tubre'. He knows his students well, and is extremely helpful in making sure that they get the best education they can."

Tubre' joined the faculty at UW-RF in 2001. He teaches general psychology, industrial/organizational psychology, psychological measurement and the psychology of human sexuality. His research on the topics of training and development, personnel selection and work-related stress is regularly published in scholarly journals and trade publications. Tubre' also co-advises the Psychology Society and the UW-RF student chapter of the Society for Human Resources Management.

Chemistry Professor Karl Peterson was selected in the division for sciences and mathematics. Students who nominated him commented: "Dr. Peterson made a genuine effort to get to know me. I hadn't really expected this from any University staff, having had older siblings and both parents tell me that college is generally a cold and impersonal experience."

Peterson told me a lot of things that I should expect after graduation, such as getting into graduate school and applying for internships. I found his advice very helpful and I appreciate that his door always seems to be open. I think it's great that I was lucky enough to have such a dedicated adviser, and I hope if he wins this award it will encourage him to keep doing a great job."

A member of the faculty since 1999, Peterson teaches general chemistry lecture and discussion, organic chemistry lecture and laboratory, and advanced organic chemistry. He has also taught the chemical communications and research seminar.

Only the top students in the junior and senior classes with a demonstrated interest in horticulture are invited to join Pi Alpha Xi. Students must have earned an academic grade point average of at least 3.0 on a 4.0 system, which would be the equivalent of a "B" grade, be of junior or senior standing, and have promise of continued activity and interest in the field.

Pi Alpha Xi promotes high scholarship, fellowship, professional leadership, and the enrichment of human life through plants. Nationally there are 32 chapters, which are located at universities with four-year horticulture programs. The organization also is a co-sponsor of the annual National Intercollegiate Floral Crop Quality Evaluation and Design Contest. There are 112 students majoring in horticulture in the College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences at UW-RF.

Vega, who has been a member of the ACLU for more than 20 years, said he originally gravitated toward the organization because it is concerned not only with issues of free speech but also with the rights of students, immigrants and ethnic minorities.

"The purpose of the course is to study and reflect upon cultural, ethnic and linguistic diversity in American society," said Vega. "It views diversity as a strength in American society,which we need to cultivate within the context of democratic ideals and principles. Many of the topics we discuss in class are also concerns of the ACLU," said Vega.

One of the major issues facing the board at this time is assaults on civil liberties made in the name of the war on terrorism. "Measures to curtail terrorism often lead to the curtailment of our civil liberties," said Vega. "Our civil liberties are very fragile. We take them too much for granted."

Vega also serves as editor for Human Relations Newsletter, the newsletter for the Wisconsin State Human Relations Association, an educational organization dedicated to the promotion of basic human rights, respect for cultural differences, and programs that enhance equality in educational opportunities for students.

He has been a member since 1981, and has served in the past as both treasurer and president. Occasionally, Vega serves as a member of the accreditation team for the Middle States Commission on Higher Education. Most recently, he visited the Central Bayamon University in Puerto Rico with the team, to determine if it complied with the standards of the Commission.

"It is an international organization built on chapters, usually operating on university campuses, and it publishes Phi Delta Kappan magazine, a nationally -known publication on educational topics." Vega has been president of the organization for 14 of the 15 years that he has been teaching at UW-RF. His wife, Carmen, was a professor of education in the department of teacher education at UW-RF from 1988 to 1998, after which she served as dean of the College of Education and Human Services at UW-Oshkosh for five years.

Takeo Morisaki, a senior from Nagasaki, Japan, with a major in health and human performance became the eighth graduating senior in the modern history of the University to be invited to deliver the commencement address.

Introduced at the ceremony was English Assistant Professor Jennifer Brantley who was selected as the 2003 Distinguished Teacher, the highest award accorded at the University. Also during the ceremony, Roxanne Emmerich, a renowned entrepreneur, business consultant and motivational speaker, was introduced as the 2003 Distinguished Alumna.

Morisaki told the assembly that he became determined in high school to pursue a degree in the U.S. In Japan, he explained, many students pursue a college degree and many of those do not know what they want to do in life. However, in the Japanese system, a student can not change majors if they have a change of heart.

I wanted to experience another culture and another educational system. I wanted to study abroad, to study in America to learn how American people act, how they think, and how they live their lives. I wanted to change myself."

Morasaki related that he had heard that Americans were more spontaneous and expressive than Japanese students like himself, "I was very shocked at the first class because students were very active in class and spoke out very much. I had never experienced such a class in Japan. I could see people were very active, not passive. They were motivated and felt free to say what the felt."

He continued, "This campus, my friends, and professors taught me how to express my feelings and how important it is to do this. I started to get involved in many campus activities and organizations. I became to express my feelings more, to speak out in front of people more than I used to."

Those attitudes led Morasaki to become actively involved in campus organizations, including serving as president of the International Students Association, and assisted the women's basketball team, and the chair of a committee for the health, physical education and recreation club.

Turning to his fellow graduates, he challenged, "Last but not least, I want to tell all of you one thing which I believe is important for our life. Whatever you are going to do, do not miss any opportunities you can get in your life and do not be afraid to take it.

"I took the opportunity to come here, and that is why I am here now. That one opportunity changed my life. We are living in the world where so many things happen, very diverse, and where borders between countries are becoming less meaningful. The world is globalized. We can go anywhere in the world, and we can do anything we want to.

"I believe that each one of us has the potential to be the one who changes the world. Take a chance as I have done by coming to River Falls, and take any opportunity you can get and do not be afraid to try anything.

Lydecker saluted the honorees, saying, "I'll bet you all have a picture in your memory of your impressions when you first came to campus. These first impressions were powerful. You stayed, you worked, you served, and you nurtured and extended the work of the University. I extend to all of you being recognized this evening my deepest appreciation and my heartiest congratulations for the contributions you have made."

Gerster was a faculty member in English from 1988 to 2001, and recently resigned to be with her family in California. In her years at UW-River Falls, she secured grants to support film and ethnic literature courses. She brought a prestigious National Endowment for the Humanities seminar to campus, where teachers from across the nation studied ethnic film. In 1999 she was named Outstanding Teacher in the Humanities for the College of Arts and Sciences. Gerster is living in Santa Cruz, Calif., and teaching full time at the University of California there.

Although Halberg was only at UW-RF for two years, from 2001 to 2003, he has left a lasting impression on the staff and students. He was known around the television services office as "the volunteer," because he was always willing to work extra hours to make a program successful. He took responsibility for coming back after working hours to record University concerts and other events for cable Channel 19.

UW-RF, and a master's degree from Northern Illinois University in DeKalb. He was chair of the journalism department for 18 years, and helped establish the marketing communications major and film studies minor at UW-RF. He participated in the Faculty Senate, and maintained successful journalism department accreditation over the years. Norman is the author of a series of well-known books on ghost hauntings. He has begun work on "Haunted Homestead," his sixth and final book in the series, which will probably be available fall 2004.

Peters began teaching philosophy at UW-RF in 1986, after earning his Ph.D. in philosophy at Michigan State University. His vision and effort have been key in developing the philosophy program at the University. He has continued to develop courses, such as business ethics, media ethics and environmental ethics to meet the needs of a wide range of students and programs. Beyond the classroom, Peters has enriched the campus and community with his music. The sounds of his piano and combo have graced many receptions and events.

Schock came to work at the University in 1969 as a power plant helper and worked up to the position of operator senior. He brought considerable expertise to his job, having learned to operate boilers on the aircraft carrier USS Midway while in the U.S. Navy. He is known as an excellent troubleshooter with a great memory for the details of boiler controls and operation.

Shepherd began working at UW-RF in 1975 in academic computing, and has been an integral part of that department through its evolution into information technology services. She not only was instrumental in computer services development on campus, but she also traveled to Western Wisconsin high schools, showing teachers and students how to use the computer terminals that the University set up and supported.

Wilson earned a bachelor's degree in math and physics in 1964 and a master's degree in physics in 1970 from Western Michigan University, and a Ph.D. in physics in 1975 from the University of Wyoming. In 1976 he was recruited to teach an electronics class at UW-RF, and he has been here ever since. Except for one course while he was on sabbatical, he has taught every offering in electronics, and for the past few years he has also taught the engineering sequence.

Two UW-River Falls professors from the animal and food science department of the College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences have received a $78,000 grant from the foreign agricultural services of the USDA for a three-part technical assistance project on forages and dairy feeding in Serbia.

Dennis Cooper, professor of agronomy, and Dennis Cosgrove, professor of dairy science, conducted similar agricultural development projects in the past, in the countries of Romania and Ukraine. The three-part project they have undertaken in Serbia is similar, though more extensive.

"This was three days after Prime Minister of Serbia Zoran Djindjic was assassinated, and the country was in a state of emergency," said Cooper. "Our plan was to be based in Belgrade, and take day trips from there. We were able to do this for the first few days, then the war in Iraq began.

"There were no protests in front of the U.S. Embassy, but for security reasons we were not allowed to go on any more day trips. The last two days of our trip we had to stay in Belgrade, and the people we were planning to see came to us.

"We wanted to determine what the needs were for an educational seminar. On the days before our travel was restricted, we went to several research and educational institutes, as well as farms and a cheese plant.

"We determined that there was a need for educational workshops on forage production and dairy feeding. The workshops, which will compose the second part of the project, will probably be scheduled for October. We will probably take along one or two farmers as well as one or two representatives from the USDA in Washington."

Cooper said the third component of the technical assistance project will be a study tour in Wisconsin for visiting Serbian agriculturalists. He and Cosgrove will invite about eight Serbians to come to the United States for two weeks to attend seminars on campus, building on what they did when they were in Serbia.

A "Young Scientist" program has resulted from the project conducted in Romania last year. Three Romanian scientists will come to UW-RF in the fall for an intensive, one-month educational program that Cooper hopes will include a visit to the World Dairy Expo.

"I would like to see the scholarship generate better exposure and more recognition for the KRLT, and create a greater awareness of what a tremendous resource the river is to the community," said Huston. "I also want to see it promote education to a student who is interested in preservation of the Kinnickinnic River watershed, and who will learn while working for the KRLT."

Huston said the Kinnickinnic River Land Trust Endowed Scholarship will be awarded the first time for the 2004-05 academic year. The recipient will be a senior majoring in environmental science, conservation or land use planning.

The student will work as a volunteer for the KRLT throughout the year. The regular scholarship committee of the College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences will make the selection of the student to receive the scholarship.

The idea for the scholarship was born when Huston and UW-RF plant and earth science Professor Kelly Cain, at the time both members of the publicity committee for the KRLT, were brainstorming to find ways that the Land Trust could broaden its exposure to the community.

Cain said he was pleased when Huston offered the scholarship, especially because environmental science majors have always had a very limited number of scholarships available to them. He hopes to see this change as their skills become more sought after and they have a higher profile.

"As urban sprawl becomes an issue across the country, people who can preserve the wildlife and water quality of an area are more in demand, and the Kinnickinnic River is a good place for them to learn about preservation," said Cain. "The Kinni is a perfect laboratory for high quality, water-based studies. We take examples from it to use in class. Service Learning projects and independent studies are often Kinni River-specific. If students can master the science and management of this premier cold water stream, they can do it most anywhere."

KRLT Executive Director Rick McMonagle welcomes the opportunity to work in partnership with the University. "We appreciate that this scholarship is named in part for the Kinnickinnic River Land Trust, and look forward to working with a UW-RF student and faculty member to meet our mission and to give the student a productive, professional work experience," said McMonagle.

Bill Rost, assistant chancellor for university advancement and president of the UW-River Falls Foundation, expressed his appreciation for the endowed scholarship, saying, "It is always gratifying to see someone from the community offer support to the University in an area that is of particular interest to them. Private gifts strengthen the bond between the University and the community, and create learning opportunities for students that they would not otherwise have had."

Classes will be held in the President's Room of the Hagestad Student Center from 9-11 a.m., and are open to all area seniors age 55 or older. Limited parking will be provided at the lot on the corner of Oak and Spring Streets, across from the Student Center. Parking permits will be available the first day of class.

Al Murray, UW-RF telecommunications supervisor from Hudson, displays his personal collection in the office he shares with Kara Albrecht, telephone system coordinator for the campus, in Room 14A of North Hall. Both are available during office hours to share their knowledge of the history of telephones, and both are willing to provide a running commentary of interesting facts.

"This is from the days of party lines, when the phones were operated by 'telephone girls,' " said Murray. "You would crank the phone and the operator would plug the cord into your number. You would tell her the number you wished to be connected to, and she would plug the other end of the cord into that number."

Next is the rotary phone, or "dial phone." "This was invented by a mortician, who thought his competitors were paying off the operators to give his business to them," said Albrecht. "So he invented a step switch that took out the human element by counting the numbers and mechanically connecting the party to the number requested."

Albrecht is particularly fond of the pay phone, soon also to become obsolete because of cell phones and calling cards. The phone is in working order, and the cost of a call is only 25 cents. "There is such a long tradition in this country of making a phone call for a quarter," she said. "It is in all the old songs. I just couldn't raise it to 35 cents, which is typically what the charge is now."

Bell System in Wisconsin, Murray has been collecting telephone equipment and memorabilia for years. He will complete the exhibit with items from his private collection, as well as some things he says are from the estate of the late Roger Heikel, a former engineer with Western Electric.

Department chair and animal science Professor Tony Jilek and agricultural economics Professor Emeritus Jerry Nolte will oversee a plan to establish mentoring relationships with UNA faculty and improve the English language skills of the faculty.

Because of financial constraints, teachers in Nicaragua seldom go to the best schools. UW-RF faculty will work closely with them to help improve their knowledge base and their teaching skills. Because the vast majority of technical and scientific work in agriculture is published in English, it is important for faculty members to be fluent in English.

"The agriculture-related topics they will focus on include forage, agricultural marketing, professional selling, agricultural financial management, animal nutrition, and soil and water conservation. They will also be taken to visit businesses, such as dairy farms and feed producers, to see firsthand how they are run."

Two of the UNA faculty members will be here for about four weeks during the summer. The other four will visit in early January for about 10 weeks. UW-RF faculty will travel to Nicaragua during school breaks, in summer and in January.

Jilek, whose area of expertise is animal science and genetics, said he plans to be in Nicaragua the summer of 2004 for two to three weeks. Nolte will visit in November, to work with his counterpart there on computer simulations of management programs.

Jilek said Nicaragua has had many setbacks in the form of natural disasters, including hurricanes, volcanic eruptions, tidal waves and droughts, in addition to civil wars. What it needs most to overcome these setbacks is education. So many people are uneducated, and qualified teachers at any level are scarce, Jilek said.

Although the country is not particularly rich in natural resources, it has land that could be productive if the people were educated to use it. There are mountains where coffee can grow, other mountainous areas that can support dairy and beef cattle, and lowlands on the Pacific Coast for crops.

Motivating Workplace," is based on the title of her most recent book. Citing the statistic that over 80 percent of American employees say they don't like their jobs, she will suggest ways to ignite passion for extraordinary results, to find stimulation and excitement at work, and to get more meaning out of life.

A 1981graduate with a major in agricultural business, Emmerich is familiar with the struggle most students face when beginning their careers. Starting out with nothing, she began her career in banking, building on what she learned to found her own banking company with a partner in 1997. Today her banking company, North American Banking Company in St. Paul, is an $80 million bank holding company.

As an undergraduate student at UW-RF, Emmerich was voted outstanding senior by the faculty in the College of Agriculture. She graduated with high honors, and received a Chancellor's Award of Excellence.

Another is "Nine New Realities and Why Most Bankers Are Being Blindsided: Find out about trends that are taking the financial industry places for which it is not prepared." Yet another is, "Thank God It's Monday: How to Build a Motivating Workplace: Learn to create an atmosphere where people will think "out of the box" and perform at a higher level. This is the topic she plans to address at UW-RF.

Emmerich rejects much of what she learned in business school. She says banks don't know how to talk to their customers; how to ask the right questions, give the right answers and follow through. They need to create their own sales system and that is what she can help them with.

Emmerich is the founder of a youth scholarship program for underprivileged college freshmen, and a board member of Youth Horizon. She has also served as host mother to three high school foreign exchange students since 1998.

In announcing the award, Chancellor Ann Lydecker cited Brantley's dedication and excellence in serving UW-RF. "For 128 years, UW-River Falls has been a teaching institution. We take such great pride in that mission that our most prestigious award is to celebrate those faculty who excel at our most fundamental value.

"Our students and recent alumni tell us that Jenny Brantley is one of our very best faculty at giving meaning to their college experience. She serves as a role model to our students and to all of us on campus on how to give our best efforts so our students will succeed in their professional and personal lives after they leave here."

English Department Chair Marshall Toman added, " Professor Brantley's students and colleagues know her as someone who is supremely organized and tactful and whose door is always open, no matter what editorial or logistical crisis she is in the middle of solving. She is someone who is always genuinely interested in their lives and accomplishments."

Wrote another, "She is a wonderful teacher for many reasons. First, she teaches what she loves, and anyone can tell that by her lectures. Second, she inspired me to write, even when I was down about my writing. With her push and support, I have gained self-esteem on my writing and I love to write. Last, she is always there for her students."

In addition to teaching freshman English and sophomore literature, she teaches in her specialties of creative writing, women's studies, poetry, and in upper division literature courses such as Women in Literature, an area in which she is co-editing an anthology.

American Review" and "Living Forge." Her articles have been published extensively in numerous scholarly and popular magazines, and she is a productive contributor to books. Brantley has given dozens of readings throughout the Midwest.

Review," to UW-RF by serving as its editor, responsible for all editorial content and magazine publishing operations. Librarians across the world who are seeking analysis on literary journals for their stacks, and readers who want insightful commentary on the best writers, turn to the magazine for expert commentary.

Brantley is an active participant in many department, college and University committees, and a frequent presenter at conferences. She is a member of the planning committee to celebrate Women's History Month, women studies committee, the library exhibits and presentation committee, and serves on the Faculty Senate.

Said Brantley of the award, "I am both honored and humbled by this award. Our students at River Falls are truly remarkable, and I am so proud to be working with them. They are eager to learn, appreciative of the value of a college education, and filled with intellectual curiosity. I am also honored to be a part of this University community; I am surrounded by amazing and dedicated faculty and staff.

June Schubert has been selected to receive the 2003 UW-RF Chancellor's Award for Excellence for Academic Staff, in recognition of excellence in her work and dedication to the University community. Chancellor Ann Lydecker will present her with the award at a reception on Tuesday, April 22, beginning at 7 p.m. in the River Room of Rodli Commons For the past 21years, Schubert has served as recruitment coordinator and career advisor for the University's Career Services office. Her responsibilities include counseling students and alumni about career options and hiring trends, job search skills and application procedures, and preparation of resumes and cover letters.

She also co-ordinates on-campus recruiting and serves as a liaison between employers and the University community. She is responsible for recruiting some of the top-quality companies to give informational presentations and interview students for positions. Her participation on a number of professional association boards has provided valuable links to area employers.

Schubert said she was speechless when Chancellor Lydecker called her with the news. When she learned that 18 letters of recommendation had been written in support of her nomination, she said, "I am very honored to receive this award and very humbled by the praise of so many. It is most gratifying, yet an awesome feeling of responsibility, to know that I have had an impact on so many people in some way."

Schubert's supervisor Carmen Croonquist, Career Services director and career counselor, had the highest praise of all for Schubert, noting her exceptional talents and her commitment to high-caliber work.

Schubert's professional associates note the flawless job she does with the two annual events she supervises, the all-campus Career Fair and Student Teacher Professional Day, saying both are enormous undertakings that Schubert handled efficiently.

She received praise for her competency as a career advisor, having helped hundreds of students to locate great jobs with solid career paths and hundreds of employers to find talented employees to fill their workforce needs.

"June was gracious and attuned to the needs of our students, faculty and employer patrons," he said. "Her personality is warm and optimistic. I can think of no-one more deserving than June for this recognition."

"Good advising helps our students to select the right program; to choose the best courses to meet their interest areas while helping them to progress toward a degree; and that all-important assistance in lining up the right internships and then finding the right job after commencement."

Said another: "Terry has supported me through everything, from academic advice all the way to personal support. She is very caring, knowledgeable, and is nearly like a second mother to me. She'll help with everything. You can cry and laugh with her. She understands we all have personal lives. She is great at setting up internships because she knows many people."

A third added: "Terry is very accommodating for students who intend to graduate in four years. She makes sure students receive the necessary classes that fit their goals and major, but also allows them the opportunity to graduate on time."

As an adviser, Ferriss assists up to 45 students per year; serves as the internship coordinator for horticulture, coordinating up to 25 students each year; and she is the adviser to the Horticulture Society and Pi Alpha Xi. Ferriss also is an active mentor, assisting students in research projects, selecting and applying to graduate schools, pursuing scholarships and graduate teaching assistantships.

Ferriss has coached the UWRF Floral Evaluation Team for decades, leading the team to five national championships and capturing five honors as coach of the year. Each year the team is comprised of all new students.

In her twenty-two years at UW-River Falls, Ferriss has taught 14 different horticulture courses ranging from introduction to plant science and introduction to horticulture to upper division courses in greenhouse management and floriculture.

Ferriss said of the recognition, "I have the privilege to work with a fantastic group of students here at UW-RF. I thoroughly enjoy working with them, encouraging and facilitating them to become who and what they want to be. Often this includes providing opportunities and challenges to stretch them to their true potential and opening their eyes to all that the world has to offer.

"This award is a tremendous honor. It is a humbling experience. Shouldn't we all get awards for doing what we love to do? I am fortunate to work in an academic environment , where students come first and advising is recognized as an important part of the undergraduate experience."

A particular interest of Wolff's has been to allow performers flexibility and range of freedom at the actual time of performance, to devise notations to make this practicable, to foster among both professional and lay players a spirit of liberating interdependence, and to draw material from traditions of popular political music.

Sorenson's Geothermal Cactus Greenhouses; a New Mexico re-constructed wetlands; the New Mexico State University's arboretum, floriculture and turf research programs; and Aldershot's of New Mexico, a greenhouse production facility that ranks in the top 50 nationally for volume produced.

Twelve universities from some of the more progressive horticulture programs across the country participated in the competition, which was co-sponsored by the American Floral Endowment, an industry group; Pi Alpha Xi National, the national honor society for floriculture and ornamental horticulture; and the host university.

Students also had an opportunity to connect with the local culture and natural sights, including a local Spanish mariachi band, a tilapia fish farm, the White Sands National Monument, and the third highest golf course in the United States at Cloudcroft, at an elevation of 9,000 feet.

In addition, Ferris said, there is a cadre of loyal floral evaluation alumni who make contributions for the trip each year. "Even if the contribution is small, it really adds up. It makes a difference and it is appreciated," she said.

Thirty percent of all proceeds from the sale will go to the student chapter of Habitat for Humanity. Students will collect donations to the local River Falls Food Shelf as well. There will be an opportunity to meet the artists as well as members of Habitat for Humanity, as they work together on the event.

National Tourism Month will be celebrated by the hospitality and tourism industry in the St. Croix Valley with a golf tournament and a banquet--with a chance for golfers to win a $15,000 Victory motorcycle.

Golfers of all abilities are invited to compete for cash prizes at a day of golf followed by a silent auction, a barbequed chicken buffet dinner and a dessert auction at the Kilkarney Hills Golf Course in River Falls, Wis., on Monday, May 12.

During the tournament, golfers will have a hole-in-one challenge for an opportunity to win a Victory Standard Cruiser motorcycle valued at $15,000. The Cruiser is black and silver, and heavily accessorized, including backrest, saddlebags, a tank strap, accessory exhaust system and chrome center tips. It is provided by Polaris Industries of Osceola.

Non-golfers are invited to the evening Tourism Month banquet, which marks its eighth year as an Alliance annual event. The fee for dinner only is $25 per person. The banquet includes a silent auction and social time are scheduled for 5 to 6:30. Dinner will be served at 6:30, and a dessert auction will follow.

Twenty-two students from UW-River Falls spent March 13-23 in Belize as part of the Belize International Study Tour, a three-credit course to increase students' appreciation of the value of conserving cultural and biological diversity. The course included weekly class meetings throughout spring semester and 10 days in Belize over spring break.

"Our students found Belizeans open, gracious, and fun, and they responded in kind," Robins said. "Students visited a village school, joined in basketball and soccer games, and were invited to homes, all unplanned and unorchestrated.

Lindsey Becker, a senior from Appleton majoring in biology, said, "I learned about the vegetation in Belize and the medicinal importance of certain plants in the rainforest. I'm also a deaf student, so I really got an inside feel for the Belizean and Guatemalan views of people with disabilities."

Parents looking for a way to channel their child's cabin fever into creative movement and self-expression can register for creative movement classes for ages 3 to 6 offered by the UW-River Falls Outreach and Graduate Studies Office.

Creative movement classes are growing in popularity across the country because of their emphasis on increasing body, movement and spatial awareness, says instructor Susan Sell. Children can also benefit through improved muscle development and coordination, increased self-control and self-esteem, and imaginative interactions with others. Any child with an interest in physical activity, including dance or sports, would be a likely participant.

"The classes are designed to encourage children to express themselves and their ideas by exploring new ways of movement and refining their existing abilities," says Sell. "We'll use colorful props, imagery and music to encourage and stimulate the child's imagination."

UW-RF physics professors Glenn Spiczak and James Madsen, running simulations of research projects at the polar icecap. Madsen, who has traveled to the South Pole as a scientist with the AMANDA project, offers annual UW-RF workshops on "Astronomy in the Ice" for science teachers. Three of those teachers have also visited the South Pole through funds from the National Science Foundation. Meyer served as a teaching assistant in last summer's workshop.

Getting to the South Pole is much less likely than playing professional basketball, says Madsen. "There are probably less than 50 institutions in the world that have the opportunity to participate in South Pole research. UW-RF is one of the only undergraduate institutions that has the chance to send students. It is hard to over-emphasize how unique Jackie's experience was."

The AMANDA project studies the mysterious neutrino, a ubiquitous particle that travels unhindered through the universe, in hopes of learning more about the universe. Sometimes the neutrino, an uncharged particle, hits an ice molecule, creating an electrically charged particle called a muon that can be detected through the telescope. Scientists hope that studying the neutrino-a particle that is almost nothing-will reveal everything about the universe.

A seemingly simple science problem can be magnified because of the climate and terrain of the South Pole. "I helped with the effort to reduce static electricity, which is a huge issue at the pole because the air is extremely dry and there is no way to ground because the actual ground is beneath two miles of ice," says Meyer, who graduates from UW-RF in spring 2004.

They worked to create optically clear ice so that the detectors can better "see" the cosmic rays from outer space. "I helped her put the experiment together which was quite fun and allowed me to use my creativity in the design process," said Meyer. "This experiment is key to developing a freezing process from the Icetop detector, which involves a network of large tanks with optical modules frozen in place. The ice needs to be optically clear to allow the detector to trace the particle's path back to origin in the sky."

Curiosity definitely fuels Meyers, who plans to attend graduate school in plasma and fusion physics. "My interest in physics stems from an overall desire to know why and how things happen," Meyer says. " I want to learn everything I can, which is what brought about my interest in the South Pole. From that interest I was given a research topic that allowed me to go this year."

After being selected to visit the South Pole, Meyer applied for funding from the McNair Scholarship Program, named for astronaut and Challenger space shuttle astronaut Ronald McNair. The program, established in 1989 by the Department of Education, is designed for undergraduates who are first-generation and low-income college students.

Meyer said her experience was amazing. "My time at the pole literally felt like two days or so," says Meyer. "Since the sun never sets, you can't tell that time is passing without looking at the clock. Life was surreal and very hard to describe."

Moreover, Meyer enjoyed working with people from around the world. "I got to experience many different cultures," she said. " I had a great time jamming in Skylab, [a multi-story tower with a recreation room with a great view of the surrounding landscape] which has many different musical instruments for people to use. I met great people and relieved a lot of stress there."

I stayed in a pretty good mood because of it. Some of the best days are when freshies [fresh produce from New Zealand] arrive. My best memory is the night at midrats [midnight meal] when we got a mango smoothie from freshies. It was heaven."

The University of Wisconsin-River Falls speech team took the 3rd place finish at the tournament at UW-Whitewater in February, with one member taking home an individual state championship. Last year the team ranked 4th, making this year's ranking the best the team has done in recent years.

Marci Brenner, a junior English education major from Durand, Wis., won the individual state championship in dramatic interpretation and earned second place in prose interpretation. This marks her third statewide championship including her first state championship while in sixth grade and a second while in high school. Brenner is now qualified for three events at the National AFA Tournament at the University of Mississippi in April.

Renee Schott, a sophomore animal science major from Greenleaf, Wis., participated in four final rounds. She took fourth place in dramatic interpretation, fifth in poetry and sixth place in communication analysis and informative speaking.

Sarah McRoberts, a junior English education major from Valley City, N. D., also participated in four final rounds. She has followed in her parent's legacy, as they also competed on the speech team while students at UW-River Falls. McRoberts placed fifth in three categories: dramatic interpretation, impromptu speaking and program oral interpretation, and placed sixth in oratory. She attended the Novice National Tournament at Cameron University in Lawton, Okla., March 1 and placed second in sales impromptu, fourth in persuasion and seventh in prose.

The workshop is the first of its kind to be offered in Wisconsin and Minnesota and is sponsored by the National Trust for Historic Preservation and the National Endowment for the Arts. The NTHP and NEA have held such workshops since 1992, and each year sponsors five across the country.

In some cases, the main concerns are heavy out-migration and loss of employment opportunities; in others, rapid growth from suburban sprawl and the location of new facilities are on the agenda. These problems affect the vitality of the community, its design, and its sense of place.

The workshop addresses these issues of community integrity and character through the process of design in a two-day participatory workshop. Keynote speaker is Daniel Marckel, University of Minnesota Design Center for American Urban Landscape.

"Since class sizes are typically smaller during summer session, students can receive more personal attention from their instructors," Zaborowski said. Summer session can be an optimal time for students to re-take a required course or get a tough course out of the way, he added.

The event consists of teams of up to 15 people representing River Falls companies, organizations, churches, neighborhoods and families who spend 16 hours together in an overnight effort to raise money to fight cancer.

The objective is to have at least one member of each team walking the indoor track for the entire event. Highlights of the event include the Survivor's Lap and Luminaria Ceremony. During the Survivor's Lap, which begins at 6 p.m. on April 4, all cancer survivors are invited to join the ceremonial first lap around the track as they are cheered on by the crowd.

The Luminaria Ceremony is set for 10 p.m. April 4 and pays tribute to those whose lives have been affected by cancer. During the event, people may purchase a luminaria in memory or in honor of someone who has been touched by cancer.

Guest choreographer Maria Gen? will present "Between Earth and Sky," inspired by the art and stories of indigenous people and accompanied by the music and poetry of the Algonquian Indians. Gen? is a professional choreographer, performer and teacher whose works have been performed at the Ordway Music Theater, Walker Art Center, and Southern Theatre. She is also artistic director of the Kairos Dance Hall Theater and the Youth Dance Company in the Twin Cities.

A traditional Korean Shaman dance by Brooke Jee In Newmaster, an instructor for the Chang Mi Korean Dancers, will also be featured in the concert. Newmaster has studied traditional dance in Korea and is a recipient of two Minnesota Arts Board folk art grants.

Faculty members Karla Zhe, Susan Sell and Torrion Amie will showcase diverse styles of choreography including hip-hop and abstract modern. Dance theater alumna Kimberly Johnson and University of Minnesota dance major Mari Kline will performance inventive and technically demanding pieces.

Ticket prices are $5 for students and children, and $7 for adults. University students can receive $1 off regular price of a ticket fi they attend the special Student Night performance on Wednesday, April 2.

David Hammer has been named the new dean of the College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences, starting January 2004. He will also hold a tenured professor appointment in the department of Plant and Earth Science. Interim Dean Stephen Ridley will continue to serve in the position throughout 2003.

In accepting the appointment, Hammer said that he had come to the interview with high opinion of the university and its faculty, staff and students. "My expectations were exceeded, and the position of Dean of CAFES was all I had hoped it would be," Hammer said. "I am delighted to accept the challenges and opportunities associated with the college, the university and the region it serves."

Hammer cited the outstanding national reputation UW-River Falls enjoys as a teaching institution, the commitment of the state to education, and the excitement of working to create a sustainable approach to living in the urban-rural interface as reasons for accepting the challenge the CAFES dean position.

Hammer was the unanimous choice of the members of the UWRF search committee for his understanding of integrated production agriculture, commitment to the undergraduate educational process, and the ability to articulate a clear vision for the college.

Kelm was nominated because of his teaching effectiveness, said Dennis Cooper, fellow animal science professor and nominator for the award. "Dr. Kelm has excellent rapport with students and works extremely hard at his teaching," said Cooper.

"Steve Kelm is a skillful and dedicated teacher," said Stephen Ridley, interim dean of the College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences. "Steve selected UW-River Falls as his professional career choice because of this institution's dedication to teaching and learning through students faculty interaction. We are fortunate to have faculty members like Steve who will continue to serve our students well. I wish to congratulate Dr. Kelm on receiving this outstanding award."

WAPEGAC's highest award went for coverage of the UW-RF versus UW-Oshkosh football game, directed and produced by Rick Vogel, Focus on U advisor and assistant professor of mass communication in the speech and theater department. The broadcast of a sporting event was a new venture for the students, says Vogel.

"All of the students did an exceptional job on all positions that made the production a success," says Vogel. "To watch my students use skills that they had learned in the classroom and use them in a brand new situation made me quite proud."

The achievement award went for a program that discussed the persuasive tactics, the psychological impact upon children and the First Amendment rights of abortion protesters who came to campus last fall. Garett Gilbertson, a speech communications major from Stacey, Minn., was director. The show was produced by Vogel, Megan Clarke, a broadcast journalism major from Mitchell, S.D., and Jennifer Kern, a speech communications major from Hurley. Ben Friesen, a speech communication major from Lino Lakes, Minn., was technical director for both programs.

"Focus on U" is the longest-running television program at UW-River Falls and on River Falls community cable. In its 13th season, the news program focuses on news and issues of interest to the campus and community. It can be seen live on Thursdays on cable channel 19, serving communities in western Wisconsin.

Plant and Earth Science Professor Robert Baker presented a session on using humor to engage students in large, introductory-level geology classes. Baker said his tried-and-true methods for keeping attention include top-ten lists, Jeopardy-type reviews, and humorous quotations and questions. Although there is no scientific evidence showing that humor helps students learn better, Baker finds that teaching in a large class is more fun when the students are engaged.

Plant and Earth Science Professor William Cordua assisted Jeffrey Bruesewitz, a junior geology major from Wauwatosa, in presenting research in Precambrian geology. Bruesewitz studied Cary Mound granite to determine if a small pluton located south of Marshfield, in Wood County, is the remains of an early Proterozoic collapsed caldera. These structures are rarely preserved in rocks the age of the granite, but Bruesewitz found the rock did contain them.

Considered an interpreter of songs more than a composer, Winston said his purpose with each recording is to include the most appropriate instrumental pieces. His latest recording, "Night Divides the Day: The Music of The Doors," re-ignites the flames and energy of the 1960s and 1970s rock phenomenon, The Doors. Winston will recreate the unique musical style and sound of each band member while incorporating his own style and inspirations.

"They experience mathematical problem solving in a real-world setting, Tomlinson said. "The principles of teamwork, finding resources and communicating results are as central to the solution as the problem-solving itself. The honorable mention designation is a wonderful extra to the already impressive accomplishment our teams achieved by participating in the contest."

Every February, COMAP sponsors the contest in mathematical modeling. Students spend a weekend researching a problem in mathematical modeling, proposing an approach to a solution, using computer resources for their work, and carefully describing their solution. Teamwork, Internet and library research, computer resources and writing skills are central to the problem-solving process, Tomlinson said.

Both teams chose a problem from film-making in stunt coordination. The case consisted of a stunt person on a motorcycle who was to jump over an elephant and land in a pile of cardboard boxes to cushion the fall. The problem is to determine what boxes to use, how many to use, and how to stack them. Their solution must protect the stunt person from injury, and also use relatively few boxes to keep them hidden from the camera and control costs.

Students, under the mentorship of faculty, presented a variety of research at the conference. Faculty mentors who attended the conference included Karen Klyczek, Tim Lyden, Kim Mogen and John Wheeler of the biology department, Lisa Isenberg of the psychology department, and William Campbell, director of grants and research.

Research, Scholarly and Creative Activity (SURSCA), that is open to students in any discipline. "We have been a motivated force on campus since last year," says Tim Lyden, biology professor and SURSCA advisor. "The students who attended last year's conference wanted to help other students go to the conference this year, and organizing a group helped them accomplish that goal."

A student-organized group dedicated to the support of research and scholarly and creative activity (RSCA) is somewhat unusual, says Lyden, who was asked to present information about SURSCA at a new session at the conference dedicated to starting such groups. "It appears that student-organized research groups are a new wave at many institutions," he said.

Lyden hopes that next year the conference will include a peer-reviewed component where students evaluate each other's research, just like the real world where research is evaluated on professional and scholarly merit. "It would be a student-driven activity, with a real exposure to peer review with students both experiencing it and doing it," says Lyden.

SURSCA plans to attend next year's NCUR conference in Indianapolis. Other goals include starting a Web-based student peer-reviewed journal that will be a forum for student-reviewed research on campus. In addition, the group is in the process of fundraising and hopes to set up a peer-reviewed grant program so that students can submit formal applications for research funding.

Lyden says that the group's activities help students get better internships, make contact with graduate schools, and get a head start into careers as scholars and researchers. "There's a direct correlation between the kinds of activities we are trying to foster and the future direction of student careers," he says.

Some of the students who attended and presented research at the conference are participants in the Ronald E. McNair Post-baccalaureate Achievement Program, a federally funded initiative designed to help students who are first-generation college students or from low-income backgrounds prepare for and enter graduate school to earn advanced degrees.

Instructor Dee McCollum is the director of field experiences in the College of Education and Professional Studies at UW-River Falls. The Wisconsin Department of Public Instruction will pay course tuition for educators who agree to supervise student teachers.

"Adults love the opportunity to learn in the comfort of their own homes," says Judy Cooper, developer of the video courses. "A well-produced course on video can reinforce and extend tradition classroom information."

Participants in the video course, "Student Groups: High Performance Learning," will learn strategies to create highly functioning student learning groups in their classrooms. Participants will also learn how research supports learning groups, the varieties and purposes of groups and how to create and evaluate them, and the use of groups to increase mastery of other academic areas.

In "Increasing Student Self-Esteem," Cooper will demonstrate the best strategies to raise student self-esteem and to create and maintain a classroom environment where students are highly motivated and work to their potential. Participants will learn how to recognize the causes of low self-esteem, use activities to build self-esteem and motivation, examine expectations for students, and recognize behavior problems.

In her 40 years as a professional educator, Cooper has taught all levels and has administrative experience as a special education director, elementary and junior high principal, high school assistant principal, and assistant superintendent.

Educators and parents interested in learning K-12 classroom management techniques may register for a one-credit course offered by the University of Wisconsin-River Falls Outreach and Graduate Studies.

Instructor John Brickner is a certified counselor who has worked with adolescents for more than 15 years in the classroom "One of the biggest challenges facing new and old teachers alike is classroom management," says Brickner. "The format of the class is very relaxed with a great deal of interaction as we learn some very practical and useful classroom management techniques."

Highlighting the day-long conference will be a luncheon address by Kevin Shibilski, the newly appointed Secretary to the Wisconsin Department of Tourism, and John Edman, the Director of the Minnesota Office of Tourism.

With an academic background in organizational communication leadership and management, Allen is a speaker and consultant to groups ranging from several Midwest rural development conferences to the IRS and the National Safety Council.

Conference participants can choose two of four morning sessions: o "Packaging for Business" highlights ways to develop packages to attract visitors. Presenter is Linda John, executive director of the Chippewa Valley Convention and Visitors Bureau. o "How to Work with State Tourism Departments" will help participants maximize opportunities for programs available through these agencies. Presenters are Ruth Goetz, northern coordinator for the Wisconsin Department of Tourism, and Jan Sawinski, metropolitan tourism coordinator for the Minnesota Office of Tourism.

Wisconsin Indianhead Technical College-New Richmond. o "Exploring the St. Croix Valley" is a panel presentation highlighting outdoor learning adventures including birding, canoeing, boating and fishing in the area.

During a working lunch, Mark Kinders, president of the SCVRTA, will discuss trends and challenges to economic development and tourism in the bi-state river region, which is home to the St. Croix National Scenic Riverway and six state parks within minutes of St. Paul/Minneapolis.

Mallman, who is a resident of Marine-on-St. Croix, Minn., redirected his career to begin working with state and federal agencies to promote sustainable funding for wildlife conservation. He has been a strong supporter of Teaming With Wildlife (now CARA). The proposed national legislation has galvanized the largest coalition of government, business, and wildlife conservation groups. In 1996 he received the President's Award from the International Association of Fish and Wildlife Agencies for his work as a national spokesperson.

Coates' specialty includes trends, demographics and generational learning and behavior. She is author of the forthcoming book, "Generational Learning Styles" and specializes in developing communication tailored specifically to various age groups' perspectives and preferences. She has been involved with lifelong learning programs for 30 years and worked primarily with rural communities while on the faculty of Kansas State University.

Honorees include authors, editors, scholars, poets, visual and performing artists, recording artists and musicians. Art work, papers, books, journal articles, videotapes and other materials created by the honorees will be on display. In addition, a publication recognizing the achievements of all contributors will be produced.

All are invited to join faculty and staff in celebrating the work that occurs outside the classrooms and enriches the campus community. A musical trio will provide entertainment. The displays and reception are sponsored by the Chalmer Davee Library Exhibits and Presentations Committee and by the Office of the Provost and Office of Grants and Research at UW-RF.

Clinton says that winning this award will help her in future career plans as a costume designer. During the summer, she has worked as the dye assistant at the Sante Fe Opera in New Mexico. In her fourth year at UW-RF, Clinton is a costume assistant to theater Professor Robin Murray in the UW-RF costume shop.

After graduating from high school in River Falls, Clinton's career path took her from the Aveda Institute in Minneapolis for cosmetology back to her hometown in Wisconsin to pursue a degree in theater.

"I figured UW-River Falls was a supportive school to go to, because of my relationship with Robin," Clinton said. "It also enabled me to see my mom and my brother who also live in River Falls. I also appreciated that River Falls is a small school that's inexpensive, where I could take advantage of a variety of exchange programs."

"In fact, while we were at the regional festival, there were over 1,300 college students and professors from a five-state region who potentially had never even heard of us until they saw her work," Murray said.

The announcement strengthens the sister institution agreement between the two universities that was established in 1999, which includes a business administration degree articulation agreement with the UW-RF College of Business and Economics as well as language teacher exchanges.

"The College of Business and Economics took the lead in establishing this relationship with your university and it will only grow," said UW-RF Chancellor Ann Lydecker at a reception for the group. "We are excited at the prospect of more of our faculty, staff and students visiting your campus and more faculty, staff and students coming here."

"I am pleased to meet so many faculty and students and I offer my gratitude for you to run such a wonderful program for us on this cold day," said Mu as he addressed the reception group. "Our goals to further enhance our academic exchange programs will be successful."

Once a community college focused on training journalists, Shih Hsin University has evolved into a comprehensive liberal arts university offering a full range of media studies. About half of its 10,000 students are enrolled in media studies, including journalism, mass communication, marketing communication, public relations, advertising and graphic/visual communication.

"The students get a firsthand view of American culture, which makes it much easier for them in their future business life to interact with American business," says Glenn Potts, theUW-RF economics professor who was instrumental in securing the 1999 sister agreement and the business administration degree articulation.

March 13 in the President's Room of the Hagestad Student Center on campus. Each class will continue on Tuesday or Thursday respectively for an additional three weeks and consist of a presentation, a coffee break and a discussion.

Richards returned to UW-RF to finish her bachelor of fine arts degree in paper and fiber. Her work is an exploration of non-traditional materials, including hand-made paper and fiber, that is cast and woven into dimensional vessels.

"When I was a student at UW-RF in the early 1980s, it was difficult for me to have something to say in my work; it was a time of learning the processes," says Richards. "Personal life experiences, and an interested in the archetypal psychological patterns behind myth have given me a voice for my work that now comes easily." Her work has been included in exhibitions at the Smithsonian and Philadelphia Museum as well as SOFA in Chicago and New York. Several galleries through the United States currently represent her work as well.

Paige, who calls Natchitoches, La., his home, is a painting and drawing major with a focus in anthropology. With an interest in studying and recording everyday events and issues in people who live in multicultural societies, Paige's paintings reflect the search for meaning in the changing culture found in the inner-city of Los Angeles. Paige's work can also be seen at his Web site at www.pressenter.com/~paigeart.

As dean, Foster oversees the academic departments of teacher education, health and human performance, communicative disorders, counseling and school psychology and the social work program. Other duties include administration of student teaching and internships, the Educational Technology Center, the Upward Bound program, the Child Center, University Preschool, the Human Development Center and athletic programs.

"Obviously I'm very excited to serve as the dean and look forward to the opportunity," says Foster. "The college has many strong programs and excellent faculty and staff and is in a very solid position to continue to grow and expand its programs.

As interim dean, Foster fortified the admissions policy in the elementary education program as well as worked with the University's College of Arts and Sciences and area public schools in securing a "No Child Left Behind" grant.

Foster has a distinguished academic career at UW-RF. She served as chair of the department of health and human performance as well as athletic director from 1996 to 2002. She served as women's athletic director from 1992 to 1996 and was named full professor in the department of health and human performance in 1992. While under her tenure, women's athletics received the Wisconsin Women's Intercollegiate Athletic Conference All-Academic Award for having the highest grade point average in the conference.

UW-RF Chancellor Ann Lydecker praised Foster for her legacy of leadership at UW-RF. "Connie is a highly energized person who welcomes the challenges and opportunities to ensuring the College is the best it can be," says Lydecker.

"She has a vision and a path for achieving excellence that set her apart from the other candidates. She is an excellent fit for the College, and I know that she is held in high regard by the faculty, staff and students in the College and across the University. Their confidence in her will assist her greatly as the College continues to move forward."

A dedicated educator, Foster is enthusiastic about getting others hooked on teaching as well. "I'd like to bring in more high school students to come to campus in the summer to explore careers as future teachers, particularly students from diverse backgrounds," says Foster. "Our students, faculty and staff are highly important and I believe strongly in professional development as well as opportunities for our students to develop professionally as well."

"Bondagers," by contemporary Scottish playwright Sue Glover, portrays the lives of 19th century women who worked on the great estates located in the Borders Region of Scotland. Despite being on the lowest rungs of the socio-economic ladder, these women fashioned culturally rich communities.

According to UW-RF Dean of Students Roger Ballou, the focus of this year's conference is methods for improving communication among college students, particularly around the issue of sex. "It has been shown time and again that poor communication can play a role in dangerous and/or unwanted sexual activity," said Ballou.

The ensemble will feature Capoeira artists, dancers, percussionists, and Afro-Brazilian folkloric traditions. The ensemble uses rhythms and movements created by descendents of Africans in Salvador, Bahia, and Brazil. At the end of the performance, the audience is invited to participate in dancing and playing percussion instruments.

The theme of the tour is "Conservation of Biological and Cultural Diversity," according to Ed Robins, tour leader from the department of sociology, anthropology and criminal justice. The tour will feature many activities, such as examining tropical rainforest and river ecology and exploring ancient sites of early civilization such as the Mayan culture, he said.

The goal of the tour is to increase appreciation of the importance of the conservation of diversity. Wildlife outnumbers people in this country where 65 percent of the forest remains and where the second largest barrier reef in the world is just off shore.

Students registered by attending an orientation meeting in the fall, followed by weekly seminars continuing through spring semester. The tour is open to all students with a minimum GPA of 2.0 . Students can receive credit for participating in the program. Admission to the program is based on an essay, letter of reference from a faculty member, and the student's state of health and fitness. For more information, contact the International Programs Office at 715-425-4891.

University. The Office of Domestic Preparedness is co-hosting the event with the DOJ, and will be attended by directors and chiefs of safety from colleges and universities. Stevens was invited to represent 275 higher education institutions in the Midwest.

Stevens attended an earlier meeting in June that focused on the topic of how best to communicate vital information to campuses. From that meeting, the December conference was recommended by Louis Quijas, FBI assistant director. Only a few directors and chiefs of campuses participateD in the December meeting, which will focus on building strategies to provide a safe environment at college campuses.

United States with only 30,000 campus law enforcement officers and security professionals who serve students, faculty, staff, and visitors. The conference will also cover current challenges such as: high value targets, cyber crimes, infrastructure, and problems of intelligence sharing with the FBI and student tracking systems.

Award. Harsdorf, a Beldenville dairy farmer, is being recognized for providing students internships opportunities, serving on the the College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences and the College Advisory Council, and advocating for UW-RF in Madison both as a state legislator and as Agriculture Secretary.

Participants who successfully complete the tutor-training course may register for field experience tutoring non-English speaking workers employed in local businesses. Fees for the class and field experience vary according to the residency of the participant, the selected class location, and the selected credit option.

UW-RF associate music Professor David Milne, an accomplished saxophone player, has the honor of leading the exciting, innovative, and creative jazz saxophone quartet. The concert will feature original works by members of the Quartet and jazz arrangements of holiday tunes.

"Jim Harsdorf has been integral to this University. For the past two decades he has served this region and the University as a state legislator, as a community member, as a dairy farmer and as our Wisconsin Secretary responsible for agriculture.

"He has always provided us with sound advice, shared his insightful counsel on our curriculum and building projects, loaned his profound expertise in agriculture and has been an advocate for us for many years.

"But just as important to us is his enthusiasm at being a teacher and mentor to our students. Jim has been an advisor to our many students who have interned in his dairy operation. And he has been a continuing visitor to campus. Despite all of his significant obligations, he has always joyfully accepted our invitations to lecture to students in a classroom, or to attend advisory meetings to the College. The pleasure he finds in working with young people is always apparent when you see him taking the time to share advice with an inquisitive student.

"He encourages Board members to think holistically about Wisconsin agriculture and the College's role in regional economic development. His frequent suggestions and questions contribute meaning to our college planning processes. He has been a champion for the College, the University and the community for years."

Secretary Harsdorf was previously honored by the College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences. In 2001, the College recognized his contributions to Wisconsin's agriculture industry with its Distinguished Agriculturalist award.

Nominators from UW-RF noted that Yang is deeply committed to service and to the advancement of Hmong women. She maintains a high level of academic achievement and currently serves as a member of Asian American Student Association, the Diversity Issues Committee of the Student Senate, African American Alliance, the Native American Council, and the Art Society.

Yang has distinguished herself on campus by participating in a variety of activities including diversity panels and focus groups, presenting cultural programs to elementary school children through the UW-RF Community Action Theatre Troupe, and coordinating numerous events for UW-RF's annual Unity in the Community celebration.

She also volunteers at the St. Paul Boys and Girls Club of Mt. Airy as a mentor, advisor, program assistant, leader, and a role model for other teens, as well as volunteering at the Turning Point Shelter for Abused Women.

The nominated added that Yang is dedicated to contributing academically and publicly to family and community issues, including those relevant to Hmong women, educational attainment for marginalized youth, and the promotion of cultural awareness.

"I don't feel that what I have done deserves such a grand honor because I gained so much from those experiences," said Yang. "Getting the an award for it is like extra icing on the cake, which is even better than what I have hoped for."

The Women of Color award was initiated in 1994 to acknowledge the ties and shared concerns among administrators, faculty, staff and students within women's studies and ethnic studies, and to uphold a continuing commitment to the pursuit off educational quality through racial and ethnic diversity.

Each year, one woman of color is selected from each campus in the UW System to be honored for her contributions. The selected individual may be a faculty or staff member, a student, or a member of the community.

The ensembles will perform works by Tchaikovsky, William Byrd, John Rutter and Randall Thompson. An audience sing-along of familiar seasonal carols will also be part of this event. All performances will take place in the William Abbott Concert Hall of the Kleinpell Fine Arts Building.

Professor Jerry Nechville of agricultural engineering and Professor Nate Splett of agricultural economics credited Butler with revising courses to ensure they maintained their relevancy in changing areas such as the environmental sciences and food technology. Among the courses Butler addressed were irrigation and drainage, waste management, and food engineering. He also developed new courses, including environmental engineering, machine design and advanced food and process engineering.

For the past 12 years, he has served as department chair years and has successfully recruited young engineers to fill vacant positions. Butler has worked collaborated with the faculty at UW-Madison to ensure technology graduates could enter such professional engineering graduate programs as biosystems engineering. Butler works extremely well with colleagues and strives for the best in students and faculty, Splett and Nechville said.

Butler actively pursues grants, conducts research and publishes his results, according to Nechville and Splett. Butler has been successful in receiving project grants of more than $250,000 in such areas as experimental learning, organic recycling and composting, manure management, and energy conservation in milk cooling systems.

As a teacher, Butler sets high standards for his students and in doing so provides them with an excellent foundation to enter the work force. The greatest testimony to his excellence in teaching comes from his former students. Graduates, majors and non-majors alike, have repeatedly indicated that the education, which they received in Butler's classes, was critical in their initial employment and future career successes.

According to Nechville and Splett, Butler quietly ponders the vision of the college; he enjoys a unique ability to assess the resources and constraints of programs, students and faculty, and infrastructure. He succinctly articulates a clear understanding of this for the college, while graciously considering and respecting his colleagues' positions as he thinks to the future of CAFES.

The UW-River Falls College of Education and Professional Studies is offering a new three-credit class beginning in January to inform educators and others about autism spectrum disorders in the classroom.

They will be prepared to be active and informed team members and advocates for these students. Also, they will learn effective strategies to enhance communication, socialization, and learning when teaching these children.

The course, Introduction to Autism Spectrum Disorders, is designed for educators, including teachers, special educators, speech/language pathologists, school counselors and school psychologists. The classes will be held on the UW-River Falls campus, Thursday evenings from 5-8 p.m. beginning Jan. 9.

Bremer Foundation. WHC supports public programs that engage the people of Wisconsin in the exploration of human cultures, ideas and values. Foner is also supported by the College of Education and Professional Studies and the College of Arts and Sciences at UW-RF.

Foner is one of this country's most prominent historians. He received his doctoral degree at Columbia under the supervision of Richard Hofstadter. During the 1990s, he served as president of both the Organization of American Historians and the American Historical Association.

Through summer institutes, professional development workshops, and activities in their own classroom, teachers from Wisconsin and Minnesota have received extensive background knowledge on the evolving topic of American identity. They are also equipped with skills for doing authentic intellectual work in history, humanities, social science, and the arts, skills they have then translated into lessons for their own students.

During his visit, Foner will help teachers do historical detective work as they search for the roots of American identity through the examination and interpretation of primary documents such as Thomas Paine's radical 18th century pamphlet "Common Sense." After he leaves Wisconsin, Foner will continue to engage teachers during an on-line conversation.

The College of Business and Economics at UW-River Falls is offering an international study tour in Uganda, Africa, July 12 to 28 with the theme, "Africa and Globalization in the Age of Information Technology." Students will have the opportunity to earn three credits, and members of the community are invited to participate as tourists.

The program will introduce students to a new culture, with a different business environment and political and administrative structures. It will focus on global issues that include information technology, trade and investment, education, agriculture and food security, health care, and gender and environmental issues.

Uganda, located in eastern Africa, is a democratic nation slightly smaller than the state of Oregon with a population of 24 million. Though landlocked, one-third of the tropical country is covered in water; rivers and lakes dominate the landscape, including the source of the River Nile and Lake Victoria.

Agriculture is the backbone of Uganda, and parts of the country have changed very little in the past 100 years. An international leader in religious tolerance, Uganda has made significant progress toward peace and stability in the last 50 years. The country is famous for its national parks and wildlife, which includes mountain gorillas and chimpanzees.

"This is really a great opportunity for our students to tour a part of the world that has not been addressed by the existing study abroad programs and tours here at UW-RF," said economics Professor Pascal Ngoboka. "This study tour will provide our students a unique opportunity to increase their knowledge, awareness and experience of global issues, focusing on an African country."

The total estimated cost of the tour is $3,150. The cost includes round-trip airfare, meeting and assistance upon arrival, single-room lodging, all meals, all local transportation, and entrance fees for parks and attractions.

After graduation, she plans to secure an internship in arts and administration with a theatre or music company. Most likely, she will work in St. Paul or Minneapolis, Minn., to get some good experience. She is currently singing with the St. Paul Cathedral Choir, and will probably audition for the Minnesota Opera in the spring.

"I hope to learn how to book shows, handle publicity and get famous artists to come in," she said. "At the same time, I will sing professionally whenever possible with operas or church choirs. Eventually, I will probably move to New York City."

"As student interest in financial planning as a career continues to grow, we anticipate that the UW-River Falls program will contribute significantly to the number of qualified candidates seeking to sit for our CFP certification examination," she said.

College of Business and Economics Dean Barbara Nemecek noted, "The College is particularly proud to be offering this new program. It exemplifies the College's mission to offer programs that will meet the continuing business education needs of the people in our region, and it is the first CFP program to be offered in this region of the state. We intend for this program to be the beginning point for future business continuing education program offerings."

Besides preparing individuals for CFP certification, the program provides practical training for anyone currently employed in a variety of financial, legal and administrative professions. The courses may also meet continuing education requirements.

CFP board compares the program with the financial planning-related topics identified in extensive job-task analysis studies undertaken by the board in 1987, 1994 and 1999. These job-task analyses found that individuals should demonstrate mastery of those topics before they can be considered qualified to provide competent, professional financial planning services.

The topics to be mastered can be categorized into the following broad subject areas: financial planning process; general principles; risk management and insurance strategies; investment theory and strategies; investment vehicles; tax computations; tax planning strategies; employee benefits; government plans; retirement planning strategies; estate planning strategies; and the CFP board's code of ethics and professional responsibility.

UW-River Falls students will display their creative activities and research projects on topics ranging from biotechnology and psychology to dance and physics at an event on Monday, Nov. 18, from 6:30 to 8:30 in the River Room of Rodli Commons. The public is invited, admission is free, and refreshments will be served.

"The event is sponsored by the Society for Undergraduate Research, Scholarly and Creative Activities, a campus-wide student organization that exists to enhance a research culture on campus," said biology Professor Tim Lyden, who serves as faculty advisor for the group. "Visitors will have the opportunity to view presentations, talk with the authors and artists who created the projects, and listen to readings."

UW-River Falls was one of 27 Wisconsin colleges and universities to sign a charter as a founding member of the Wisconsin Campus Compact, an association of college and university presidents. Its mission is to promote service that develops students' citizenship skills and values, encourages campus-community partnerships, and assists faculty members who seek to integrate public and community engagement into their teaching and research.

As one of 28 state Campus Coalitions, WisCC will be connected to a growing network of more than 750 colleges and universities committed to providing leadership and support for service learning and community service on member campuses. The activities the coalition generates will benefit both the students and the larger community and ensure a well-educated citizenry.

Said Chancellor Ann Lydecker, "There are a number of compelling reasons for the University to pursue the goals of the Campus Compact. The Compact will strengthen the bond between the University and the community; provide practical, community-based experience for students; and reinforce the University's importance to students, to communities, and to the state as a whole."

Lydecker said that as a member of WisCC, UW-RF will serve as an ambassador for higher education, communicating regularly with legislators, corporations, foundations, community-based organizations and the media. It will gain from assistance in the retention of students, multicultural education, community relations and workforce development.

WisCC will provide professional development and technical assistance services such as workshops for faculty and resource lists. It will attract funds for the University to initiate or enhance community service projects, integrate service into the curriculum or make particular service projects possible, and build partnerships between institutions of higher education and other sectors.

Cooper said he and Cosgrove addressed the topics of forage production for dairy cattle and the feeding of dairy cattle at the seminar. They discussed methods to improve productivity, including management-intensive rotational grazing, and dairy genetics.

"Exposure to agriculture in another part of the world adds to our professional knowledge, and in turn internationalizes the curriculum for our students," said Cooper. "It gives students a global perspective and opens them up to the possibility that in time they may work to help alleviate hunger and disease in the world."

The pair said that Romania is somewhat larger than Wisconsin, with a climate and latitude similar to the Great Plains in the United States. It is a beautiful country, with mountains, rolling plains and lowlands. The Danube River runs along the Southern boundary of Romania on its way to the Black Sea.

It is a land of contrasts, as well, where large, mechanized farming operations that would rival anything in the United States exist side-by-side with peasant families who farm their land with a one-horse plow.

Concerning the dairy industry in Romania, Cooper said about a third of the milk is sold privately by people with herds of one to three cows. The milk they sell is not pasteurized, which is a public health concern. There is also a shortage of milk, and there is a great demand in the cities for milk to give to the children.

"That's not the only problem," said Cooper. "While Romania was a Communist country, dairy herds were kept on collective farms. In 1989, after the revolution, the workers each took home some dairy cows, milked them for awhile, and then ate them. The dairy herds were lost in this way."

"For the big farms, which were formerly the collective farms, the problem is that they lack the infrastructure they need for farming; silos, tractors and other farm equipment," he said. "They will need a different kind of assistance than the small farms."

"Those with smaller farms of 10 to 40 cows and those who want to begin farming lack the basic knowledge of forage production and storage. I addressed those subjects, and also talked to them about rotational grazing, because it is an inexpensive way to feed cows when you are just beginning an operation."

While this type of involvement with developing countries is clearly beneficial to the University, it is also likely to benefit the United States. Because of Mad Cow disease, there is a ban on the importation of dairy cattle and bull semen from Europe. Romania may look to the United States and other countries for these products, as well as soybean meal, plant seed and agricultural machinery.

"We've recently completed training with three people from Latvia on food safety and fish processing microbiological safety, to produce safe food for consumption by people in Latvia," said Ridley. "We plan to do this again next year."

About 1998, the U.S. Congress asked the University to provide assistance to the three Baltic countries of Latvia, Lithuania and Estonia. "We have a number of programs with these countries, particularly in the area of dairy production,"

According to UW-RF Chancellor Ann Lydecker, the University has taken precautionary steps and is directing those who have been in close contact with Spindler to seek medical treatment. Treatment is through a one-time dose of antibiotics.

According to a UW-RF investigation, Spindler began to show flu-like symptoms last week. On Sunday morning he left his residence hall to work at an off-campus location. After returning to his residence hall room later Sunday morning and complaining of illness, residence hall staff transported him to the River Falls Area Hospital.

Meningococcal disease is caused by bacteria that is spread by direct, close contact with respiratory and oral secretions or by direct contact with an infected person. The American College Health Association defines direct contact as oral contact with shared items such as cigarettes or drinking glasses or through intimate contact such as kissing.

The early symptoms usually associated with meningococcal disease include fever, severe headache, stiff neck, rash, nausea, vomiting, and lethargy, and may resemble the flu. Individuals with these symptoms should seek medical assistance at the River Falls Medical Clinic, UW-RF officials said.

For the past several years, UW-RF has conducted a meningococcal meningitis awareness campaign by providing information to parents and incoming students both through the mail, at freshmen registration and through fliers and posters on campus.

The University also conducts monthly vaccination clinics in which the meningococcal vaccine is available at a cost of $70. The vaccine is also available through the River Falls Clinic or through Pierce County. It usually takes 7-10 days to build immunity to the disease and the vaccine will not inhibit the disease in a person who is already infected.

An investigation into the death of a UW-River Falls student has confirmed that he succumbed to meningococcal disease. According to Pierce County Public Health Department Administrator Donna Moraska, laboratory tests completed Tuesday (Nov. 12) at the River Falls Area Hospital confirmed the disease as the cause of death of Erik Spindler on Monday.

Students were provided information about the disease and its transmission. In a subsequent screening session, individuals who were in close contact with Spindler were sent to the River Falls Medical Clinic for antibiotics. Some 20 students or staff had received the antibiotics as of Wednesday afternoon. Treatment is through a one-time dose of antibiotics.

Chancellor Ann Lydecker said the University responded quickly to the potential meningococcal threat after it was suspected in Spindler's death. "We sought to ensure that anyone who might fear that they were exposed to the disease knew how to get treatment. We also wanted to quickly educate everyone on campus about the risk factor to them. I think we accomplished these objectives," Lydecker said.

UW-RF officials encourage those faculty and staff whose insurance coverage includes the immunization fee to seek the vaccine from a private physician or clinic to ensure students who are seeking the immunization are able to receive it.

According to UW-RF officials, it takes up to 10 days to build immunity against meningococcal disease and it will not combat the current incident. Also, the immunization does not provide protection against all strains of meningococcal disease.

For the past several years, UW-RF has joined with the national efforts of the ACHA to conduct a meningococcal meningitis awareness campaign. The University provides information to parents and incoming students both through the mail and at new student registration in the summer. Awareness fliers and posters are also distributed on campus.

Hygiene have determined that a UW-River Falls student died Monday from a meningococcal strain of type B serogroup. According to Donna Moraska, Pierce County Public Health Department Administrator and Health Officer, laboratory tests may continue with the final results to be released within a week by the state epidemiologist in Madison. Cases of the same serogroup are not necessarily linked unless confirmed by the state epidemiologist in Madison after further testing and investigation.

UW-RF Student Health Services Director Alice Reilly-Myklebust noted that the immunization provides protection against four of the five strains of meningococcal disease. However, it does not protect against the B serogroup. An individual who had direct contact with that strain must receive a one-time treatment of antibiotics and should contact the River Falls Medical Clinic if they believe they were a direct contact of the recent case.

Moraska and Reilly-Myklebust urged those individuals who show more than two symptoms of meningococcal disease to seek treatment. The early symptoms usually associated with the disease include fever, severe headache, stiff neck, rash, and lethargy, and may resemble the flu.

Reilly-Myklebust encouraged students who have not been previously inoculated to participate in the immunization clinic on Friday. She noted that the immunization will help to provide students significant protection against four of the strains, should they have direct contact with an infected person in the future.

UW-River Falls will offer a new graduate course designed to prepare talented professionals in the health care field to become top-notch leaders, managers and administrators, according to Dean Barbara Nemecek, College of Business and Economics. The course is offered through the College and the Outreach and Graduate Studies department.

Nemecek noted. "This new course is structured and has content planned particularly for administrators of the small-to medium-sized provider. We think this is one of the greatest areas of need. The College of Business and Economics and UW-RF are excited about introducing a class that will begin to address this need."

Operational Integration," will begin on Jan. 10. The micro-level course covers the unique aspects of planning, organizing, directing, coordinating and controlling individuals, groups and systems in health care organizations, according to Program Manager Michelle Hadley. The three-credit class concentrates on the skills and methods needed by health care practitioners to successfully meet their administrative responsibilities in a health care setting.

Students will complete the class in just two weekends in January. In addition, the class credits may be applied toward the UW-RF Masters of Management degree or other selected graduate degree programs. Applicants must have a bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university or hold a professional degree to enroll. Application forms and information are available on the Web at www.uwrf.edu/ogs/healthcare, through e-mail to hca@uwrf.edu, or by calling 715/425-3256.

Program Innovation Fund to develop a program for businesses that employ workers with little or no proficiency in spoken English, aimed at improving communication and cultural understanding in the workplace and the community.

Said Program Co-leader Katrina Larsen, "The English as a Second Language in the Workplace program is a unique collaboration that brings businesses together with university and extension personnel to address the issues that arise as our population and workforce become more diverse."

The workers will benefit from on-site English and cultural training that will help them communicate with their employers and other workers. The businesses will benefit from improved communication with their workers, resulting in improved worker retention, safety, productivity and firm profitability. The tutors will benefit from applying what they learned in the tutor training classes, thus enhancing their career prospects and their ability to contribute to the community.

The conference is scheduled for June 2003. Said Gregg Hadley, another of the program co-leaders, "The conference will get at the broader issue surrounding a more culturally diverse workforce, including human resource management and cultural, legal, eduction, healthcare and community integration issues."

Addressing these broader issues helps strengthen businesses and promotes community and economic development, strategies identified in Gov. Scott McCallum's Build Wisconsin initiative as important to building the state's agriculture, manufacturing and tourism industries.

The forum, "Emerging Issues in Food Safety," is sponsored by the animal and food science department of the College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences at UW-RF and Cooperative Extension Service of the University of Wisconsin System. The information provided at the forum will be of interest to the general public as well as to scientists and technical people, according to Food Science Professor Purnendu Vasavada, who is coordinator for the forum. Vasavada also serves as food safety and microbiology specialist for UW-Cooperative Extension.

"We will discuss the latest approach to detection and control strategies for emerging issues such as CWD, both nationally and internationally. CWD is not just a local problem; it is a problem all over the world, though we don't know yet to what extent," said Vasavada. "It is a moving target."

"We also know that it hasn't been determined for sure whether CWD is transmittable to humans. It hasn't been proven that it is transmittable, but it hasn't been disproven, either. What we have to do is minimize the risk and control the problem to the extent that we can."

Disease, is under scrutiny now, Vasavada said, since recent developments suggest the organism causing Johne's Disease may also be involved in causing Crohn's Disease in humans. These are topics that are relevant to everyone.

Keynote speaker for the forum is Will Hueston from the University of Minnesota, speaking on "Chronic Wasting Disease and Prion Diseases: Problems and Prospects," focusing on the science of the diseases as well as the current state of CWD in Minnesota.

Wisconsin state veterinarian Clarence Sirocky will provide an update on CWD in Wisconsin. Irene Grant, a scientist from the U.K., will present information on Mycobacterium paratuberculosis in milk: the U.K. situation.

Scapino! combines a pinch of Moliere, a dash of the Marx brothers, a twist of Austin Powers and a whole heap of fun. Set in Naples, the play focuses on Scapino, a rascal and a trickster who helps two sets of young lovers get together despite the opposition of the boys' fathers. A series of deceptions has the fathers paying for the unions and a few coincidences help bring everything to a happy conclusion.

College of Arts and Sciences Dean Gorden Hedahl will direct the play. Hedahl is a professor of theatre at UW-RF. He has directed over 50 productions during his career, two of which were for the St. Croix Valley Summer Theatre. Scapino! will be the first show he has directed during the academic year at the University.

"The Cheats (or Tricks) of Scapin" which is based on the traditions of the commedia del' arte, an improvisational free-form theatrical tradition which introduced "slapstick" comedy. This action-packed, side-splitting play is sure to be filled with comic madness.

Student actors appearing in the play include freshman Mike McKay, a theatre arts major from Hibbing, Minn., who plays Ottavio; junior Cordell Wesselink, a speech communication major from Beldenville who plays Sylvestro; freshman Andy Anderson, a theatre arts major from Northfield, Minn., who plays Scapino; junior Rob Halberg, a marketing communications major from Hastings, Minn., who plays Argante; sophomore Bradley Jennings, an English major from Chetek who plays Geronte; junior Brad Meyer, a speech communications major who plays Leandro; sophomore Wayne Yeager, a speech communications major from River Falls who plays Carlo; sophomore Peter Josef Potyondy, a broad field social studies major from Woodbury, Minn., and freshman Vince Baumel, a social science major from Brooklyn who play waiters; and David Robelia, a former student with a major in chemistry from River Falls who plays the guitar player/gondolier.

Nancy Tech, a freshman from Shakopee, Minn., with a pre-major in social science, will fill the role of stage manager and sophomore Angie Drinkwine, a speech communication major from Superior, will be the assistant stage manager.

Filling the role of costume designer will be senior Moria Clinton, a speech communications major. Her costumes will include style elements from the 1970's as a base for the commedia clown-like characters.

Students at any level of study are encouraged to attend the career fair. First- and second-year students will learn about possible career paths from the many businesses attending. Sophomores and juniors will locate possible internship opportunities to gain valuable work experience. Seniors will find a variety of future job opportunities.

The fair is sponsored by the career services office in collaboration with the cooperative education and internship programs in the College of Agriculture, Food, and Environmental Sciences, the College of Arts and Sciences, the College of Business and Economics, and the College of Education and Professional Studies.

The two schools hope to expand their relationship to include faculty and student exchanges and scholarly visits. UW-RF intends to send faculty and students to ZEI as early as fall 2003. ZEI would like to have UW-RF faculty teach English courses as well as courses in their area of expertise. This arrangement would provide UW-RF students the opportunity to take a class from a UW-RF professor and a class in Chinese while in China.

Green says the benefits of an expanded relationship with ZEI are obvious. "We are a global world, and studying abroad is a perfect way to learn that," he said. "These programs would increase global awareness and employability for UW-RF students."

Chancellor Lydecker and Green are reviewing the possibility of a reciprocal visit to ZEI this winter to work out further details of the agreement, recruit ZEI students to River Falls, and negotiate logistical issues of the exchange.

Fuentes has performed nationally and recorded four CDs as the lead singer with the musical groups Sotavento, Paraguas and Madisalsa. In 1998 she released her first solo album titled, "Sobrevida." Fuentes now resides in Santiago, Chile, and travels throughout America educating listeners about other cultures and instilling in them an appreciation of Central and South American music.

College students reveling on Halloween night across the nation should beware the ghosts that college campuses harbor, and be on the lookout for icy hands on their shoulders, floorboards that creak from the pressure of invisible feet, doorknobs that twist on their own and lights that turn off and on.

Supernatural experiences on college campuses are well documented, according to UW-River Falls Journalism Professor Michael Norman, who has included a collection of them in a section he calls Haunts of Ivy in the newly-published book "Haunted Heritage," which he co-authored with his late writing partner, the deceased Beth Scott.

The stories come from colleges across the country, including Wisconsin, Illinois and Kansas in the Midwest. The ghosts in these tales are usually former students or professors, some of whom died tragically and some who just don't seem ready to leave.

"There's the story of a history professor who died unexpectedly yet continues to keep office hours, with lights burning in his locked office late at night," says Norman, "and the story of a young woman who was bludgeoned to death with an axe by a crazed custodian. She has remained in the hall where she was killed, continuing to practice her piano in the former music room.

"Then there's the varsity football player who awoke one night when he heard his name being called. A man was standing in the doorway of his dorm room, and he was wearing the student's varsity letter jacket. The student's name was stitched on the jacket. The man went into the bathroom down the hall and left the jacket there, hanging on a stall, and he disappeared."

Students may also want to consider sharing their Halloween candy when dealing with ghosts. One young actress laughed and ridiculed people who thought the campus theatre was haunted by a ghost girl, and left candy to appease her. One night, as the actress descended a flight of steps to reach the stage, a pair of hands suddenly gripped her ankles tightly, causing her to fall headlong down the steps. After that, she didn't take any chances. She began bringing candy to share with the ghost girl, just in case she really existed.

Kesler, a broadcast journalism major from North St. Paul, Minn., in his junior year, was presented with a plaque and award Oct. 5 at the Metropolitan Ballroom in Golden Valley, Minn. Awards were presented to winners from the Upper Midwest region in 45 different categories.

Kesler's award was based on a composite tape featuring two stories that he shot, reported and edited. His first story was about the final UW-RF men's baseball game of the season played at home last spring as the team was elminated as a sport. For the other story, Kesler followed write-in River Falls mayoral candidate Jen Firchow on election night, letting her tell her own story. Firchow, a senior last year at UW-River Falls majoring in political science, participated in the election to learn about the political process and posted an impressive vote total.

This isn't the first recognition Keslers talents have earned him. Last summer, he won an award from "The Home Town Video Festival," a national festival held annually, in the category called, "About Public Access by a Nonprofit." His entry was a video about a public access studio, which he reported, photographed, edited and narrated.

To prepare himself for life as a professional photojournalist, Kesler works as an intern at Cable Channel 12 in Brooklyn Park, Minn., photographing, editing and occasionally reporting. He also works with journalists from the local news stations KARE and KSTP, accompanying them on their stories.

Cities, at one of the big four stations in this market, because it is one of the best in the country. I plan to continue working at Channel 12 to begin with, then eventually move on to one of the big stations.

Wisconsin deer hunters will be allowed to harvest many more deer this season than in the past, and if they take the recommended precautions against Chronic Wasting Disease, a fatal disease of the nervous system that appears in deer and elk, they will be able to safely consume the venison. This was the consensus of experts in the field who gathered to exchange information at a daylong forum on topics relevant to food safety, Thursday, Oct. 17, at UW-River Falls.

The forum, "Emerging Issues in Food Safety," was sponsored by the animal and food science department of the College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences at UW-RF and the Cooperative Extension Service of the University of Wisconsin System. It was attended by scientists and technical people, students and the general public.

Eradication and intensive harvest zones have been defined in the Mount Horeb area near Madison where CWD was first detected, according to veterinarian Shelby Molina from the Wisconsin Department of Agriculture, Trade and Consumer Protection.

The meat of the deer from these two zones will not be consumed. Hunters will take their deer to collection stations, where it will be tested for CWD. Carcasses that test negative will be deposited in a landfill, and those that test positive will be burned.

Molina outlined precautions hunters must take for field dressing and processing a deer. The recommendations include: wearing latex or rubber gloves; removing all internal organs; minimizing contact with the brain, spinal cord, spleen and lymph nodes; avoiding the use of household utensils; boning out the venison; and cleaning residue from knives and equipment, then disinfecting them with a 50/50 solution of household bleach and water.

Scientists believe CWD is caused by a protein called a prion. Prions concentrate near nerve tissue in the brain, spinal cord, eyes, lymph nodes and spleen. Because of this, scientists recommend that these parts of the animal be removed and not eaten. Prions haven't been found in muscle tissue, which is the meat, and this is what most people consume. Thus, the meat of venison is considered safe to eat if it has tested negative for CWD.

In a discussion on the problems and prospects surrounding CWD and prion diseases, epidemiology Professor Will Hueston from the University of Minnesota said that to effectively deal with CWD it will be necessary to implement a program of vigilance and stick to it. "We need a scientifically-sound plan, and coordination between state and federal agencies," said Hueston, who is the director of the Center for Animal Health and Food Safety at the University.

Hueston said a good plan would consider diagnosis of CWD, control and eradication, disposal, and transmission of the disease to other species. Of diagnosis, he said if an animal doesn't test positive, that doesn't mean the animal hasn't been exposed to CWD. It only says the animal doesn't have the disease yet. There appears to be a 16-to-18-month delay between exposure and the disease.

Control and eradication depend on testing for the disease, then eradicating the herd if it is infected. "In Colorado and Wyoming, where the disease originated, it was slow to spread because there are low animal densities in those states.

Because the immune system doesn't seem to play much of a role in CWD, it isnt possible to immunize for the disease. It spreads quickly through a herd by direct contact, probably in an exchange of saliva when the deer touch noses.

Disposal of the diseased carcasses must be handled in a way that presents the least risk to other animals, such as burning. To date, Hueston said, CWD has spread only between deer and elk. Cattle grazing on the same land or held in the same pen have not become infected.

The colleague who nominated her wrote, "I nominated Margaret Phinney for this award in recognition of her dedication and enthusiasm for her work, her vision in reorganizing the undergraduate and graduate reading programs at UW-RF, her ability to work as a leader as well as a team player with her colleagues, and the evidence of her respect and support for her students."

With regard to her teaching, the committee said that faculty and students commented on her authentic enthusiasm for both the subject and her students. "She is extremely knowledgeable, prepared and concise, and models the kind of teaching she expects of pre-service teachers," they said. "Her reflective statement on teaching is truly inspiring."

She demonstrated excellent service by redesigning the reading program, making major administrative changes, and serving on various committees such as the graduate council with tenacity and expertise. The committee also said Phinney's scholarship was original intellectual work, as shown by her portfolio.

Studies, "Dr. Phinney is highly deserving of this recognition. She is committed to her students and extremely hard working in the areas of curriculum change and program reorganization. Her numerous presentations and publications demonstrate her continual involvement in scholarly activity. Please join me in congratulating Margaret on her many excellent accomplishments as a faculty member in our college."

Phinney joined the University in August 1999 as a professor and director for the master's program in reading in the department of teacher education. She has published a number of professional books and children's stories; the most recent of which are "City Visit," to be published this spring by Mondo Publishing, and "Loose Tooth," published in 2000 by Lee and Low Publishers.

The safety of the food we eat, an issue that has taken on new meaning since the terrorist attacks of September 11 and the threat of bioterrorism that followed, was a topic of discussion at the 22nd annual Food Microbiology Symposium at UW-River Falls. Chronic Wasting Disease, another foodborne health hazard that has recently come to the forefront, was also discussed.

He prefaced his presentation by saying, "Unfortunately, many biological agents are hard to distinguish from naturally-occurring foodborne diseases. Current inspection methods may not detect deliberate contamination."

In reviewing the procedures all branches of the U.S. armed forces have taken to prevent contamination of their food supply, Huck emphasized the need to make preparations now to prevent contamination of the general public's food supply.

There should be a coordinated effort between federal and state regulatory agencies, he said, and laboratories should coordinate their testing capabilities. It is important to consider everything, from procurement to storage, to preparation and serving.

Wisconsin Secretary of Agriculture, Trade and Consumer Protection Jim Harsdorf covered the topics of Chronic Wasting Disease and other food safety issues in the state, saying that nearly everything his department does has to do with the transfer of food.

"From the dairy farm to the food table, what we do has to do with making sure that food is safe," he said. "I believe we in Wisconsin produce some of the safest food on this earth. Everyone, from the producer to the marketer to the consumer, has a stake in providing safe food."

Wasting Disease, Harsdorf said, "We found it because we went out looking for it. When we found it last February in Mt. Horeb, that was the first time it had been found east of the Mississippi River. Others say they don't have it, but that is because they haven't looked for it.

"We have closed our borders to the transport of deer and elk, and we will test 500 deer in every county. That will be about 45,000 tests in all, not counting the deer shot by hunters that will be tested."

The seminar was sponsored by the department of animal and food science in the College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences. It is one of the two main technical seminars in the nation. The session on Sunday was free, and the public was invited to attend.

The symposium continued with a technical program Oct. 14 to 16, consisting of lectures and discussions relevant to food borne pathogens and toxins, as well as the safety, quality and shelf life of foods by speakers from academia, industry and regulatory agencies. It also included presentations by representatives of various companies involved in developing and marketing rapid and automated methods for microbiological analysis of food, water and the environment.

The selection was made by fall and spring UW-RF graduates from 1998 and 2000, who were asked to nominate professors who had the most positive impact on their education, careers and lives. They rated them on excellence in teaching, understanding and helpfulness as an adviser, and ability to motivate by their example.

Student comments on Abuhejleh included, "He never treated his students like they were just a number," "He was always willing to take time out of his busy schedule to help students with assignments and class schedules," and "He always had time to help students with questions on assignments or preparation for exams."

They said Abuhejleh was diligent about helping students secure internships and post-graduation positions and he was especially helpful with making sure they took their credits appropriately to assure timely graduation.

These topics and others are covered in "Wisconsin Journey, 2002," a new textbook by UW-River Falls History Professor Kurt Leichtle written for elementary school students. Some school districts will begin using the book this fall in their fourth grade classes, according to Leichtle, who said that is the year when the elementary curriculum introduces state history and begins to connect it to U.S. history.

Studies at the University on techniques for teaching social studies, said the most recent Wisconsin history textbook available to elementary teachers was written in 1974, and it is not appealing to students of today.

"Teachers have not been using a textbook, but have been drawing material from a number of other sources," he said. "This book will give students a comprehensive and consistent overview; a level of common understanding."

"where the waters gather," then described a time long ago when most of Wisconsin was covered by water. Ferns grew higher than trees, and dragonflies with wingspans of more than two feet glided through the forest.

He told how, before the 1890s, the only dairy product was cheese, because that was the safest way to preserve milk. By the 1890s, when railroads could move perishable products quickly to markets, the dairy industry grew to include milk.

Another strength of the book, Leichtle feels, is that it provides appropriate attention to the contributions of Wisconsin's Native American population. It describes the groups that lived in Wisconsin, how they lived, and how they interacted with the immigrants who came here from Europe.

While working on the book, Leichtle said, he found one of the most challenging aspects to be that he had only about 120 pages to cover all of the influences in the development of the state. Another challenge was to determine how to say things to a fourth-grader. "Fortunately, my son was in third grade at the time," he said. "I tried out some of the material on him." The story of Burmester's Grocery in the southwestern Wisconsin town of Loganville incorporates some of Leichtle's own family history into the book.. In 1929, Leichtle's maternal grandfather Albert Burmester established the business as an ice cream parlor, but during the Great Depression switched to selling groceries because, as he said, "most people could not afford to buy ice cream during the Depression, but everyone had to buy groceries."

December graduates from the years 1998 and 2000. Graduates were asked to nominate two faculty members in each division, focusing on excellence in teaching; understanding and helpfulness as advisors; and ability to motivate students. Comments were also invited.

Brantley's enthusiasm and insights into literature were applauded. "She is outstanding!" one former student remarked. "I wish my course with her had lasted longer than one semester." Another cited "the personal attention she gave me and the amount of intellectual growth she provided me."

Of Pala, nominations included, "She helped students learn organic chemistry on her own time with a weekly study group;" "She was funny. She made organic chemistry easier to learn;" and, "She was friendly and a good teacher. She always made me smile!"

Said Dean of the College of Arts and Sciences Gorden Hedahl, "It is important to recognize and celebrate outstanding teaching, as that is the heart of our mission and one of the primary motivations for the faculty who have chosen to make their careers at UW-River Falls.

"This award is especially significant as it is chosen by students who have graduated and entered the workforce. They are able to reflect on their entire University experience and recognize those who have made lasting impacts on their lives and careers.

"Jenny , Magdalena and Charlie are all exemplary teachers. I am pleased that their dedication and ability to inspire have been acknowledged by their former students. They serve as role models for the large number of faculty members in the College who work as effective educators and mentors for our students."

A long, long time ago, more than 400 million years, an asteroid about a half mile in diameter traveling at about 12 miles per second smacked into the earth at Rock Elm, Wisconsin, leaving a hole about four miles in diameter and 200 yards deep.

The crater, known as the Rock Elm Disturbance in eastern Pierce County, is one of more than 100 known impact craters on our planet, according to UW-River Falls Geology Professor Bill Cordua. There may be many more, as yet undiscovered, in countries that have not been explored for craters as well as beneath the sea.

Though most of the Rock Elm crater is on private property, part of it falls within the boundaries of Nugget Lake County Park. Visitors to the park occasionally pan for gold or visit Blue Rock, a geological formation of dark blue rock about 150 feet wide and 60 feet high.

Nevertheless, the site has generated its share of attention over the years, not only from students of geology but also from prospectors seeking gems and minerals, people who speculate about UFO visits to the area, and those who wonder when another asteroid will drop out of the sky.

Chris Peters, a recent UW-RF graduate from Stillwater, Minn., who majored in geology, conducted a study on the disturbance for his senior research experience and solved one riddle: he was able to determine the age of the crater in Rock Elm.

Peters painstakingly used a telescope to examine sediment from cores that a commercial company had drilled while prospecting for gold and diamonds at the disturbance. He found fossils from two types of tiny, soft-bodied creatures, conodonts and scolecodonts, and matched them with other fossils of known ages.

With this information, he was able to identify the era that the asteroid hit as the Ordovician Period, roughly 430 million to 455 million years ago when ancient Wisconsin was located just north of the Equator.

Both gold and diamonds have been found in the crater, in the sediment of its streams. About a dozen diamonds were found in the 1880s, according to Cordua, who said they were identified by George F. Kunz, a gemologist. Kunz described the diamonds as pale yellow to blue in color and weighing as much as two carats.

"The relationship between gold and diamonds is not known," said Cordua, "but it is interesting from a geological point of view that they have both been found in the crater. They probably washed out of the glacial material in that spot."

"There are hundreds of asteroids in orbits that cross the earth. We don't think any constitute a danger to us now, but of course we don't know about all of them. There is a torino scale that is used to measure the danger of asteroids on a scale of one to 10, with 10 being the most dangerous, but to my knowledge none of the asteroids we know about are rated above a one or two."

There is evidence that in 1908 a comet blew up in the air in Siberia, Cordua said. The trees that it blew down for many miles were radially distributed from ground zero, and the force behind it was somewhat equivalent to the largest hydrogen bomb that we have. Fortunately, the area of impact was not inhabited.

More than 50 percent of the species became extinct within a relatively short period of time after it hit the earth. A lot of people think it was this event that led to the extinction of the dinosaurs.

Outdoor recreation managers are employed by the UW-RF Leadership Center and work with the student life program to develop and enhance campus and community living experiences. Her responsibilities include supporting and coordinating outdoor/adventure recreational activities, programs, events and trips. She is an elementary education major.

Resident assistants are employed by the UW-RF Leadership Center and work with the student life program to develop and enhance campus and community living experiences. Responsibilities include individual resident contact, organizing group activities, and staff management and programming functions.

The area desk managers will work with other students and professional staff to contribute to UW-RF's general student life program and to develop and enhance community living. Some responsibilities include the coordination of desk workers, payroll administration and guest services.

Body Shop workers are employed by the UW-RF Leadership Center and work with the student life program to develop and enhance campus and community living experiences. Responsibilities include orienting new members in the use of the fitness equipment, administrative assistance, and general upkeep of the facility.

Resident hall desk assistants are employed by the UW-RF Leadership Center and work with the student life program to develop and enhance campus and community living experiences. Responsibilities include hall security, administrative assistance and guest services.

The event manager will work with other students and professional staff to contribute to the University's general student life program and to develop and enhance community living. Some responsibilities include supporting and coordinating campus activities, programs and involvement opportunities. He is an agricultural education major.

The intramural recreation manager will work with other students and professional staff to contribute to the University's general student life program and to develop and enhance community living. Some responsibilities include supporting and coordinating campus recreational activities, programs and events. She is a speech communications major.

KinniConnections staff are employed by the UW-RF Leadership Center and work with the student life program to develop and enhance campus and community living experiences. Responsibilities include supporting and coordinating outdoor adventure recreational activities, programs, events and trips.

Orientation leaders are employed by the UW-RF Leadership Center and work with the student life program to develop and enhance campus and community living experiences. Responsibilities include being a campus resource, serving as a role model and easing the transition for incoming students.

Rivera's visit is one component of a speaking tour he is conducting in Minnesota and Wisconsin sponsored by Witness for Peace, a politically-independent grass roots organization. Founded in 1983, it is dedicated to non-violence and working for peace and justice in the Americas.

Midwest, Rivera has worked extensively on issues related to fair trade and organic coffee. He is the leader of the Cooperative of Active Small Farmers of Jalapa, known as the CCAJ in Spanish, with 985 members throughout the area.

Rivera coordinates a micro-lending program for small farmers, promotes organic agriculture and leads educational programs that focus on teaching leadership skills and political and economic analysis to small farmers. A small farmer himself, Rivera makes his livelihood off his four acres of coffee, three acres of corn and beans, and two cows.

He is one of the 112 members in CCAJ who are certified organic coffee producers selling their coffee as fair trade. They have been hit hard by the crisis created from the drop in coffee prices on the world market. Rivera has brought them together to analyze the policies that have created the crisis and advocate for themselves as a unified body.

At a protest in 1999, Rivera had the opportunity to talk to policy makers at the World Bank and the International Monetary Fund in Washington, D.C. He also spoke with members of the U.S. Congress about how structural adjustment policies affect small coffee producers in Nicaragua.

An estimated 200 students and faculty members will create outdoor works to highlight a specific site on campus. The works may take the form of a colorful quilt made entirely of natural materials, a clothesline of photographs or a larger than life horse sculpture fashioned from natural materials.

Art Professor David Haberlein said the purpose of the outdoor installations is to encourage people to see things they wouldn't usually notice. "The art will bring awareness of these spaces that we all move through, allowing us to see them in a different way," he said.

Construction of the installations will begin Monday, Oct. 7. The finished installations can be viewed from Wednesday, Oct. 9 to Friday, Oct. 11. All who view the works are asked to please respect the artistic ideas and to not alter or damage the artwork.

Those participating in the meetings were: Dennis Cooper, professor of dairy science; Gregg Hadley, assistant professor of agricultural economics; Steve Kelm, assistant professor of dairy science and Gary Onan, assistant professor of animal science. Onan lives in Ellsworth; the others reside in River Falls.

The professors attended symposia, oral sessions and poster sessions presented by professional members of the organizations on topics related to their teaching, extension and research interests. These included ruminant nutrition, nutrient analysis of forages, livestock and dairy management, undergraduate teaching, animal comfort and environment, reproductive physiology and many others.

Cooper and Kelm, along with five students from the UW-RF Dairy Club, also participated in activities of the Student Affiliated Division of the American Dairy Science Association. ADSA was established in 1906 as a scientific and educational association to serve the dairy and dairy-related industries. It facilitates the discovery, application and dissemination of dairy science knowledge and information.

ADSA was established in 1906 as a scientific and education association to serve the dairy and dairy-related industries. It facilitates the discovery, application and dissemination of dairy science knowledge and information.

Chancellor Ann Lydecker welcomed the evaluation as an important endorsement of the quality of UW-RF. "Of the dozens of surveys and rankings of quality in higher education institutions, U.S. News and World Report generates the greatest attention. Their assessment of the quality and value of UW-River Falls is on target.

"Their assessment is not only beneficial to us as we recruit students, faculty and staff, but it's of tremendous consequence regionally as we partner with local government and economic development organizations to recruit and expand high tech and high-paying industries to the St. Croix Valley and western Wisconsin."

Lydecker noted that UW-RF showed gains in several categories: an increase in its ranking of academic reputation; a four-year graduation rate that trails only UW-Madison in the University of Wisconsin System, and in student indebtedness at graduation. In the latter category, UW-RF graduates carry an average debt of $11,500, which was the 11th lowest of all public master's universities in the Midwest and all Wisconsin public institutions.

The Dec. 6 meeting is dedicated to student readings. The UW-RF Reading Series was founded in 1996 by English Professor Jenny Brantley, to provide a community for writers and a place for their voice. It serves both the students and the people of the region.

The readings provide a place for students to read their own poetry and prose and to meet established authors. At a student reading, those students who have signed up read first, then the mike is opened up for any others who have brought in work to read. Guest readers often include writers of regional and national acclaim who are available for questions after their readings.

"In the beginning, our turnout at readings was small," said Branstad. "Now it is anywhere from 25 to 100 people. This is amazing to me! I love hearing the sound of laughter and applause coming from the library on a Friday afternoon."

At age 18, Armstrong had fulfilled her dream of becoming a Playboy Playmate when she appeared in "Playboy" magazine as Miss September 1986. Her life in Hollywood was that of a star; going to parties, a six-figure income, and a beach house. She was offered movie deals, commercials, and modeling jobs.

Armstrong has fought the virus for over 17 years, and has dedicated her life to educating others about the consequences of unsafe sex and alcohol abuse as it relates to impaired judgment and the reality of AIDS.

If the course is approved by the school board, the student will not have to pay the tuition cost and the student will receive both high school and post-secondary credit for a successfully completed course.

Placement program, a national program that provides for college-level courses to be taught in high schools by high school teachers. Once a year, students are able to test for college credit for the courses they have taken through Advanced Placement.

"We're delighted to exercise our option for another year of training camp at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls," Peterson commented. "This will be our 13th year in River Falls and never once has the University been complacent in meeting our needs and making our training camp the best that it can be. UW-RF and town officials always work to make things better. It goes without saying that this past year, the weather in Wisconsin was nearly perfect. We never lost any days to hot and humid weather as was the case in some other NFL camps.

"On behalf of the Hunt family and the Chiefs organization, I want to personally thank the entire River Falls community and particularly the staff at UW-River Falls for making training camp an exceptional experience for us the past 12 years," Peterson concluded. "As I have noted many times, the weather and the opportunity to work against other NFL teams continue to be major reasons for our decision to return to River Falls each year."

UW-RF Chancellor Ann Lydecker said she welcomed the team's decision to return to the western Wisconsin community. "The Kansas City Chiefs continue to be one of the top organizations in the National Football League," Lydecker said. "Having the opportunity to host the team for the past 12 years as their summer home has been a benefit not only to our campus community but to communities all around the St. Croix Valley. We've been pleased and proud to call UW-RF the Summer Home of the Kansas City Chiefs. We look forward to working with the Chiefs for many years into the future."

The opening session for a seminar for ensuring that America's food supply stays safe by being informed about the latest news on food safety issues and bioterrorism will kick off on Sunday, Oct. 13, at the 22nd Annual Food Microbiology Symposium at UW-River Falls, in the River Room of Rodli Commons. The seminar is sponsored by the department of animal and food science in the College of Agriculture, Food & Environmental Sciences.

Sciences, stated "Not only is the symposium important for the River Falls campus, but it is also important for the public health community in general. Statistics show that this year, one out of every four Americans will experience some sort of food borne illness and an estimated 5,000 Americans will die of a food borne illness. This is a conference that is covering a major issue concerning the public. It really is a significant event."

The symposium's technical program consists of lectures and discussions relevant to food borne pathogens, toxins, safety, quality and shelf life of foods by speakers from academia, industry and regulatory agencies. It also includes presentations by representatives of various companies involved in developing and marketing rapid and automated methods for microbiological analysis of food, water and the environment.

The conference provides a basic understanding of the strategies and approaches available for the detection, enumeration, isolation and characterization of microorganisms and toxins of interest in food microbiology and emphasizes the practical application of the information to the solution of problems dealing with microbiological safety and quality of food.

UW-River Falls has scheduled activities and events for visiting alumni and friends over homecoming weekend, Saturday and Sunday, Oct. 5 and 6. As an added attraction this year, the music department will sponsor a piano sale over the weekend.

Also at the Student Center, Chancellor Ann Lydecker will host a question and answer session at 10:30 a.m. in the President's Room. The open forum will include information on new campus initiatives, budget challenges, new building projects, student enrollment, projections for the future, and more.

Farm 1. All alumni are invited to tour the new colt barn from 10 a.m. to 1 p.m. and participate in the dedication ceremony beginning at 11:30 p.m. in the lobby of the new colt barn. Refreshments will be provided.

The music department invites alumni to a band/wind ensemble reunion. A band rehearsal will be held from 10 a.m. to noon in the Abbott Concert Hall in the Kleinpell Fine Arts building, with a reception at Copper Kettle at 4 p.m. A choir rehearsal will be held at 6:30 p.m. at Abbot Concert Hall, and the choir alumni will hold a potluck dinner at the Ruth and Ken Lee home in River Falls.

The department's pianos are replaced periodically, and the used instruments are available to the public for purchase at prices significantly lower than market value. The pianos will be displayed from 10 a.m. to 6 p.m. on Saturday and 10 a.m. to 5 p.m. on Sunday in the Syse Theatre of the Kleinpell Fine Arts building.

"The UW System is fortunate to have so many talented artists as members of the faculty and staff," said Lydall. "The Brittingham Art Invitational allows us to showcase their remarkable and diverse works for the public."

Art department Chair Michael Padgett was pleased with the selection. "I am delighted that the UW-RF art department has again been selected with three faculty to participate in the Madison exhibit. Each of these artists brings a unique perspective to their discipline and compliments the goals and objectives we set in providing our students with outstanding professionals to learn from."

Padgett's work was represented at the Invitational last year. His ceramic piece "Falling into You" was one of four from around the state selected to be purchased for the System's permanent collection.

The artwork on display includes a wide variety of media and stylistic approaches, including ceramics, drawings, etching, lithographs, paintings, photographs, printmaking, textiles, digital prints and sculpture.

UW-RF Chancellor Ann Lydecker expressed her approval of the selection. "The art, which is prominently displayed in Brittingham House and on the 17th floor of Van Hise Hall, makes a strong statement about the talent of the faculty in the art departments within the UW System. We can be extremely proud that three of our own UW-RF faculty have contributed to the exhibit, demonstrating the variety of talent available to students on our campus and to the greater community."

Easton, who until recently preferred to remain anonymous, decided to reveal herself as the donor in the hope that others would be inspired to make contributions to the University, according to Animal Science Professor Larry Kasten, who heads up the horse science program.

"Jennifer is a special person," said Kasten. "She was enrolled in a number of our horse classes in the early 1980s. We shared an interest in reining horses and we became friends," said Kasten. "When she came back for a visit and saw that we were still using our out-of-date facilities, she offered to build us a new barn. Her gift has greatly enhanced our horse program."

The horse science program at UW-RF is one of only a few in the United States, according to Director of Admissions Alan Tuchtenhagen. Nearly 200 students are enrolled in the program, making it one of the largest in the country. Another 150 people attend the summer horse program and youth clinics.

"There are three parts to the program," said Tuchtenhagen. "Riding and training is one part; the science aspect, which includes reproduction and nutrition is the second part; and the business end, including management and finance, is the third part."

Students have the option to specialize in any of the three areas, Tuchtenhagen said. If they specialize in riding and training, they may become professional trainers and competitors. If they specialize in science, they may conduct research or breeding programs, or they may go into veterinary medicine. If they specialize in the business end, they may manage a horse operation.

"Jennifer's gift is a terrific endorsement of our horse science program. It demonstrates that there are opportunities for support. We hope that others will follow suit and make contributions in areas of their own interest. .

A difficult economic picture on the federal and state government level will present a host of challenges to UW-River Falls as it heads into the current academic year. That assessment was delivered by Chancellor Ann Lydecker on Monday (Aug. 26) in her address to some 400 faculty and staff members that marks the traditional beginning of the school year. Classes begin on Sept. 3.

Lydecker and other senior administrators struck a balance between a potentially bleak fiscal picture against the University's intensive planning process that has outlined nine priority objectives that will help in setting a common vision during the coming years. Last academic year, UW-RF returned over $800,000 to the state to help address its $1.3 billion budget deficit, reported Virgil Nylander, vice chancellor for administration and finance. With a projected shortfall of $2.8 billion in the upcoming biennium, it will magnify the issues confronting UW-RF.

Addressing the political and fiscal climate, Lydecker noted, the University will have to remain aggressive at the federal level to attract funding for student grants and loans, while pursuing new research and program dollars.

"At the state level, the outlook is perhaps even more uncertain," Lydecker said. The current fiscal year budget was settled in late July by draining the state's tobacco settlement fund. "We have a major job ahead of us to educate the populace of this state, and our legislators, about the value of higher education to the long-term economic development of this state. Public higher education is an investment in the future, and it must be a legislative priority.

"The payoffs may not be immediately apparent because it takes four years to produce a graduate. But when we couple our work in preparing future teachers, scientists, artists, government workers, business owners, doctors, lawyers, and other workers with the partnerships and entrepreneurial activity we engage in with business and industry, government, and other agencies, it is clear that playing out the Wisconsin Idea through the UW System is the route to a vital and vibrant state economy in the future," Lydecker said.

She offered that the coming political season will be an important one for students, faculty and staff. National political analysts are predicting a close election for Wisconsin's governor. In Minnesota, that state's new governor will face a $2.3 billion deficit that could affect reciprocity or economic development initiatives that will affect UW-RF and western Wisconsin, Lydecker said.

"If ever there was a year to follow the candidates and vote with knowledge, this is it," Lydecker said. "Listen to what our legislative and gubernatorial candidates have to say about their priorities, about higher education, about balancing the budget. Attend forums where they present their ideas, and then exercise your right to vote, beginning with the primary elections on September 10." She noted that student leaders are planning again to launch a student "get out the vote campaign."

University. Last year, the Board of Regents temporarily froze admissions when confronted with proposed dramatic budget cuts. While the chancellor did not predict the coming biennium's budget debate, she noted that "to maintain quality, we must make adjustments in either access or revenue. When revenue goes down, we must limit access, if quality is to be maintained."

Quoting UW System President Katharine Lyall, Lydecker noted: "The System has absorbed almost $100 million in base cuts during the past decade, while continuing to admit more students in response to enrollments needs. We lead the nation with the lowest administrative costs (5.8 percent) of any public university system, so we educate about 20,000 more students than our peers for the same amount of money? and we have now hit the wall. We cannot continue the downward trend in our budgets."

The fiscal context emphasizes the importance of UW-RF having a common vision and set of institutional priorities, Lydecker said. She noted that the institution will continue to expand on and implement its nine priorities for the years 2003-05.

"We already have a number of existing partnerships, which we think are effective, but we must continue to find means of advancing them and also communicating about them both internally and externally," Lydecker said.

Lydecker said UW-RF must expand and document how resources are used. "Within this goal we will build our advancement operation in order that we may undertake a major fund-raising campaign, which will lead to increased gifts from alumni, parents, faculty, staff, and corporate foundations and ultimately to an endowment of which we can be proud," she concluded.

On Friday, Sep. 6, at 8 p.m., Peter Mayer will perform as the first act in the Coffee House series, also sponsored by the entertainment committee. The concert is free to students and $5 to non-students.

Discussions will address the connection between the way residents live and the future of the river and its landscapes, with a range of topics that includes water quality; conservation; land use planning and Smart Growth; agriculture; and the rights and responsibilities of property owners.

Each forum will feature a keynote speaker, followed by a panel of local citizens representing a variety of voices and perspectives on the changing landscape of the Valley. There will be time after the speaker and panelists for dialogue with the audience.

The keynote speaker for Sept. 12 is Dave Cieslewicz, co-founder and executive director of 1000 Friends of Wisconsin, an organization that develops and supports land use policies to reduce sprawl and strengthen communities. His topic will be, "City Ethic: Urban Conservation and the New Environmentalism."

Throughout the coming year, the St. Croix Scenic Coalition will sponsor several workshops in communities throughout the region, which will be followed by sessions on sustainable economic and community development sponsored by UW-River Falls.

University of Wisconsin System Board of Regents because of concerns over the state's pending budget deficit and potential cuts to the University. Although the budget has not been resolved, the bulk of admitted new students for next fall completed their class registration process in June.

As a result, said Admissions Director Alan Tuchtenhagen, "We now have a better picture of how many admitted students actually will be attending and we believe there will still be some openings for new freshmen and for transfer students."

Tuchtenhagen said that priority will be given to enrolling older, returning students and to local students. Also receiving additional consideration will be those students who choose to major in UW-RF's biotechnology or computer science information systems programs.

Wisconsin counties as a Technology Zone in which high tech businesses will be given special tax incentives to relocate or to expand their operations. "The State of Wisconsin has placed a real priority on developing these high paying industries in western Wisconsin, and we want to ensure there is a supply of well-trained professionals to fill those New Economy job openings as they occur,"

Two years ago the new program was started as a joint effort and became the first program in Wisconsin to develop a certification partnership with a private university, and also the first program to cross state lines between Wisconsin and Minnesota universities. The program enables teachers to remain working while also taking classes towards their principal certification. It was created to meet the needs of the shortage of principals in the region and to provide a program where students did not have to travel long distances to gain proficiency.

UW-RF Professor Florence Monsour, who coordinates the principal certification program, said that the program filled a real gap in teacher training. "There are two other programs in the Wisconsin that offer a master's degree for principals and are located in Milwaukee and Superior," she said. "In this area, there is a shortage of principals and a real need for the program."

The principal certification program has been approved by the Wisconsin Department of Public Instruction. Teachers who are interested in obtaining their certification must commit to a two-year program. Most of the courses are offered over the summer, with a few scheduled during the regular academic year semesters. Currently, the third cohort of future graduates started its classes this summer. The group of students will go through the program together until graduation.

The working group, meeting recently at the University at the request of the national headquarters of the Red Cross, has been exploring how to make numerous activities of an international humanitarian law curriculum fit the national standards for U.S. social studies in American education. Red Cross Chapters in Wisconsin and Minnesota co-sponsored the working task force.

"We live in a time of heightened awareness of armed conflict and the reality of war," said Ogden Rogers, Associate Professor of Social Work at UW-RF and the project facilitator. "The American public needs to know what the rules of human conduct in war are. The Red Cross has a responsibility to reach out to the public and inform it about the meaning of the Geneva Conventions. These are the living rules that help to save lives and to relieve human suffering, even in the terrible face of war."

The project recruited area high school educators to form a focus group to help devise ways that will help American students and teachers learn about the treaties that define war crimes and basic human rights during times of armed conflict.

The teachers focused on national standards that serve as the guidelines for social studies education in the United States. The American Red Cross hopes to take the findings of the group to develop curricular materials for use in American schools.

Local teachers involved in the effort include River Falls High School social studies teacher Doug Hjersjo, who enjoyed the opportunity to lend his expertise in the effort. "These materials will provide students with a opportunity to become actively involved in the learning process," said Hjerso. "The interaction at the UW-RF workshop provided the educators an opportunity to critique and evaluate materials for the Red Cross."

School, noted, "The issues involved in the international humanitarian law are often overlooked by American educational institutions. I was excited about the opportunity to contribute to finding ways by which the Geneva Conventions can be introduced to American teachers and students."

New Richmond teacher Michelle Riba-Doerr said, "I think this is really important for U.S. students because of the increasing political violence that people in the world can experience." A second New Richmond teacher, Mandi Erickson, said, "I'm anxious to see how this important material can be implemented in my own classroom. It was an honor to be working on building a bridge between the Red Cross Movement, educational colleagues, and the Geneva Conventions."

Kurt Leichtle and Emeritus Professor of Teacher Education DeAn Krey. Krey, who recently retired from the University, has been nationally recognized as a contributor to setting the standards of social studies in the U.S. She said she found it very satisfying to work on a curriculum that will be meaningful for youth all over the world.

The American Red Cross hopes to make materials available to U.S. educators in the coming year. "We were very excited to partner with UW-RF and the area teachers who formed our expert task group," said Laurie Fischer, international services associate for the National Headquarters of the American Red Cross.

"The River Falls area is a wonderful place to gather advice on how to present the important message of the Geneva Conventions to American Students. We are so thankful to find such professional and caring volunteers to help us with this mission."

Consider the popcorn kernel, a solid little bead that becomes fluff when it is heated and popped. One can't help but notice that the original kernel has more weight than the popped one, and wonder what happened to change it. The answer is that moisture escaped from the kernel, making it lighter.

Schoolteachers from four states learned to use popped popcorn and other simple illustrations as innovative science projects to explain the concepts of astronomy to their high school or middle school students at "Astronomy in the Ice," a two-week workshop held at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls this summer.

AMANDA is the world's largest detector of the mysterious neutrino, a particle that is almost nothing but may reveal everything about the universe. It has been installed a mile deep in the ice of the South Pole since 1999.

Madsen said the workshop will help teachers to interest students in science and encourage them to choose science as a career. He uses the AMANDA project as the basis for lectures and experiments, because it is an actual scientific discovery project that is relevant to the world the students live in. The experiments he has devised explain complex scientific facts in a way that is easily understood.

The mass was heavier before it was decayed. Scientists inferred that something was missing after decay; that another particle existed that they hadn't detected yet. In their search for what was missin they discovered the neutrino.

Madsen explains.Similar experiments showed the workshop's teachers some concrete ways to help students understand cosmic rays, statistics, the method used for particle detection and how the detector tracks particles in the ice.

Madsen said that Meyer and Eric Muhs, a high school teacher from Seattle who attended the course, will go to the South Pole to participate in the AMANDA project for the upcoming austral summer, which will occur during our winter because it is south of the equator. Funding for their expeditions is provided through the National Science Foundation.

AMANDA was the first stage of the project, and it will run for another few years, according to Madsen. "We are in the final stages of approval for the next stage of experiment, a new detector called IceCube," he said. "If IceCube is approved by the NSF, the experiment will continue for 10 years and will send one or two teachers from K-12, middle school or high school to the Antarctic each year."

Tuesday, June 11, 7 p.m. The opening concert features the band Tropical Breeze, with Caribbean style music takes you on a trip to the islands with the sounds of steel drums, a sweet bass lone, rhythmic bongos, and smooth vocals.

Tuesday, June 18, 7 p.m. MuDaiko-Taiko Drum is a band of Japanese percussionists and a talented flutist who will help listeners to absorb the ancient culture of Japan as they see and hear these amazing musicians.

Tuesday, June 25, 7 p.m. , Lehto and Wright have taken a fresh approach to the world of folk by taking cues from the Irish, English, and American folk traditions and blending them with a healthy dose of original compositions.

Tuesday, July 23, 7 p.m. An authentic German song and dance troupe will be the final concert in the series. Straight from Germany, Enztaler Musikanten and Brant Trachtengruppe are sure to inspire a polka or two.

Concert attendees are encouraged to bring a picnic basket, blanket or lawn chairs, but grills and alcoholic beverages are not permitted. Brats and beverages will be on sale at the concession stand. The rain site will be Brandy's in the Hagestad Student Center.

Lydecker saluted the honorees by noting, "You have proven through your words, deeds, and years of dedicated service that you care for others, and you have used your affections to touch many lives, and to improve life for those you have touched. We are privileged to work along side you and we have benefited from your shining example!"

Faculty with more than 25 years of service received a medallion of the University's seal that is to be worn at formal events that require academic regalia. Classified staff with more than 25 years of service were presented with a paperweight that included the struck University seal.

"The late Mother Theresa once said, 'We can do no great things; only small things with great love.' Our retirees have done many small things, and always with great love and pride." Lydecker asked the retirees to keep in contact with the institution. "Remember this university. We expect to see you back here for musical and theatre performances, athletic events, seminars and lectures, the International Film Festival, the Lion's Paw Book Club, continuing education programs? we want to see you at the Book Store, at Freddy's for lunch, at athletic events, at Falcon Foods for ice cream, cheese and brats; at the Art Gallery during the Annual Scholarship Sale. You name it."

At the ceremony, the faculty members were recognized with certificates of service appreciation from Gov. Scott McCallum and from the University of Wisconsin System Board of Regents. They also received a commissioned glass raindrop paperweight with UW-RF lettering produced by students in the art department's glass studio program.

Albert joined Geography and Mapping Sciences Department since 1977. While the department has become more comprehensive to reflect the trends in the discipline, Albert noted that his role has been that of an "all-purpose human geographer."

Albert noted, "I am proud to have contributed to the progress and evolution of the Geography and GIS/Cartography programs, as I view the study of geography as an essential part of a liberal education, as well as a discipline that imparts practical knowledge that needs to be applied to the solution of many problems that we face, regionally, nationally, and globally. I am proud to have contributed to the education and success of many students who are at work applying geographic principles for the betterment of society.

Department Chair Charlie Rader noted of Albert: "His versatility as a geographer has made him an extremely valuable department member in that his interests and teaching abilities broadly span the discipline. His depth of knowledge and sense of humor make his classroom both informative and fun, and his lectures are always well illustrated with slides from his many travels.

"Over the years that I have worked with Mike, I have found him to be an exemplary role model. He will leave a big gap to fill in our department. But to echo his own words: 'We'll get through this, somehow, I guess.' "

"He directed the Honors Program for many years, developed a particularly important course in International Literature, and he remained active in scholarly presentations, including papers delivered this year and last year on 'The Uses of Speculative Fiction in the Nineties.' "

Albert will spend his retirement in various pursuits: he plans to work during retirement in his hometown of Prescott, reading and continuing his scholarly activity, hopefully presenting at least one paper a year.

As one would expect from someone so intimately associated with teaching, Krey will take away with her many fond recollections of students. Krey notes, "A memory that prevails is that of watching more than 5,000 pre-student teachers change from college students into future elementary school teachers. They were like butterflies emerging from a cocoon as they prepared lesson plans and taught children in the public schools for the first time. This was the most satisfying element of my work."

An has been extremely valuable as a faculty member because she consistently models what she teaches in the classroom, and she also embodies commitment to instruction at the college level, which has been our most honored tradition at UW-RF. The department will miss her leadership and passion for teaching."

